Authors
Ted Prigge
Number of Reviews
274

Title
Review for Alien (1979)
Director: Ridley Scott
Writer: Dan O'Bannon (with story by Dan O'Bannon and Thilo Newman)
Starring: Sigourney Weaver, Tom Skerritt, Ian Holm, Veronica Cartwright,
Yaphet Kotto, Harry Dean Stanton, John Hurt, Bolaji Badejo, Helen Horton
Some horror films just get off on non-stop gore, cheap thrills, and,
well, bad acting.  "Alien" has none of these.  It's an atmospheric,
claustriophobic, slow-moving creep-fest, playing more like a cross
between a Hitchcock film and an Angathie Christie novel than a 50s
horror hokefest they show on "Mystery Science Theatre 3000."
"Alien" takes place almost entirely on a large mining ship returning to
earth.  It's a dark ship, filled with numerous crevices and ducts, and
seems almost inhuman.  There are seven people in hibernation for the
journey home: Dallas (Tom Skerritt), the semi-reluctant leader; Ash (Ian
Holm), the science officer who is always working for science first,
people later; Lambert (Veronica Cartwright), a frail woman; Parker
(Yaphett Kotto), a bitter technician; Brett (Harry Dean Stanton), who's
quiet and reserved; Kane (John Hurt), another officer; and, of course,
Ellen Ripley (Sigourney Weaver), stuck in middle management.
The crew is woken from hibernation to do a little job on the way home,
which requires them to journey down to the planet they're by, and do a
little reserarch.  The first forty minutes are very slow, allowing us to
just witness what is going on and get to know the characters in a
relaxing fashion.  We see some of them journey down to the planet, and
find a bunch of pods.  When one of them, Kane, gets too close to an open
pod, a little face hugger leaps out, and attaches itself to his face.
After awhile of not being able to get the hugger off, it dies, and Kane
seems fine.  Then at a frightening dinner, he begins coughing
uncontrolably, and an alien pops out of his stomach, killing him, and
escaping.  The rest of the film is a slow-moving, scary execution in
pure style as the alien hunts them down one by one, some twists come
out, and then it ends in a non-anti-climactic finale.
What's so memorable about "Alien," why it has survived the test of time,
and spurned out three sequels, is because of the way its constructed. 
Sure, it's slow moving, but that adds to the overall tension of the
film.  The alien is only seen in its fullness for a brief couple
seconds, and even then it's in the dark.  Ripley Scott has never been
one for pure nihilistic spectacle.  His "Blade Runner" is a thoughtful
futuristic film noir, filled with tension instead of excitement.  The
same applies to "Alien."  It's also not very gory, which actually works
for the better of the film.
The film was very monumental as it showed that a horror film could be
intelligent and even satirical.  The stance it takes on the government
is awesome, and utterly creepy.  Sure, it's a technqiue which is done in
all of the other sequels, but when Ripley discovers the truth, it's much
more of a shock than it was in the others.
The film is also monumental in the way of women's liberation.  Ellen
Ripley, as played by Sigourney Weaver, is a very strong woman role
model, one who is tough without becoming manly.  Weaver's an excellent
actress, one who can act seriously without becoming melodramatic.  Her
performances in the "Alien" films are an example that even women can
head up a big action pic (even if she got second bill for this).
All the acting in this is very good.  The best performances come from,
of course, Weaver; but also Tom Skerritt, who seems to not like what
he's doing on the ship; and the uber-god Ian Holm, who makes a perfect
Ash.  I suppose a little mention should go to John Hurt for being able
to act like an alien is actually popping out of his chest (and would do
again in Mel Brook's "Spaceballs").  All of them do a good job with the
film.
But, as always, the film's strength is with the director.  Each of the
"Alien" films have a different feel.  With Cameron, it was tense and
emotionally exhausting.  With Fincher, it was atmospheric.  With Jeunet,
it was, well, french and darkly comic and weird.  Director Ridley Scott
(who would go on to direct "Blade Runner" and "Thelma and Louise") goes
for creepy and leisurely.  There are only a few moments where there are
big shocks, and there are no moments of adrenalin pushing excitement,
which would be found in its first sequel, "Aliens."  Not to say that
"Alien" is without its tense moments.  The film is really an exercise in
mounting tension, starting out with none at all, then escalating to long
periods of heavy breathing, as Ripley tries to escape while afraid that
the Alien will pop out at any moment and take her life.
This is the strength of this film: the ability to make us cringe without
getting too gory on us.  In fact, there's relatively little blood in
this film, and it sometimes seems that the only thing that's cut from
this when it's on TV is the language, which is sometimes foul (it's a
mining ship, folks).  "Alien" is not just a visual tour de force, it's
an all-around tour de force.
The only problem I have with this one is it is sometimes TOO leisurely. 
I like how it takes 45 minutes to even see the first alien pod, but I
don't like sitting through it.  Sure, the film is amazing to look at,
and I like how it feels to just sit back and witness these people doing
stuff that we don't always understand - sometimes not knowing is part of
the overall brilliance - but for a second sitting, it seems even
longer.  The film really gets going when the alien has escaped from
Kane's body, even if it is predictable.  The direction holds it
together, and makes the film seem overall amazing.
"Alien" is the rare horror/sci-fi film that can still shock after years
of release.  Even when most of the stuff from this has been recycled
over and over again, and there have been three sequels, we can still go
back and have a great time by watching this film, an amazing example of
great and controlled filmmaking.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Director: Mimi Leder
Writers: Bruce Joe Rubin and Michael Tolkin
Starring: Téa Leoni, Elijah Wood, Morgan Freeman, Robert Duvall, Maximilian
Schell, Vanessa Redgrave, Leelee Sobieski, Ron Eldard, Mary McCormack,
Blair Underwood, Jon Favreau, Laura Innes, Rya Kihlstedt, Richard Schiff,
Betsy Brantley, Derek de Lint, Kurtwood Smith, James Cromwell, Charles
Martin Smith
With "Deep Impact," what you really have is not only a return-to-form for
the "Disaster" Films, which at best were suspense films centered around the
various people involved (my personal favorite is the Steve McQueen/Paul
Newman/William Holden/O.J. Simpson epic, "The Towering Inferno"), but also
a little bit of optimism for future disaster films.  After all, haven't we
been bombarded with the most inane disaster films as of late (such as
"Twister" and "Volcano," neither which had one interesting character)?  We
sure have, and if anything, "Deep Impact" is a nice try at being something
great, as well as a big fresh of air from seeing way too many big special
effects become the forefront in films.
"Deep Impact" is the first of the two comets-heading-directly-for-earth
arriving in theaters this summer (the other being "Armageddon," which is
frantically trying to make itself look more human), but the focus isn't
even really on the comet itself - it's on the people involved.  After all,
if a comet was to strike earth, this would really make up for about five to
ten minutes of cool special effects when the comet actually hits, and
perhaps about ten to fifteen minutes of other special effects when the
astronaut team tries to blow it up.  There's a whole lot of filling time in
there, and "Deep Impact" figures that it shouldn't be about the comet
itself but rather its impact on the people it will affect.
The film begins with the discovery of the comet, and quickly establishes
the measures taken by political offices around the world to deal with it. 
They decide to send a Russian-American team of astronauts/miners to land on
the comet, plant a couple bombs, and then set it off months before it hits
earth.  Of course, there's a back-up plan, which involves randomly
selecting a certain amount of people to live in a cave for a couple years
until the dust settles and they can try and repopulate the world (a plan
which was thought up in none other than "Dr. Strangelove").  This is all
very scary, and luckily, it's handled that way, almost in the same scary
way that "Outbreak" dealt with the blocking off of the town so that the
virus did not escape.
But this is not the real focus of the film: it's main point is to show you
the various people it affects, and so we can see a wide variety of people,
it choses three chief groups.  We have Leo Beiderman (Elijah Wood), who was
the kid who discovered the comet during a meeting of "The Astronomers
Club," and who has to deal with the fact that he may not be able to bring
his girlfriend (Leelee Sobieski) along to live in the caves, and if he may,
she may not go because her parents may not be able to come along.  There's
also Jenny Lerner (Téa Leoni, who has a very cute neurotic quality), a
rising MSNBC anchor (giving the station the most press it has ever had) who
not only tries to uncover the comet story when it's still off-grounds to
the public, but who finds she has to deal with her feelings for her father
(Oscar-winner Maximilian Schell) when he decides to remarry a younger woman
instead of getting back together with her mother (Vanessa Redgrave).
And we also have the story of the astronauts/miners who are landing on the
comet, led by the aging Spurgeon "Fish" Tanner (Robert Duvall, hot once
again off his performance in "The Apostle") after an accident with the
other leader (Ron Eldard).  As "Armageddom" is making these people the
focus of its film, "Deep Impact" makes them an equal to the other two
stories, and tries to flesh out their lives to show the pain of having to
perhaps be a martyr (one astronaut, played by Mary McCormack, wryly says
"If we do this, they'll name high schools after us").
And at the head of it all is the President, played with dignity and grace
by Morgan Freeman, who is so good in the role that I'd probably vote for
him if he ran in a couple years.  Unfortunately very little is done with
his character, and one early scene involving him actually harms his persona
from that point on, even if in all reality it was only a hoax (you have to
see it to understand what I mean).
I've been hearing lots of people complaining about the hokiness that this
film has, how all of its characters are stereotypes or paper thin, and
partially these people are right.  This film is corny, and no character is
fully fleshed out enough to truly and deeply associate with them.  Then
again, the same thing could be said about "Titanic," which featured two
romantic leads who were hardly fully-realized people (she's rich and he's
poor, and they love eachother...that's about it).  But like I said with
that film, stereotyping and not fully developing characters actually helps
here.  The people in this film are broad generalizations that only help us
to feel for them more and find ourselves in them.  We can all (hopefully)
associate with Leo when he's worried about parting with his beloved
girlfriend, because, hey, we wouldn't want to leave her behind either.  And
we can all associate with Jenny, because we've all had a grudge against
someone that we fear we may have to fess up to if something like this comes
along.  If these people were more complex, we'd not be able to really find
ourselves in them, because the more complex a person is and the more we
know about them, the less we can say "Yeah, the same thing happens to me
too!" and since that's what this film's big strength is, I can't say it's a
big flaw.
"Deep Impact" has many many many problems, so many that a big list could be
made of them (every twist in the story happens so the conclusion can
happen, what's up with Charles Martin Smith being killed for no reason in
the beginning, why deal with the cover-up of the comet when it really has
nothing to do with the rest of the film, not enough Vanessa Redgrave or
Maxmilian Schell to really feel for them completely, how come Elijah can
easily climb that mountain, etc, etc, etc.), but if I were to make a list
of them and take off points for every thing that went wrong with this film,
I'd really be cheating you out of a review.  If anything, the real problem
with the film is it puts too much into its conclusion and not enough into
its exposition.  But "Deep Impact" is, after all, more of a sign of
optimism for future films than a really great film.  With this and
"Titanic," we see Hollywood is changing for the better, and that future
films won't be as soulless as, say, "Godzilla" or "Twister."  We can expect
better characters, more interesting plotlines, and much more.
If you're having trouble seeing past the cliches, then think of that scene
where you see the big tidal wave towards the end about to come down on two
main characters, you don't think "Wow!  What a cool effect!," but instead
think "Oh shit, that wave is going to kill them!"  I could easily point out
that this scene is cheap because one character had to kill themself to put
them there, and that it looks fake, and a couple other things to demean it.
 But I'd be lying if I didn't say that I cared.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for He Got Game (1998)
Writer/Director: Spike Lee
Starring: Denzel Washington, Ray Allen, Milla Jovovich, Rosario Dawson,
Zelda Harris, Jim Brown, Bill Nunn, Ned Beatty, John Turturro, Charles
Barkley, Larry Bird, Michael Jordon, John Thompson, John Wallace, John
Chaney
Young basketball player Jesus Shuttlesworth (Ray Allen) has been playing
basketball for as long as he can remember and now finds that he is the top
college draft pick in the U.S.  He's on the cover of numerous magazines, is
being badgered by every single big college university with a basketball
team (including Temple U - yea), and is being offered all sorts of pay offs
from everyone.  He's so good that he doesn't even need to go to college; he
could just go right on to the NBA.  Jesus finds himself at the crossroads
of his life, but when asked what he's going to do, he just says "I'm
weighing all my options."
Spike Lee's newest film (or joint), "He Got Game," is not so interested in
the game of basketball itself as it is in the drama of a person who is so
good that he finds that everyone he knows is only interested in him as a
basketball player.  His girlfriend, Lala (Rosario Dawson), pretends to like
him even though she's obviously fallen out of love from him, but is in it
because she gets a part of his money for being the "sweetheart."  Even his
uncle (Lee staple, Bill Nunn) is getting paranoid that he's not going to
give him a cut.  Except for his sister (Zelda Harris), who he's raised by
himself since he was a kid, there's only one other person who really cares
for him as a person.
Unfortunately, that person is his father, Jake (Denzel Washington, with a
pretty cool-looking afro, which surprisingly works for him), who has been
in jail for six years for murdering his mother in a fit of rage.  Sure, it
was an accident, but Jesus holds so much contempt for Jake that he has
convinced himself that he doesn't even have a father.  However, Jake is
given a second chance with him when the warden of Jake's prison (Ned
Beatty) gets orders from the governor to let Jake out so he can convince
Jake to go to the college the governor wants him to go to.  He has one
week, and if he does so, the governor may just shorten his sentence.
While this premise seems pretty forced, it's merely a bit of a stretch done
by Lee to show how important basketball is handled when compared with life.
 Sure, it's forced and no prison would let a criminal out into the real
world so he can convince an estranged son to go to a certain university. 
And why would they chose Jake?  Doesn't Jesus hate Jake?  Wouldn't he be
the last person they'd chose?  But hey, it's a movie: get over it.
Anyway, Jake is shuffled out of prison in secret, and is given two hard-ass
parole officers (one played by Jim Brown) who attach a bug to him so they
can see where he is at all times, give him a couple bucks, and toss him
into a cheap hotel while they go stay at a classier place.  Jake has a
limit of one week to talk to his son and get him to sign a contract for
this certain university.  And, of course, Jesus is not pleased to see him,
and no, Jake does not give up.
The great thing about this movie is how the drama between Jake and his son
is given a very realistic feel.  Jesus is still very pissed off at Jake,
and does not give in enough to let him get a lot of conversation in, but
knows deep down inside that it was an accident, creating an inner war.  He
knows that Jake is the only one who gives a shit about him, but just can't
come to forgive him for what he's done.
Meanwhile, Jesus is being shown all the perks of being a great basketball
player, getting lots of under the counter illegal deals, not only from
universities but also from his own potential agent.  He turns all of these
down, but as the film goes on, we sense that any time, he's going to give
in and take anything they offer him.
And while this is going on, Jake is desperately trying to find a way to
connect with his son.  But in the meantime, he finds he needs to help a
prostitute (Milla Jovovich, the fifth element from "The Fifth Element") who
lives next door to him who feels beaten down by not only her pimp, but
basically life.  This is probably the only weak link in the film, but it
does show a man who has definitely changed.
We see some of the past in flashbacks, where a heavily demanding Jake
forces his son to play basketball, almost causing him to detest it in the
process.  There are two reasons why we see these: a) because we want to be
able to understand the reason why Jesus is so pissed off at his father; and
b) so we can understand Jake's point of view.  What other films use
flashbacks so well, which not only educate us about the characters, but
take both sides on the stories?
This could all be handled like a TV movie starring Tori Spelling and that
guy who played Zach on "Saved by the Bell," but Lee gives the film so much
spirit and emotion that it works on multiple levels, none which insult us. 
We see a powerful, intelligent drama which might have seemed forced if done
by another director, but instead seems emotional because of Lee.  We also
see a biting satire on the sports world, which cares only about money and
talent, not the game itself.
Spike Lee obviously loves basketball.  What is the one image you think of
when you think of Lee?  It's either him hanging with Michael Jordon, or him
sitting in the front row of a Knick's game.  Lee shows his love for the
sport in the beginning, which is a wonderful montage of all sorts of people
playing basketball in all kinds of ways.  There's no professional players,
but there are lots of shots on people in inner-city courts playing in teams
or in doubles, and even a couple people shooting into an open-ended basket
nailed onto a wall.  All this is done to the music of Aaron Copland, which
underscores a lot of the film majestically.
The point that Lee is making in this film is that there is a line between
loving the game and playing it professionally.  Lee is not only attacking
college and professional basketball for being too into money than into the
real game, but also the parents who try to live through their children by
pushing them to do something they may not even enjoy.  I used to play tee
ball, and I probably would have liked it if the coaches were as well;
instead, they want to win, and they forget why they're playing in the first
place.
All this is done using Lee's incredible craftsmanship.  I've seen only a
few Lee films, but every one of them has blown me away by his use of great
camera and technical work, as well as the way he presents his topics.  He
always shows a great deal of love with them yet is still able to distance
himself from the story, telling it with passion but not so much passion
that it collapses.  Here, he's able to distance himself from one of his
biggest passions, and tell a story not so much about basketball, but the
love of basketball, and the way that human emotions are often muted in
favor of "greater" things.
The film's music is something that should also be noted.  I mentioned the
score, which from Aaron Copland ballets, but the film also features a whole
array of songs by Public Enemy, who have been featured in some of his
films, most notably "Do the Right Thing" (remember that big ass boom box
that Radio Raheem had?  or that dance Rosie Perez does?).  The songs work
nicely with the film, especially the song that features the Buffalo
Springfield riff, and all of them work in great contrast with the Copland
score.
The acting is another great thing, with Denzel Washington easily walking
away with the best performance in the film.  In Jake, he creates an
incredibly complex character, one that would seem impossible to play, but
is done with such ease by Denzel that it almost seems easy.  He's easy to
sympathize with, even after the flashback scenes, which are horrifying.
Ray Allen is also very good, although a bit wooden (hey, he's a basketball
player).  He shows some great emotion in a couple scenes, primarily a scene
where he sees his father for the first time in six years...in his
kitchen...with his sister.  Also good are Milla Jovovich, as the
hooker/friend of Jake's; Jim Brown, as a hot-headed parole officer; Ned
Beatty, as the warden of Attica; and John Turturro, in a one-scene
performance as the coach of a college basketball team which is interested
in gaining Jesus as one of their team members...VERY interested.  And look
for a wide assortment of cameos from people from the wide world of
basketball, including Dick Vitale, Michael Jordan (who gets the privilege
of saying the film's title), and even Temple Basketball coach, John Chaney
(did I even spell his name right?), who appeared four times in the film,
each time garnering loud applause by the audience.
The ending of the film, especially the climactic basketball match, is, yes,
anticlimactic, but still poetic.  It takes someone like Spike Lee to make
something like this cinematic, and I can't really think of many directors
who can give a film about basketball a feeling of originality, and even
emotion.  It's the best basketball film since "White Men Can't Jump," only
it's better.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Swimming with Sharks (1994)
Writer/Director: George Huang
Starring: Kevin Spacey, Frank Whaley, Michelle Forbes, Benicio Del Toro
I hated my last boss.  I mean it.  He was a giant schmuck who, after two
years of service, one of them being without a doubt the most competent
worker in my field of work, gave me a total of five raises, culminating
at the current minimum wage while my peers were being promoted to the
better next level (cook - I was a busboy, by the way).  He was also too
moody, often acting like a total asshole, which was different than him
being only a quarter of an asshole the rest of the time.  I mean, I was
afraid to even approach this guy to tell him the sink was clogged.  I
know that if I had the chance to literally bit the shit out of him
without anyone knowing about it and no repurcussions for my actions, I
would have done it.
That's what this film does...well, sorta.  It also gives a satirical
look at Hollywood, but it seemed only secondary to the whole "My boss is
an asshole!" spiel.  Watching the abused employee finally enact his
revenge on his sadistic, immature boss throughout the film, between
flashbacks, is one of the most entertaining things I've ever seen.  Of
course, not all of the film is as good as watching this and laughing at
the boss mock the employee.
Frank Whaley plays a hopeful filmmaker, and recent graduate of film
school, who lands a temporary desk job at a film company, acting as the
secreatary to one of the executives of the company, Buddy (Kevin Spacey,
the year he was in four films and became a superstar and in one of his
most memorably flawless performances).  The outgoing secretary (Benicio
Del Toro, stealing scenes as usual) warns him that he'll become a
bitter, coffee-downing, chain-smoking nervous wreck but will finally
settle into cynicism, but Frank's optimistic.
Buddy is the most childish excuse for a man.  A selfish, immature
asshole who makes my boss look like Mother Teresa (God rest her
overlooked soul, since Di's death overshadowed that of the most
selfless, caring person since Jesus).  He humiliates him from the first
sentence, and mocks him sadistically throughout the film, uses him for
his own personal gain, treats him like a slave, and drives him into near
insanity.
Also going on in poor Frank's life is a relationship with another
selfish woman (Michelle Forbes), who is also in the film business, has
slept her way to the top, and may be using Frank to sleep her way into
Buddy's services.  But she claims to really care about him, even when
he's sleeping into insanity and possible homicidal tendencies.
In the beginning (and gradually throughout the film, since the past is
told through flashbacks), Frank walks into Buddy's house with a gun,
ties him down to a chair, and proceeds to torture him in some original
and not-so-original ways (to get an idea how cool it is, he uses an
envelope to give him some uncomfortable paper cuts).  The plot twists a
bit, we laugh some more, then things get dark and kinda depressing.
While the torture scenes and flashbacks are well done, the ending is too
dark for what happens.  It works well, but this whole obsession with
being brooding and overly serious doesn't mesh well with the black
comedy of the first hour or so.  But other than that, this is a really
funny black comedy that satisfies anyone's needs to ever beat up their
awful, power-hungry bosses.  And, it even says a bit about how horrible
those nasty Hollywood-ites.  But, we all knew that anyway, didn't we?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Roi de coeur, Le (1966)
Director: Philippe de Broca
Writer: Daniel Boulanger (story by Maurice Bessy)
Starring: Alan Bates, Jean-Claude Brialy, Françoise Christophe,
Genevičve Bujold, Michel Serrault, Pierre Brasseur, Adolfo Celi, Julien
Guiomar, Palau
"King of Hearts" is an anti-war film, and God knows we don't need
another anti-war film, but this is a rather peculiar one.  Instead of
getting its message of peace and love and all that good stuff across via
cheap, blatant, and banal manner, as is the case of many films (even
Kurosawa's great film "Ran" features some awful dialogue in one scene
about how God is crying because he sees us killing eachother for no
reason - oi), it opts for a different approach, one that never allows it
to succumb to any sort of anti-war cliches.
The great thing is, though, that it never comes at all close to feeling
cliched.  When "King of Hearts" opens, it opens lightly.  We see men at
war, fighting eachother, and if it weren't for the wacky credits (which
give the film a nice tone), we'd probably think this is a serious war
film, maybe about the lives of some of the army men or a little bit of
history we never learned about.  The film takes place during World War
II in a small French town, and when it opens, the Scottish and German
armies are fighting around it.  But it looks like the Germans have the
upper hand: they've placed a bomb in the clock tower of the town, ready
to explode at midnight that night.
The Scottish Army has their spies, though, and one of them overhears the
discussion, and is in the process of revealing it to his side when he is
discovered, and shot on sight.  With only part of the message in tact,
they send the only Scot who can speak French to go into the town, hide
as one of the town's inhabitants, find the bomb, and disarm it - one
Private Charles Plumpick (a young Alan Bates).  When he gets to the
town, though, the Germans spot him immediately, and chase him around
town until he hides in the local asylum, which now holds what seems to
be most of the original town members.  The Germans follow him in, and
Plumpick disguises himself as one of the patients, proclaiming himself
to be "The King of Hearts" when asked by the soldiers, since he sees a
playing card of the same title and in an effort to assimilate with the
nuts.
Once the Germans have left, he leaves to, but accidentally leaves the
gates to the asylum open, letting all the patients go as well.  They
re-populate the town, bringing back their old jobs, and old social
status.  And as an added bonus, they begin to hail Plumpick as the King,
since that's what he said his name was earlier.  Plumpick begins
mingling with them, trying desperately to warn them of the bomb that is
still going to erupt, and of the war going on around them on all sides
of the town, but they act oblivious of everything.
"King of Hearts" could be a grand old blatant satire, one where the
crazy people are the only sane ones because they get along and do not
believe in any war, and for the most part it is.  It's a philosophical
film, where we're asked who are the real crazy people, and where we're
asked to gulp the notion that if we don't see something's wrong, it's
not wrong after all.  The people in this film are sunny and cheery,
hinting cynically that the key to happiness is insanity, while the sane
are the miserable and moronic.  The character Plumpick is our window
into the world of the townspeople, and as he gets more accustomed to
their world being the real world as they become more and more his
friends, we experience the same thing.
But satire needs something else to push it along, to make it watchable
and lovable.  Many mediums make the mistake that if you just push
theories and make bold statements that the entertainment will come
naturally.  "King of Hearts" retains its power as a philosophical satire
on war, but all the while it possesses a totally different facade, that
of a human comedy.  The entire feel of the film is that of light comedy,
where everything is taken with a sense of humor that anyone can relate
to, and instead of coming across with a fierce, acidic contempt for war,
it comes across as a silly, lovable comedy that shows us that the real
reason is war is bad is because it's moronic.
"King of Hearts" moves at a steady pace towards no real conclusion,
since its message is able to be ascertained rather early in the film, so
what it fills the screen time with is dropping in on the crazy
inhabitants of the town.  Phillipe de Broca's direction throughout all
this is light but moving, as he takes the time to really make the former
patients into real people, and in one long sequence, quietly observes
each as patient as they relearn their original places in society.
The script by Daniel Boulanger is a witty and warm one, creating a
society that's like no other, not only because the inhabitants are all
crazy, but also because unlike most societies, they effortlessly get
along with one another, despite the fac that each of them is a unique,
original creation.  There's a Duke and Duchess (Jean-Claude Brialy and
Françoise Christophe) who walk around gaily, totally content with
everything going around them, and having absolute confidence in their
social statuses.  As a love interest for Plumpick, there's a tarty waif
(a tres young Genevičve Bujold) who's elected to be the girl who
satisfies Plumpick's more sensual desires, since he is the king (and
good it is to be, obviously).  Even famous actor Michel Serrault (known
to American audiences as the gay, quasi-transvestite lover in "La Cage
Aux Folles") plays, of all things, a foppish hair dresser.
We soon get sucked into their world, as Plumpick does, and toward the
end, when conclusions have to be arranged, we almost forget that there's
still a bomb to destroy and maybe even a battle to be fought.  Luckily,
none of this corrupts anything that goes on in the town, and we never
have to really chose which world we'd rather belong to: that of the
armies or that of the insane French town.  This leaves the viewer with
the chance to just bask in the glow of a really hilarious and very
pleasing film that doesn't argue its message with the viewer via corny
or ignorant measures.  And there's just something to be said about an
anit-war film when following a battle where everyone has been brutally
killed, the comment following it is "They're overacting."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Murder at 1600 (1997)
Director: Dwight H. Little
Writers: Wayne Beach and David Hodgin
Starring: Wesley Snipes, Diane Lane, Daniel Benzali, Alan Alda, Dennis 
Miller, Ronny Cox, Tate Donovan, Harris Yulin, Norman Fell
"Murder at 1600" deals with the rather "Absolute Power"-esque (a far 
better film, by the way) problem that the president may have had sex 
with another woman who wasn't the first lady and then brutally murdered 
her and shoved her corpse in a bathroom in the White House.  Now, I'm 
sorry, but they have the Secret Service to deal with the corpse, and 
they wouldn't just toss it in a bathroom.  Anyway, the chief suspect is 
one of the cleaner's of the White House, and the investigator is a cool 
and inquisitive detective played by the cool Wesley Snipes, and of 
course buddied by wisecracking ubergod, Dennis Miller, who seems to have 
written a line or two of his own dialogue.
Snipes is aided in his investigation with not much initial help by a 
Secret Service chick played by Diane Lane.  But the investigation is 
limited by a creepy White House staffer played by the Daddy 
Warbucks-looking Daniel Benzali (from "Murder One").  He limits nearly 
everything, hindering Snipes investigation.  Also in on the 
investigation is another staffer (Alan Alda), the president's horny son 
(Tate Donovan), and, of course, the President (Ronny Cox), who seems 
rather ignorant with everything anyway.
Now, this film is not a bad film at all.  The plot twists are 
interesting, though not very shocking since somehow you can feel the 
twists minutes before.  And the film has a totally original albeit 
unbelievably proposterous finale, including sneaking into the White 
House (????).  And, of course, the acting's good.  And the actor chosen 
to play the big villain is a totally original choice.  I like that pick 
of casting a lot.
But the characters are all cardboard and any kind of character 
developments are just there for plot reasons.  For instance, Diane 
Lane's characters was a sharpshooter in the Olympics back in the 80s, so 
you know she's gonna be used to shoot some badguys.  And, as most films 
do, it uses the great comic brilliance of Dennis Miller as just a 
character who will either be wounded or killed (I won't say which).  On 
his show once, he said the reason his personality shines through each of 
his film personas is because their so thinly drawn.  He's so right.  The 
guy's a genius, give him a good part some day, will ya?
Anyway, the film is pretty fun for a cliched-ridden thriller, and has 
some really cool plot twists.  It's not its absurdity that's wrong with 
it, but lack of innovation and originality that wounds it.  It's not a 
bad film, but it's nothing special either.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for M (1931)
Director: Fritz Lang
Writers: Paul Falkenberg, Adolf Jansen, Fritz Lang, Karl Vash, and Thea von
Harbou
Starring: Peter Lorre, Gustaf Gründgens, Ellen Widmann, Inge Landgut, Theo
Lingen, Otto Wernicke, Frank Stein, Theodor Loos, Georg John
Fritz Lang's "M" is one of the great philosophical films, primarily because
its anger and message are not bogged down in pretentious overtones with
crush the story of the film, rendering it almost unwatchable a second time.
 It's a film where the meanings and anger of the film are not fully
comprehended in one single showing because it raises so many questions
about crime, punsihment, and authority.  But what's really amazing is how
it's first and foremost a gripping story about a murderer and the pursuit
of him, and then its philosophical.  What a concept.
"M" is all about a man named Hans Beckert (Peter Lorre, in the role that
made him internationally famous) who is an infamous child killer who the
police have been after for months, as his acts have been serial.  The first
10 minutes of the film introduces him as the public sees him: he woos a
little girl on her way home from school with candy and balloons, and then
we see an intensely creepy montage of the girl's ball rolling in the grass,
and the balloon he bought for her stuck in electric wires.  This whole
segment is intercutted with the girl's mom waiting at home for her to
arrive, and growing more and more worried as the time passes.  And we get
the saddening, scary shot of the woman's cry for her daughter being echoed
in an empty room.
The film immeadiatly launches into a kind of documentary on what the police
are doing to track him down, including night raids on criminal spots where
they think the killer may be, and propaganda for kids to learn not to talk
to any strangers.  The public is furious that the police haven't caught
him, and some even begin doing their own investigated work, albeit less
successful or deft as the police.  There's a scene towards the end that
perfectly sums up what this film is about: an old man is seen innocently
talking to a child, and before he knows it, a mob of people have formed
around him, and begin attacking him, saying that he's the infamous
murderer.  Of course, the man isn't the murderer, but it shows what people
become when they are angry and want to take their vengeance out on someone
without proof.
We also discover that the other really pissed off people in this matter are
the local mafiasos, who meet to discuss how they too will try and track
them down.  In one of the best parallel action sequences I've ever seen,
Lang shows the mafiasos discussing their plans as well as the police's
plans, and both seem eerily similar (even though they're marginally
different).  And soon the criminal underground, the police, and the general
public all seem to be the same.
The film also shows us Hans, who, in one brief shot, looks at himself in
the mirror and makes a nasty face like the monster the people believe him
to be.  The opening scenes of him show him as such, as we see him primarily
in shadow, and eerily whistling Grief's "In the Hall of the Mountain King"
over and over again until it becomes his signature tune.  The fact is we
never really see him up close, only in the form of shadows, and when we do,
he's not this monster he's made out to be.  It would be cheap if he was
such a monster, but the film shows Hans to be a man with a really sick
impulse, one that he cannot control, and one that is driving him insane. 
Peter Lorre's portrayal of Hans is not as a horrible creature, but as a
frightened human being.
The one scene that perfectly sums up who Hans really is and how he feels to
be himself is a pivotal scene where a man has discovered that he's the
killer and tries to place a marker on his back so that he can be found more
easily.  So the man sketches an "M" on his hand, trips into Hans as he
walks by him, and places the "M" on his back shoulder.  A couple seconds
later, Hans looks back into a mirror behind him and notices the "M."  His
entire face looses color and from this point on the film becomes a
merciless rush of fear and paranoia.
Hans has very little time in the film, but in one final scene, he is
captured and brought before a council of citizens and criminals (no police)
who have gone out of their way to get him for themselves and before the
police do.  There, he's placed on trial with the mafia don as the
prosecuting attorney, and a defense counsel man who basically says there's
not much he can do for him.  Here, a frightened Hans looks death right in
the face of all the people who hate him, and tries to desperately plea for
his life.  "I cannot help what I do!" he shouts out, but the people can't
get out of their mind what they see when they read the headlines,
announcing that he's killed another child.
"M" is angry about so many things in society, namely the way that people
refuse to see past what they hear about, and the way that people decide
other peoples' fates.  The trial scene is quickly exposed as a simple form
of revenge by a bunch of pissed off people, as well as some who are also
hypocrites.  How ironic is it for a criminal who has killed dozens of
people in his life to sentence a man to death for murder?  And who is to
say that another man must die because of what he has done and for what he
is?
Hans is seen as a murderer, but no one appears to want to help this man. 
They just want to kill him.  Society often wants to easily rid themselves
of people who don't fit in with them, who cause a roucous in the waves of
society, and that's what this film is about.  People refuse to look
underneath Hans and see a man who needs psychiatric help; they just see a
man who has killed a bunch of kids.  They block out Hans' desperate cries
for help, and refuse to understand him.  This film asks us to understand
people who commit crimes against society, for after all they are human
beings.
"M" was restored last year after being released on video in a murky,
screwed-up version filled with bad sub-titles and unwatchable scenes.  This
new version really clears things up and allows us to see what Lang wanted
us to see.  The film was a major innovative film when it came out, as it
was one of the first "talkies," and uses its sound so carefully and
effectively that its a wonder that anyone was able to be impressed with it
by viewing the older version.
When Fritz Lang made this, he was speaking out about his homeland, Germany,
and the atrocities they were having at the time (as well as in the time
when he made "Metropolis").  But this film actually goes beyond that.  It's
a universal story because things like this still happen today, when one
person is seen as the one to die for everyone's anger.  Hans Beckert was
based on a real person, but this person is a regular in history, and this
film doesn't intend to make him out to be a monster, but really a person
who just has some really major problems.
What's amazing about Fritz Lang's storytelling is how he doesn't let his
message become overbearing or pretentious.  "M" is an intensely watchable
film, one that holds the audience's attention, and in the process, stirs
them up, and makes them think about what is occurring.  A lesser director
would have made this a blatant satire, but Lang lets the story tell itself
and the meaning to come out through it, much like he did with "Metropolis."
 Lang is angry, but he's also doesn't to be condescending about it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Man Who Knew Too Much, The (1934)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: Charles Bennett and D.B. Wyndham-Lewis
Starring: Leslie Banks, Edna Best, Peter Lorre, Frank Vosper, Hugh
Wakefield, Nova Pilbeam, Pierre Fresnay, Cicely Oates, D.A. Clarke-Smith,
George Curzon
Hitchcock's earlier British films (he went to Hollywood in 1940) are
neither as glamorous or ambigous as his older films, but were still amazing
as they told simple stories in the most complex and amazing ways possible. 
"The Man Who Knew Too Much" is one of the best films he ever made, showing
him in the top of his filmmaking craft, as he structures a film which could
thrill and entertain as well as be a great example of fantastic filmmaking.
 It's a story which could have been made into a little piece of flat pulp,
but was instead made into a stunning film which is intriguing from start to
finish.
"The Man Who Knew Too Much" starts by introducing the protagonists to us,
two Olympic stars, Bob and Jill Lawrence (Leslie Bank and Edna Best,
respectively), who are vacationing in French Morrocco with their loving
daughter, Betty (Nova Pilbeam).  One night at a club, a man is shot and
before he dies, he tells Bob and Jill that a revolutionary group is
planning to kill a public official during a performance at Albert Hall in
London.  Soon enough, Betty has been kidnapped and the ransom is that they
don't tell the authorities.
Bob takes it upon himself to find the kidnappers and rescue his daughter
without harming either of them.  His clues lead him to the rebels, who are
headed by a mysterious man named Abbott (mysterious only because he's
played by Peter Lorre, in his first performance in English following his
triumph in Fritz Lang's "M," where he played a child killer), who soon also
takes Bob into his custody.
The film was the first Hitchcock film to really become a big hit, and it
made a name of him for being a master of suspense (which he was).  What
Hitch was best at doing was creating a plausible yet chilling suspense
sequences, which are often the big set pieces for disection by film
analysts (I can't tell you how many times we saw that party sequence from
"Notorious" in my film classes...).  Here, in my opinion, is one of
Hitchcock's greatest sequences, a masterpiece of film montage which shows
Jill in Albert Hall on the night of the shooting sitting as an anonomys
audience member, and piecing how the murder is going to happen by looking
around.  As the music builds, she figures out exactly when the assasin will
kill his target, but she can't scream or the kidnappers will kill her
daughter.
Another famous sequence takes place in what has to be one of the very first
(if not the first) visceral shootout in a film.  The sequence is long, but
is scary and realistic, and, interestingly enough, mostly told from the
perspective of the bad guys.  The entire experience of watching it is never
boring or redundant though, due to Hitchcock's great ability to edit and
design a sequence.
But these are not the only two great things about this film.  "The Man Who
Knew Too Much
 is a great story, filled with a surprising amount of characterization, and
a storyline which is smart without becoming too brainy.  The characters in
this film are not forced to do what they do because Hitchcock wants
suspense scenes; Hitchcock knew how to create a film without trapping the
characters in the confines of the genre, and this is easily shown by this
film.
Accompany the brilliant direction by Hitchcock with a smart script and
great acting, especially by Lorre (who's just the Man, in my humble
opinion), and "The Man Who Knew Too Much" comes out as one of the greatest
suspense thrillers of all time.  While it may be trite (the film clocks in
at a mere 74 minutes), it never feels rushed, and the story never fails to
intrigue you with its great characters and storytelling.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for After Hours (1985)
Director: Martin Scorsese
Writer: Joseph Minion
Starring: Griffin Dunne, Rosanna Arquette, Teri Garr, John Heard, 
Catherine O'Hara, Linda Fiorentino, Verna Bloom, Tommy Chong, Cheech 
Marin, Will Patton, Bronson Pinchot
"After Hours" is the most bizarre black comedy anyone will ever see.  
Simply stated.  This film is so bizarre that not only is it absolutely 
hysterical to watch, but it's also tense and frightening and one could 
probably benefit from a small break halfway through the film just to 
collect yourself.  I mean, one can only take so much of Kafka and Freud 
being presented at the same time.
Written by a film student and directed with darkly comic flair by Martin 
Scorsese (A True God Among Men), "After Hours" is a kafkaesque nightmare 
of a movie, starting out as a little unusual date movie and turning into 
a wild multi-leveled nightmare.  Our hero, Paul Hackett (Griffin Dunne, 
at his best), is a typical computer programmer in New York who hates his 
job, flicks channels all night, and goes to coffee shops to read George 
Miller's "Tropic of Cancer" with hopes of meeting a female.  This 
particular night it happens with Marcy (Rosanna Arquette) who sees him 
reading Miller and makes some wild, sexually fierocious comments on the 
book.  Paul is immeadiately turned on and gets her number.
He calls her that night and discovers she's living with some artist 
named Kiki Dees (a young Linda Fiorentino, working on her "Last 
Seduction" role early) in Soho (Let me just say that after watching this 
movie I will NEVER step foot in Soho).  He goes there, experiences some 
very bizarre situations, gets to know her better and then ditches her 
because: a) she's weird and more importantly: b) she might just have 
some burn scars all over her body.  
The film, which has started off as a date film, has slowly become 
bizarre and, well, kafkaesque (a counter, please, for the number of 
times I say that word in this review alone).  But even though it has 
been weird so far, it's nothing as for what will happen next.  Paul's 
life is turned into a nightmare by associating with other people in an 
attempt of trying to get back to his apartment (see, the subway tolls 
have gone up and he only has about 90-some cents on him).  Among the 
people he meets are: a bartender (John Heard), who's seen so much that 
he doesn't even stare a bit when two men come into his bar and make out; 
a waitress (Teri Gaar), who's such a loser that it's unexplainable; and 
a pair of burglars who just happen to be played by none other than 
Cheech and Chong (great casting, if I might say).
This might just be a stupid everything-bad-happens film but it's so well 
written and so brilliantly directed by Scorsese that it seems to have 
several dimensions: on the surface, it's a wicked comedy; beneath, it 
has Freudian undertones (most of the problems he gets into are 
sex-related in some way...and the end is, well, incestuous, but I won't 
divulge) and, well, Kafka undertones as well (no need to explain this). 
 It all projects Scorsese's view of New York as a kind of Dante's 
Inferno, with everybody seeming to be losers just waiting around for 
whatever and actually being so bored that it might be fun to form a mob 
and chase an innocent man through the streets of Soho.  
Besides, this has Scorsese written all over it: the music playing slowly 
and drearily; the amazing slow takes; the dry wit and black humor; etc, 
etc, etc.  But, unlike many of his other films, I believe "After Hours" 
to stand on the same level as his other masterpieces (Which are?  Glad 
you asked: "Mean Streets," "Taxi Driver," "Raging Bull" and 
"Goodfellas"), presenting Scorsese's talent with comedy; his 
non-traditional way of presenting a story with flair and style and 
making a full dimensional work of art out of it.  But if you really 
don't care about these things, you'll still have a great time with this 
brilliantly funny film.

Title
Review for Brazil (1985)
Director: Terry Gilliam
Writers: Terry Gilliam, Charles McKeown and Tom Stoppard
Starring: Jonathan Pryce, Kim Greist, Michael Palin, Robert DeNiro, Ian 
Holm, Bob Hoskins, Katherine Helmond, Jim Broadbent, Charles McKeown, 
Ian Richardon, Peter Vaughn, Gordon Kaye
Terry Gilliam has a warped mind.  We all knew he was a tad off-kilter 
when we saw his bizarre animation on "Monty Python's Flying Circus" and 
other brit shows in the 60s, but this is the film that separated him 
from the "Python" pack and established him as not only one of the 
greatest directors of our times, but as an intellectual, cryptic and 
bizarro individual.
"Brazil" is a black, black, black comedy set in an alternate reality or 
a future (the film cryptically says in the beginning "Somewhere in the 
20th century") probably in England.  The world is ruled by "The 
Ministry" which serves as a place where everything is ultra-organized 
and superefficient.  But everyone seems to be happy because everything 
is convenient.  Every room has little TVs (without Big Brother's face - 
heh heh) and behind the walls are tons of tubes and wires.  But things 
keep breaking but can't be fixed because you need a billion forms to 
even walk out of the office to go and fix it up.
Our hero is the daydreaming Sam Lowry (Jonathan Pryce, pre-"Miss Saigon" 
days), a low-level government worker who has fantasies of him flying and 
saving a beautiful woman trapped in a cage.  This dream sequence is 
shown intermittingly in the film.  His mother, Ida (Katherine Helmond - 
you know, from "Who's the Boss?"), is a filthy rich woman who dines with 
her superficial friends, gets bizarre face-lifts from Dr. Jaffe (Jim 
Brodbent) - the coolest effect in the film, by the way - and wants her 
son to be a high-level worker with an office and benefits and the whole 
nine yards.  But Sam seems content with his dreams.  But it seems 
everyone wants him to wake up to reality and be shallow like everyone 
else.
The plot of the film is set in motion when a government worker 
accidentally screws up an arrest form and gets the wrong man.  The 
police break in in a hilariously ridiculous arrest scene, break all the 
windows, bust up the apartment above theirs and put a sack cloth over 
their man - a Mr. Buttle.  The scene is handled perfectly, with 
satirical comedy, as the family is distraught and confused by what is 
happening and the big cheese walks in and coldly gives her forms to sign 
("This is your receipt, and this is my receipt for your receipt.").
We then meet Sam who has to sort this mess out for his nervous and 
slightly incompent boss, Mr. Kurtzman (the always amazing Ian Holm).  
But he is distracted because on his way to work one day, he sees a woman 
who is a dead ringer for the woman in his dreams.  She turns out to be a 
butch truck driver/alleged-rebel, Jill Layton (Kim Greist), who wants 
nothing to do with him but is somewhat drawn by his kafkaesque ways of 
wooing her ("I love you...er, er, in my dreams I love you!").  
Sam also gets into the rebellion thanks to an encounter with a renegade 
air-conditioner repairman (Get that for a rebel!), Harry Tuttle (Robert 
DeNiro, awesome as usual), who was the man the Ministry was looking for 
in the beginning and who quit the government because of too much 
paperwork.  His interception of a phone call when Sam's air conditioning 
dies winds him in a lot of trouble with the Ministry of Works, 
represented by two weird repairmen, one being Spoor (Bob Hoskins). 
Sam ends up taking the big promotion his mother set up for him just so 
he can track down this Jill Layton easily, but finds himself overwraught 
with even more paperwork and a tiny, claustrophobic office where he 
shares a desk with a bizarre man named Lime (co-writer Charles McKeown). 
 In possibly the best scene in the film, he has a Chaplin-esque war over 
who gets the majority of the desk with Lime.  His boss is a 
quick-talking Mr. Warren (Ian Richardson), who shows him to his office 
and yells at him for having a messy desk since all he's doing is 
becoming obsessed with Jill.
The film is a plunge into the deepening insanity of a man who is having 
a war between his dreams and the reality of a burdonsome world which is 
too uber-efficient for its own good.  Soon everyone has turned against 
him, including his best friend, Jack (a memorably menacing Michael 
Palin, who gets to don the coolest mask in 80s cinema).  And by the end, 
he has won - he is totally numb and lives inside his mind, flying in the 
clouds with his dream girl and humming the cool latino song "Brazil."  
The film is deeply satirical, almost as much as what seems to be its big 
inspiration, "1984."  For one thing, everyone but the rebels and Sam are 
superficial twits.  In one scene, he attends his mother's party ("Simply 
everyone is here!") and meets some of the weirdest people.  There is 
also a running gag about plastic surgery - his mother has been getting 
it and as the film goes on she's getting younger and younger.  
Meanwhile, her one friend has been getting complications to her 
complications to her complications and by the end, is wrapped like a 
mummy being pushed in a wheelchair by her shallow daughter (one scene, 
he meets her while she's lingerie shopping, prompting what may be the 
funniest joke in the film).
And the end prompts a huge action sequence which is set into motion 
after a frightening torture sequence where Sam is strapped into a metal 
chair in the middle of a huge dome.  There are many explosions in the 
film since there are terrorists who are always trying to get people to 
realize how horrible society is but they're too wrapped up in things to 
even notice.  In once scene, Sam has lunch with his mother at a fancy 
restaurant and in the middle of the meal, an explosion takes place but 
they don't even look and the Matire D' sets up a block and has the 
orchestra keep playing.
This also features several brilliant tracking shots.  The most menacing 
one is when Sam is strapped down before the torture sequence and the 
camera pulls back from his face to show how small he is in the dome.  
Another one - the best one - shows an office full of people running 
around and the camera quickly zooms from the back up to the front with 
people running in front if the camera but never hitting it and then 
zooms right up to Ian Holm.
This is possibly one of the best films of the 80s and one of the most 
cryptically brilliant films ever made.  Terry Gilliam's image of a 
superficial society where dreams have become scarce is perfectly done 
the way he wanted it, even though he had to fight a company who wanted 
to manufacture it for the masses, even though it's more of a cult film 
nowadays.  But never has Terry Gilliam's direction been more on target. 
 He perfectly bullseyes who he wants to get and makes the film hilarious 
if not totally bizzare.  Indeed, this film deserves multiple viewings 
just to get everything.
The Oscar-nominated script is wonderfully biting.  It pokes fun at 
everything and contains some of the most clever lines ever.  It also has 
some of the most eccentric characters in all of cinematic history.  
Terry Gilliam's masterpiece so far would be "Brazil" since it perfectly 
shoots at what he wants and gets right on target.  Besides, it's just so 
damn cool.
Visit my homepage: http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/hills/8335

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
Director: Warren Beatty
Writers: Warren Beatty and Jeremy Pikser (story by Beatty)
Starring: Warren Beatty, Halle Berry, Oliver Platt, Don Cheadle, Paul
Sorvino, Jack Warden, Isaiah Washington, Christine Baranski, Laurie
Metcalf, Sean Astin, Richard Sarafin, Nora Dunn, Larry King, William
Baldwin, George Hamilton
We first meet California Senator Jay Bullington Bulworth on TV starring in
one of those television ads promoting politicians, showing them at home in
their family life, working hard at work, and making a powerful speech in
favor of himself directly to the audience.  He says stuff like "this is a
new milenium" and "I will work hard for you," just like everyone else. 
Then the camera cuts to Bulworth sitting in his office in the middle of the
night, watching these ads, and he's balling his eyes out.
Jay Bulworth has reached a point that we probably suspect all politicians
are at - where they know that what they're saying is total bullshit and
they're sick of it - and then gone over it.  In a suicidal, maniacally
depressed state, he hires a friend of a friend named Vinnie (Richard
Sarafin, the oh-so Italian mafia don from "Bound") to have him killed by
the end of the weekend, then heads out to his daily speeches and public
appearances.  Arriving at an all-Black church in South Central L.A., he
walks up to the podium, tosses away his speech, and figures "Hey, my life
is over, I'll say what I want," and does just that.  Afterwards, everyone's
in a state of appallment, as well as shock, and Bulworth turns to his chief
aide, Dennis (Oliver Platt) and says, "That was pretty good."
This is basically the premise "Bulworth," a fairy tale-like story all the
more surreal and shocking because it's about a politician who actually is
blunt about the way he feels, something that hasn't existed in at least the
past century.  It tells of a politician who wants to tell everything in a
non-watered-down context, who wants to actually research what he's working
for and help people, and who finds a new-found love for the career he chose
a long time ago.  Like I said, it's a big fairy tale.
There is more: Bulworth begins by making obnoxious and insulting
observations out loud to people (at one point, he goes to a party hosted by
Hollywood moguls and basically tells them that their films suck so why
should they be spending so much on them?), then actually digs down deep,
and begins to research what he's doing.  After meeting a couple women at
the South Central Church (including a woman who catches his eye - Nina,
played by the gorgeous Halle Berry), he begins to learn more about South
Central, most especially their culture (he finds he is, at heart, a rap
lover, like I bet we all are), and soon finds he can (sorta) rap and try to
use his bluntness to fix things that are wrong with the system, like
problems with affirmative action, and basically the way that South Central
is such a dead-end place (next stop: North Philly!).
As you probably could tell from the previews, as well as this review,
"Bulworth" is not a serious satire; it's a really scathing black comedy of
sorts, probably making this the funniest movie to come out this year
because it's so bluntly honest about everything, and it's willing to strip
everything down to the buff, which is, these days, a rare thing.  We get
all sorts of really sarcastic, politically incorrect jokes, like when he's
at the South Central church, he tells everyone "If you don't put down that
bucket of chicken wings and don't get behind a linebacker who stabs his
wife in the back, you'll never get rid of someone like me!"  We get to see
his staff frantically try to cover up for him, most espeically Oliver
Platt, who is, as always, a riot.  And we even get to see the sight of
Warren Beatty dressed in South Central rags, trying to rhyme every sentence
so that he sounds like Grandmaster Flash on anphetemines.  That alone is
worth the price of admission.
But most of all, we get another great film in a trio of really pissed-off
films about the way that politics have become such bullshit today (or have
always been such bullshit - I dunno).  After "Wag the Dog" and "Primary
Colors," "Bulworth" is a successful potential end to this sorta trilogy of
political cynicism, and particularly succesful because it doesn't carry the
same message as either of them did.  Instead of merely mocking the lies we
are told or saying that politics merely destroys people, "Bulworth" is just
out to say that all politics is bullshit and that if anyone actually came
out and told the truth, they'd be elected in a flash, regardless of what
their views are.
Warren Beatty, the director, co-writer, and star of "Bulworth" (and one of
my favorite actors, who's disappearance from film for the past couple years
has been dually noted by myself), has been a long-time liberal democrat,
and I almost wonder if this has been a film he's been planning to make all
his life, or a realization he had just now.  I'm saying this because
"Bulworth" comes off as being honest even about the terms "liberal" and
"conservative" (as well as "Republican" and "Democrat"), saying that not
even these exist in today's politics.  I imagine he was watching Clinton
and (Bush/Dole/Perot - you pick) debate, and he realized that Bill, the big
old liberal democrat up there, was saying anything to get elected, crossing
over any kind of borders between the two forms of political thought (I'm
leaving out moderacy here, aren't I?).  To Beatty, there doesn't seem to be
political thought anymore, just people who will say anything to get
elected.
As angry as Beatty's message is, he has a charming way of not letting this
overpower his film, and actually being able to let this hostility work with
the story and message.  It's one thing to be angry, and it's another thing
to be in control of your anger, and it's obvious that "Bulworth" belongs in
the latter.  But as brilliant and amazing as the message of "Bulworth" is,
the story does have a few small kinks.  For one, the romance between
Bulworth and Nina doesn't totally work, but does have a certain sweetness
to it that makes it hard to resist.  And the assasination subplot,
involving Bulworth clumsily trying to avoid his alleged assassin, doesn't
really work well with anything else...until the end (funny how suicidal
tendenices make you a better person in the long run, eh?).  But these are
so minor that they barely affect the film in the overall sense.
Oh, and look for an amazing cast of some great supporting roles - including
a southern Paul Sorvino (a chameleon of regional dialects if I ever heard
one), Jack Warden, Don Cheadle (who's becoming one of the most versatile
actors in Hollywood - shy, gentle, alienated porn star in "Boogie Nights"
to angry-as-hell drug dealer here...both totally convincing performances),
and Christina Baranski as his dysfunctional wife (wait till you see who
she's boning...), as well as a slew of cameos (Sean Astin...Nora
Dunn...Larry King NOT appearing on his talk show...) - all of these people
just add to the overall fun of the film.
It's almost sad to say it's cinematically the weakest of the three
political movies to come out in awhile, because deep down, it has the best
political message.  But that doesn't really mean that "Bulworth" is a
failure of any kind story-wise.  For its entire time, it's a hilarious,
entertaining-as-hell romp that has an intriguing story to tell, and one
helluva message to relay.  On second thought, I think that Beatty has
always felt like this...it just took Clinton to make him realize it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for House of Games (1987)
Director: David Mamet
Writer: David Mamet (story by Mamet and Jonathan Katz)
Starring: Lindsay Crouse, Joe Mantegna, Mike Nussbaum, Lilia Skala, Ricky
Jay, J. T. Walsh, Steven Goldstein, Jack Wallace, Meshach Taylor, William
H. Macy
"House of Games" recognizes a distinct human weakness that we all suffer
from: the need to feel like you're smarter than everyone else.  I remember
not too long ago being in a chinese restaurant with a friend, and she told
me she was going to steal the ash tray at our table when the cooks weren't
looking.  I asked her why she wanted to that; she didn't even smoke.  She
just gave me a bad look and shoved the thing in her bag, and then cooly
left the building.  Hmm...
This film deals with people who do this kind of stuff for a living, and on
a much more dramatic scale.  The main characters in this film are the
infamous people known as confidence men, who are all flawless actors who
fool people out of something, whether it be money or just their wits.  The
writer and director of this film, David Mamet, one of the world's great
playwrights, is himself a magician, another form of the confidence man, who
just loves to play with people, and here has made a downright fascinating
magic trick that cons the audience perfectly with such an incredible
illusion that it soon opens the film up to even more incredible depths that
few suspense films have ever tread upon.
"House of Games" deals with a psychiatrist, Margaret Ford (Mamet's
then-wife, Lindsay Crouse), who deals primarily with compulsions, and has
just had a book published when she discovers that one of her patients, a
compulsive gambler, has just gotten himself in a big trap: he owes 25 grand
to a man who says that if he doesn't pay by the next day, he will murder
him.  Margaret journeys across town to the place where the man hangs out,
called "The House of Games," where she meets this man, Mike (a brilliant
Joe Mantegna), and sees if she can get him to help her friend out.
Mike, who has never heard something like this, decides to cut her a deal:
she helps him find the "tell" on a man he is playing poker with in the next
room, and if he wins, her friend's marker is torn up.  From here on out, it
would be totally unfair to reveal anymore of what happens plot-wise, but
let's just say she gets sucked into the world of conning and deceiving,
where the whole idea is that you con someone out of their money in the most
elaborate way possible so that they have little or no doubt that they were
duped.  After all, what use is stealing money from someone if they know
they were tricked?
Basically, this film is one big con from start to finish because nothing
that it shows us is real and it knows it.  It leads us through what seems
to be high drama, then pulls the rug out from under us and shows us that we
were totally duped, which shouldn't be a real shock to anyone who's seen
his latest film, "The Spanish Prisoner," and has yet to see this film
(which was me up to a couple of hours ago).  Both films feature elaborate
con games that fool the protagonist with twist upon twist upon twist, and
in turn, probably also fool the audience as well.
Yet this film is still remarkably intelligent and fresh and a whole lot
better than most films that try to do what this film does.  Why is it so
intelligent and fresh?  Well, it's intelligent because it never takes us
for morons, and instead sets up such a lavish ploy that anyone of any kind
of intelligence can be easily duped by it.  Everything we see seems totally
real and there's really no proof of fraud until you see everything for what
it really is.  That's why it's such a smart movie.
And it's fresh because it's not just always thinking about what it will do
next and stays two steps ahead of the audience, but also because it's
remarkably deep for any film.  Basically, "House of Games" is about
watching movies, making this a subtlely self-reflexive film.  There's a
scene towards the end that has to be one of the most kafkaesque scenes I
have witnessed (later sorta copied for a later scene in "The Game," another
ingenius con game), and is basically saying that this is all an act we are
watching, and none of this is real, which sets it up for the finale which
could be seen as cheap if it weren't so intelligent and deep.  It's pretty
much one of the reactions someone could have to this film, basically
because it can be seen as manipulative.
"House of Games" is brilliant, though, because it can easily and almost
effortlessly con the viewers into thinking like the psychiatrist
protagonist, and because it's practically a tragedy of two types of people
in the world.  The chief con man of the film, Mike, is one of the saddest
characters to ever populate a movie because he's all an illusion and he has
no delusions about what he is (or isn't).  And the second tragic figure is
Margaret, the woman who tries to delude herself about a simple human folly,
and tries to make herself out to be something better than everyone else is,
even in the final frame of the film.  "House of Games" is electrifying
because it's so refreshingly smart, and so enigmatically deep about
humanity.  And what a con.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Wild Man Blues (1998)
Director: Barbara Kopple
Starring: Woody Allen, Soon-Yi Previn, Eddy Davis, Cynthia Sayer, Don
Barrett, Greg Cohen, John Gill
I adore Woody Allen's movies more than almost anyone else in the world, and
I can't even explain why.  So a documentary on him that actually follows
him around, that allows us a sneak peek at his life, and shows us a Woody
Allen sans one of his script...well, that automatically appeals to me and
anyone else who watches his movies (all eight-and-a-half of us).  After
all, Woody is a paradox when it comes to celebrities: he's constantly being
talked about on the news for this and that, but no one knows a thing about
him.  Basically no one goes to see his movies, and only about 5 or 10
percent of the American population has even seen a Woody Allen film, but
everyone thinks they can imitate him and whenever you bring his name up to
people, they give you a bad look.  Seeing Woody Allen "unplugged," I
suppose you can call it, is incredibly intriguing to me basically because
I've been watching his movies for years and I couldn't tell you a thing
about his personal life.
"Wild Man Blues" conveniently comes out following Woody's film,
"Deconstructing Harry," a mind-bending, hilarious portrait of the public's
perception of him as an amoral, selfish sonofabitch which ulimately
questioned whether or not that was the real Woody Allen.  And bizarrely
enough, this film questions the same thing.  For about an hour-and-a-half,
we get to follow Mr. Allen as he travels all around Europe, stays at
expensive-looking hotels, plays numerous jazz shows, meets fans, and
finally has dinner with his parents back in Manhattan.  We see Woody
talking with his band, with various people, and even talking with Soon-Yi
herself, and the whole time we have no clue if it's really Woody or just an
act.
Basically, "Wild Man Blues" works on three separate levels: on one, we have
a reflection of Woody Allen, in all his glory, whether it be fake or not;
one another, we have a portrait of a subgenre of music that is almost
extinct today; and on yet another level, we have a subtle, classy rebuttle
to Mia Farrow's scathing autobiography, "What Falls Away," which, frankly,
made Woody out to be Lee Harvey Oswald (and therefore her out to be the
world's dumbest woman for spending over a decade with him).  We see a lot
of each of these, but no real balance of them.  The director, Barbara
Kopple (a two-time Oscar winning documentary filmmaker), at first wanted to
make a film about the band itself, but upon shooting a bit, decided to leak
a lot into Woody's life, and you can actually see this transition.  The
film begins as a nice balance between letting Woody talk to the camera and
showing the band both in front and behind the scenes.
But as the film goes on, we see less and less of the band, and we see more
and more of Woody.  And as we see more and more of Woody, the more
cartoonish he becomes.  When we first meet Woody, he's almost nervous about
talking to the camera, and he comes off as very serious and shy.  He
discusses why he loves staying in Paris, and talks about his music and why
he loves it, and not once does he say any great one-liners.  But as the
film moves along, he gradually adopts his screen persona.  It's hysterical
to hear him do his schtick (his criticism of Italian hotel staffs is
priceless), but which is the real Woody?  Was he at first too nervous, but
then became comfortable with it later on?  It doesn't help that his mother
at the end tells the camera he's nothing like his screen persona, and that
his movies reflect very little of Woody Allen the person.
I suppose the message, as unintentional as it probably is, is that Woody
Allen is someone whom we can never really learn of in depth because he's
different with everyone else.  To his band, he may seem a bit cold, while
to the band leader, he's incredibly friendly.  In his movies, he's whiny
and hysterical and loves to talk, but when performing, he says three words
and they play music.  The film is basically saying that no man can possibly
be the same to everyone, I suppose.
One of the main strengths of the film is, though, is in its moments that it
happens to capture, and those other big things that it shows us.  Some of
Woody's one-liners that he makes up on the spot are as hilarious as the
ones he has written in his movies.  There's the sight of Woody trying to
swim in a pool with Soon-Yi, and even a hilarious bit where Woody and
Soon-Yi continually keep missing eachother in a hotel.  And there's even a
couple moments that are manipulated by Kopple, like one where Woody is
being hounded by European fans of his, and the soundtrack begins to play
Nino Rota's brilliant score from Fellini's "8 1/2," which had to do with a
film director who is plagued by too many problems, like fans and producers.
 There's even a wonderful moment where Woody explains why he doesn't like
awards (hint: it has something to do with Brando...which is also one of my
main reasons for not liking awards).
The real expose in the film is not really Woody, but Soon-Yi, who is barely
shown as nothing more than a horny young girl of his, but here emerges as
what seems like the perfect soulmate for Woody as well as an incredibly
intelligent woman.  Seeing Soon-Yi tell Woody that he has to be more open
with the members of his band is one of the coolest things I have ever seen,
and it makes her out to be an almost maternal presence for him, always
giving him sound advice, and making him calm and pleasant.  Take that, Mia!
If anything, "Wild Man Blues" suceeds in telling us to give up on seeing
Woody as who he really is, and that we may never really see him.  We learn
very little about him in the running time of the film, but what we get is
mouth-watering stuff that makes us want to perhaps just meet the guy and
see what he's like to us.  I know that the fact that I wasn't able to see
what he's really like is disappointing, but for some reason, it doesn't
come off that way.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Strada, La (1954)
Director: Federico Fellini
Writers: Federico Fellini, Ennio Flaiano, and Tullio Pinelli
Starring: Anthony Quinn, Giulietta Masina, Richard Basehart, Aldo
Salvani, Marcella Rovere, Livia Venturini
"La Strada" is a simple fable about three people, and in the hands of
another director, it could have just remained that.  It takes a really
good storyteller to bring tales like this to life, and as told by great
Italian director Federico Fellini, it's shockingly enough nothing short
of a masterpiece.  Why is a film like this so amazing?  Why does a film
dealing with circus folk and how they either help or hurt one another
come off as such a momumentous film and receive such high accolades from
critics and audiences alike?
They key, it seems, is not just that it has deep metaphors (deep if
you've never seen a Fellini film before) or that it has an abundance in
negative imagery that aesthetically deepens the film, but that it has
real emotional complexity.  It knows how to really affect an audience,
and not via cheap strokes like many other films do.  The characters seem
extremely real to us, not just representations of different parts of
humanity or something, and its this neo-realism that is absolutely
devastating to us when we watch.  In his early career, before he turned
to surrealism (for which he is most famous for), Fellini made several
emotionally complex simple narratives like this, "I Vitelloni," and
"Nights of Cabiria."  Amongst those before his supreme neo-realism
masterpiece, "La Dolce Vita," "La Strada" is his best.
"La Strada" opens and closes with scenes by the ocean and people
hovering around it in a crisis.  In the beginning, it's where one of the
protagonists, Gelsomina (Giulietta Masina, Fellini's wife), is when she
discovers that her one sister has died while in the hands of a
travelling circus strongman named Zampano (a pre-"Zorba the Greek"
Anthony Quinn).  To make money for her mother, who is near broke, she
says that she will go with Zampano now to be his assistant as her sister
was, and Zampano agrees, giving Gelsomina's mother her other sister a
good deal of money for her.
Zampano has a simple bit: he wraps a chain around his chest, boastfully
tells the more "delicate" audience members to cover their eyes for they
may be blinded by the effect, and then breaks it with his muscles.
Gelsomina's job is to dress as a clown, play the drums, and say "Zampano
has arrived," and occasionally do a comic bit with him.  While not
performing for whatever audience, he drives from town to town on a
motorcycle that drags a significantly larger wagon carrying all his
supplies and Gelsomina, whom he mistreats terribly.  Part slave, part
potential love mate, she is beaten with thin branches when she doesn't
do exactly what Zampano tells her, is forced to cook even if she can't,
and one night, is told to wait on a corner for a couple minutes while he
takes off with a woman...then doesn't return until that morning.
As they wander around, Gelsomina's detestation for Zampano's cruelty
gradually rises, and around the half-way point, she runs off from him,
and wanders into another circus act, that of a man dubbed simply "The
Fool" (American actor Richard Basehart), who is doing a dangerous tight
rope act when Gelsomina first sees him.  When Zampano finds her, he
drags her to the nearest circus, where he gets a job, and luckily for
her, The Fool is working there as well.  In the film's most famous
section, Zampano and The Fool lock horns, as the latter taunts the
former humorously, as he recognizes Zampano's total lack of a sense of
humor and the fact that he mistreats the adorable Gelsomina, and when
the fight is finally broken, Zampano is taken away by the police and
locked up for the night, and both men are fired from their jobs.
The rest of the film deals with the aftermath of this experience, the
clash of all these three people, and how Gelsomina realizes that despite
all of Zampano's harshness towards her, she really does have feelings
for him, and in one of the film's best scenes, The Fool tries to get
Gelsomina to run away with him, but upon discovering that she does love
Zampano in a weird way, he tells her the best thing to do is stay with
him.  The film turns uglier towards the end, and by the grand finale, it
has reached such an emotional peak that the final scene doesn't so much
come off as a metaphor but as an almost cathartic experience.
"La Strada" means "The Road," and the film turns into a road movie,
devoid of any real plot, and extremely episodic, as all of Fellini's
great films were (want to see a really episodic film?  Watch "La Dolce
Vita"), and the feeling Fellini presents throughout is that of a
seemless wandering, the way the characters in this film are often
wandering around emotionally.  While this is in theory a simplistic
film, Fellini makes this extremely complex, especially when The Fool is
introduced.  What he does to Zampano is, in actuality, sadistic, and
perhaps he does get what he deserves later on in the story, but it's too
easy to come to that particular conclusion.  Rather the fight scene and
whatever happens following it stem from a problem with both The Fool and
Zampano, who are both acting on their first emotions without really
considering the consequences.
The acting is one of the reasons this film is so good, because much of
what happens emotionally is what goes unsaid by the characters and can
only be shown by the actors playing them.  Masina brings a sweetness to
Gelsomina which goes unparalleled, even by the likes of Chaplin and
Lucille Ball.  She has the ability to affect us emotionally with so much
as a twitch of her eyes, and she can change from comedy to sadness (or
even both) in a split second.  The shot of her dressed as a clown is the
supreme image of an ironically sad clown.  Richard Basehart is hilarious
as The Fool, filled with so much energy that if he had only had a
higher, more annoying voice, and less funnier things to do, hell, he'd
probably be Jerry Lewis.  His later scenes are touching and majestic,
proving him a great actor and a complex character after all.
But Anthony Quinn gets the toughest role.  His performance as Zampano is
deft and emotionally troubling, and always starkly realistic.  This was
long before he became an almost kitsch-y sensation, popping up as one
who could not be taken totally seriously, but here, as a young, buff
man, he's filled with anger and a strong presence that is, at first,
distancing.  But as the film goes on, he gradually lets the audience in,
as he does Gelsomina, and by that final shot, where his emotional
journey seems to be at an end, as far as the movie goes, the film has
earned the right to be that powerful.
But it's really Fellini who raises this as high up as it could have
gone.  His approach hardly belongs in the group of "Italian
Neo-Realism," since his fascination is not with using his characters to
critique social problem, as they usually are, but rather using his
characters to represent real people, and thus, all of humanity.  Though
Zampano could easily be seen as an asshole, but Fellini never judges
him, and instead sees him as just a person on the edge with his true
feelings, as he does every character.  His direction is marvelously
involving, with camera movements and edits that are so smooth that you
hardly notice them at all, and as such, the film is deeply involving, as
you were actually there with the characters, witnessing everything.  If
any director had a way of sucking his audience into his film and
involving them in every way, it was Fellini.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Grande illusion, La (1937)
Director: Jean Renoir
Writers: Jean Renoir and Charles Spaak
Starring: Jean Gabin, Pierre Fresnay, Marcel Dalio, Julien Carette,
Erich von Stroeheim, Georges Peclet, Dita Parlo
Jean Renoir's "Grand Illusion" is pretty much unanimously praised as one
of the greatest films ever made, as well as one of the greatest war
movies.  But why is a film that seems like an arty french old version of
"Hogan's Heroes" and "The Great Escape" so amazingly praised?  Well, for
one it's a lot more structured and complex than a "Hogan's Heroes"
episode, and makes a wonderful statement about war.  I mean, this film
is so deceptively complex that the laserdisc we saw it on had a track
for a guy to narrate everything that goes on as the film plays (we
turned him off).
In" Grand Illusion," it's just before the first World War, and a couple
of french pilots (Jean Gabin and Pierre Fresnay) are shot down over
Germany, and subsequently taken into a POW camp.  The weird thing about
this film is not only is this the only real instance of war we see, but
that the german who shot them down (Erich von Stroeheim, who would later
star in "Sunset Boulevard" - the movie) actually invites them to a
dinner before they are hauled out to the prisoner camp.  "The Hanoi
Hilton" this is not.
The various prisoners quickly get to know eachother, and form a bit of
comraderie.  In the camp are a varied group of people: Lieutenant
Marechal (Gabin), a French plebian; the French aristocrat de Boeldieu
(Fresnay), who kind of isolates himself from the others; a hyperactive
actor (Julien Carette); and French jew Rosenthal (Marcel Dalio).  They
work on some escape tactics, but never go too far, sometimes getting
cold feet someway through, and usually getting cut off by the germans.
We follow some of them as they go to another POW camp, this time in a
giant castle, and headed by none other than the German soldier who fed
them after he shot them down (von Stroheim).  The film follows them
working on some more escape attempts, as well as building a
wonderfully-crafted relationship between the von Stroeheim character and
the Fresnay one.  They seem to be the two most alike characters in the
film, and the only difference seems to be their nationalities.
"Grand Illusion" paints a kind of surrealistic world where the soldiers
actually realize that they're all part of the same race, but are trapped
by nationalities and "duties."  A powerful moment towards the end
perfectly illustrates this, causing one of the few very sad moments in
the film, which is often mounted in some good old character comedy,
though not like a sitcom (this is the last time I mention "Hogan's
Heroes").  The very final scene is also poignantly representing what the
film is trying to prove.
What's cool about this film is you hardly even know there's a war going
on.  If you missed the beginning, you probably wouldn't even know
they're prisoners of War.  This makes sure that they can build up the
characters, and create parallelisms between the prisoners and their
german captors.  The film paints a world where everyone is kind to one
another, although they are somtimes held back by their nationality.
Even for those of you who would think a 30s french film about POWs would
be boring, "Grand Illusion" is not what you're gonna find.  It's an
always fascinating flick to watch, filled with a great sense of humor
that never makes this overly surreal, a dramatic edge which never feels
forced, and emotion that never feels hokey or melodramatic.  The ending
is brilliantly done, with a scene which might never really take place,
but it's a film, and it's trying to make a point.
"Grand Illusion" is one of the greatest films ever made, and a trend
setter in the tradition of the sub-sub-subgenre of POW camp films, like
"The Great Escape."  And it's a lot more complex than I originally
thought it was, making me want to see it again just so I can concentrate
more on the film's subtexts.  A good POW camp film is a horrible thing
to waste, and this is the best one of those I've ever seen.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
Director: Mick Jackson
Writers: Jerome Armstrong and Billy Ray
Starring: Tommy Lee Jones, Anne Heche, Don Cheadle, Gaby Hoffman, Keith 
David
There's a scene somewhere in this film where one of the characters reads 
the book "Screenwriting Made Easy."  This is funny the first time just 
'cause it is, but funnier as the film goes on since it's totally ironic 
since the screenwriters of this inane film probably read it, outlined it 
and then wrote this film.  It's like they took the sub-genre of the 
disaster pic, which can be fun and hokey at the same time, and then 
forgot one of the greatest parts of them: the stupid, eccentric 
characters.  Yes, "The Poseidon Adventure" is crap, but it's fun 'cause 
of all the stupid, eccentric characters.  And "Earthquake," MY GOD!  
"Earthquake" has got to be one of the worst movies of all time, but at 
least they had the joke of having Charlton Heston sleeping with 
Genevieve Bujold.
"Volcano" takes a semi-intriguing yet stupendously inane plot (a volcano 
NO ONE knew about suddenly errupts one fine morning and then erupts 
again later then stops...only it's in, dare I say it? L.A!!!) and then 
puts no stupid, stereotypical, eccentric characters in it.  They're just 
stupid.  And the actors are all good ones.  Tommy Lee Jones is great, an 
Oscar winner, and a member of the Men In Black (my vote for what should 
be the coolest movie of the summer).  Anne Heche is a good indy actress. 
 Don Cheadle STOLE the disappointing "Devil in a Blue Dress" from 
Denzel's feet.  And Gaby's one of the few good teenage actors.  But they 
get nothing to do but act dumb and scream at what's going on.  They do 
their best, God bless them, but they're all lost in the fake magma (only 
Don Cheadle gets an interesting part and he's the greatest part of the 
film).
There's no real suspense here 'cause you don't care about anyone.  I 
actually was rooting for Gaby's character to get killed so Tommy Lee 
Jones wouldn't have to keep saving her (he did it like thirty times!).  
And there are no interesting sites in L.A. that we see get destroyed.  
Part of the fun of disaster films is watching sites get toppled or 
destroyed or whatever.  In "Independence Day," the best part (other than 
Judd Hirsch) was watching the White House and Empire State Building get 
blown up by the aliens.  That was cool.  Watching really fake-looking 
magma plow down the street is not.
Okay, so the film's not devoid of merit.  As I already stated, Don 
Cheadle was great and the cast does their best.  And there's this really 
moronic scene which looks cool.  John Carrol Lynch (Norm from "Fargo") 
goes on a subway car to save people but the lava comes and surrounds it. 
 He has one guy who's wounded and COULD make it.  He could throw the guy 
and jump and still survive.  But NO!!!  He has to go and inanely jump 
and land right in the middle of the lava.  Here's the cool sight: he 
melts.  Here's the dumb part of it: he somehow manages to throw the man 
to safety as his legs are melting.  Cool sight.  No logic.  But cool 
sight.
The volcano erupts twice and for some reason, the film ends there.  They 
aren't worried about it eruting again, they just go home to their 
toppled homes.  But to tell the truth, I was glad they didn't go on.  I 
was hoping the film was over after the first eruption ended.  My god, it 
was actually painful to sit through this little 102 minute long film.  I 
haven't seen "Dante's Peak" but I've heard it's a masterpiece compared 
to this.
If you want to see a cool disaster flick that's inane but interesting, 
rent "The Towering Inferno" with Steve McQueen, Paul Newman, and the 
schweppervescent O.J. Simpson (he saves a cat).  If you want to waste 
your time watching a boring, stupid disaster flick (literally, it almost 
grossed half of its budget), see this.  But I warned you.

Title
Review for Rear Window (1954)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writer: John Michael Hayes (from a story by Cornell Woolrich)
Starring: James Stewart, Grace Kelley, Thelma Ritter, Raymond Burr
Watching a movie, viewing a story featuring characters alien to you, is
a lot like voyeurism.  This is what Hitchcock's film, "Rear Window," is
claiming.  And like any bold statement, it backs it up with a suspense
filled story that drawls us, and the protagonists, into its web.  What
results is, in essence, one of the greatest films ever made.  I'm
talking top 10 or 20 here.  Of course, it's from the greatest director
of all time, Alfred Hitchcock, who made, maybe, one bad film in his 50
film career.
Anyway, the film deals with a photographer (James Stewart) who has
wounded himself in an accident and is confined to a wheelchair for a
couple months, whereas he has become pretty much attracted with watching
his neighbors from his back window for hours upon hours, since he has
very little to do.  He names some of the people who do several things,
like naming a woman who lives alone, and suffers a bad date "Miss Lonely
Hearts."
However, one thing he sees is shocking.  He spies on a husband (a young
Raymond Burr) and wife, the latter who has disappeared suddenly.  He
starts to suspect foul play as evidence keeps turning up.  But what can
he do?  He's a voyeur, which is illegal and everything.  But like him,
we're obsessed with the story, which is very intriguing.
Also in his life is his gorgeous girlfriend (Grace Kelley), who he has
come to ignore and put down, since she's not as interesting as watching
the people from his window.  Not until she goes ahead and ventures out
as part of the world from his window, does he take notice.  And when she
comes back, he's infacuated with her.  There's also his physical
therapist (Thelma Ritter), who warns him about the dangers of being a
voyeur, and eventually joins with him and Kelley in their fascinatoin
and obsession with the world from the window.
To be brilliant, Hitchcock shoots the entire film (save a small bit at
the end) from the inside of his apartment, not allowing the viewers to
see the people from any close shots, and with no sound.  We, like
Stewart, are in a seat watching the events form across the way like
we're in a movie theater.  The fact that he's a photographer is also
very intriguing.  This whole film is filled to the brim with symbolism,
so that while we're watching a satisfying suspense/thriller, we're also
intrigued by the meaning of the film.
Unlike "Sliver," this film shows voyeurism in an intelligent light. 
It's fascinating, and the film does not totally condone it.  It can get
us into trouble though, when we start having trouble differentiating the
real world from that of the TV world.  With people watching more and
more TV these days, this film shows us a bunch of sick people who have
an obsession with other people's more fascinating lives.
The acting is, of course, wonderful.  Come on, it's a Hitchcock film. 
Stewart (who sadly passed away recently...but you already knew that) is
awesome as usual.  And Kelley is fantastic, as, well, she always has
been.  She was a gorgeous woman, but she wasn't all just looks, but she
could act too.  And Thelma Ritter almost steals some of her scenes with
Kelley and Stewart.
Did I forget the awesome screenplay?  These characters don't have a lot
to do in terms of action wise.  They're basically watching and talking
about the people they see, kind of like an audience.  And the talking
they do is almost as fascinating as the things that go on in the lives
of the other people.
And, of course, the direction is near-perfect.  Not only does he create
a greatly intriguing film, and give it a great theme and message, but he
doesn't take a negative view of his protagonists, much like what another
lesser director would do.  These people are us, and we're watching
ourselves on screen.  They're just normal people, with a lot of time on
their hands.  Kind of like us, since we're taking 2 hours to watch
this.  If he were to put them down, they'd put us down.  Good man, that
Hitchcock.
I love Hitchcock's films, and this is probably his best work.  I'm not
saying it is, it can be argued it's another one as much as it can be
this one.  But anyway, "Rear Window" is an entertaining masterpiece, a
film of style AND substance.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Batman (1989)
Director: Tim Burton
Writers: Sam Hamm and Warren Skaaran
Starring: Michael Keaton, Jack Nicholson, Kim Bassinger, Robert Wuhl, 
Michael Gough, Jack Palance, Pat Hingle, Billy Dee Williams, Jerry Hall, 
Tracey Walter
A simple pleasure comes from watching this first full-length Batman 
film...especially after having just witnessed the latest opus in this 
series, the dreadful "Batman and Robin."  To get over that experience, 
which wasn't totally horrible but incredibly unfulfilling, one must go 
back to the roots - the original, with the original cast and crew.  To 
watch Tim Burton's intense view of comic books with a pefectly amazing 
score by Danny Elfman reminds us how fun it was to watch these little 
stupid action hero films.  
I can't totally explain my love for this film - it's just plain fun.  
Maybe I'm bitter because I didn't enjoy the latest one.  But I remember 
being almost obsessed with Batman prior to seeing it and actually 
becoming more obsessed after seeing it.  When does that happen?  When 
does a big budget pic ever live up to its potential and even go further? 
 Hopefully, "Men in Black," which I have been calling "orgasmic" will 
live up to the hype as well.
Now, director Tim Burton's view of Gotham is incredibly different from 
that of Joel Schumacher.  It's bleak yet bright, filled with life and 
seems rather inspired by "Metropolis" and "Blade Runner."  Crime is so 
bad that the local government has had to cancel their 200th anniversary 
celebration.  The criminal world seems to be ruled by a Carl Grissom 
(Jack Palance).  But there's a superhero in hiding who is pretty much a 
myth - Batman (Michael Keaton), who just happens to be the alter-ego of 
billionaire (or millionaire), Bruce Wayne (also Michael Keaton), a 
reclusive, weird type.
Carl Grissom's big man on campus is none other than Jack Napier (Jack 
Nicholson), who is sleeping with Carl's mistress, Alicia (Jagger wife, 
Jerry Hall).  He has him set up in a big factory scene with the cops AND 
Batman battling the goons.  To finish up this amazingly cool action 
sequence, Jack falls into a vat of chemicals and turns up deformed.  
After plastic surgery, Jack emerges as the Joker, taking over the crime 
world by storm.  
Meanwhile Bruce has fallen in love with Vicki Vale (Kim Bassinger), a 
photographer who's working with a Batman-obsessed reporter, Alexander 
Knox (Robert Wuhl).  As she gets closer to Bruce, he finds himself 
wanting to reveal himself to her, even though the consequences may be 
horrible.  Their romance is interesting, but when she finds out who he 
is, it should have been a lot bigger.  I mean, this cat's Batman, for 
Christ's sake, not Bill Gates.
The thing that makes this great is the wonderful black humor and 
intriguing action sequences.  His humor is best represented by Jack 
Nicholson, who all but steals the film and becomes the trend setter for 
future Batman villains to rule the show, while Batman and his kind are 
left behind.  But Tim Burton infuses a kind of psychological approach, 
since it was Jack Napier who killed Bruce's parents.  He becomes 
obsessed with this and starts to question what he's doing.  This is a 
nice approach to the character and it is wonderfully done by, in my 
opinion, the quintessential Batman, Michael Keaton.
The action sequences are amazing as well - adrenalin-rushing and 
hilarious.  Tim is a true master for creating these intense scenes and 
he does it by minimalism.  He doesn't use a billion Bat-Gadgets, just 
the ones he needs.  In the newer ones, they have gadgets for everything. 
 "Hand me the Bat-Sock-Warmers, will you, Robin?" will be the next quote 
in the next Batman.  But in this one, he has a few things and a mere two 
vehicles - the Batcar and Batwing.  These are cooler than any of the 
later models.  
Danny Elfman's amazing score is also highlighted by some campy Prince 
tunes.  These fit nicely into the campy, darkly comic scenes that Tim 
Burton creates.  
Tim creates a Batman with depth, humor and action and also creates the 
quintessential superhero film - it feels like a comic book but not like 
the hammy TV show.  He perfectly balances the film noir qualities with 
the humor.  And with Jack Nicholson playing the Joker, the circle is 
complete since we have the best Batman and the best Batman-villain.  
The only weak point is the female - Kim Bassinger, who gets to fall in 
love with Bruce (and not Batman).  She's good most of the time, but the 
scene where she finds out who he is just kills her character.  She's 
good except for that essential part.
Overall, this is probably the best superhero film ever made.  Of course, 
with Tim Burton handling it, how could you miss?  Okay, well "Mars 
Attacks!" wasn't that great, but at least he has this one on his oeuvre.

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
Director: Terry Gilliam
Writers: Terry Gilliam, Tony Grisoni, Tod Davies, and Alex Cox (based on
the novel by Hunter S. Thompson)
Starring: Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro, Christina Ricci, Gary Busey, Tobey
Maguire, Ellen Barkin, Cameron Diaz, Flea, Mark Harmon, Katherine Helmond,
Flea, Michael Jeter, Lyle Lovett, Harry Dean Stanton, James Woods
One could probably read Hunter S. Thompson's novel "Fear and Loathing Las
Vegas" while watching Terry Gilliam's film "Fear and Loathing Las Vegas"
and find that everything is nicely in synch with one another.  Fans of
filmed novels, especially cult classics like this one, almost get off on
pointing out every single little difference, no matter what the size is,
will actually find that the film version of this novel ranks as one of the
most faithful film adaptations, up there with, say, Orson Welles version of
Kafka's "The Trial."
Of course, film and books are different kinds of mediums: books let our
imaginations bring the story alive, directed by almost painstaking detail,
comparitively; films give our imaginations a break, and lure us into a
sensual lull, although some often stimulate the brain with themes and
concepts, like books do.  Thus, a film that is totally faithful to a novel
does not always mean a great thing.  The film needs to be successful in
terms of film, and being faithful to the novel doesn't need to come first. 
Last year's "The Shining" mini-series, starring Steven Weber and Rebecca
DeMournay, taught us that.
However, Terry Gilliam, ex-Monty Python-er and cult director ("Brazil," "12
Monkeys," etc.), is one of the best contemporary directors in terms of
making a film an experience to savor, and he and the other screenwriters
(Tony Grisoni, Tod Davies, and Alex Cox, the latter who was supposed to
direct this flick but was canned from the job), make "Fear and Loathing in
Las Vegas" The Film not only satisfying in terms of an adaptation, but also
does a great job in capturing the tone and detached wry wit of the film. 
He gives the film a distinct visual flair, putting us in what Gilliam
envisions as the mind of Thompson, and even allows the narration to
continually quote from the book's hilarious verses, making this one of the
most faithful film adaptations not only in terms of substance, but also
style.
However, this total faithfulness does raise a couple problems, like the way
that the film relies so much on Thompson's narration that it runs into some
problems with telling the story.  Or the way that it tells of a time that
is probably unfamiliar to many of the people this flick targets (other than
fans of the novel, this film is aimed towards Generation Xers, and anyone
younger), which is the early 70s when drugs began to loose the steam they
had, yet people like Thompson were still doing it, seperating themselves
from the society.  The film doesn't do the best job of establishing the way
it felt in general, other than showing some news clips of Nixon and
Vietnam.  I mean, I had to do research just to know the importance of this
novel.  The novel is a piece of journalism, reporting not only the way it
was, but the way he felt to be apart of it all.  It was blunt, it was
concise, and a film is not really the best way of making itself a piece of
journalism, like the book was.
But before I go on, let me explain the plot a bit.  "Fear and Loathing in
Las Vegas" was the true account (or what he could remember) of his trip to
Vegas (duh) with his one lawyer friend to cover a desert racing event and
later a Drug Enforcement Seminar.  Prior to going, his friend "advises" him
to buy a red convertible, jazz up his wardrobe with lots of hawaiian
tee-shirts, and buy as much drugs and alchohol as possible.  With all the
drugs in a briefcase, they take off for the strip, downing as many drugs as
possible, ironically in the same place where marijuana possession means
about 10 years, and selling means life.
Johnny Depp plays the Thompson character, who goes by his pseudonym Raoul
Duke, and wears a white cap, sunglasses, with his head balding rapidly, and
with a cigarrette perpetually dangling from the corner of his mouth, all
while talking in a really fast, deep voice in what is his reality and also
on the narration (he really does look and sound like a young Thompson); and
Benicio Del Toro plays the lawyer friend, sadly named Dr. Gonzo (after the
term "gonzo journalism," which Thompson created from this book), burying
his usual cool looks under about 40 or so more pounds than usual, as well
as long, puffy hair, nicely creating the "300-pound somoan" that Thompson
describes his prose.
Together, they proceed to wreak havoc on the denizens and locales of Vegas,
primarily the two hotel rooms they stay in during the course of the film. 
They run into various people, who show up briefly, then disappear, some who
occasionally re-appear for a couple brief seconds, giving them a sense of
alienation in the world.  Alas, this means lots of cameos, with some great
stand-outs from: Christina Ricci, as a Jesus freak who, um, paints Barbara
Streisand portraits, or at least attempts to; Tobey Maguire, as an
unfortunate hitch-hiker; Cameron Diaz, as a kinda flirtatious chick on an
elevator; Ellen Barkin, as a saddened diner waitress; Michael Jeter, as an
out-of-touch speaker at the DEA conference; and Gary Busey, as a police
officer who specializes in desert control.  Some credits have listed James
Woods in the cast as well, but I couldn't find him.  If you do, please tell
me.
This is exactly how the book felt - a supporting character would enter the
story for a couple pages, then leave a bit, and it successfully distanced
the leads from everyone else in the world.  The film does this nicely as
well.  The film is also very effective in giving everything the right
atmosphere, staging some of the best sequences from the book wonderfully,
and even following up on some of Thompson's weirder acid flashes (the
casino becomes alive with lizards, literally, in one scene).  Gilliam also
sometimes pulls back from the leads' perspectives, showing how moronic they
look to everyone else, and how distanced from society they really are.
The narration works nicely, often following from the novel literally, and
this gives the viewer the reason to like our characters, as what they do in
the visual context of the film would probably not gain the affection of any
audience who hasn't read the book.  The film seems like it's talking to us,
commenting on what's going on from Thompson's perspective from later on, as
he is often reflecting on the experiences he had, but seems like he still
hasn't given up on them.  One of the messages of the film is to be
yourself, and not worry about what society thinks when they see you acting
weird.
The reason the novel was so important was because it came at a time when
the psychedelia of the 60s, so popular at its time, was quickly dying, and
the year it was written (1971) was a major turning point in terms of mind
expansion.  By this time, Thompson was considered an "aging hippy," and his
rapid drug use, considered so acceptible at its peak in the late 60s, as
well as his views on politics and the condition of the world at the time as
one of the main reasons he used drugs so profusely, were becoming passe. 
The novel was a portrait not only of himself, but of the people who looked
on his behavior as deviant.  The film doesn't really capture all of this,
but the sense of alienation that the characters suffer through, and the way
that their behavior was becoming more destructive than before makes this
film successful.
Of course, the film is far from perfect.  The plotlessness, which worked so
nicely in the book, doesn't work as well for the film as it did for the
movie, particularly because this film is 126 minutes long, making some of
the longer moments which go nowhere plotwise seem too much (the diner
scene, such a great part of the book, seems like a distraction in the
film).  And there are some more problems with the redundancy, which didn't
seem as apparent in the book, but seems kind of annoying here (the film
sometimes follows a trend of: do drugs, embarass one's self in public,
retreat to room, do more drugs, trash it...maybe include someone else from
time to time to shock).
Nevertheless, Gilliam does manage to keep a tight control over the film,
making the film like a really freaky trip of sorts.  We're along with the
two protatonists whether we like it or not, and thanks to some great
narration, we're almost glad to be there most of the time, when they're not
getting close to ODing and not resembling human beings at all.  Kinda like
the book in a way...kinda not...
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for SubUrbia (1997)
Director: Richard Linklater
Writer: Eric Bogosian
Starring: Giovanni Ribissi, Steve Zahn, Amie Carey, Nicky Katt, Jayce 
Bartok, Parker Posey, Dina Spybey, Ajay Naidu, Samia Shoaib
Richard Linklater's fourth film, following "Slacker," "Dazed and 
Confused," and "Before Sunrise," is much like his previous efforts - 
they all depict slackers in a lovable fashion, allowing them to talk; 
all take place within a day (mostly night); and all are good.  However, 
"subUrbia" takes a whole new stance on the whole slacker-brand idealism 
- it's just a waste of life.
The characters in this film hang out at the Cicle-A gas station, the 
place where people fuel up and then go on with their lives.  Here, these 
guys are stuck at the gas station, just hovering around, wasting time 
and talking about all the things they're gonna do with their lives 
occasionally.  Of course, that's all they do is talk, but never act on 
them unless they absolutely have to.  Linklater has always viewed these 
guys as idealistic in that bad way, but he has never presented it in 
this kind of honest and dark fashion.
The pretty-much-understood protagonist is Jeff (Giovanni Ribissi, the 
first drummer in "That Thing You Do!" who broke his arm), a clueless 
slacker who has no clue what he wants to do and feels content in the 
fact that he knows this.  He is dating the multi-color-haired Sooze (Amy 
Carey), an also clueless future performance artist (who's bit "Burger 
Manifesto Part 1" is classic) who wants to move to New York, much to the 
dismay of Jeff, but is pretty much set in just saying "I'll get there 
someday."
There's also Sooze's best bud, Bee Bee (Dina Spybey, on "Men Behaving 
Badly" now), who has just gotten out of rehab, but is totally shaky and 
feels isolated from everybody.  She gets some consolation from Jeff and 
from Buff (Steve Zahn, also from "That Thing You Do!," but in a much 
bigger role), a hyperkinetic jokester who seems to be eternally drunk 
and on a combination of hash and speed, causing him to always be 
attracting attention.
Then there's Tim (Nicky Katt, one of the slain rednecks in "A Time to 
Kill").  Tim was in the Air Force but was honorably discharged so he can 
work on his alcoholism and nihilation.  He's the creepiest and most 
dangerous of them all because he presents the fact that the American 
dream is dead and becomes the big annoyance for everyone by sadistically 
preying on every single character's insecurities.
As far as the American Dream goes, it's represented by two Pakistanis 
who own the Circle-A (the first time I've seen a Pakistani owning 
American property in a non-comical role).  They are the married young 
couple, Nazeer and Pakeesa (Ajay Naidu and Samia Shoaib, respectively), 
and Ajay has two years left before he has completed his engineering 
degree.  He represents how people can further themselves, but is held up 
for contrast to the slackers who do nothing with their lives but bitch 
and complain and talk about how they're Americans and are somehow owed 
something.  Ajay also utters the devastating words that wrap up the film 
at the end.
There is no real plot, just talking, which just orchestrates that these 
people have nothing to do but talk.  The only kind of narrativeness 
comes in the form of a guy named Pony (Jayce Bartok), who was their 
friend back in the day but became a big rock-star.  He's not presented 
as a jerk or anything, but as a guy who has actually taken the time to 
work hard and, for some odd reason, wants to just lay back and do 
nothing for a night.  He's rather clueless himself - at one point he 
meanders about a subject, just as an excuse to have them tell him to 
play his music.  He whines about how his life is hard and how it's 
turned into just "Hotel, concert, airport," and etc, etc, whatever and 
ever amen.
Some things happen, couples become rearranged in the spirit of "A 
Midsummer Night's Dream," and in the end, they're all viewed as a bunch 
of losers who need to be given a shot of motivation or self worth.  The 
suburbia of the title refers to a kind of enclosed prison where they 
don't have to care about anything, but always have a quick-e-mart of 
some kind to hang out at and do nothing.
The film is wonderfully acted, with standouts by Ribissi, Zahn, and 
Katt.  But the whole cast works wonderfully.  We even get Parker Posey 
(who's been in, like, 30 films in 3 years) as Pony's journalist or 
something who's just along for the ride so she can get laid, no matter 
what slacker it is.  The cast has a lot to say, and they all give the 
dialogue in the most human manner and all play off eachother 
wonderfully.  I haven't seen large-group chemistry like this 
since..."Dazed and Confused."
The writing is also very well done.  Eric Bosogian has a knack for 
writing great dialogue, dialogue that is speakable and fun to listen to. 
 There's a ton of great lines and jokes, and all the characters are 
cleverly constructed.  But some of the lines are very satirical and 
don't seem like a normal person would say them.  But this isn't reality 
anyway.  It's a surreal kind of landscape of nihilism and 
self-destruction.
While Bogosian paints his characters as all being schmucks (except for 
the two Pakistanis), Linklater presents them in a loveable vein, causing 
them to kind of mirror us.  It's some of us on the screen, but we would 
only say some of the stuff if we're really being honest.  It somehow 
works.
And Linklater always seems to find the perfect everything for a scene.  
The whole film doesn't take place at the Circle-A; it ventures out 
everywhere in the bleak suburbia.  The mood and tone are dark and 
foreboding, like you know something bad is going to happen.  He 
carefully constucts everything, almost making it like stalled time for 
the characters to waste their lives.  It's never boring, kind of like 
listening to Spalding Gray talk, but more satirical (yet just as 
rewarding).
"subUrbia" is a very fantastically done film that not only proves that 
Rick Linklater is one of the finest young American directors, but also 
that we idealistic slackers who think if we think long enough, we'll 
suddenly come out kosher dill are all just wasting our lives.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
Director: Jeremiah Chechik
Writer: Don MacPherson
Starring: Ralph Fiennes, Uma Thurman, Sean Connery, Jim Broadbent, Fiona
Shaw, Eddie Izzard, Eileen Atkins, John Wood, Patrick Macnee
People who know me will be surprised to discover that I've never watched a
second of this show, and not at all surprised to discover that I'm dying to
finally get a glimpse of it.  One would think that in theory I could get a
neat glimpse into what the show was like by watching a movie based on it,
but such is the magic of the Hollywood machine.  Unless the show is really
a huge mess with a scattered, confusing plot, lots of bad puns, and only a
couple cool moments...oh, and some neato fashion.
Okay, it's not that bad.  But it's close.  "The Avengers" is only made
better if you're not a fan of the cult hit TV show from the 60s, where
you'd probably be appalled if you saw what has been done with it, unless
the show was really this mediocre.  Since I have nothing but lots of good
word of mouth about how cool the show was, I have no way of knowing how
faithful it is.  I just know that it made me want to see how cool the
original TV show was since Hollywood doesn't exactly have a good track
record with bringing TV shows to the big screen.
All I know of the show is what I know from reading and listening to fans,
and what I know is this: the Avengers of the title are a pair of secret
agents working for the British government with the job of stopping criminal
masterminds that plague the country.  While the heroines changed (the most
popular being Emma Peel, played by Diana Rigg), the hero, John Steed
(played by Patrick Macnee), was always the same.  Steed was a master of
suaveness, and with his proper dress, fashionable hat, and umbrella always
in hand, he was a master of the dapper...or so I'm told.  Peel was just as
intriguing, what with her skin-tight black leather costumes and smart
babeishness, and the two had a cool sexual tension between them that never
crossed the line since Peel was married anyway.
The film brings back those two, with amazing actor Ralph Fiennes playing
Steed, and also amazing actress Uma Thurman playing Peel, and the film
gives us an introduction to them.  As like every TV show film adaptation,
this film is designed to launch a franchise and a whole slew of sequels a
la Batman, and like all of the spin-offs, this feels like more of a trite
introduction than an actual good film, which the original "Batman" film
was.  We get a half-assed case to introduce the characters, and generally
give us a good feel about them, but this film exacts the point that many of
these films just don't care about their plots.
Here's this one: a billionaire named August de Wynter (Sean Connery,
finally playing a spy-like villain) has decided to make England pay for
their weather by designing a device that controls it.  It's up to Steed and
Peel to stop them.  It's not the best plot (actually, it sounds
disturbingly a lot like the Simpsons episode where Mr. Burns blocks out the
sun with a machine and tries to get the town of Springfield to pay for it),
but it could have at least been easy to follow.
The chief complaint I have with this film is it's not done yet.  I swear to
god this film has scenes missing, as if some NYU student got a hold of it
and cut it up a bit so that it would be less presentable.  Not only do
simple things, like the explanation for a second Emma Peel and the motive
for August's actions, never become clear at all, but this film has gaping
plot holes that cause this film to make little to no sense.  Why does
August's henchman (Eddie Izzard, most likely the next Dr. Who) decide to
attack Steed and Peel by using giant cyberbugs with cannons on them?  Beats
me, but it sure annoyed me.
Actually, it's not too horrible.  The film choses an interesting path to
chose: instead of worrying about plot, it decides to set a certain mood. 
And for the first half of this film, we get to kind of just hang with Steed
and Peel as they get to know eachother and flirt unsubtely.  Fiennes is a
terrific actor, and he pumps up the charm as high as he can get it, making
Steed a wonderfully likable spy.  Even an Avengers-fan/friend of mine
pointed out that he was after all a great choice for playing Steed. 
Meanwhile Thurman isn't bad, although not as interesting as Fiennes.  She
just never finds the exact note for her performance.  Still, the first half
is fun to watch, and I was rather entertained albeit very clueless to what
was going on.
By the end, though, it had begun to resemble one of the worst of the
annoying TV show film adaptations, "Batman and Robin," where they had
crossed from light camp into total lampooning.  Both the end of "The
Avengers" and the entirety of "Batman and Robin" rely on bad jokes, witless
humor, and annoying and badly-executed action sequences to "carry" them. 
So what do we get for watching the first hour or so of this film?  A boring
and blessedly trite attack by Steed and Peel on the fortress of August,
with a sword fight (sorta) and a whole lotta water.  And following that, a
rip off of the ending of a James Bond movie.  Ugh.
I have to admit, though, I actually did like some of this movie.  I loved
Ralph Fiennes performance, and was pretty into Thurman's as well (though I
suspect I'll fall in love with Diana Rigg like everyone else who saw the
show did).  I laughed at several of the jokes (especially August's note to
the British Government: "I'll make the weather so cold that you all will
have to go to hell to warm up), and appreciated that they at least let
actors like the great Jim Broadbent and a hilarious, Tommy Gun yielding
Eileen Atkins do some good British humor schtick.  But I wouldn't reccomend
it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Writer/Director: James Cameron
Starring: Leonardo DiCaprio, Kate Winslet, Billy Zane, Frances Fisher,
Kathy Bates, Gloria Stuart, Bill Paxton, Suzy Amis, Bernard Hill,
Jonathan Hyde, Victor Garber, David Warner, Danny Nucci
With all the hype surrounding it, it's a shock "Titanic" isn't
anti-climactic.  I mean, with a budget bigger than that of
"Waterworld"'s, a very simple if not tired premise, and a film that has
been worked on for around three years now, it's a shock I wasn't let
down.  Thankfully, "Titanic" is the old-fashioned epic I had hoped for -
a passionate, emotional tragedy on the level with any of the great epics
of the fifties and sixties.  One would have to be pretty cold-hearted
not to at least feel a little sad at the finale of this one.
First off, "Titanic" has the most amazing special effects I've ever
seen.  Really.  The ship looks realistic, the action sequences are
exhilerating (yet never overwhelming), and every shot is authentic. 
When we first see the ship, it looks as grand as it probably did when it
was first unveiled to the world.  A giant ship that was arrogantly
declared "unsinkable," even seeing a recreation of it isn't
anti-climactic.
And when it begins to sink, it looks absolutely frightening.  Thanks to
a long running time, we get the feeling of every single second of the
ship's descent into the cold Atlantic waters.  Every single shot of the
water spilling into the ship is creepy and ominous, even after we've
seen it hundreds of time.  There are brilliant shots on people about to
be killed as a result of the flooding, most notably a shot of an old
couple on a bed that is about to be swept away with water.  And when the
ship's rear is sticking way up in the air, still carrying hundreds of
passengers who are hanging on for dear life, it's one of the most
shocking sights these eyes have ever seen, that includes all the things
I've seen in real life.
The film is also incredibly authentic, acting as an exact example of
what it was like to live back in that particular time period.  I mean,
the film gets every single facet of the boat correct, probably all the
way down to the kind of china they used to serve the upper class. 
Watching "Titanic" is like taking a literal time warp; you feel like
you're one of the passengers on this boat, and when the boat is sinking,
we either feel like the people in the boat watching this horrendous
event, or we feel like one of the people still on the boat...depends
where we are.
And the special effects are astounding.  The reason it's the best I've
seen in a long while is that it doesn't understate the storyline, and
doesn't look like a special effect.  The ship looks realistic, and it
looks absolutely frightening every time we see the water slowly creeping
into rooms.  The film uses special effects in a way that most films
don't use it: intelligently.  Even before we journey back in time, we
learn exactly how the ship sank, thanks to some great special effects in
the beginning.  Of all the films I've seen this year, "Titanic" is the
best to look at.
Then there's the story...just kidding.  The story's actually excellent,
working flawlessly with the special effects.  Sure, the premise sucks
(Romeo and Juliet for the first half, "The Poseidan Adventure Part Deux"
for the second), but writer/director James Cameron fuses it with so much
passion, that by the finale, this is truly a tragedy.  Not many people
could pull this off without making it incredibly corny and
melodramatic.  But we care about the characters that inhibit the
storyline, and by the end, even I was kind of choked up.  If you know me
at all, I hardly give any deep emotions for any film characters, but in
this, I cared about the two protagonists as people, not characters.
If you've seen the tell-most-of-everything preview, you know that the
story revolves around the present day search for a valuable piece of
jewelry believed to have sunk with the Titanic.  Grungy-looking Brock
Lovett (Bill Paxton, who has finally found a good look for himself)
heads an operation that goes down to the sunken ship with a small remote
control boat (hysterically called "Snoop Dog"), and takes pictures, much
like Cameron did in real life (these are real shots of the Titanic). 
Seeing it on the news is a survivor of the sinking ship, 101-year old
Rose Dawson (Gloria Stuart), who claims to be the naked girl in a
drawing they found, wearing the jewel.  She's shipped out to the ship,
and begins to tell the anecdote we see on screen.
Being forced to marry an arogant ass (but a rich arrogant ass) named Cal
Hartley (a surprisingly effective Billy Zane), the poor Rose (Kate
Winslet) is on the ship with her fiance, her mother (Frances Fisher),
and Cal's entourage, including his respectable henchman, Lovejoy (David
Warner, who was just in "Scream 2" as the theater director). 
Incessantly melancholy, she tries to kill herself, and runs into Jack
Dawson (Leonardo DiCaprio), a third class guy who won himself a ticket
from a game of poker.  They instantly click, and are soon parading
around, and falling in love.
After several complications (mommy doesn't like him, and Cal is getting
jealous...not to mention he's poor), they are soon officially sneaking
around, and by the time the ship (which was going too fast on purpose)
has collided with the iceberg, we are really rooting for them to get
married.  Some may call this an unoriginal and simple relationship.  It
is.  That's the beauty of it.  Because of its simplicity and universal
relation to any star-crossed love affair (even that of Romeo and
Juliet), we identify with them and/or care about them incessantly.  And
since Winslet and DiCaprio have wonderful chemistry together, and
possess such charisma individually, we love them as people.  By the time
they're in the water, waiting for the lifeboats to come and pick them
up, we're already in tears.
Apart from a wondeful tragedy of epic proportions, the film works
brilliantly as simple satire.  Cameron takes a negative approach to the
Titanic, as well as a sweetly positive one.  He shows the horror of
classes, as they are divided, and that the first class (or "better
half," as one character puts it) is saved while the lower classes get
gypped.  But by the end, both classes are suffering in one way or
another: the lower classes suffer by mostly dying, and the upper class
suffers by having to watch this and feel emotionally ravaged (well, most
of them do).
The film is also about man's arrogance.  Why anyone could think they
could build a ship that "God himself couldn't sink" is truly moronic,
and God (if he's there...) makes them pay for it.  Not to mention, some
of the more stupid people running the ship decide to not put enough
lifeboats on the ship for fear of "cluttering."  The Captain and the
Designer of the ship (Bernard Hill and Victor Garber, respectively) are
thankfully put in a good light, as they were merely pawns in the game,
ruled by the arrogant of them all, Bruce Ismay (Jonathan Hyde), the
administrator, who wants to blow everyone away by arriving in New York a
couple days before scheduled.
Thankfully, this film isn't one-sided.  The best thing about the Titanic
seems to be that it brings two people together, even if it's not
historically possible (apparently, the upper class would have no way of
even getting near the lower class).  Even at the end, Jack is happy that
he came on the ship, since he got to meet his true love.  At least some
good came out of the ship, even if it was one of the few rays of light.
The acting is amazing, especially from the two leads (who won
well-deserved Golden Globe nominations).  DiCaprio has never been
better, and Winslet is amazing (even if she has been better - she's a
better actor than DiCaprio after all).  Also notable is Gloria Stuart,
as the older Rose, Bill Paxton, Bernard Hill as the Captain, Victor
Garber as the Designer of the ship, Billy Zane (who does a great job,
despite the fact that his character is one-dimensional), and Kathy Bates
as the noveau riche (not to mention, unsinkable) Molly Brown.  A fine
job from everyone.
At over three hours, "Titanic" is lenghty but never boring.  Cameron has
made several long films in his career, most of them director's cuts. 
Thank god he wasn't afraid to release a long film, because this film
needed to be long.  No important elements of the story are missing, and
he directs with such passion.  Sure, his writing in some places is a tad
corny, but he never lets the film seem melodramatic or forced.  Even the
star-crossed lovers plot is not forced (thank god once more).
"Titanic" may actually be the best film Cameron has ever done (maybe). 
Of all his films, this one has the most undaunted passion, biggest
emotions, and grandest themes.  It's an all-around powerful film, an
epic that never gets corny, never seems like a disaster film, and is
never boring at all.  It deserves to be ranked along with the best films
of the year, a wonderful masterpiece of a film.  I loved every minute of
it.
homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Himmel über Berlin, Der (1987)
Director: Wim Wenders
Writers: Peter Handke and Wim Wenders
Starring: Bruno Ganz, Otto Sander, Solveig Dommartin, Peter Falk
Here's the most beautifully lyric, most poignant, and downright sensual
film you will probably ever see about the phenomenon known as angels. 
That's because this is not a glorification of what they are, it's a film
that tries to make it feel like you're one of the two angels in this film. 
It understands that they are the spirits God chose to watch over earth
because no one else could witness it.  It knows that perhaps children can
see them, but adults have lost the abitlity to.  And it knows that they try
and console those they see in desperation and sadness, but that they cannot
directly affect their lives.  To them, the world is a black and white world
that they know everything and nothing about.
The two angels of the film are named Damiel and Cassiel (Bruno Ganz and
Otto Sander), and they are the angels who look after Berlin, back when it
was divided by the Berlin Wall.  They have been there ever since the days
before of Hitler, have witnessed all of World War II, and have seen
everything they possibly can see.  The first hour and a half are a
slow-moving, totally hypnotic trip around Berlin as we see each of them
watching people, listening to their inner thoughts like they were stations
on the radio, and sometimes staying to see people in need of some help, to
which all they can give is a helping hand.
Somewhere in the beginning, Damiel wanders into a carnival, and soon falls
in love with an acrobat there, Marion (Solveig Dommartin), who is depressed
because the carnival is closing, and she will have to give up the job she
loves and take up a waitressing job.  It's easy to understand why Damiel
loves her: she has deep, sad feelings, something which the angels are not
able to really have, except for the giant yearning that Damiel soon has to
"take the plunge," as he puts it, and become human so that he can live as
the people he has been watching for so long.
Sound familiar?  Well, it should because it was recently remade here in
America as "City of Angels," with Nicolas Cage as the lead angel, and Meg
Ryan as the woman (a heart surgeon in the movie - get it?).  Yes, I missed
the film (on purpose), but as it looked, that was too obsessed with the
love story, which is fine, it's just not "Wings of Desire."  This film is
not one that would be as successful as "City of Angels" was.  It moves
slowly, and has no plot and really nowhere to go for most of its running
time.  It's obsessed with creating the feeling of being either Damiel and
Cassiel, not being able to see things the way humans do, and only being
able to act as a voyeur, even when they're right in front of the people
they're viewing.
"Wings of Desire" is one of the most delicately structured films I have
ever seen in my life.  It's filled with a heavy amount of sadness and
almost jealousy, but it's light as a feather.  There is no real feeling of
time, and it has no real place to go, just like the angels who inhabit the
movie.  At around the hour and a half spot, when Damiel becomes human, and
the black and white cinematography suddenly shifts to color to show the
world of humans (the film shifts a bit every now and then, depending on
what the perspective is), the film suddenly has somewhere to go, and the
scenes that take place are often more crucial to the "plot" than to the
overall feeling.  Suddenly, Damiel has the chance to win the heart of
Marion, and he better damn well do it!
There's another character in "Wings of Desire" played by American actor
Peter Falk, who's playing himself (literally) making a movie over in
Berlin.  We learn about half way through the film that he cannot really see
Damiel, but that he knows he's there, and when he suddenly begins talking
to him, Damiel is so moved that he finds he needs to become human right
away (and he does).  Although he's only in it intermittently, he's a very
crucial figure in the film for two reasons: a) he brings up the prospect
that many other angels have done what Damiel ends up doing, and b) he's an
opposite to the angels: he's the one everyone in the world wants to watch
while Damiel and Cassiel are the ones that want to be watched.
What's the film's overall message?  There really isn't one, which is
actually better.  Like "2001: A Space Odyssey," this is a film that doesn't
necessarily want to limit itself to one singular definition, but wants to
be philosophical while still becoming hypnotic.  So many films make the
mistake of trying to be too philosophical and forgetting that it's a film
and it needs to become an experience.  Here's a film that doesn't answer
all the questions it brings up, and doesn't even bring up all the questions
it could.  But for two hours, I guarantee that you will be glued to your
television set, and afterwards you can debate the concepts that it touches
on.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Dead Again (1991)
Director: Kenneth Branagh
Writer: Scott Frank
Starring: Kenneth Branagh, Emma Thompson, Derek Jacobi, Andy Garcia, Hanna
Schygulla, Wayne Knight, Robin Williams, Campbell Scott, Christine
Ebersole, Miriam Margolyes, Obba Babatundé, Patrick Doyle
"Dead Again" is a prime example of a film that is filled to the brim with
energy, bravaura, and unbridled passion, a film that speaks only in broad
strokes and leaves one feeling completely satisfied by its wild conclusion.
 Films like this are seldom made today, but used to flourish in the past,
and that's why this film feels like a huge breath of fresh air: it's one of
those old fashioned suspense classics that Alfred Hitchcock used to make
that plows ahead with a wonderfully melodramatic story that anyone can
enjoy, and never apologises for any of it.
Of course, this is no surprise because it's by
director/actor/all-around-Shakespeare-guy Kenneth Branagh, one of the most
energetic and visual directors working today, the guy who can take a
four-hour completely-by-the-book adaptation of "Hamlet" and make it fly by
in what seems like a regular film.  But that it's a sophomore effort is
even more amazing.  Right away, Branagh introduced himself as a director
who is completely confident in what he's doing, and surprisingly just as
competent.  "Dead Again" may be his homage to Hitchcock and perhaps even
Welles, but it has Branagh written all over it.
The story is one that Hitchcock probably would have loved to have made but
died before he ever got around to it.  It deals with past lives, past
loves, and a kind of psychic energy that allows wrongs to resurface, either
to be corrected or made worse.  The film deals with a modern-day L.A.
detective, Mike Church (Branagh himself, this time equipped with a killer
American accent), who is hired by his old church (ha ha) to find out the
past of a woman (Branagh's then-wife, Emma Thompson, also equipped with an
American accent) who has come to them in a state of amnesia, the only clue
to her past being that she has nightmares every night and wakes up
screaming.  Branagh attempts to help her out, all the while falling in love
with her.
His investigation leads him to meet a hypnotist named Franklyn Madison
(Derek Jacobi, one of the best living Shakesperean actors), who offers his
help in finding out her past, and ends up discovering a past life, where
she was Margaret Strauss, the wife of a composer named Roman Strauss, who
was found guilty of killing her with a pair of scissors, and put to death. 
The film ends up juxtaposing back and forth between the present and the
past, the latter being shown in black and white, and featuring Branagh and
Thompson as the ill-fated couple.  We learn of a bit of dysfunction within
their marriage: Thompson becomes ever tired of his long-time servants, a
woman and her son, who helped Roman escape from the Germans during World
War II; and Roman begins to suspect Margaret of longing for another man, a
detective named Gray Baker (Andy Garcia).
The film continues on this path just like a good old Hitch film,
introducing numerous twists that are not only shocking, but plausible as
well (if you can swallow all of the past lives stuff), including one twist
that is so clever that you just have to give it a good laugh.  The past
eventually catches up to the present, and all of the loose ends are fought
over in the wonderfully theatrical conclusion, a sequence that any fan of
suspense will take great delight in.
Although told seriously, Branagh allows lots of humor to pour in, himself
giving a wonderfully cool and laid-back performance that causes the viewer
to easily like him.  He even gives roles out to Robin Williams and Wayne
Knight (who used to be Newman, if you didn't know that already), both who
give a healthy amount of support to the big picture.  This is, after all, a
Hitchcockian film, and the one thing that Hitchcock films weren't is
unhumorous.  He allowed tons of humor to flow in, to make the audience
relax a bit, then he would hit them with the suspense.  Branagh has this
down cold.
's almost bizarre to see a film that is this confident in everything it
does since most films today often pussy foot around and try and make up for
things that it does.  "Dead Again" is a film that just wants to be heard. 
The first thing we see in this film is a newspaper with the huge headline
"MURDER," and the last thing we see is two people in a passionate embrace. 
Branagh is so confident in everything he does from start to finish that
multiple viewings often result in discovering many little things that are
almost impossible to notice the first time because you're so wrapped up in
the story.  Even the bit twist towards the end is carefully backed up if
you examine all the acting and all the little things that go into it.  It's
confidence like this that makes for great movies, that makes you forget
about many of the little problems this film may have, and for the entire
run of the film just manages to pull you into the movie, make you laugh,
scare you a little bit, and then dump you right back into your seat with a
big grin on your face.  If only all movies were as wonderfully exuberant as
this one.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
Writer/Director: Whit Stillman
Starring: Chloë Sevigny, Kate Beckinsale, Christopher Eigeman, Matthew
Keeslar, MacKenzie Astin, Matthew Ross, Tara Subkoff, Robert Sean Leonard,
Burr Steers, David Thornton, Jaid Barrymore, Michael Weatherly, Jennifer
Beals, Mark McKinney, Carolyn Farina, Dylan Hundley, Taylor Nichols
>From looking at the title, Whit Stillman's "The Last Days of Disco" could
be seen as a corny confession of his love for the music, arriving just at
the time when everything 70s is suddenly (not to mention finally) suffering
a comeback.  After "Boogie Nights," the rebirth of John Travolta, the
sudden unearthing of the Studio 54 phenomenon, and even another Bee Gees
album, "The Last Days of Disco" comes out at a time when people would just
go to see it to laugh at disco music, not to mention the people who
actually enjoyed listening and dancing to it.  Of course, Whit Stillman's
much better than all that.
"The Last Days of Disco" is not really about the Disco Club phase as it is
about a time in history when the whole reason some people went to these
clubs was to bask in the social part of it all.  The people that are the
portrait of this film, the upper-middle-class soon-to-be-yuppies, may
actually enjoy the music, but they go to the club out of a fear of not
fitting in, and go there more to meet people, hold conversations, and maybe
occasionally go home with one of them.  The only reason they go to these
kinds of clubs is because they're the fad at the time of the film.
Of course, anyone who's seen one of Stillman's films knows this. 
"Metropolitan" and "Barcelona" are (in)famous for being plotless talkfests,
featuring characters that have rarely been filmed before.  In
"Metropolitan," he dubbed his group UHBs: Urban Haute Boreousie...or in
other words, snobs.  They're all well-educated, all read Salinger (as we
all should), only flock in their particular group, but still have many of
the same problems we all have.  But while "Metropolitan" saw them as
growing out of their young age, and "Barcelona" saw them as already
working, "The Last Days of Disco" catches them at that inconvenient time
known as post-graduation (and to make a connection between these films,
Stillman brings back some old cast members for cameos, most notably Taylor
Nichol's dorky Ted from "Barcelona," who makes a speech about, well, going
to Barcelona).
There's nary a plot in this film (unless you count a little subplot that
arises about narcotics and smuggled cash in the club), so we are instead
introduced to a wide variety of characters who inhabit the club every now
and then, most prominently Alice and Charlotte (Chloë Sevigny and Kate
Beckinsale, respectively), two young women both working as book editing
underlings in the same office, who become the film's chief focus as they
hang out in their big clique and occasionally pair off with the male
members who attract them at the moment.  For Charlotte, she somewhat
settles down with the hilariously insecure advertising underling, Jimmy
(MacKenzie Astin, the guy from the latter seasons of "The Facts of
Life"...don't ask me how I know that), who may not be the best partner for
her, but at least it sorta seems that way.
Alice is a lot different from Charlotte, though, and the two are even more
mismatched a pair of friends than the two leads from "Barcelona." 
Charlotte's a bit of a bitch, but one of those bitches who is somewhat hard
to stay mad at because they act like they need to be friends with you.  And
besides, Charlotte's insecure about her future and maps out goals she must
have for life, like getting married and working in television, while Alice
is insecure in general and finds she's wandering a lot more than Charlotte.
 As the film goes on, she goes through a couple boyfriends, starting off
with the suave but at the moment somewhat shallow Tom (Robert Sean
Leonard), and even dating the wonderfully obnoxious club partner, Des
(Christopher Eigeman, who's the main link between this and Stillman's other
two films), all while the kinda off-kilter young DA Josh (Matthew Keeslar,
from "Waiting for Guffman") looks on at her with longing.
The film wanders around with these people, never really sure where it wants
to go because these people aren't either.  One of the many great things
about Stillman, why he's one of the best writer/directors working today is
because he has an intriguing and ingenius knack for drawing character he's
fascinated with, partly because they're probably part of him.  As he's
gotten older (he's in his late 30s, I think), he's been able to look back
to his youth, when he was just like these people, and is able to paint
portraits of them that are simultaneously loving and satirical.  In other
movies, these people would be looked on as mere snobs, but here, they're
still snobs but they're also people.
While "Metropolitan," which dove deep into the lives of members of the
Debutantes and Escorts circuit, had a bit of trouble making a clear
connection between them and the audience (I know people whom I respect that
just can't sit through it because they can't stand the characters), "The
Last Days of Disco" shows that Stillman has finally found out how to make
his characters totally lovable, and surprisingly more sympathetic.  The
characters are basically all of us at that point in our lives where we're
just starting out in real life, struggling to make it in the big city
without financial help from our parents, and struggling to make friends
where the only social happenings are what you have to find for yourself.
And that's where the disco club comes in for these people, and why it's
demise is seen as both tragic and as a relief.  The club is basically all
these people have to really make aquaintances, and where they can discuss
novels, sex, and even the way that Disney films, like "Lady and the Tramp,"
are propaganda by Disney to make children into zombies (this speech is as
funny if not more than anything Quentin Tarantino has ever written, and
much more intelligent).  The characters in this film are as insecure as
everyone, and its this connection that rises "The Last Days of Disco" above
either of the films Stillman has made before.  We care about these
characters because despite their social rank, are really us...or soon to be
us.
"The Last Days of Disco" is the best film Stillman has made so far, not
just because of this great connection he makes, but also because the film
just allows us to live with these characters and watch their lives change
and how they interact with one another.  He has also never been able to
control his actors this well before.  Chloë Sevigny, the only cast member
of "Kids" to do exceptionally well in that film, is simply awesome as
Alice, and in an opposite field, Kate Beckinsale's performance as Charlotte
is as flawless as her accent.  Even MacKenzie Astin shows great promise as
a slightly neurotic future yuppie, something I wouldn't have thought he'd
be.  And Christopher Eigeman has never been this delightfully obnoxious
(his "To Thine Own Self Be True" speech is priceless).
As for Whit Stillman, a script of his has never been this sharp.  He has
such a great ear for the way the people in his film talk that he's up there
with the likes of David Mamet, Quentin Tarantino, and Woody Allen as the
best screenwriters currently working in films, and in this film, we see him
at his most controlled as well as a talented writer for women's roles.  His
films seem to live just for the dialogue, and listening to his characters
interact is as entertaining as anything on celluloid.  But perhaps most
commendable, he gives a voice to a group of people who haven't been
represented since the glorious days of J.D. Salinger, mostly because he's
been there, knows what it's like, and has distanced himself away from them
so that he can write them fairly and with the right amount of humanity. 
"The Last Days of Disco" only furthers his credibility and establishes him
as a very major talent in modern films.  His past two films are amazing,
but just shy of a four-star review, mostly because of a couple little
problems that just didn't get it past the finish line.  "The Last Days of
Disco" does, though, because it's his most balanced, most likable, and
overall most deep without becoming totally pretentious or unentertaining,
and, well, manages to make a film pack a film with wall-to-wall disco tunes
that still lives for the dialogue.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
Director: Steven Spielberg
Writer: David Koepp (kinda based on the novel by Michael Crichton)
Starring: Jeff Goldblum, Jullianne Moore, Pete Postlethwaite, Vince
Vaughn, Arliss Howard, Richard Schiff, Peter Stormare, Vanessa Lee
Carter, Richard Attenborough, Ariana Richards, Joseph Mazello
I saw "The Lost World," the sequel to "Jurassic Park," for a buck
twenty-five at my college's cheap movie theater, since I wouldn't pay a
good five bucks to see it in a regular one when the rest of the world
was seeing it.  Since I had passed a good environment up for crap
quality, a pan-and-scan format, and sound that was muffled and blaring,
as well as the question of whether or not the whole screen would even be
in focus, you can tell I had low expectations.
Yeah, I really liked "Jurassic Park."  It was breathtaking, scary, and
just good old fun.  But, well, you know that good sequels are about as
plentiful as good college food (so I have no school spirit...).  With
the rare exceptions ("Empire Strikes Back," "The Godfather Part II,"
"T2," "Addams Family Values" - that was about it), the sequel is pretty
much just a gimmick to make even more money on a gimmick that worked
once.   I mean, was it just me, or was "Home Alone 2" just "Home Alone,"
just in a different locale?
No, "The Lost World" is not nearly as good as the first one.  But did it
thrill me?  Oh yeah.
Many people criticize this film, and with good reason, but let's face
it: Steven Spielberg knew there wasn't much he could do with this, but
just wanted to make a fun movie, and toss in some little guilty pleasure
stuff he couldn't work into the original because he was trying to make a
little message.  So, while the first one was majestic, and somewhat
satirical in respects to cloning (though not a masterpiece or anything),
this one is darker, more violent and gorey, and even features one and a
half more T-Rex's.  Why one and a half?  Because one of them is only a
baby.
Of course, when you're making a film like this, where you want suspense
scene after suspense scene, you're bound to run into some little
problems.  For one, he never really builds up any of the characters,
with the exception of the only person from the original to have a major
part - Dr. Ian Malcom (Jeff Goldblum) - but that's because he was IN the
first one.  Also, the script is only marginally funny, with most of the
cool lines going to Ian (duh), while it does what most big
budget/let's-give-the-audience-what-they-want-and-deserve flicks do: use
characters' idosyncrasies as cheap plot devices (i.e. a characters
sadism towards the smallest dinosaurs on screen, another characters' gum
chewing, etc, etc, etc).  And there are more plot holes than you can
shake a stick at.
The plot is anti-climactically cheesy and flat: there was ANOTHER
island, where they bred hte dinosaurs or something, and the "capitalist
turned humanist" John Hammond (Richard Attenborough, proving again that
he is a better actor than a director) asks Ian to go back to the
dinosaurs and make sure they're okay.  Obviously he wouldn't want to go
back there, but we have an incredibly cheap plot device where his
girlfriend (Jullianne Moore) is already there.  So off to the other
island for some more dinosaur adventures.
Unlike the first one which pitted a couple characters together with one
goal - getting off the island in one group - we have two groups.  One
the good side are Ian, his girlfriend, his stowaway daughter (Vanessa
Lee Carter, who's mallato-ness caused a bit of a stir in the audience),
a buff photographer ("Swingers"' Vince Vaughn), and Mr. First-Death
(Richard Schiff, who was a scene-stealer in "City Hall").
And on the bad side are the company stereotypes, and their employees. 
We have the nephew of Hammond (Arliss Howard, who NEVER looks the same
in any of his movies), the big hunter chief guy (Pete Postlethwaite), a
sadistic hunter (Peter Stormare, lukewarm off of "Fargo," although I
think he rocks), and a couple of other guys (read: dino food).  They are
united about halfway through the film, following one of the big suspense
scenes.
After the traditional "Jurassic Park" long opening (although not nearly
as awesome as the beginning of the first one, since you were being kind
of educated and awed), we get to the point of the film: to scare the
shit out of you with improbable but highly skilled suspense scenes. 
Yes, the truck-hanging-over-the-cliff sequence is totally unbelievable
for nearly every second, but when you're watching, you're too freaked
out to even notice.  Spielberg, as it turns out, is a pretty good
director, and even if he lets plot holes like "why did Ian not make sure
his daughter was on a train or something before leaving" fly out into
the open, he knows exactly how to frighten us.  There were times, like
in the original, when I jumped, and even when I actually let out a
little Ted-like scream.
The ending, which is the most improbable of them all (the T-Rex is let
loose in the streets of San Diego), is actually done well.  It's all
tongue-in-cheek, with lots of inside jokes (a "Burger King" sign on a
ravaged bus - get it?), as well as blatantly funny ones (the video store
has signs for Robin Williams in "Jack and the Beanstalk" and Ah-nold
Schwarzennegger in "King Lear"), and even a couple parodies tossed in
for good measure (three japs running in terror from the Rex).  The
ending is not as satisfying as the original, mainly because we've been
scared for no good reason.
So is that a bad thing?  Not really.  I mean, yeah, we were scared in
the original, AND there was a reason for it.  But I personally see no
real reason why being scared for the sake of being scared is a bad
thing, other than that means you have to watch this film numerous times
intermittently.  No, the cloning-is-bad message is no longer really
there, but who cares?  It's a sequel.
The cast is amazing, yet there aren't any real acting stand-outs, let
alone Postlethwaite (big shock).  Goldblum isn't nearly as entertaining
as he was in the first one, but has a couple good lines here and there,
and is nicely done by good old Jeff (who should really start demanding a
percentage of the profit of his movies).  Moore, who can shift smoothly
between big budget film and indie, is okay.  The big sadness here, other
than Storemare having such a small and crappy part, is Vince Vaughn. 
After demonstrating exactly what a star-making performance really is in
"Swingers," he gets an under-written role that merely requires him to
look and act cool.  I mean, yeah, he rocks, but if you're gonna have
raptors jumping around and sneaking up on people in 4-foot-high grass,
you might as well toss in a scene where he jumps on top of a building
with a big gun and starts shooting those bastards.  It's only fair.
And as for the whole unlike-the-book spiel, I'll have you know that the
script and the book are two different entities.  They were written at
the same time to do well in their specific mediums.  I mean, I read the
book a long time ago, but I think Ian actually DIED in the first book,
but he's alive here, and starring.  So stop bitching, you Chricton-ites!
The darker tone, and the vicious-ness is a welcome surprise to the film,
causing it to become more fun than the original, in cases.  Sure, it had
plot hole after plot hole, stupidity after stupidity, and a plot weaker
than an Ethiopian (a joke, okay, a joke), but it wasn't aiming for
brilliance.  This was made to make money and entertain.  And I think it
achieved both of those, although not in any kind of spades.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
Director: Roger Spottiswoode
Writer: Bruce Feirstein
Starring: Pierce Brosnan, Jonathan Pryce, Michelle Yeoh, Teri Hatcher,
Ricky Jay, Goetz Otto, Judi Dench, Desmond Llewelyn, Joe Don Baker,
Vincent Shiavelli, Samantha Bond
The Bond series is an island in the film world; where else would we look
forward to cliches, and all of the other things that occur in most of
these films?  Where else would pure escapism, a vulnerable hero, the
"talking villains," blatant product placement, predictable action
sequences, and lots of promiscuity be hoped for instead of a significant
change?  I don't understand it myself, but that's what the Bond series
is based on.  For (I think) 18 films, we've mostly got the same thing
over and over again, with some variation (and a bit of change, most
notably in the two Dalton films).  But even I, a king of cynicism, can't
bitch about it.  And "Tomorrow Never Dies," the (again, I think)
eighteenth Bond film, and second Brosnan Bond film, is no exception. 
Thank god!
The plot, as in most of them, is pure balderdash, but seems to have a
nice kind of edge to it.  Instead of just plain billionaire psychotics,
we get a Rupert Murdoch-esque media mogul/psychotic - Elliot Carver
(Jonathan Pryce, looking bitching with a white-haired cru cut, and
always talking like he's out of breath), who has the admittingly
ingenius idea of getting ratings by creating a war.  No, this is not
"Wag the Dog" - he wants a real war, between China and England, and is
stupid enough to put the coverage out before anyone else discovered
it...in comes Bond.
James is sent all around the world, trying to do research on Carver,
fighting with his men, and running into (on more than one occasion) a
Chinese secret agent like him: Wai Lin (Michelle Yeoh, Asian action star
extraordinaire...and co-star of "Supercop," nearly stealing the screen
from Jackie Chan in that one).  The two eventually, and predictably of
course, begin working together, and yes, there is some sexual tension
between the two.  Luckily, their relationship is never strained, and she
never gives into his Cassanova-ness until the finale.  Thank god again.
In every Bond film, James bags, on average, three women (sometimes more,
sometimes less - the latter being more potent towards the
AIDS-cautionary Dalton), and he doesn't spoil this one (though we never
see them, of course - I mean, they need to stay around a PG-13 rating). 
There's always one at the beginning with some chick we never see again,
the big Bond girl (Yeoh), and this time we have an almost-cameo by Teri
Hatcher as Carver's wife, Paris, who, it seems, was once one of the
girls he bags at the beginning.  Yes, Teri's very attractive, but she
seems kind of dull.  Of course, it's not really her fault; her part is
under-written, and she's only in a small part of it.  Oh well.
And there are always the big henchmen, the guys who do the dirty work
for the polished big villains.  This time we get a tall, arian-looking
(not to mention Robert Shaw in "From Russia With Love"-looking) guy
named Stamper (Goetz Otto), who is pretty awesome, although a bit stiff
(well, mostly his posture, really).  And for a bit of comedy, we get a
cameo from Vincent Shiavelli as a German or Austrian assassin who is
ordered to do in Bond at one point.
The government people have small parts, as usual, with Q (Desmond
Llewelyn, looking near death, sadly) getting only one scene (in a more
grouchy mood than usual), and M (Judi Dench), getting more than M
usually gets (I mean, it is Judi Dench).  And for no reason whatsoever,
except 'cause he was so good in "Goldeneye," Joe Don Baker shows up
again as Wade, admitting he has no reason for being there, and is this
time more annoying.  Again, oh well.
The action sequences are not a let-down, although sometimes go on too
long.  They pop up every now and then, mainly because they have to (for
the sake of the series), and some significant ones are the opening one,
one in a garage with a BMW that runs on remote control, and a motorcylce
chase (on a BMW cycle, nonetheless) through China streets (or was it
Vietnam...the plot's not really essential).  They're more high-tech, and
feature much more laughs, which, yeah, I dig.  So what if they're
distracting; they're supposed to be!
The acting, from most around is great.  Yeoh is, actually, one of the
better Bond girls, mainly because she's so unique.  The better Bond
girls are more independent, and have a certain wily-ness to them.  Pussy
Galore, with her homoerotic undertones and all, is one of the best, and
Diana Rigg, who married Bond at the end of "On Her Majesty's Secret
Service" only to be killed, added some emotional depth.  Yeoh is notable
since she's so active, and has great chemistry with Brosnan.  Pryce is
an awesome villain, being slimy and lovable at the same time.  And
Brosnan is, once again, the mack daddy.
The Bond series is built on cliches, mainly because they're so fun and
add to the escapism.  If you can remember the Dalton years, and they're
serious direction, you remember how unsuccessful they were, both
financially and aesthetically.  The series would falter if bogged down
with too much plot, too many themes, and too much characterization. I
don't really understand it myself, yet I'm one of the bigger fans of the
series in the Northeast United States.  Having seen all of them more
than once (yes, I've seen this twice already), you can tell I adore
them.  While it's not one of the best, like "Goldfinger" or "From Russia
With Love," "Tomorrow Never Dies" is nonetheless a truly awesome
installment, even if not being as fully amazing as some of the better
ones.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Bound (1995)
Writers/Directors: Andy and Larry Wachowski
Starring: Gina Gershon, Jennifer Tilly, Joe Pantoliano, John P. Ryan,
Christopher Meloni, Richard C. Sarafian
Lately, the sub-genre of film noir has been coming back in a big way. 
With "L.A. Confidential" being dubbed one of the best films of the year,
we're seeing a 90s version of a once-dead group of films which delighted
in presenting a world full of harsh, selfish, amoral people, all out to
screw eachother over more than an episode of "Melrose Place."  With
"Bound," we get the perfect epitome of the new wave film noir.  It's a
stylish, politically incorrect, and deliciously nasty tale of greed,
trust, betrayal, and good old fashioned lesbianism.  WOO-HOO!
The big news for this film was that it was a film noir dealing with a
pair of LESBIANS who decide to rip off the mob.  As you can tell, the
main hook seems to be that the two protagonists are two female
LESBIANS.  But, this flick is more than that.  Yes, I was already there
when I found out that this flick featured a "steamy lesbian sex scene." 
But yeah, I could get that on Cinemax on any late night of the week...if
I HAD Cinemax.  But, this film surrounds that with a well-developed
plot, characters we like and/or care about in some fashion, and an
amazing directorial style which makes this film dripping with mood and
pure, unadulterated tension.  Even the lesbo sex scene is well-directed.
The film, as I said, tells about two lesbians, and we see them when they
first meet.  Corky (Gina Gershon, fresh off of "Showgirls," where she
played a bisexual stripper who makes out with Elizabeth Berkley - I
haven't seen it) is a butch crook who has just gotten out of prison, and
is doing a job for a mafia friend which requires her to...paint an
apartment.  When she gets on the elevator, she finds herself on it with
a mafiaso guy (Joe Pontaliano) and his cute moll (Jennifer Tilly).  The
two chicks trade flirtatious looks, and we find out that Corky is going
to be working in the apartment adjacent to that of the mafiaso and his
moll.
The film takes us through their courtship, which is funny and
intriguing.  Corky and her (name is Violet) meet a couple times before
one day Corky gets a call to fetch an earring out of Violet's sink. 
Before you can say "foreplay," the two are making out on the floor, and
soon engaging in some good old sex.  Some problems come up where they
begin to loose trust in eachother, but it becomes known that Violet's
man (name is Caesar) is holding two million in stolen money in their
apartment.  The two begin plotting an ingenius scheme which would not
only help them get rich together, but also get away clean with Caesar
blame.
This is only the first 20 minutes or so, by the way.  We are soon tossed
into a world of Hitchcockian tension.  Each step along the way gets more
and more frightening, and soon we are gripping the arms of our chairs. 
Why do we do this?  Well, the direction is fantastic, and we realize we
actually care about these characters.  In a typical or even good
thriller, the characters are half-interesting, more characateur, and we
only care about them because they are deemed "protagonist."  But here,
the directors make us care about these characters.  Hence, we're more
into it.
The direction is the real highlight of the film cinematically (we all
know what the real highlight is otherwise, though, eh?).  The Wachowski
brothers find interesting things for the camera to do in every single
shot.  Whether it's showing a close-up of blood squishing through the
carpet as someone steps on it, or if it's a wonderfully cool zipping
tracking shot of information going from one telephone cord to another,
the cinematography is always interesting, and highly snubbed at this
year's Oscars.  Look at the art direction in this film, and tell me you
don't already feel tense.
Also, instead of going for some cheap-ass Valerie Solonas message that
guys are jerks, and women should stick together to the bitter end, this
film aims for just a fun twist on the subgenre (as well as some more
fans from Howard Stern listeners).  It doesn't take up a lot of the film
(thank god), but just adds some more fun to the film, by letting us see
Gina and Jennifer show true chemistry.
The only complaint I have is that Jennifer Tilly's voice is annoying,
but I will say that it's less in this film than in others.  Not sure why
either.  If you've never heard it, it's very squeaky and high-pitched (a
friend said she would rather view it dubbed in another language, just so
they didn't have to listen to it).  But nevertheless Tilly is an
excellent actress, and so is Gershon.  The two have fantastic chemistry,
and make for two of the most memorable two leads in film noir.
Many thrillers are cheap, redundant, and sometimes even boring.  "Bound"
is the complete opposite.  From the moment that they're past the point
of no return, we're in a web of pure and utter tension.  Not many
thrillers can do this, and hold it without any peaks and valleys, but
the Wachowski brothers can, and can do it in spades.  And if you're not
already sold, just remember: it has lesbians.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
Director: Roland Emmerich
Writers: Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich
Starring: Will Smith, Jeff Goldblum, Bill Pullman, Judd Hirsch, Margaret 
Colin, Randy Quaid, Mary MacDonnell, Vivica A. Fox, Robert Loggia, 
Harvey Fierstein, Harry Connick Jr., Brent Spiner, Adam Baldwin
According to popular film opinion, a film's greatness is determined by 
time.  Take for example "Casablanca."  Great film, even today.  It's 
still as powerful as it was when it came out and still as romantic and 
tragic.  Another example would be "Star Wars," which had a very, very 
healthy box office gross despite the fact that we had all seen it about 
3 billion times before.  But as I rewatched "Independence Day" when it 
came out on video after being the number one hit of 1996, I kinda felt 
like it wasn't as cool as when I had first seen it.  I had liked it when 
I saw it the first time (*** was my original view) and basically saw it 
as a good "escape film."  But when I rewatched it, I felt cheated.  
Thus, the curse of the "event film."
"Independence Day" is like that kid who come out of nowhere and makes 
everybody happy at once (except for a couple kids - the critics, in this 
situation).  But after a while, this kid becomes annoying and you just 
wait for the next one.  Well, this kid is the "event film" in my little 
analogy.  And when I rewatched "Independence Day," not only did it not 
look cooler at all on the big screen, but I felt insulted the whole 
time.  There are too many gaping craters in the plot and you just aren't 
sure if it's comedy or hokey drama.  One scene, you'll see a hilariously 
nebbish scene between Jeff Goldblum and Judd Hirsch; the next you'll see 
a bunch of military uptight guys walking around, saying corny lines.  
The worst is a scene between Brent Spiner and Bill Pullman where Spiner 
is sayinig something innocently funny but is barked like a junkyard dog 
by Bill Pullman who gives him the most unitentionally funniest speech 
since the end of "Glen or Glenda?"
Now this annoying kid's problem is that in the process of trying to make 
everyone like him all at once, he shows he has no balls.  And 
"Independence Day" has no balls.  It plays it safe everywhere.  It 
throws in a ton of action that is borrowed from other superior films.  
The chase scene between the alien ship and Will Smith is straight out of 
"Star Wars."  I mean, isn't that Devil's Den?  And the aliens are about 
as anticlimactic as Demi Moore's breasts in "Striptease."  They're these 
octopus men, boring freaking octopus men.  I mean, come on.  The aliens 
in "2001" were more interesting and you didn't even see them!
Basically the plot is straight from a B-Movie from the 50s: aliens come 
to earth and we wonder if they're hostile or peaceful.  Okay, it's an 
interesting topic, but it's not handled greatly.  Now they aren't and 
somehow a computer geek, Jeff Goldblum, figure out they're using our 
satellites as a countdown to destruction.  Yep.  These aliens are not 
only heavily armed, they're stupid too.  They also use the same kind of 
computer as we do, but that comes about later.  The president (Bill 
Pullman), who's under attack for being a wimp, decides this would be a 
nice time to be belligerent, and he decides he'll stay in the White 
House which the aliens have covered.  I don't care if it's Bob freaking 
Dole in the White House, get him out of there.  I don't care if you have 
to inject him with sodium pentathol, just get him out of there.  Later 
on, he's stupid and wants to fly in the attack on a big alien ship.  I 
think it's time for impeachment for this guy.  He's more senile than 
Reagan on pot.
Then there's a cocky pilot (Will Smith) who is the only person to 
survive the counter-attack on the second day and becomes Moses in 
leading his children to the elusive Area 51 (the film's only sign of 
being brave).  His girlfriend's a stripper sharing a subplot with 
"Striptease" in that she has to do it for her son.  Come on, she has a 
fighter pilot boyfriend/soon-to-be fiance.  I think she can quit that 
job and get a more respectable job at Long John Silvers.  She's also the 
few, the proud, the lucky to survive the igniting of L.A. (as well as 
her dog, who narrowly survives).  
There are some bright spots.  They tossed in enough old film homages to 
keep me laughing.  The best one is when Jeff Goldblum (nicely named 
David) turns on his computer and a picture of HAL comes up and says, 
"Good Morning, Dave."  And they even played R.E.M.'s "It's the End of 
the World As We Know It (And I Feel Fine) at the beginning.  And Judd 
Hirsch steals the film by actually acting great (he's a stereotype, but 
I just loved the man anyway).  But there are no real subtle comic 
moments.  Will gets way too many one-liners and he has no one to play 
off of (execept Jeff towards the end, and the two do great).  
As I said, this film has no balls.  It is just aiming for a crowd 
pleaser and that's what it is.  But after a couple months, we all move 
on to the next "event" film while intaking little films and a couple 
indy ones for good measure.  But at least the indy ones last for a 
lifetime.  This one's short on batteries.

Title
Review for Delicatessen (1991)
Directors: Jean-Pierre Jeunet and Marc Caro
Writers: Giles Adrien, Jean-Pierre Jeunet, and Marc Caro
Starring: Dominique Pinon, Jean-Claude Dreyfus, Marie-Laure Dougnac,
Chick Ortega, Jean-Francois Perrier, Silvie Laguna, Edith Ker, Karin
Viard, Anne-Marie Pisani, Ticky Holgado, Pascal Benezech, Marc Caro,
Rufus
With "Alien: Resurrection" out just now and all, I thought I'd FINALLY
see "Delicatessen," an earlier flim by its director, Jean-Pierre Jeunet,
who had co-directed it with Marc Caro, but had not done the same with
the new "Alien" film (bringing about some tension over whether or not he
was the one with talent - by the way, it was good).  "Delicatessen" is
an amazing film, filled with amazing style, a wonderful off-beat tone,
and some bits of satire which work with the film instead of being apart
from it.
"Delicatessen" takes place in a post-apocalyptic future where there's
apparently a shortage of meat.  We meet a ex-clown turned wanderer named
Louison (Dominique Pinon, who was Vriess in the new "Alien" film), who
finds a room at an apartment building with a butcher shop in it, run by,
well, the butcher: Clapet (Jean-Claude Dreyfus).  He gives him a job as
his assistant, which basically means he goes around painting and doing
odd jobs about the bizarre building.  Little does he know, this is a
very temporary job as he will be chopped up after a week or so, and fed
to the apartment dwellers (we find this out in the first scene).
The film chronicles his going-ons in the apartment, as well as that of
the inhabitants.  Everyone in the building is eccentrically weird in one
way or the other.  For instance, there's an old man who lives in an
apartment filled with water so frogs and other amphibians can live with
him.  There's also the aristocratic suicidal Aurore (Silvie Laguna), who
is always setting up overly-elaborate death traps for herself which
never work out (one has the old electrical appliance dropped into a
bathtub).
The only ray of sun-shine in the gloomy, bizarre building is that of the
mousy Julie Clapet (Marie-Laure Dougnac), daughter of the butcher.  She
and Louison immeadiately hit it off, and start a kind of bittersweet
romance which never gets really sexual or anything, but is never
overly-corny.  There are great scenes they have together, including one
where they play a duet together: she on the cello, and he on a saw (it
sounds really cool too), and they become a symbol of light in the gloomy
post-apocalyptic world.
As the film goes on, the need for meat gets worse, and soon other people
are being hacked for the good of the rest, mostly since Louison is an
excellent worker.  A subplot involving a group of renegades who live
underground is also introduced, and they struggle to stop Clapet from
killing more people.  The climax is wonderfully long, and incredibly
elaborate, bringing the film to a very satisfying conclusion, but not
becoming overly grand.
One of the many great things about this film is how it refuses to get
off on its gimmick.  The cannibalism idea is one that could bring about
a huge gorefest a la "Dead Alive."  While this is not a bad idea, I
really admired how un-gory this film really is.  Jeunet and Caro barely
show the killings, making it more effective.  Sure, there's some gore in
it, but it never glamorizes or over-does it.
The style is the best thing about this film, even though it is
jam-packed with wonderful things.  It is incredibly off-beat, and shows
us some truly bizarre characters, as well as some wonderfully weird and
imaginative scenes.  One of the best parts of this film deals with sex
going on, which is then juxtaposed through certain other scenes of
people doing things, all in rhythm with the other, and ending in a
wonderfully inspired climax (i.e. Julie playing her cello in synch with
everyone else, and resulting in her breaking her bow).  And one scene
dealing with the grandmother is truly classic.
I also admired how sweet and gentle it could be.  While its style is so
offbeat that even the Coen brothers would drop their jaws, there are
moments and scenes that are just wonderfully calm.  There's a scene
towards the beginning where Louison is unpacking which is strangely
melancholy, which is one thing this film usually isn't.  And the scenes
between Louison and Julie are wonderfully bittersweet and strangely
touching.  Pinon and Dougnac have great chemistry, which helps.
A special note should be made to Jean-Claude Dreyfus who is absolutely
awesome as Clapet.  While being hysterical and all, he also shows some
truly human signs in quieter scenes, and just does a great job with the
role.  Another note should be made to Chick Ortega who steals scenes as
a freaky mailman with a crush on Julie and a penchant for shooting
anything subversive.
But most of all, this film is truly a masterpiece of a black comedy. 
It's hysterical, moving, and just jaw-dropping to watch visually.  There
are some minor flaws (the rebel underground subplot really never goes
anywhere), but overall, the film is more than a rewarding experience,
and a symbol of sheer filmmaking craftsmanship.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Maltese Falcon, The (1941)
Director: John Huston
Writer: John Huston (from the novel by Dashiell Hamet)
Starring: Humphrey Bogart, Mary Astor, Sidney Greenstreet, Peter Lorre,
Elisha Cook Jr, Jerome Cowan, Gladys George, Barton MacLane, Lee
Patrick, Ward Bond, Walter Huston
There are a few perfect films in their own respects that have been made
in cinema.  This is one of them.  "The Maltese Falcon" gets my vote for
the greatest piece of American film noir, simply because everything
about it is so flawless.  Filled with twists and turns which are
plausible and amazing, intriguing characters from all sides, and a story
which is never boring, "The Maltese Falcon" actually improves upon each
viewing.  They just don't make films like this anymore.
"The Maltese Falcon"'s labyrinthine plot revolves around the least
amoral and most intelligent character in the story: detective Sam Spade
(Humphrey Bogart), half of the detective office of "Spade and Archer." 
One day, a woman named Miss Wonderly (Mary Astor) comes in, asking them
to find her sister who has been stolen from her by a man named Floyd
Thursby.  When Archer (Jerome Cowan) tails him that night, he is shot by
point blank by someone.  Only minutes later, Thursby is also shot in the
back four times.
Not only out to clear his name since the cops think he shot one or both
of them, but also to get vengeance for his partner, Sam begins to do
some more investigating, and discovers that Thursby was thought to have
in his posession an antique "malteese falcon," which is worth millions. 
Also, Miss Wonderly is revealed to be a liar who's real name is Brigid
O'Shaughnessey, but whether she killed either of them is still
questionable.
As the plot slowly unfolds, we are introduced to a trio of more unshady
characters, all out to find the falcon: Joel Cairo (the great Peter
Lorre), an aquaintance of Thursby's who uses some witless tactics to
search Sam for the bid; Kasper Gutman (Philip Greenstreet), who's last
name describes his shape, and a rich man seeking the bird for years, and
willing to do anything to get it; and Wilmer Cook (Elisha Cook Jr.),
Gutman's dim-witted hitman who makes a name for himself inconspicuously
tailing Sam throughout the first half of the film.
The film has a brilliant plot, devoid of plot holes, implausibility, and
genuine stupidity, but is only secondary to the characters.  This is how
film noir should work: the plot is fueled by the characters within it. 
None of these characters are trapped by a gimmick, or by a plot which
needs to go only one place.  Even the romance between Sam and Brigid is
intelligently done, opening up whole new dimensions in the story.  And
the plot isn't just about who will get the bird; it's about who's smart
enough to get it.
The film also sometimes feels like a play, posessing a lot of the
intensity of watching live action occur.  On my third viewing of the
film, I timed the final scene at around 27 minutes, and in that scene,
we get a continuation of the story, as well as a wrap up.  The way this
scene is done, with very few cuts, is one of the most intense scenes in
cinema, as you're watching the end unfold mysteriously.  One of the best
things about this film is because it is character motivated, you don't
always know where the plot is going to go, and this allows every future
second to appear like a blind gaze.  In this scene, which is long, we
get tension purely because it is so superficially contained, and it's
one of the best scenes in all of Hollywood history.
The script is also amazing, as it is rumored to be word-for-word from
the novel it was adapted from (novel by Dashiell Hamet; script by
director John Huston).  The dialogue these people have are incredibly
deft, and create well-drawn characters.  There are numerous memorable
scenes consisting of just dialogue that moves the action around,
including the end, and a brilliantly done scene between Sam and Gutman,
when they first meet.  There are also some of the great lines that would
become Bogie staples, like my personal favorite, "When you're slapped,
you'll take it and like it!"
And the acting from everyone is incredible, as their characters are
written amazingly.  Elisha Cook Jr nails his role as the dim-witted
Wilmer, especially in the long final scene.  Peter Lorre gives a
memorable performance as Cairo, who has one of the coolest sounding
voices in history (which was later an influence for the cartoon
character, Ren - Lorre even gets a chance to yell at Gutman "You bloated
idiot!").  Sidney Greenstreet is incredible as Gutman, playing his
intelligent character appropriately cool, yet with undertones of
scariness.  And Astor plays her role so well that even I was as confused
to her innocence as Sam was.
And, of course, there's Bogie.  Humphrey gives one of his best if not
his best performance of his career as the anti-hero Sam Spade, a lonor
with a personal code of ethics which deems that he investigate the case
further.  Every scene he's in, he nails his character fully, embodying
him completely.  Every move he makes, and every piece of dialogue he
utters is his that of Sam Spade.  Not many people can embody a character
in a film this well, but Bogie can do it.
The direction by John Huston (in his first directing of a film) is
incredible.  He paces everything perfectly, and has written a highly
intelligent script which never loses the audience or insults their
intelligence.  Every single character is well-defined, and every twist,
turn, back-stabbing, is plausible and shocking simultaneously.  This is
a film where it is almost impossible to be bored at, and definitely
impossible to not be thrilled by.
Film noir is always a hard thing to do, but when every element is
balanced correctly, when everything comes together effortlessly, you
have a gem on your hands.  "The Maltese Falcon" is the best film noir
I've ever seen - better than "Chinatown" and the recent "L.A.
Confidential" (also better than the recent "Jackie Brown," which also
has great characterization).  By creating a world where the selfish and
cruel can abound by trying to screw eachother over, "The Maltese Falcon"
suceeds in thrilling an audience on simple pleasures, and coming off as
one of the most memorable and greatest films of all time.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Rich and Strange (1932)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: Alfred Hitchcock, Alma Reville, and Val Valentine (based on the
novel by Dale Collins)
Starring: Henry Kendall, Joan Barry, Percy Marmont, Betty Amann, Elsie
Randolph
What I love about these box sets of films you've never heard of by actors
and directors that are on sale for really cheap prices is that you can
discover little gems that are relatively impossible to find.  A friend of
mine recently purchased a 10-film boxed set of old Hitchcock films, old in
that they're from his '30s era when he still worked in England.  "Rich and
Strange" was one of the films, and what's surprising is that it's not a
suspense film, which was what most of Hitch's film were, yet it's still a
really good film in its own respect.  There's no espionnage, no kafkaesque
vision of a man innocently believed to be guilty; just a small, light
satire on the lives of the noveau riche, done with lots of energy and
style.  And no fierce birds or transvestite schizophrenics.
The beginning of "Rich and Strange" (I've never heard of it before either)
is actually one of the best openings of a Hitchcock film I've ever seen. 
It's kind of like a pre-Terry Gilliam view of the working class as zombies,
all except one character - Fred Hill (Henry Kendall) - who's the only one
of the large group of employees who has trouble with his umbrella when they
all go outside into the rain.  It's a fantastically orchestrated sequence
which I imagine Gilliam saw when he was a child, and this set his sense of
humor from that point on (just a theory...).
When Fred gets home to his wife, Emily (Joan Barry), the two are surprised
with a letter from a relative who's dying and has decided to give them a
ton of money to do whatever they want before he dies (he figures he might
as well do it now, maybe so they like him better or something).  So the two
hop a boat, and decide to cruise around the world, following a brief stop
in Paris.  On their cruise, the two become distanced from one another due
to a couple cicumstances (Fred gets massively seasick), and each of them
venture into little affairs: she with a rich Commander (Percy Marmont); he
with a supposed Princess (Betty Amann).
One thing that's amazing about his early films is how trite they are.  On
average, they last about 80 minutes or so, yet cover a surprising amount of
material, including some great set pieces.  "Rich and Strange" is not so
vast as his other early films, but rather tells a leisurely fun story in a
short amount of time.  There's no real suspense here, save a bit at the end
when the cruise boat is almost sunk by raging waters.  Instead of suspense,
Hitchcock gives us a more lighthearted story, told in an energetic manner,
and with lots of humor.
Throughout the film, title cards pop up to comment or tell us something
about the story.  Maybe Hitchcock was trying to humor us, mocking the old
days of silent film when title cards had to explain everything.  Whatever
it does, the use of title cards do create some chuckles along the length of
the film, and give it a humorous undertone.
But despite its comic tone, it also has a satirical edge in respect to
those who have quickly become wealthy without doing anything but be related
to someone with a certain amount of wealth.  The characters in this film
yearn for wealth in the beginning, but as the film goes on, find that
wealth does not automatically mean happiness.  Without becoming preachy,
Hitchcock addresses this minor problem pretty well.
The only drawback is a film which does kind of run out of steam towards the
end, showing that Hitchcock doesn't always have to direct suspense, but
it's definitely what he does best.  Still, the direction in this film is
extremely good, and the script and acting creates a film which is silly and
fun to watch.  Who needs a film with international intrigue and spies every
time anyway?  "Rich and Strange" is definitely not one of Hitch's best
films, but it is definitely worth a viewing or two.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Director: Rob Bowman
Writer: Chris Carter (story by Carter and Frank Spotnitz)
Starring: David Duchovny, Gillian Anderson, Martin Landau, John Neville,
Armin Mueller-Stahl, William B. Davis, Blythe Danner, Terry O'Quinn, Glenne
Headley, Lucas Black, Mitch Pileggi
The entire concept of "The X-Files" is extremely seductive: that we are
being allowed to see things that we're really not supposed to be seeing,
and that the more we know, the more mortal danger we are in.  It's at once
frightening and almost orgasmic to learn things that we're not supposed to
be knowing, and that must be the real draw to the show...at least it that
was the draw of the movie for me.
I have perhaps seen the TV show twice, maybe twice-and-a-half, and one
would think that since this is a film that does not try to pander to those
who don't watch the show (like me), that I would have a bitch of a time
following the complex plot this film lays out.  True, the film does not
insult those who have staked a living watching this show from the start
(there is no formal introduction to anything that goes on, no explanation
of what the "X-Files" really are), but it is able to walk on a tight rope
between never annoying the regular viewers and also not perplexing any
newbies to the area of X-Philedom.
But it won't hurt to do some research, in fact it may really help a lot. 
>From the shows I've watched and the article I read in "Newsweek" last week,
I was able to understand what the X-Files really are, the nature of the two
protagonists' relationship, and also able to point out a couple of the
supporting characters (Look!  There's "Cigarette-Smoking Man!"  Look! 
There's "Well-Manicured Man!"  But who are those three dorks hovering over
David Duchovny and why is everyone in the theatre laughing at them?!).
The film, as I see it, is really an expansion of the TV series, not only
coming off as a two-hour episode with a mighty-big budget and grade-A
special effects, but also as a starting point for some explanations of some
of the bigger secrets the series hides up.  As the show often deals with
the discovery and potential cover-up of extra-terristrials, the film
decides to unearth some of the deeper conspiracies about this subject.  The
film's focus is on the discovery of a certain slimy alien that is first
discovered in 3500 B.C. in Texas during the Ice Age (someone in the
audience ACTUALLY shouted out "There's no snow in Texas!" - true story) and
is then found out by an ill-fated little boy (Lucas Black, the kid from
"Sling Blade").
After an admittingly sloppy-as-hell cover-up (which brings about disturbing
memories of Oklahoma City), our two favorite Special Agents, Fox Mulder and
Dana Scully (David Duchovny and Gillian Anderson), rightly smell something
fishy and discover some alien virus cover-up material...only to find
themselves separated by the big cheeses in the FBI (headed by none other
than Blythe Danner).  Of course, they secretly get back together, and begin
to dig a little deeper.
That's enough description of the plot, in fact it may be too much.  Part of
the fun of watching this film is being able to walk into it with very
little knowledge of what's going to happen, and then being surprised by
every big twist and turn.  But I'm not exactly sure how much is revealed in
this film, because I don't know everything that has gone on in the show,
but the real power of the film is that the film is not so much about what
we learn as it is about the fact that we're actually learning it.  The
direction by series regular Rob Bowman is wonderfully eerie, and the
production design is icy and forboding.  Everywhere they go looks
unwelcome, and it gives off the feel that we just shouldn't be in there but
we can't help ourselves.  The show's power is that we all want to know the
truth, but finding it can easily cost us our lives.
However, the film often becomes a little cheap, and by the end, even the
most ardent fan will not know exactly what has been found out.  I suppose
the fact that the show is still on the air (and there's still the
potentiality of more films in the series) permitted the writers from
revealing everything, and thus wrapping up the film nicely.  And I have to
admit that as the film goes on, it often forgets some of the things it
started, thus confusing the audience a little more.
But for every problem you can discover with it, there's at least two things
to admire.  The two leads nicely convert to the big screen, even Duchovny's
deadpan deliver of almost all of his lines, and especially Anderson's
intensity.  Although we get very little character development, we honestly
don't need any: they're so likable that any real expansion into their
characters would be a distraction from the real points of the concept that
is "The X-Files."  And we also get some interesting performances from the
supporting characters, the best coming from Martin Landau as a man who
knows everything about conspiracies and lurks in the shadows and bars,
trying to find the right person to spill his guts to, and another great
performance coming from John Neville, continuing his role as Well-Manicured
Man from the series, who's incredible amount of wrinkles make him look like
the most eerie person on this earth (also look for a brief Armin
Mueller-Stahl as one of the old creepy guys running the world).
And, of course, the film has a sense of humor, not only in Duchovny's
admittingly droll performance, but also in those little comic moments (my
favorite being the scene where Duchovny and Landau share a piss on an "ID4"
poster - ha ha).  The best thing a film that is as serious as this can have
is a great sense of humor.
The best way to view the film is as a really intelligent popcorn flick. 
There's a lot of big action sequences, which are often extremely tense (a
couple of time, yes, I gripped my arm chair), and are directed with the
right amount of intelligence and intensity.  And you always have to at
least be intrigued by any film where the main intent is to try and discover
exactly what's really out there.  The way I see it, "The X-Files" is
successful in two ways: for regular viewers, it whets their appetites to
continue watching; for rookies, it just makes them want to watch the show
on a regular basis.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
Director: Frank Coraci
Writer: Tim Herlihy
Starring: Adam Sandler, Drew Barrymore, Christine Taylor, Allen Covert,
Angela Featherstone, Matthew Glave, Alexis Arquette, Frank Sivero,
Christina Pickles, Steve Buscemi, Billy Idol, Jon Lovitz
In the first scene of "The Wedding Singer," Adam Sandler did something I
never thought I'd see him do: after a drunken Best Man at a wedding gives a
scathing speech to his father and his brother the groom, the wedding
singer, played by Sandler, doesn't yell at him or beat him up, but instead
turns to the married couple and says something about how he thinks they'll
have a long happy marriage, easily smoothing over the previous speech.  I
did a double take.  Sure, he has a different cut and all, but aside from
that, I thought that would be the only difference his character has to,
say, Billy Madison or Happy Gilmore.  Is this the same guy?
Yes and no.  "The Wedding Singer" has the some of the same off-the-wall
humor usually attributed to Sandler outings, but this time the filmmakers,
and Sandler, have given the film a sweet overtone.  The Sandler who was
subject to fits of rage and various other vulgarities, the guy who would
scream obscenities at a freaking golf ball are gone.  "The Wedding Singer"
strips Sandler down, and exposes his soft candy shell.  Sure, we're still
laughing, but this time I actually cared for his character for reasons
other than that he was being played by Adam Sandler.
This fooled me immensely as the previews and commercials for this film made
it look like yet another gimmicky flick from Sandler that you see once,
laugh a couple times, and then forget completely (does anyone remember
anything about "Happy Gilmore," other than it featured golf?).  It could
have: a) been a typical Sandler flick, where he sings some tunes and yells
at people; or b) a tiresome, occasionally witty joke film making fun of the
80s (which would be a hair better).  What it is is a sweet, simple tale...a
slightly self-conscious 80s teen movie with a heart of gold and a couple
swear words.
Sandler is Robbie Hart, a musician in his early 20s working in town as a
wedding singer at receptions.  One night at work, he meets Julia (Drew
Barrymore - possibly looking the cutest she ever has), a waitress working
with him there, and the two slowly become better and better friends.  After
being stood up at his own wedding to a big-haried bitch (Angela
Featherstone), he starts to get more and more aquainted with her, and soon
realizes he may be in love with her.  Unfortunately, she's dating a Don
Johnson wannabe jerk, a guy who works at a big paying job in the city, and
drives a Deloreon (!!!) - Glenn (Matthew Glave).  The thing is Glenn cheats
on her, and is only marrying her for stability and because they've been
dating for years upon years now anyway.
That's the plot in a nutshell, but it's covered with lots of sugar coating
to make it nice and relaxing, as well as a billion 80s jokes, most of which
are hilarious.  Those of us who were forced to grow up when MTV was young,
when Reagan was in office, and when everything seemed kinda honky dorey for
the moment will bust a gut laughing at this film's numerous references,
such as a friend of Julia's (Christine Taylor - Marcia from the Brady Bunch
flicks) who has the old Madonna look, a run-down of couples who people
thought would be together forever...but are not anymore (Burt and Loni,
Donald and Ivana, Woody and Mia...), and a member of Robbie's band (Alexis
Arquette - the Arquette who tried to shoot Travolta and Jackson in "Pulp
Fiction") who bears an uncanny resemblance to Boy George...who alas gets
the worst case of "beating a dead horse" jokedom in the film.  Yeah, I
laughed my ass off when he started singing "Do You Really Want to Hurt Me"
over and over again in the begininng, but by the 45 minute point enough is
enough!
And we even get a couple dynamite cameos, one from Steve Buscemi (an old
pal of Sandler's - he's been in "Airheads" AND "Billy Madison"), and
another from Jon Lovitz, both which are tied for funniest part of the film.
 Buscemi gets to play the drunken best man in the beginning, and does it to
comic perfection, while Lovitz gets a chance to show why some of us
sometimes think he's really really funny, playing another Wedding Singer,
only more of a lounge lizard.  His exiting grin is priceless.  And oh...how
could I forget: Billy Idol, playing his own self-obsessed self...and not
doing too bad a job at it either.
The thing that I'll really remember, which really makes this film seem like
something, is the way the film just feels sweet.  Who'd of thunk that a
scene where Sandler sings a tune in that tiny voice he does to Drew would
actually make me smile?  Sure, he does some of his usual schtick, but most
of it is what you've seen in the commercials.  This time his temper is very
much on hold, and when he lets it go, you actually feel bad for the guy.  I
loved his reaction when he was told his fiancee was standing him up at his
wedding: he just stands there with a half-grin on his face, and quietly
walks away into the Groom's tent where he then throws a fit.  I laughed
much more than I would if he had torn the place down or something like
that.
I have to admit, I'm not a huge fan of Sandler, or ex-SNL members who try
to films either.  But "The Wedding Singer" gives a very funny comedian a
chance to open up a little bit more, to do his usualy schtick but also do
some stuff he's never been able to do before.  The film could have been
better (it could certainly have done some truly satirical takes on the 80s,
like materialism, which it touches but only briefly), but it's still an
enjoyable, nostalgic, and even a bit touching time at the movies.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
Director: Taylor Hackford
Writers: Jonathan Lemkin and Tony Gilroy (based on the novel by Andrew
Neiderman)
Starring: Keanu Reeves, Al Pacino, Charlize Theron, Judith Ivey, Connie
Nielsen, Jeffrey Jones, Craig T. Nelson, Tamara Tunie, Ruben
Santiago-Hudson, Debra Monk, Heather Matarazzo, Don King, Delroy Lindo
Taylor Hackford's "The Devil's Advocate" has a really cool, satirical
gimmick in it: that lawyers are really working for the devil, like we all
expected anyway.  But the film itself is one of those which is full of
flaws, and seems to be out to just exploit this idea in a cheap way. 
Watching it is very manipulative: the story seems to be going nowhere until
a final scene sums it all up, and it all seems great.  Normally, I'd try to
be cynical and say this is what "brings it down, causing it to be less than
what should be there," or something like that.  But then again, I've been
known to go against the norm.
"The Devil's Advocate" deals with a hot shot young lawyer, Kevin Lomax, who
is straight out of a Grisham novel with the exception that he's played by
Keanu Reeves (ha ha).  After winning a ton of cases consecutively in the
south (wait till you hear Keanu's in-n-out accent - you thought his french
accent in "Dangerous Liasons" was bad), he's hired at the top law firm in
the country, located in Manhattan.  Despite the christian coalition rants
from his Bible Belt mother (Judith Ivey), he and his wife, Mary Ann
(Charlize Theron), move to Manhattan to a lush, spacey apartment.
Soon enough, he catches the attention of the firm's head, John Milton (ha
ha), played by Al Pacino, who tempts him into becoming one of his top
lawyers on the edge of the building's roof with a waterfall toppling over,
and a gorgeous shot of the city, showing that he's going to take a fall if
he sides with Milton.  After awhile of workaholic-dom, the lonely Mary Ann
becomes detached from him, and is soon seeing images of people as demons,
driving her nuts.  We begin to suspect that Milton is not really
human...although we all know what he is from the previews.
The film, which is long and pretty plotless through most of it, wanders
around for a lot of its running time, never seeming to go anywhere.  But we
the audience stay tuned because we know that the end will explain
everything, and that all the big questions will be answered, like: why is
Kevin drawn to the sexy lawyer Christabella (Connie Nielsen) so much that
he imagines he's porking her while he porks his wife in real life?  Or why
is Mary Ann the only one being haunted?  Why not Kevin?  And, of course,
why is Kevin being shown as a heartless man defending criminals when he
obviously has a heart?
The ending, which consists of twist upon twist upon twist, is what makes
everything worth it.  Towards the end, Kevin and Milton have a giant
confrontation in his office, which we've seen clips of on the commercials,
which is explains everything and even contains several unexpected twists. 
This trend in movies, where the ending is the thing that makes everything
worth it, has been going strong with the movie audiences since "The Usual
Suspects" did it with style, and while this film doesn't do it as
masterfully as that film did, it sure makes the long wait well worth it.
To fully understand "The Devil's Advocate," one needs to realize this is
not art: it's a crowd pleaser.  It's the kind of film that tempts you
throughout it, with lots of cool individual scenes and great cinematic
moments which seem disjointed from everything else until the grande finale
blows you away, and leaves you giddy afterwards.  I'd love to say that I'm
one of those critics who can "see through the film and was the only one who
booed afterwards for it being manipulative," but the film was able to
snatch me up into it, and by the ending, with the Rolling Stones' "Paint It
Black" playing over the end credits, I was leaving with a big fat smile on
my face. The ending makes all the apparent flaws of this film seem like
they were good.
Why did I enjoy this?  Well, I think that it's a good film because of all
these things, which would be called problems from another perspective. 
It's a film that saves everything for the ending, going out with a bang. 
Even the final twist at the end, which would seem really really cheap in
another film, is backed up with a great sense of logic when you think about
it.  Is Kevin really this cold blooded lawyer, or is there an alternate
influence in his life which makes him this way?  The ending, which is kind
of like the ending of Scorsese's "The Last Temptation of Christ," made me
moan at first, but then seemed worth it with the final frame.
But what really makes this a really great pleasure to see is the way it
feels.  Taylor Hackford (who also directed "An Officer and a Gentleman" and
produced "When We Were Kings") has directed this film with a wild visual
flair which makes everything seem amazing.  I adored the production design,
especially that of Milton's office which is one of the best sets of the
year.  I loved the "Koyaanisqatsi"-esque time elipses, with time seen
blowing by in a matter of moments.  And one of the final scenes, with lots
of wild special effects, and even some rampant nudity of one special
character (hee hee), is long but jaw-dropping.
Unfortunately, this film does have its share of problems.  The direction
and mood are all over the place, with scene tone ranging from
overly-melodramatic to high camp.  The film never decides whether it's a
serious satire on lawyers or a black comedy.  But once again, the finale
choses what it is (and at least it goes out with style and a big laugh). 
While I said that the manipulation of the viewer can be viewed as a good
thing, that doesn't mean it can't also be viewed as a negative point
against the movie.  Watching "The Devil's Advocate" is like reading a
college freshman's term paper that stumbles around until the last paragraph
where it makes its final point.  While it's pleasing at the end, you can't
help but feel like the first bit of it was a bit cheap.  
However, the final feeling to the film manages to be satirical and
entertaining, feeling cheap at first, then feeling great.  The satirical
gimmick is also pretty great: that lawyers are actually hounds of hell
ready to take over the world from God (Milton points out that there are now
more law students than lawyers - freaky deaky).  The fact that it's able to
hold this up throughout the film without it ever seeming cheap is something
to be rewarded.
A big shock of the film is Keanu Reeves, who, if you know me at all, is one
of the main actors who I make fun of a lot (I adore doing an impersonation
of him in "Much Ado About Nothing"), but I will admit that he sometimes
delivers a performance which is believable and passable.  Here, he's at his
best, which might not be very good, but is at least passing.  I believed
his performance, and after awhile, I forgot that it was Keanu Reeves, the
ex-Ted of "Bill and."  Yes, I was incredibly skeptical about it (when you
hear Keanu Reeves is a "hot shot attorney," you just laugh) and was ready
for some heavy duty ridicule, but after actually seeing it, I
actually...liked him in it.  Yikes indeed.
Charlize Theron, who came out of nowhere last year to give great supporting
work in "That Thing You Do!" and "2 Days in the Valley," is once again
great in a role which is suprisingly deft.  Mary Ann's character is never
clearly defined in the film, but she fills in the gaps, creating a gradual
descent into madness which actually seems realistic enough to be taken
seriously.  In the beginning, she's bright, sunny, and lovable; later on,
she's clearly gone off the deep end, needing the support of her ever
distancing husband.  Her acting in this film is great.
And then there's the man...Al Pacino, who beat out Jon Voigt for best
overacting of the year (he hammed it up big time in "Anaconda").  Every
scene Al's in, he shows his talent for being larger than life, saying each
of his lines with unbridled enthusiasm, and creating a character who's
lovable and seductive, even if he IS the devil.  I wanted to applaud after
every line he uttered, and every time he smiled and did his great laugh (a
la "Scent of a Woman"), I just giggled like a school girl (hee hee). 
Watching Al Pacino on screen in this film, playing a role he would
hopefully kill for, is one of the few total pleasures of this year
movie-wise.
Watching "The Devil's Advocate" forces the viewer to forget about plot or
ongoing themes, and just remember everything for the big twist at the end,
where everything finally makes some bit of sense.  And what an ending it
is.  Sure, it's a scene between Pacino and Reeves, and that would already
sound kinda iffy, but it makes everything suddenly feel like it was worth
it, and leaves you with a satisfying taste in your mouth.  Sure, everything
up that point is pretty cool, albeit a tad mediocre at some points, but
this film is further proof that sometimes, it's all about the ending.  And
that devilish grin by Pacino...
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Flirting with Disaster (1996)
Writer/Director: David O. Russel
Starring: Ben Stiller, Patricia Arquette, Tea Leoni, Mary Tyler Moore,
George Segal, Alan Alda, Lily Tomlin, Josh Brolin, Richard Jenkins
David O. Russel's debut film, "Spanking the Monkey" (no jokes about the
title, guys, it's old), devastated my emotionally, and I'm still not
over it.  It was the most intense character study I've ever seen and
depressed me beyond belief.  His sophomore film, however, made me laugh
so hard that I'm still not over the physical damage I did to my gut
while watching this.  Okay, I'm exaggerating, but this film is a
screwball film that just gets funnier and funnier as it goes on, and
ends on an even funnier note.
The seemingly standard screwball plot deals with a grown man (Ben
Stiller) searching for his real parents, since he was adopted.  His
parents (Mary Tyler Moore and George Segal, who were so funny together,
that they were forced to appear on several episodes of co-star Tea
Leoni's sitcom, "The Naked Truth") are outraged when he announces this,
and introduces them to his slim, slightly neurotic adoption agency
helper or whatever she is (Tea).  The thing that caused him to bring
this up is the birth of their son (his wife is Patricia Arquette, by the
way), and is inability to name him for that anal reason.
So he embarks on a trek with his wife and Tea to find his parents and
rejoin them, but finds out that the agency screwed up and sends them to
the wrong people twice before winding them up with his real parents
(Alan Alda and Lily Tomlin).  What's great about this is that everyone
you meet is nothing like they first seem.  They run into Patricia's old
male pal from high school (Josh Brolin) who's a U.S. Marshall, and turns
out to be married to his male partner who suffers from hysterically high
amounts of hypertension (wonderfully and memorably played by Richard
Jenkins).  And, of course, his real parents turn out to be drug addicts
who brew LSD in their basement but are still tight about their
"non-smoking household."
There's also a lot of partner swapping, as Brolin and Arquette begin to
go at it, but in Brolin's fetish way (wait till you find out what his
favorite part of the female body is, which spurns one of the funniest
scenes in 90s cinema).  And Tea and Ben go at it, although neither is
really sure if they should.  One scene they just give eachother little
pecks, then jump on eachother simultaneously.
Then there's the direction and writing by Russel, who certainly has a
knack for breaking taboos (like incest and masturbation in "Spanking the
Monkey" - title doesn't say it all), shocks the audience and causes them
to laugh hysterically, a great feat if you've seen his first film since
he drained all emotions from his audience till they were silently
depressed for months afterwards.  Here, he shows us many big taboos:
like the Brolin fetish; the Brolin/Jenkins gay relationship; openly
talking about felatio; the truth about B&Bs; and we even get to see Mary
Tyler Moore pull up her shirt and show us her bra, as she brags about
how perfect her breasts are.  This film isn't flirting with disaster,
much less crashing into it.
But Russel holds it all together, and by the ending where a hundred
things are going on, and you can't decide which one is funnier, he still
manages to hold a tight grasp on things, and even ends on a note of
semi-sentimentalism, which isn't even cringe-inducing.  And, of course,
he shows some more shocking moments during the end credits, where we get
to see all the end couples in bed in their numerous ways, and all with
that lovely prop: the baby.
This film is a lovely companion piece to "Spanking the Monkey": brings
you down from your depression, by showing you some of the same taboos
but in a different sense.  So, if you ever go ahead and rent "Monkey,"
make sure you couple it with this one.  You'll laugh your ass off.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Stargate (1994)
Director: Roland Emmerich
Writer: Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich
Starring: James Spader, Kurt Russel, Jaye Davidon, French Stewart
To put it bluntly, Ed Wood would have been proud of this.  A totally 
ridiculous plot is encompassed with bad humor, hokey drama, zero logic 
and a crap screenplay.  Also, a beautifully anti-climactic ending.  Not 
to say it didn't look intriguing when I saw the previews. So much for 
truth in advertising.
Roland Emmerich, who's later "Independence Day" would look like "The 400 
Blows" compared to this, co-writed and directed this inane sci-fi film 
which uses the cliche of there being some connection between Eqypt and 
aliens.  In a useless opening sequence, men find a stone in 1914 with 
hieroglyphics on it.  It wouldn't be till present day ('94) till they 
would actually figure it out.  They're decipherer?  A slightly-neurotic 
scientist (nice twist), Dr. Dan Jackson (James Spader, doing his best 
outside of erotic thrillers and some indy fare) who's life sucks so much 
that people walk out of his lectures after the third word.  Why do they 
use him to decipher what no one else could?  So there is a hokey ending! 
Duh!
He figures it out in about a minute.  Yea.  And then they get a suicidal 
colonel or something, "Jack" O'Neill (Kurt Russel, with his Wyat Earp 
locks in the beginning then a flat-top that would make Howie Long snap 
into a fetal position).  Why a suicidal colonel?  For the ending!  
You'll get the hang of this.  They open the stargate, a bunch of them go 
through it with a bomb to blow it up if they find anything bad.  After 
an overdone special effects thing, they're...inside a goddam pyramid.  
So they went to Egypt, right?  Wrong.  They're on another planet that 
was filmed in Egypt.
They discover a cilvilization ruled by Ra, the sun god (the androginous 
Jaye Davidson, with a voice modifier to make him sound like Barry White 
with asthma), and there are fights, explosions and a kiss between two 
people.  Yea.  Also melodrama, stupidity, hokey scenes and a bizarre 
language.  An anti-climactic ending ends with stupid lines ("Say hello 
to King Tut, asswhole!" - the quintessential line, lemme tell ya) and 
some convenient pesudo-pseudo-pseudo-character development.  By the end, 
you just wanna go home and watch, I don't know, the "Outer Limits" or 
something.  
The script's terrible.  The special effects are okay, but nothing great. 
The story's so weak that it's almost opaque.  The whole experience just 
isn't worth it unless you're so bored that you'd consider watching a 
"Full House" marathon...or this.  I'd pick this, obviously, but still, 
it's just not fun at all.  And I can't wait for it to premier on MST3K.

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
Writer/Director: Gary Ross
Starring: Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Joan Allen, William H. Macy,
Jeff Daniels, J.T. Walsh, Don Knotts, Paul Walker, Marley Shelton,
Marisa Ribisi, Jane Kaczmarek
"Pleasantville" is an amazing film, and it's incredibly philosophical
about life and all, but there's a couple things people have been looking
over.  They watch this film and they see that it deals with the complex
subject of change and looking strangely at the 50s ideal American Dream
of suburbia where everyone's happy and live without fear of conflict,
and although they think that the reason it's such a great film is
because it's philosophical, they're glossing over something else that's
there.  There always has to be something more than just philosophy to
make a piece of art great, even if what you're looking at is
Dostoevsky.  Reading "Crime and Punishment" is not a great read because
it expertly undlies humanity, but because it's a damn tense read that
shocks us with its major insights.
The makers of "Plesantville" have come up with a gimmick that is truly
ingenius.  As, the characters in this film go through major changes in
the way they see life, they change from black and white to color.  This
is the reason this film is great.  Director and writer Gary Ross has
found a way to convey not only the fact that they're changing but what
they're feeling like and what it must be like to everyone else in one
simple technique that to the audience is completely cinematic and
jaw-dropping.  Seeing the first red rose amongst a patch of otherwise
black and white flowers is nearly orgasmic.
"Pleasantville" is a simple film, filled with not only this gimmick, but
another one more that is commonly known as the "Fish Out of Water"
movie, and despite some clumsiness in this set-up, "Pleasantville" may
go down in cinema history as the best "Fish Out of Water" movie since
"Being There."  It deals with two modern-day teenage siblings, David and
Jennifer (Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon, respectively) - he's a
loser hermit who watches an old black and white 50s show called
"Pleasantville" with a passion; she's a cynical, slutty connioseur of
MTV and the like.  One night, when she has a date to watch a concert on
TV and he wants to watch the 24-hour "Pleasantville" marathon, they have
a fight over the remote control and break it.  A sinister-looking TV
repairman (played by none other than Don Knotts) shows up, gives them a
new remote, and when fighting over that one, they suddenly get sucked
into "Pleasantville."
Now, I don't know if anyone remembers the ill-fated sitcom from the
early 90s, "Honey, I'm Home" (where they imported a family from the 50s
and put them in the cynical 90s), but even if you do, don't worry
because after about 10 minutes, these two take off in different
directions.  Instead of staying with the overdone gimmick of "They're
from the 90s and now in the 50s!  How about that?!," which features
David and Jennifer trying to fit in at home (the parents are played to
perfection by William H. Macy and Joan Allen) and at school, and
discovering all the annoyances of living in perfection (they quickly
discovers nothing burns, it never rains, the fireman don't know what a
fire is, and there's not bathroom in those stalls), it instead takes off
questioning everything that has been put before them.
Starting with Jennifer teaching the captain of the basketball team (Paul
Walker) what should be done at Lover's Lane, a chain reaction is started
where most people learn about what else there is in life, and when they
do, they turn into color, while everything else is in black and white.
This actually robs the film of any real subtlety about its message,
making everything incredibly obvious, but it makes up for this in two
ways: 1) the gimmick of people changing never becomes tiresome, and is
always handled with originality and emotion; and 2) it actually adds on
top of that some real complications.
The world of "Pleasantville" is happy, and perpetually so, and only
changes when one person who has seen the difference and dislikes it
enough to do something about it.  But is it really a good thing that
these people changed, and complicated everything?  Wouldn't it be better
if everything was at peace and there was nothing wrong ever?  Gary Ross
says no, and the rest of this film is his argument.  Isn't the fact that
there are conflicts and suffering and the chance for happiness much
better than actual happiness?  Isn't the great thing about life that
things will not stay the same for any real length of time, and that you
always have to get used to living with something else?
The fact that Gary Ross explores all these angles is incredible, since
most films follow through on their subjects just so they can prove their
points.  "Pleasantville" shows the modern-day as cynical and
pessimistic, with chances of things only becoming worse.  The 50s, when
everything was seemingly perfect, is shown as the opposite of that, and
should theoretically be the ideal place to live in.  The changes, when
they happen, only bring out pain and suffering, resulting in a darker
second half, where the black and whites end up in a war against the
"colors," and book burning, prejudices, and social upheveal take hold.
But Ross says this is all worth it, just because when you suffer, you
finally see how free and grand life really is.
For this philosophical argument, I commend it, but that's really not why
it's great.  Sure, it says that life is worth living, but I'm much more
interested in the way this all comes about than rather what it says.
For me, "Plesantville" is worth multiple viewings just for those moments
when the colors pop up amidst the black and white photography.  I love
those moments when little things are color while the rest are still the
same.  And when instead of safe 50s ballads, Dave Brubeck and Miles
Davis creep onto the soundtrack.  And when the pages of the normally
blank books in the library fill up with words before our eyes.  There's
an intensely touching moment when the mother has learned about sex and
has turned to color, and asks David in confidence to put makeup on her
to hide up her transformation, and another moment that's nearly erotic
when the makeup is slowly taken off by someone else.  And my favorite
moment, when David and his new girlfriend drive from the black and white
road into Lover's Lane, where everything's vibrant colors, and then
later it rains for the first time.
Gary Ross has assembled an incredible cast of actors who aren't so
well-known but are all immensely talented, and everyone gives an
incredible performance, but there are some real standouts.  Tobey
Maguire is effortlessly lovable in the lead, as he always is, and Reese
Witherspoon is hysterical as the cynic who learns about real passion
from a D.H. Lawrence book (as we all did).  William H. Macy brings real
emotion and depth to his character, especially in the final moments of
the film, and Jeff Daniels, as the local sodajerk, comes off as sweet
and charmingly innocent.  In his final performance, J.T. Walsh
demonstrates exactly why he was great: because he was eerily prickly the
only he could be.  Joan Allen, though, looks like the one who would get
the Oscar nomination out of the lot.  She brings true emotion and
creativity to her role of the housewife who learns about passion early
on, and tries her best to deal with it, demonstrating that she may
possibly be the greatest actress in her age demographic working today.
But will anyone see it as nothing but a philosophical film, and an
unsubtle one at that?  I hope not, because it's one of those films that
is endlessly inventive and truly magical, in the tradition of the best
films of Frank Capra and even Victor Fleming (although some are
comparing it to "Back to the Future," it almost has as much magic as,
say, "The Wizard of Oz").  In years, people may reflect on this as the
film they nearly misunderstood for its greatness, but right now, it's
one of the best films to come out this year, just on the strength of how
happy it can make even the most pessimistic of the lot, and how it can
make the future look optimistic for a change.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Citizen Kane (1941)
Writer/Director: Orson Welles
Starring: Orson Welles, Dorothy Comingore, Joseph Cotten, Everett
Sloane, Ruth Warrick, Ray Collins
"Citizen Kane" is always being referred to as the greatest film of all
time, or at least in the top five.  Every critic loves it (it's Roger
Ebert's favorite film of all time), and we constantly hear how perfect
it is.  I'm not going to deny any of this.  I mean, if you've seen it,
you know how awesome it is.  It's 1997, yet I was still blown away by a
film that was called "innovative" back in 1941.  I've always said that
the greatness of a film is truly measured over time, and this is one of
the few films that is truly amazing to watch, and actually lives up to
all that damn hype.
So what's the big deal with "Citizen Kane?"  Well, for starters, it's
technically innovative, much in the way "Star Wars" was (I'm not saying
Kane like blows up a death star or something like that).  Orson Welles,
who made this when he was 26 (!!!), used all kinds of new techniques for
his film, including depth of field, wide angle lenses, etc, etc, etc. 
There are cool-ass shots all over the place, including some great
swooping shots, wonderful shadows on the perfect things, and even a
brilliant shot of a nurse walking into a room shot through a broken
piece of reflecting glass.  Even in these digital 90s, that looks cool.
But "Kane" isn't just innovative technical-wise; it's innovative
story-telling-wise, becoming the pre-cursor for non-linear narratives
like that of "Pulp Fiction," "The Usual Suspects," etc.  In pieceing
together the story of the mysterious protagonist, we see flashbacks told
in whatever order, making it fun to piece together.  Sure, there's an
on-going narrative - the search for who was Charles Foster Kane - but we
get to see parts of his life told by people who knew him, which was
revolutionary back then, since most people went to the movies for
straight-foward narratives, like "King Kong."  No wonder this movie
bombed financially back then.
So what's the story of this flick?  It deals with, well, as I said, the
search for who was Charles Foster Kane (Orson himself).  Kane actually
dies in the beginning of the film, but before he does, he utters the
famous last word, "Rosebud."  We then cut to a newsreel documentary on
him being viewed by some newsmen.  In it, we get the rough outline of
the film, telling us he had inherited a huge fortune at a young age, and
became a big-time newsman.  He was also hated and loved at the same
time, and even ran for governor.  But of course, this is an empty
experience, since no one can really explain why he was, and the makers
of the film think that it's "Rosebud."  But what is "Rosebud?"
The film takes us through flashbacks, as they interview all sorts of
people who were big parts of his life.  We see almost his whole life,
presented in these flashbacks, and in montages.  Kane was a very
lonesome man who, as people say, wanted to be loved, but had problems
with other people.  He has two unsucessful marriages during his life,
suffers some scandals, and dies alone and miserable in his giant palace
he built to himself, Xanadu (no relation to the early 80s Olivia Newton
John film of the same name).
The ending is ironic and totally brilliant, and brings the film to a
beautiful poetic ending.  But this film is not just a good ending; the
entire film is amazing to watch.  Orson Welles expertly breaks the
protagonist down through the flashbacks told from other people's
perspectives, showing that no one truly understands anyone else.  Of
course, we get an omnipotent view of the man, and learn what made him
tick in the final frame.
The acting is excellent from everyone (although Dorothy Comingore as his
second wife is kind of annoying, but that kind of helps her performance
a bit), but, obviously, the best part of this film is Orson.  His
direction is damn-near flawless, his writing is awesome and not corny
for a sec, and his acting is superb.  Not even half the size he would be
by the time he was in "The Muppet Movie," Welles is still a striking
presence in the film, perfectly embodying his subject.  He has a kind of
coldness which distances himself from everyone, but somehow embraces the
viewer to caring about him, even when he's being a total ass to people. 
And his make-up for when he's older is flawless; he fools everyone, and
doesn't nearly resemble his 26 year old self.
Oh, and special mention should be made to the composer of the musical
score - Bernard Herrman.  He creates a beautifully haunting score which
is nothing short of brilliant.  Of course, it's penned by Herrman, so
what do you expect?
Contrary to ignorant opinion, "Citizen Kane" is neither pretentious nor
boring.  It moves at a wonderful pace, with things always occuring in
the story.  And the symbolism is simple yet sweet, and is never overdone
in any way.  If there is a film that is pretty close to being brilliant,
it would be "Citizen Kane," and I'm not just saying that so I won't be
scrutinized by other film geeks.  It's an awesome film which hasn't
dated a bit, and a film which embodies a perfect combination of
technical artistry, as well as narrative brilliance.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Everyone Says I Love You (1996)
Writer/Director: Woody Allen
Starring: Woody Allen, Natasha Lyonne, Goldie Hawn, Julia Roberts, Alan 
Alda, Drew Barrymore, Edward Norton, Tim Roth, Natalie Portman, Gaby 
Hoffman, Lukas Haas, Billy Crudup, David Ogden Stiers
The old musicals of the 30s and 40s showed a bunch of people 
surrealistically dancing and singing about being in and out of love 
instead of just following the usual route and telling the audience.  
Well, Woody Allen has taken this approach and taken some big twists on 
it.  For one, the characters are way more neurotic than the previous 
ones.  And the people in it, well, some of them really can't sing.  
However, this film is one of the most fun, entertaining films Woody has 
made in a while.
The story kind of takes a removed "Hannah and Her Sisters" approach to 
the characters, who are not only diverse but numerous.  The film is 
narrated by DJ (Natasha Lyonne), who is a collegiate chick in a huge 
family.  Her mother (Goldie Hawn) divorced her father (Woody Allen) 
years ago and remarried another guy (Alan Alda), but they're still all 
friends.  With Alda, Hawn had several kids, including two feuding 
daughters (Natalie Portman and Gaby Hoffman), a somewhat naive daughter 
(Drew Barrymore), and a son who turned out to disappoint his liberal 
parents by becoming totally right-wing conservative (Lukas Haas), who 
has big political fights with his father all the time.
Now, Drew is engaged to Holden (Edward Norton, in his third cool flick 
of '96), who is great and all but is about as naive as she is.  Then she 
meets an ex-con (Tim Roth) who her mom helped get out of prison who kind 
of piques her interest in that criminal way.  And also, Allen, who is 
very neurotic (as usual) and is a writer living in Paris, falls in love 
(or lust) at first sight with a Manhattener (Julia Roberts), who is one 
of the people who his daughters listen to through a hole in their 
mother's therapy room.  So DJ ends up teaching Allen how to get to her, 
using all her loves and causing her to fall deeply in love with what she 
thinks is Allen.
Now, the storyline is rather basic, I mean for a Woody Allen flick.  
It's not bad, but it's nothing totally special either (although the 
Roth/Drew thing is pretty original for Woody, I suppose), but what makes 
this film great is the musical parts.  He modernizes all the tunes, not 
by actually changing them or anything, but by staging dances in the most 
original places possible.  He does a musical sequence in a ward in a 
hospital, featuring straight-jacketed mental patients, pregnant women, 
and people casted head-to-toe dancing and singing "Makin' Whoopee."  He 
stages a montage of characters singing that great Marilyn Monroe tune 
"I'm Through with Love," doing it in the most clever ways, including 
having a rapper rap the tune, but with changed lyrics featuring a single 
word that causes this to be rated R.  And the finale features Woody and 
Goldie dancing on the shores of Paris, complete with flying.
The musical sequences are clever and charming in themselves, but the 
thing that may be a problem to some people is the choice of singers.  
Woody chose the actors for their acting capabilities and then later told 
them they were going to have to sing.  So we get to hear such 
non-singing people as Woody Allen and Julia Roberts croon, while we get 
to hear the surprisingly good Ed Norton, Tim Roth, and Alan Alda, as 
well as the women we all knew could sing, Goldie Hawn.  Drew is the only 
one who's dubbed, since she probably petitioned for it.  Oh well, I 
don't feel a loss (just kidding, Drew).
And the acting's great, as it always is in a Woody Allen film.  Standing 
out are Woody (as usual), who makes great faces as he lies through his 
dentures about liking the same things as Julia, and Julia, as she always 
does, rocks.  Also standing out are Ed Norton, who talks in a kind of 
neurotic way, as he seems to feel the need to replace Woody when he 
finally retires from acting; and Lukas Haas is hysterical as the 
tres-conservative son.  And Alda and Hawn are great as the always are.  
Natasha Lyonne is great as the very indicisive and narrating daughter.  
I have no clue who she is, but she rocks.
If there are any problems, it's that some of the subplots don't end as 
well as they could.  Some actually feel rushed.  The one dealing with 
Portman and Hoffman actually feels edited, but this one never really 
took any kind of form anyway.  But I have to give it to Allen for 
finding the funniest ending to one of them in recent memory with regard 
to the Lukas Haas one.
The thing that's great about this film is the way it presents itself - 
as a 30s or 40s musical for the cynical 90s.  The characters in this 
film seem to be trying to escape from reality through their songs and 
dances, so they can forget their problems for a couple minutes.  And 
they're truly fun.  I usually cringe at musical sequences in 90s movies, 
but this seems to be a rare exception.  This is Woody's best film since 
"Husbands and Wives" and one of the most entertaining films of '96.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Color of Night (1994)
Director: Richard Rush
Writers: Matthew Chapman and Billy Ray
Starring: Bruce Willis, Jane March, Reuben Blades, Lesley Ann Warren, 
Lance Henrikson, Brad Douriff, Kevin J. O'Connor, Scott Bakula, Eriq La 
Salle
This film isn't even good enough to mock in one sitting like Ed Wood's 
"Plan 9 From Outer Space."  That's how bad it is (I'm not saying it's as 
bad as that classic, but this is a contender for the worst film of the 
90s).  But still, if you're watching it on your VCR and you have your 
thumb on the fast-forwarding button, you'll have a great time mocking 
this utter piece of dogcrap.
I saw this on one of those free previews we get, and luckily (ahem!) I 
got to see the director's cut.  My question is: Which 20 minutes of crap 
WASN'T in the film?  This is film is so awful that you could take 
any 20 minutes out and it would make it better no matter what.  The plot 
doesn't matter.  The mystery isn't even worth thinking about.  The 
lesbian scene isn't really worth anything (disappointing for perverts 
and useless to anything the film is about).  I mean, this film is only 
good for an MST3K episode - but one where they edit a lot out to make it 
somewhat watchable.  Or at least THEY have a fast-forwarding button.  
This one would do these guys in if shown in its entirety.
The "plot," or whatever we want to call it, centers around a 
psychiatrist (Bruce Willis) who looses his Freudian faith after one of 
his patients jumps out the window of his office near the top of a large 
building (a cool shot - best since "The Hudsucker Proxy" - but not 
really worth the time it takes to see it since the rest of the movie 
blows).  He looses the ability to see red (which has no effect on any 
aspect of the story, but it's there for the title) and moves to L.A. to 
shack up with his psychiatrist friend (Scott Bakula), who hosts a Monday 
Evening Group Therapy session and has a Type A personality.  Then he's 
murdered in a ridiculous scene where he's stabbed about 30 times of so. 
 We see everything.  I think I got the point after the second stabbing 
that he's gonna die.
Bruce takes over the group 'cause something points to one of the members 
of the Monday Group doing it.  In this group, we get nuts who give nuts 
a bad name: Lesley Ann Warren is typecast as an oversexed Black Widdow 
type who's hanging out with this younger chick who makes her happy (heh 
heh - let's guess what happens betwixt these two, eh?); Lance Henrikson 
is some old guy who can't get over his wife's death or something; Kevin 
O'Connor is some freaky-ass artist who's big problem seems to be that he 
can't act to save his life; Brad Douriff, a once-Oscar nominee, is a 
lawyer who autistically counts everything and gives us neurotics a bad 
name; and then there's some guy who doesn't even look like a guy who 
never talks.  Let's guess which one's the rotten apple, ok?
Also in on the "story" are a Chicana stereotype renegade police officer 
of some type (Reuben Blades, who gives overactors a bad name) and a 
semi-attractive woman who shows up out of nowhere and ends up having 
"steamy sex" with Bruce, giving him a chance to show off his little 
pecker in a pool scene.  They have sex for about 10 minutes straight for 
some reason and it's not very erotic, in fact very nauseating.
The film goes on literally FOREVER!!!  It's like a non-stop crapfest for 
2 hours and 20 minutes.  You don't care about anyone but Bruce 'cause 
he's Bruce and that's it.  There's a billion unnecessary scenes, which 
if cut would make this film about 5 minutes long.  There's a billion 
scenes of nothing but talking but not saying anything (Did I mention how 
horrible the script is?  One of them wrote "Volcano," that's how bad it 
is).  He talks to each of them and the story stays still.  Woody Allen 
said in "Annie Hall" that a relationship is like a shark; it has to 
constantly be moving or it just dies.  Well, I'd like to apply this 
thinking to film - it always has to be in constant motion.  And what we 
have in the case of "Color of Night" is a dead shark.  The story goes 
nowhere and just wastes time.  At least "Plan 9 From Outer Space" moved 
a bit.
To waste more time and to get some horny teenagers to like this, we get 
a totally unnecessary lesbian relationship between Lesley Ann Warren and 
this girl-friend of hers.  They have an anti-climactic and barely 
satisfying "lesbian scene" which ends in what's supposed to be a twist 
but turns out to be as anti-climactic as the rest of the film.
The acting's horrible.  The script is crap.  And the direction - oh my 
god!!  Richard Rush, the director, made "The Stunt Man" 14 years 
earlier, a film I've yet to see but has been pretty much unanimously 
hailed as a masterpiece of celluloid.  What in the hell was he on when 
he made this?  Did he actually look at it afterwards and say, "Cut. 
Print. Let's eat."  If I were him, I would have done what Woody Allen 
did when he saw the first final product of "September": throw it the 
hell out.  Of course, Woody started over.  I would've thrown it out and 
made a whole other film.
So, basically this is a worthless film, right?  Well, I guess the one 
positive note is the suicide scene.  Yes, it's anti-climactic, but it's 
cool to see her fall.  And I guess you could say it's consitstent: it's 
crap the whole way through.  And I can give it a bonus point for using 
the nailgun as a weapon - although it was already used in "Lethal Weapon 
2."
So, pretty much, this film is devoid of any goodness and is destined to 
be looked on and cherished as a masterpiece in pure shit and to be 
re-issued as one of the great horrible films of all time.  Good job, 
Rush!
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/hills/8335/

Title
Review for Saturday Night Fever (1977)
Director: John Badham
Writer: Norman Wexler (from a story by Nik Cohn)
Starring: John Travolta, Karen Lynn Gorney, Donna Pescow, Barry Miller,
Martin Shakur, Fran Drescher
Anyone who knows me knows that I adore this movie almost as much as I
adore, say, "Pulp Fiction."  Ever since I finally saw this, I could
recite the movie, call the dances (I can't actually do them, 'cause I
look like Ed Grimley when I do), and even do the cool walk in the
beginning.  But even though some might call this a "guilty pleasure,"
this is actually a very well-made film that could have been a shallow
dance movie starring that guy from "Welcome Back, Kotter," but turns out
to be a very intelligent character study that just happens to have some
of the coolest dance scenes ever made.  I know Gene Siskel will back me
up on this one.
John Travolta, fresh off of "Kotter" and "Carrie," in the role that made
him a superstar (and also spawned a stupid sequel I have yet to see),
plays Tony Manero, a kind of dim Brooklynite who works in a paint store
during the week, and on Saturday nights, goes out with his friends to
the local disco place, the nicely named "2001 Odyssey," where he's a
superstar since he takes up the dance floor whenever a cool tune comes
on (usually a Bee Gees tune, who wrote about six tunes in a week for
this flick).
One night, he sees a woman there (Donna Gorney), who is a great dancer
and catches his attention.  After he meets her, she turns out to be kind
of feisty and a little too intelligent for him, but he persits. 
Meanwhile, his other partner (Donna Pescow), who has a big crush on him
and begs him for sex constantly, is dumped by him cruelly so he can
pursue a hopefully more than kosher relationship with Gorney.  Also, his
brother, who was a priest and the pride of the family, has quit the
parish, and is moving on, shaming the family, and making Tony feel
better.
Like all dance flicks, there's a big dance competition, and Tony and
Gorney want to go and win.  But this film is too intelligent, and ends
in a kind of mature and shocking manner.  Throughout the film, Tony
matures (he's only 19), not only in intellect, but in just an all-around
kind of way.  Like Renton in "Trainspotting," he grows out of his
friends, who are self-destructive and totally immature.  I mean, these
guys go onto the Brooklyn Bridge, dance on the sides, and pretend to
fall to their death.  A big melodramatic thing occurs later on, but it
actually feels moving and shocking, instead of stupid and shallow.
Of course, the big thing to admire in this is the dance scenes, which
are totally awesome.  I mean, I usually don't get into big dance
sequences, but I mean, I'm just all into the ones in this one.  And, you
also get to see John Travolta in his first Oscar-nominated role.  He's
an incredible actor and is just incredible, even if he has a Brooklyn
accent.  He creates a character with many levels, who actually seems
more human than he would in a lesser film.  Also look for great
performances from Gorney and Pescow.
Also, look for a cameo from Fran Drescher (she has weird hair) as a
chick who goes up to him, says a memorable line, and even gets to grab
his ass, which she revels in even these days.
"Saturday Night Fever" is one of the most memorable and entertaining
(not to mention addictive) films I've ever seen.  It's not the most
brilliant film, but it's certainly one of the more intelligent dance
films.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Un chien andalou (1929)
Director: Luis Bunuel
Writers: Luis Bunuel and Salvador Dali
Starring: Pierre Batcheff, Simone Marieuil, Robert Hommet, Marval, Fano
Messan, Jamie Miravilles, Luis Bunuel, Salvador Dali
A man (Pierre Batcheff) holds a razor in his hand, and looks out his
window.  His wife (Simone Marieuil) sits in a chair behind him, pretty
much doing nothing.  The man turns around, walks over to his wife, holds
the razor to her eye, and then slits it fully open with the razor.  The
audience perks up as they all shriek, scream obsenities, or just go
"EW!!!"  But nevertheless, this film has our full and complete attention
for the following surreal-as-hell 16 minutes.
I watched this film in an auditorian full of students in film class a
couple hours ago, and the whole experience has yet to really leave me. 
I'm not only talking about the disgusting beginning (I'm not easily
grossed out, but that literally turned my stomach...then made me laugh),
but the rest of the 16 minutes (which isn't nearly as gross as the
beginning part), which is an exercise in a dream-like state, resulting
in the most surreal film ever made.
David Lynch has tried this more than once (most recently with "The Lost
Highway," which just was actually too structured for the nightmare it
seemed to want to be), but if you want to see it done right, watch the
first film by famed director, Luis Bunuel (who would also go on to make,
among others, "Belle De Jour").  Every scene is surreal as an actual
dream.  None of the sequences have any real connection with the others,
except for maybe similar characters.  For instance, a woman opens a door
in a room, then finds herself on a beach.  At first, this just seems
like it's out to shock us.  Then we get into it, and feel like we're in
some kind of weird dream.
There are tons of bizarre scenes going on throughout, none linked to the
other.  Other than the stunning beginning, we also get: scenes where a
man makes fun of a severed hand on the street; a man stands in the
middle of the street, then is run over by a careless driver; a man
chases a woman around a room, then feels her up, imagining her naked;
the man later tries to reach that woman, but for some odd reason, feels
the necessity to pull a rope that holds not one, but two pianos, two
men, the ten commandments, and some dead animals; etc, etc, etc.
These images are open for interpretation.  One could probably find some
kind of meaning to the whole film (there are some constants: a husband
and wife are recurrently present), but that would probably spoil the fun
of the film.  If you let yourself go, you find yourself in the most
surreal dream sequence ever.  And that's exactly what Bunuel, and his
co-writer (and painter) Salvador Dali were going for.
"Un Chien Andalou" is the most surreal film I've ever seen, and this is
after several bizarre-as-hell films I've seen (i.e. Dudley Murphy's
"Ballet Mechanique," which we also watched today in class).  It's not
only that, but it's a near perfect exercise in crafted filmmaking.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
Director: Atom Egoyan
Writer: Atom Egoyan (based on the novel by Russel Banks)
Starring: Ian Holm, Sarah Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Alberta Watson, Tom
McCamus, Gabrielle Rose, Maury Chaykin, David Hemblen, Arsinée Khanjian,
Earl Patsko, Caerthan Banks, Brooke Johnson, Stephanie Morgernstern
"The Sweet Hereafter" is the haunting, sad new film from Atom Egoyan, a
Canadian filmmaker who makes films which revolve around characters and
raise themes and ideas about them.  His new film revolves around the
effects of a horrible tragedy on the small town, as well as about the
effects of death and tragedy on humanity.  When something like this
happens, people are always trying to point a finger at someone to make
them feel better about their grief.  In this film, everyone's searching
for an answer to the major accident that has taken place.
Presented in non-linear form, with several plots running
simultatneously, the film explores what happened when a school bus
filled with kids hit an ice patch on a slick road one morning, and ended
up crashing into an icy lake, killing most of the kids, and leaving a
few crippled survivors, and destroying the community.  In to "help" is
Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm), a lawyer who is out to sue anyone who had
anything to do with the accident, like the guys who made the bus or the
people who built the railing along the road that the bus crashed
through.
But Mitchell has problems all his own.  His daugher, Zoe (Caerthan
Banks), is a drug addict who has been in and out of several rehabs
without any luck.  He is divorced from his wife, and is continually
getting collect calls from Zoe, whom he fears will end up being the
police to say that they've found her body somewhere.  At the same time
that he's worrying about her continually, he has to be a cold-hearted
bastard in picking on the poor people of the town who are mostly up for
blaming whoever Mitchell says is responsible, but Mitchell is just like
them anyway.
The story "The Pied Piper of Hamlin" by Robert Browning is read
throughout the film to symbolize the entire accident, but the film
doesn't accentuate the kids who are led into the mountain by the angry
piper, but the lame boy who wasn't allowed to go with the other kids. 
The one kid we see who survived, the older Nicole Burnell (Sarah Polley,
looking like a young Uma Thurman) with a bit of an Electra complex, has
been confined to a whellchair, brooding over her previous life, and
seeming to pine over the death of her peers.
But she's not the only lame kid in the film; it seems that the entire
community who had to live through it are the lame kid.  Everyone in the
film is dealing with the accident in their own way, either if its
blaming someone, just wanting to find an answer, or merely brooding over
it.  The bus driver (Gabrielle Rose) has to live with the fact that she
accidentally killed a bunch of kids, but is trying to get over it.  Two
very liberal parents, Wanda and Hartley Otto (Arsinée Khanjian and Earl
Patsko, respectively), have lost their adopted Indian son, and want
whomever had anything to do with it to go to jail until they die.
Meanwhile, Risa, who has been having an affair with a widower, Billy
Ansell (Bruce Greenwood), has succumb to the persuasions of Mitchell,
whom Billy has built up a distaste for after some run-ins with him, and
threat of a subpoena being sent his way at the trial since he was
driving his truck behind the bus when it crushed.  Billy, who was waving
to his kids who were sitting in the back of the bus before it crashed
and killed them, is unable to really cope with the loss of not only his
wife (who died before the events in the film) but of his kids, and has
alienated himself from everyone else, but is not up to simply blaming
someone for the accident.
The flashbacks to the accident, as well as events in Mitchell's private
life intercut the story which shows us the aftermath of the accident,
and result.  But none of these are distracting.  In fact, the background
of Mitchell's life (like a story about how Zoe almost died of a black
widow bite when she was a baby) helps round out his character so he's
not some villanous John Grisham lawyer.  Egoyan never gives us a
narrator, and thus makes "The Sweet Hereafter" into a bit of a puzzle,
with parts the viewer has to piece together.  The opening montage
doesn't make much sense until one sees the rest of the film, thus making
the opening images more poignant.
The acting from everyone is brilliant, as all of them are deep in misery
thorughout the present day part of the film.  Alberta Watson and Bruce
Greenwood are amazing as the cheating pair, who grow apart because of
the accident (Greenwood is especially brilliant).  Egoyan regulars
Chaykin, Gabrielle Rose, David Hemblem, and his wife Arsinée Khanjian
are on hand in several smaller roles, and all shine as usual.  And Sarah
Polley is absolutely amazing as the quietly depressed survivor Nicole,
who we're never really sure what she's thinking (especially in one of
the final shocking scenes).
But acting-wise, the movie belongs to veteran British actor, Ian Holm,
who's been in movies since the 60s, but never really become any kind of
legend.  He's more of a cult star, having appeared in numerous films,
from Ash the android in "Alien" to the weasel-looking Polonious in the
Mel Gibson version of "Hamlet" and most recently as the priest in "The
Fifth Element," Holm has not always been one of the most popular, but
definitely one of the best.  But this is perhaps his most brilliant
performance.  We see a shewd jerk on the surface of his character, a man
with a stone face who can say to his daughter without stuttering "I
don't know who I'm talking to anymore."  But underneath is a man who is
quitely sad, harbored by such intense misery and even more depressed
than any of the people in the town.  When he finally does break down and
cry, I wanted to cry along with him.  Holm's is probably the best
performance of the year.
But this film is really Egoyan's, who paints every single scene with the
right kind of atmosphere, and sense of misery that it needs.  From the
first couple scenes to the finale, he holds us in his hypnotic grasp,
and hits every single right emotional cord.  I think I counted about six
times when I was just about to cry (I never cry at movies, at least in
the theaters).  And his writing is brilliant, layering out the film
perfectly and flawlessly interjecting flashbacks in to the plot without
harming the underlying storyline.  The film unfolds beautifully, much
like Egoyan's other films do, but in a more emotional and interesting
fashion.
Take for example the bus crash scene, which in any other movie would
take place in the beginning.  He positions it in the middle of the film,
building it up so much that when it finally occurs, it's not
anti-climactic, but emotionally draining.  And it's not even nihilistic:
we don't see the bus go off the cliff, but we see it in the face of
Bruce Greenwood, who witnesses the entire thing.  The sight of the bus
sliding along the thin ice, then crashing is still one of the scariest
things I've seen this year or any other year.
"The Sweet Hereafter" is perhaps the most poignant and saddening film
I've seen all year.  Afterwards, I felt emotionally moved, and could
hardly get out of my seat.  The reason for this is it's smartly done,
not controlling the audience, but allowing us to reach our own
conclusion.  It has a long-lasting effect on people because it doesn't
answer everything this movie brings up.  There are many things I've been
thinking about after seeing this film, and have not come up with the
answers yet.  The people in this film are all searching for answers, but
the sad truth it there is none.  It was an accident, and looking for any
kind of answer to all the questions will lead to only more suffering and
depression.  There is no answer to many of the questions posed by this
film, and becuase the film knows that, it lingers on farther than any
film released this year.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
Director: Wes Craven
Writer: Kevin Williamson
Starring: Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, Skeet Ulrich, Rose McGowan, David
Arquette, Drew Barrymore, Matthew Lillard, Jamie Kennedy, Liev
Schreiber, Henry Winkler, Roger Jackson, Linda Blair, Wes Craven
You thought that the national entity known as the "slasher flick" was
dead?  Guess again (*corny diabolical laugh*).  Wes Craven, who's career
revolved around that little sub-sub-genre of the horror flick, brings us
the new 90s fresh take on that particular group of films, which has
brought back the "slasher flick" with a little concious twist - whether
we like it or not.
But in all seriousness, "Scream" is a surprisingly great flick.  Instead
of focusing on a group of horny teenagers, "Scream" puts its focus on a
surrealistic group of teens who have grown up watching the 80s slasher
flicks, can name any cliche out of it (example: while watching
"Halloween," one of them shouts out "Here's the obligatory nude
scene!"), and even the more obsessive ones can point out anything out of
any horror flick.  It's a nice fresh idea, methinks.
"Scream" opens with one of the best openings in a movie I've really ever
seen.  A teenager (Drew Barrymore, with a wig that I like, and seem to
be the only one who thinks so) is home alone in a house in the middle of
nowhere, getting ready to let her boyfriend in the door so they can
watch a "scary movie."  Then she gets a phone call...okay, well, you
know what happens, 'cause it seems to be the most parodied thing of the
year.  But it's a gripping, hysterical, and satirical little frightfest,
gradually getting scarier as it goes on, cheifly due to the direction
and the acting by Drew, who just conveys growing fear.  It sets up the
film nicely, by the way.
Cut to Sydney (Neve Campbell), our protagonist, who's mother was
conveniently murdered a year before, and who's alleged killer, Cotton
Weary (Liev Schreiber), is in a nasty trial.  She has a Johnny
Depp-looking boyfriend (Skeet Ulrich, luckily Depp's dead ringer), and a
distaste for horror movies.  And soon, she finds herself getting calls
from the same guy(s) who killed Drew in the first scene.  After a run-in
with the killer (who is dressed in a frightening black cape, and wears a
mask resembling that of Edward Munch's great painting, "The Scream"), we
are all launched into a deliciously fun world of whodunit, as well as
some good old cliche-ridden scenes of goriness, which are somehow
scarier now that the whole self-concious factor has been tossed in.
Some of the other characters/suspects are: Tatum (Rose McGowan),
Sydney's best friend; Stuart (Matthew Lillard), Tatum's hyperkinetic
boyfriend; Deputy Dewey (David Arquette), the inept police
officer/brother of Tatum; Randy (Jamie Kennedy), the obsessive film geek
who can quote any horror flick (guess which one I identify with?); and
Gale Weathers (Courtney Cox), a bitchy tabloid reporter.  The film has
some good old wholesome/delicious fun with playing with who the
killer(s) is/are, and to tell who it is would just take away from a good
half of the fun of the film.
There's a lot of uses of cliches, but all are handled with some lovely
self-concious fun.  We all know that when the big-breasted chick says
she's gonna go out to the empty garage to get some more beers that she
won't be coming back.  We all know that when the girl is sitting in the
locked car, the killer will enter through the back hood.  But so does
the film.  There's a great scene where the film geek (love this guy)
stands up in the middle of watching "Halloween" to preach to everyone
the rules of staying alive in a horror flick, without even knowing that
they're about to be in the middle of a grisly bloodbath.
The film also features billions and billions of references to horror
films, blatant and sly.  There are direct lines out of past horror films
(i.e. a character saying "We all go a little mad sometimes" is, duh, a
line from "Psycho), as well as entire sequences.  I couldn't catch a ton
of them, but I'm sure there's some totally obsessive film geek even
geekier than me re-watching and re-watching and re-watching this flick
to catch every single horror film allusion.  "Scream" is basically a
horror film geek's wet dream.
Of course, there's the downside of "Scream," which is pretty much the
equivalent to the downside of "Star Wars."  You've noticed that the
slasher film has been reborn, even if it is sometimes semi-self-concious
like this one.  Sure, we get critically acclaimed stylish horror films
like "Mimic," but we also get crap like "Wishmaster," and wannabe
"Scream" flicks like "I Know What You Did Last Summer."  And the sequel
will hopefully be good, but I'm starting to doubt it (although that
scene between Dewey and Randy in the commercials is great).
"Scream" is, essentially, a fantastically fun flick to watch, even after
repeat viewings, and preferably with a large group of people.  I
remember seeing it again in a crowded midnight showing during the third
wave of its popularity, and the "Rocky Horror Picture Show" type fun of
watching it, and yelling at some of the people in it.  "Scream" is
basically the best horror film I've seen since...I'm going with "The
Shining."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Fled (1996)
Director: Kevin Hooks
Writer: Preston A. Whitmore II
Starring: Laurence Fishburne, Stephen Baldwin, Will Patton, Salma Hayek,
Robert John Burke, Robert Hooks, Victor Rivers, David Dukes, Brittney
Powell, Bill Belamy, Ru Paul
What's the coolest thing about these little "Free Weekends" of premium
channels like "HBO," "Cinemax," and all those other ones is that you get
to see (usually) uncut films for free that you would never pay more than
a quarter to see.  I watched "Fled" mainly because I knew it wouldn't be
great at all, but might offer some kind of entertainment.  I was sorta
right.
"Fled" is basically your run-of-the-mill cheapo action pic which
features two guys feuding with one another and running from the law and
the mafia (either italian, russian, or cuban - this time it's the
latter), using cliches from films you've seen way before and liked way
better, and ends in the two guys becoming friends at the end after
defeating the main villain, although being belligerent friends.  Yes, I
told you the whole story, but you've seen it before anyway.
What makes "Fled" just a little bit different is that it kind of
embraces the cliches it uses.  Like "Scream" it rips off films, and just
gets off on that, as one of the two protagonists says "Didn't you see
[place film name here]?" after each rip-off.  But, of course, there's no
reason for this other than to be cute and kinda witty, which it is, but
that doesn't mean it's a good film.  But we do get references from "The
Fugitive" to "Deliverance," and even a pretty funny final reference
which is even funnier if you know the filmography of Fishburne.
In fact, the plot of "Fled," at least in the first half hour or so, is
inescapibly reminiscent of the film classic "The Defiant Ones," where
Tony Curtis and Sidney Poitier were escaped convicts handcuffed
together.  The two guys in this are, again, black and white, and are
played by the suave Laurence Fishburne (named Piper) and the kinda dorky
but trying to be cool twentieth Baldwin brother, Stephen (named Dodge -
love these names), and are again escaped convicts, but unfortunately are
de-chained about 40 minutes or so in the film, right about the time the
film becomes redundant and boring.
As the film goes on, we learn of conspiracies on top of conspiracies on
top of more conspiracies, as well as some police corruption, and a
couple cops connection to the cuban mafia.  The film tries to unfold in
a cool manner, with twists in the story coming about because all the
truth is witheld at first, but they instead feel cheap instead of great
like they did in, say, "L.A. Confidential" (why am I mentioning this
film in THIS review?!).  For instance: we never know why Dodge is in,
but we find out he's a computer hacker, and he hacked 25 million bucks
from some people who want it back.  Funny: I thought Stephen Baldwin
looked like a hacker too!
In these kinds of films, we have to get the obligatory chicks for each
of these guys, and we do: one who is not really necessary but
interestingly played, and one who is boring but at leasy she's topless. 
Salma Hayek (who reportedly hated doing the nudity in "Desperado") plays
the former, and, as I said, does it pretty well, although she's not
really essential or anything.  And the second one (played by Brittney
Powel) is even less essential, needed just for some nudity.
The film has lots of action sequences, which range from fun to boring
and redundant, as it is a chase movie (yea).  Director Kevin Hooks
("Passenger 57") creates every action scene to be a shock, but I swear
you can smell each one coming 10 minutes away.  There's one of these
every couple minutes, and the final one, which is small compared to all
the others, seems extremely anti-climactic.  They're not very well done
either, never realy garnering any excitement, but occasionally prompting
a snicker.  John Woo Hooks is not.
Fishburne does give a pretty commanding performance though (big shock
there), while Baldwin sinckers occasionally, but never really garners
any likability for his role.  I mean, what's he doing playing a hacker? 
Hayek is pretty okay, while the other chick is boring and pretty un-sexy
for a stripper (another fault: a hacker dating a stripper).  Will Patton
is pretty good though, even though he has way too many horrific lines
("when you spit into the wind...it may come back!" or something like
that).  And we get some distracting cameos from Bill Belamy and Ru Paul,
I guess added for cuteness as well.
Bottom line: "Fled" is semi-entertaining, and won't you to watch it, but
it's too boring to pay to see.  But even if it's for free, you still
have to waste about an hour and a half of your life watching it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Boxer, The (1997)
Director: Jim Sheridan
Writers: Jim Sheridan and Terry George
Starring: Daniel Day-Lewis, Emily Watson, Brian Cox, Ken Stott, Gerard
McSorley, Ciaran Fitzgerald, Elanor Methaven, Kenneth Cranham
Contrary to the title, "The Boxer" is not another Rocky story only this
time spliced with some cold hard politics.  It's actually three movies
in one: a political film, a boxing film, and a love story.  All of these
work in their own respects and have some pretty decent balancing betwixt
the three elements of the story, but somehow it seems kind of cliched
and unoriginal.  We've seen it all before, and we're just not blown away
with it like we should be.  Oh well.  It's still an excellent irish
story.
"The Boxer" of the title is Danny Flynn (Jim Sheridan staple Daniel
Day-Lewis), an ex-IRA member who gets out of a Belfast prison after 14
years, and finds out that his troubles are far from over.  First off,
the IRA is having a small civil war between its leader Joe Hamill (Brian
Cox), and one of its sub-leaders, Harry (Gerard McSorley), both having
opposing views on getting many of their members out of jail.
While this is going on, Danny and his old drunkard buddie, Ike (Ken
Stott, who played the chief inspector in Danny Boyle's "Shallow Grave"),
re-open an old gym which allows the two opposing religios sects,
Protestant and Catholics, to work together.  Danny not only begins
teaching kids how to box, but has stayed in great shape whilst in
prison, and is ready to start boxing real people again.
And Danny runs into his ex-love, Maggie ("Breaking the Waves"'s Emily
Watson), who hasn't seen him since he went in.  They don't easily start
up their romance again because she's the wife of a prisoner whom she
married during Danny's tenure in prison, and also has a son, Liam
(Ciaran Fitzgerald), from him, whom Liam is hoping will get out soon. 
But the two are slowly re-drawn to eachother again, and this begins to
complicate things.
The political story is nothing really special but works in itself. 
We've seen it many a time before, but it's at least interesting,
sometimes emotional, and even riveting at times.  There's a big riot
towards the middle of the film which is frightening in its brutality and
honesty.  The boxing story is very minor to the story, but does
represent people coming together to fight eachother fairly, and even
with good sportsmanship.  There are only a few boxing scenes, but
they're never like "Raging Bull"/let's-strip-down-the-sport-to-its-bones
brilliant.  They're more realistic, and instead of bone crunching, we
hear the sound of the gloves hitting eachother, which is slightly
unerving at times.  And I didn't know Daniel Day-Lewis was in such good
shape.
But the backbone of the story is the love one.  Because these characters
are given such horrible circumstances, and since the two leads have such
great chemistry together, we really feel for their plight.  As the film
goes on, and circumstances get worse and worse, the characters have to
make real human decisions, and we can sympathize with them as humans not
characters.  This is how you write a love story - take note, Hollywood.
These elements are pretty much equally balanced, with each of the parts
of the stories working hand-in-hand with eachother.    I loved how each
of the different parts of the plot mattered, and sometimes spilled over
into the next.  It made sure that we didn't just care for one of them. 
I'm not saying they're all equally great, because the love story really
carries the film, but at least they all work out respectively.
The acting is amazing, with Day-Lewis and Watson giving excellent
performances and showing great chemistry.  I'm not sure if they're
Oscar-nominee bound, but they're very good.  In the supporting roles,
Billy Cox is greatly sympathetic as the IRA leader losing control of his
daughter and his workers.  But the film is stolen acting wise by Ken
Stott as Ike, who is just a great scene stealer.
The direction and co-writing by Jim Sheridan (with the other co-writing
credit going to Terry George) is excellent, rounding out the characters
well, but not pacing everything greatly.  I noticed that the first half
was very leisurely (yet fascinating), but the second half whirls by at a
quick pace, and ends much too quickly.  More time could have been spent
thinking up the ending, since it does seem quite sloppy.
Though "The Boxer" is a good film, it never achieves the greatness that
it should.  Sure, it's a masterpiece compared to most of the Hollywood
drivel we usually get, but on it's own, it just could have been better. 
But it still works out, gives us a great love story combined with a
political and boxing drama, and features great acting.  Even if it could
have been better, this'll do.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Director: Michael Bay
Writers: Jonathan Hensleigh, Robert Roy Pool, Tony Gilroy, Shane Salerno,
J.J. Abrams (story by Jonathan Hensleigh and Robert Roy Pool, and
uncredited extra writing by Paul Attansio, Ann Biderman, Scott Rosenberg,
and Robert Towne)
Starring: Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Will
Patton, Steve Buscemi, William Fichtner, Peter Stormare, Owen Wilson, Keith
David, Jessica Steen, Grace Zabriskie, Udo Kier, Laurence Tierney, Anthony
Guidera, Charlton Heston
"Armageddon" is probably the cinematic equivalent of the 1976 Who concert
where the band played at record-breaking and ear-shattering decibels,
leaving behind a record that most rock bands were and still are afraid to
break.  "Armageddon" is close up there, with so many loud explosions that
drummer Keith Moon would be impressed if he were still around today, and in
a way is pretty much as over-the-top as that concert probably was. 
"Armageddon" is as flashy and glossy as any film comes, and it does pretty
much anything it can to make us like it, including giving us characters we
just plain like because they're being portrayed by good actors, bringing us
a love story, and providing us with so much action that after awhile all of
this becomes pretty numbing.  Kinda like the Who concert probably was.  I'm
sure everyone heard the first hour or so, but after that only heard
distortion and a couple explosions from Keith Moon's drum set.  Same with
this movie.
"Armageddon" is the second comet/asteroid-colliding-with-earth film we've
had in a two month period, following the "On the Beach"-wannabe "Deep
Impact."  While that one featured people trying to cope with the
possibility of the end of the world, this one is a little more aggressive. 
Both feature a group of miners and astronauts attempting to blow the
comet/asteroid up, but this one dwells prominently on them, and instead of
just one long sequence of them working and failing like in "Deep Impact,"
this one features one really, really, really long action sequence where
everything goes wrong that could go wrong and these guys keep going like an
Energizer bunny on uppers.
It's an event movie, which means it's pretty much a formula film where what
worked in the past crops up again.  This one is a disaster film but without
much of the drama of the people actually living on earth waiting for
potential extinction, and more on the "drama" of the people working to
destroy it.  Of course, you've all seen the previews: an asteroid is
heading towards earth, and it's up to Bruce Willis to destroy it.  Willis,
the token gruff action boy of late, plays a cynical miner chosen to destroy
the asteroid by the head of NASA, Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton, cashing
in on "Sling Blade," I see), along with a couple of his own men and some
other astronauts.  While "Deep Impact" took place over about a year or so,
this film puts itself in a corner immeadiately: we have about 16 days
(!!!).
The first hour of the film is easily the best.  We're introduced to the
situation, given some ways of fixing it, and then introduced to the
characters who will be going up and staying down.  The film establishes
Willis's daugher, Grace (Liv Tyler - is Bruce REALLY that old?), as the
martyr as her father AND her fiance, the buff A.J. Frost (Ben Affleck...oh,
I mean, OSCAR WINNER Ben Affleck, sorry), are both going up to space to do
battle with the large rock, setting up the film for some real heart on
Tyler's part, and giving the film a chance to cash in on the fact that
Liv's father is none other than Stephen Tyler of Aerosmith (yuck).  The
second half of the film is a rollar coaster ride of problem after problem
after problem etc etc etc, all making sure that after the film has
completed, you're totally drained.  And you are, trust me.
It's obvious by the way it was advertised as well as by simply looking at
it that this film is not at all concerned with being intelligent,
thoughtful, or even, in all reality, entertaining.  It's meant to make
money, and has been designed so much like that that an entire article in
this month's Premiere magazine shows the many steps it took to make this as
formulaic and therefore profitable as possible.  And yes, it's better than
other formula event pictures (need I mention the crapfest that was
"Godzilla?"), but it still has several problems, so many that if I were to
mention all of them I'd just be being picky.  But some are just too
unmentionable, such as the lackluster second half in comparison with an
entertaining first half, too many cheap "human" moments, and worst of all,
what has to be a quarter-assed love story that is so underdeveloped that
it's distracting every time it crops up.  Does A.J. even realize Grace
exists for half of the movie?  Why else would he talk about how he's coming
back and then later on risk his life for sheer cockiness?  I understand
that they felt they needed a romance angle in this film, what after
"Titanic."  But they really needed to put a little more umph into it, or at
least just a bit of umph.
So why am I recommending this film?  Why did I enjoy a film that has
numerous plot holes, too many explosions, and the IQ of a house plant? 
Because most of these bad qualities are used luckily to make for a really
entertaining experience.  I enjoyed the whole gung ho-ness of it all, the
way that it took the time to set up its characters in a similar way to that
testosterone-classic, "The Dirty Dozen"...then sends them on their way to a
suicide mission.  They're not deep characters, in fact they're pretty much
characateurs not characters, but the film actually makes us care about them
anyway, not the least by casting a bunch of good actors who've made it in
the indie/art house film world, not only Thornton, Affleck, and Tyler (and,
in some respects, Willis), but also Owen Wilson (who was brilliant in
"Bottle Rocket"), Peter Stormare ("Fargo"), and Steve Buscemi (pick a
film), all who are allowed to overact to sheer delight.
Willis, in fact, hasn't been this good in awhile.  His past few
performances, even in "The Fifth Element," have seemed to be on autopilot,
more or less, but here he brings us a sorta older version of his beloved
John McClane character.  Willis is a good comic actor when he wants to be,
and here he's back as his old self, making wise-cracks and generally
winning over the audience just like he used to.  Of course, he's upstaged
by Buscemi (can we just give this guy an Oscar already...or at the very
least a Lifetime Achievement Award?), who plays the resident comic relief
and still stays fresh even when the second half of the film finds him
diagnosed with "space dimentia" (okay...).
"Armageddon" was directed by Michael Bay, who directed "Bad Boys" and the
wonderfully entertaining "The Rock," a film that, like this, doesn't take
itself totally seriously (sometimes this does, but then it pulls itself
right out of the ditch it creates), and features the infamous use of
hyper-hyper-editing.  No one shot lasts more than 5 seconds, creating a
glossy-as-hell film that could easily be denounced as "crap on a stick,"
but for some reason works.  Maybe it's because the characters are likable
enough that when they're sent out to be martyrs we worry about whether or
not they're coming back at all, and for some reason not as worried about
the people on earth (save for Thornton and Tyler...and maybe that stripper
that Buscemi meets...). And also because Bay's MTV-style direction creates
an experience that is numbing yet still enjoyable and even a little
admirable.  Look at his crash-on-the-asteroid scene: have you seen this
much confusion and general fright-of-the-unknown since "Aliens?" 
"Armageddon" prides itself in being glossy but has no real delusions about
what it is and what it isn't, and while this isn't totally commendable,
it's still mildly distracting for 2 1/2 hours, and admittingly very
entertaining, which is something which is pretty good for us every now and
then.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Once Upon a Time in America (1984)
Director: Sergio Leone
Writers: Sergio Leone, Leonardo Benvenuti, Piero De Bernardi, Enrico
Medioli, Franco Arcalli, and Franco Ferrini (based on the novel "The
Hoods" by Harry Grey)
Starring: Robert DeNiro, James Woods, Elizabeth McGovern, Tuesday Weld,
Treat Williams, William Forsythe, Danny Aiello, Joe Pesci, Burt Young,
James Hayden, Larry Rapp, Darlanne Fluegel, Richard Bright, Scott Tiler,
Rutsy Jacobs, Jennifer Connelly
In his long career, spanning from the mid-60s to the mid-80s, italian
director Sergio Leone made a total of seven (7) big films, most epic
westerns, like "Fistful of Dollars" and "The Good, the Bad, and the
Ugly."  "Once Upon a Time in America," his final film before his death,
is the culmination of everything he's ever done, so obviously it would
be a tad anti-climactic.  Featuring the same style, but a more
experimental narrative, the film seems to be too ambiguous for its own
good.  But somehow it holds together, and becomes a masterpiece, and a
wonderful little exit piece for the genius Mr. Leone.
"Once Upon a Time in America" is a gangster pic, but hardly the
traditional kind.  Sure, it embraces all kinds of cliches, like the
gangsters looking absolutely fabulous all the time, substituting style
for characterization, and featuring paradise discovered and then
tragically lost.  But Leone turns these cliches into pure brilliance,
putting an interesting twist on the almost overdone genre.  All of
Leone's films steer clear of deep characterization, and instead focus on
more grandiose themes, like amorality, betrayal, trust, and greed.
The film takes place in three time settings - 1921, 1933, and 1968 -
each placed in non-linear bizarro order.  In fact, the first twenty
minutes of the film are a series of bizarre little vignettes, seeming to
have absolutely no connection other than the fact that they all have
gangsters in them.  With no narration, we are left to guess what is
going on, but we should actually remember exactly what occurs in this
introduction, as we will be forced to revisit it in order to figure out
this movie, which is structured like a puzzle.
The film takes place in three different time settings: 1921, 1933, and
1968, each visited in bizarro order.  There is no underlying plot, but
deals with a group of people who live in these times, and are either
involved directly or indirectly with the world of organized crime.  The
film's protagonist is Noodles (Robert DeNiro as an adult, Scott Tiler as
a kid), who starts his life of crime back in the days of prohibition.
Noodles grew up in the Lower East Side of Manhattan, which is the jewish
section, and was friends with some other kid gangsters, such as Patsy,
Cockeye, and Max (Rutsy Jacobs as a kid, but James Woods as an adult). 
Although being tempted by an attractive young girl named Deborah
(Jennifer Connelly - *swoon* - at 13 - *non-swoon* - as a kid, and
Elizabeth McGovern as an adult), he still prefers the company of young
gangsters, and they are soon part of the whole world of organized crime.
The film also visits the 30s, where Noodles is released from prison
after 12 years (he did some nasty stuff as a kid), and starts right up
again with the grown-up Patsy, Cockeye, and Max.  And throughout the
film, we return to the late 60s, where Noodles is an old man, painfully
remembering his past, and looking more ravaged and lonely than other
older people.  DeNiro is at his best in this film when he's old; he
nails the look and feel of a man who regrets his entire life, but cannot
turn time back.
The film is constructed in a wonderful fashion, unearthing facts as the
film moves on.  In all his films, the plot unfolds wonderfully,
introducing us to things on a need to know basis.  We don't know exactly
why Noodles is so depressed at his old age until towards the ending, and
somehow it's not anti-climactic.  Leone is a master story-teller, always
carefully plotting his films.  The ending of "For a Few Dollars More,"
for instance, when we find out the true motivation for the Colonel's
actions, is interesting, but not a let-down.
But unlike his other films, this has a much different feel.  Sure, we
get the same kind of style Leone is famous for, which several minutes of
no dialogue but pure montage which are engrossing and hypnotic.  And
most of his characters are amoral, mainly because they can't be anything
else.  But for the first time, we get some true emotion from a Leone
film.  We feel sorry for Noodles since he spoils any chance he has to
turn his life around.  And instead of a simple plot, the story unfolds
in an episodic fashion.  But luckily, we still get Leone's knack for
close-ups, cool shots, and making anyone look cool (even William
Forsythe's face is as memorable as that of Henry Fonda in "Once Upon a
Time in the West").
Also, Leone adds a lot of depth to the story, as well as some really
analytical things.  For instance, the film opens and ends in an opium
shop, where the 1933 Noodles is getting high, and remembering parts of
his life.  Perhaps the whole 1968 part is just what he thinks will
happen, a reminder that his life is going to be full of misery since he
was chosen to live on the opposite side of the law.  It makes for a more
rewarding film experience.
The music by Leone regular Ennio Morricone is amazing as well.  He
creates a sad score, filled with beauty and depth.  He occasionally
adapts some traditional tunes throughout the film, including the
Beatles' "Yesterday."  Morricone has made one of his best scores for
this film.
The acting is also very good.  DeNiro, as I said, just looks and feels
like a man regretful of what he is.  And James Woods is awesome,
especially in some of his later scenes.  Elizabeth McGovern is actually
pretty good, although her younger self played by Jennfier Connelly is
better.  The big scene stealer award goes to Tuesday Weld, who plays a
girl who is raped by Noodles and eventually becomes Max's girlfriend. 
There are lots of smaller parts for semi-famous and future famous
people, like Joe Pesci, "Rocky"'s Burt Young, Treat Williams, William
Forsythe, and Danny Aiello.
Leone has always been a fan of long epic films ("The Good, the Bad, and
the Ugly" and "Once Upon a Time in the West" are both two hours and
forty-five minutes long), and this one is barely an exception.  Running
at a lenghty three hours and forty-five minutes, the film still never
drags.  Leone always keeps things moving, and is a master of montage. 
Sure, it's almost four hours long, but you'll never be bored, and you'll
be reluctant to turn it off because it is so positively hypnotic (if you
still want to see it but don't want to see a four hour gangster film,
there is a two hour and fifteen minute theatrical cut, but I have no
idea what they cut from it.  this film is so elegantly structured that
if you took thirty seconds away, the film would fall apart).
"Once Upon a Time in America" is a film which is amazingly narcotic:
it's hard to stop.  Leone has always had this kind of power over his
viewers, and this film, the culmination of his career, is one of this
best examples of this.  While I still think "The Good, the Bad, and the
Ugly" is a better film, "Once Upon a Time in America" is definitely one
of his best, and one hell of a way to go out.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
Director: F. Gary Gray
Writers: James DeMonaco and Kevin Fox
Starring: Samuel L. Jackson, Kevin Spacey, J. T. Walsh, Ron Rifkin, John
Spencer, David Morse, Regina Taylor, Paul Giamatti, Siobahn Fallon, Paul
Guilfoyle
"The Negotiator" is almost drowning in cliches, but they're only extremely
evident once the movie has ended.  For instance, the film opens with a
sequence where the film's one negotiator, Danny Roman (Samuel L. Jackson),
does a tough negotiating job with a homicidal lunatic.  He manages to talk
his way into the room, and even allow the police to get a wound shot on
him, all without even getting a scratch.  Afterwards, they go to a bar and
party, laughing at the news when it covers the situation they were just
present at.
How many times have we seen this in a film like this?  I can remember
"Speed," but at least that whole bit had to do with the actual plot.  The
things that happened in that sequence resulted in the rest of the movie. 
Here, the film is trying to prove three things: 1) that Danny likes to risk
his life for his job, 2) that he's very excellent at his job, and 3) that
he's just too cool for words.  And generally, it does a good job of setting
his character up for the rest of the movie, where he will be stripped away
of everything and turned into a desperate creature.
As you've no less seen in the previews, "The Negotiator" deals with another
in the long line of "Dog Day Afternoon" rip-offs, where hostages are taken
and we're given more of a glimpse on the inside with the bad guys and less
on the outside with the good guys.  In this film, though, it's an almost
impulsive move.  After the opening sequence, Danny's partner (Paul
Guilfoyle, who IS in everything these days), who was investigating stolen
funds from the department's treasury, is killed and Danny is framed for the
murder.  Danny didn't do it and we know it, but as the evidence comes in,
everyone points the finger at Danny, and he goes over the edge when he
walks into the office of the man investigating the crime, Inspector Niebaum
(the late J.T. Walsh, playing a creep for the last time), and in a fit of
rage, takes him and three others hostage.
After a bit of pandemonium, Danny refuses to speak to anyone except for a
West-Side Manhattan negotiator he's never met, Chris Sabian (Kevin Spacey),
who comes over and begins to ease the tensions between Danny and the cops
who are trying to take him out, probably because some of them are the guys
who framed him.  It's a story we've all seen before, although told a little
differently since the kidnapper knows all the little twists of negotiating,
and worst of all, knows everyone who's trying to take him out so he can
perhaps juice up their emotions a bit.  As the film goes on, we're treated
to the intensity of the situation as well as a giant conspiracy that slowly
unravels as the film moves on.  Who set Danny up, and can he find out
before the cops break in and kill him or someone who knows something?
Since you've seen this all before, basically, I'll give you two good
reasons to see this particular entry: Samuel L. Jackson and Kevin Spacey. 
Here we have two of the best actors working today, the former a master of
fiery intensity, the latter a master of calm intensity.  And since the
entire film, or basically most of it (following a lengthy exposition),
these two are playing cat-and-cat games with one another, the film is
intensely watchable.  Who wasn't holding their breath the first time they
saw the final scene of "Pulp Fiction," where Jackson gave such a powerful
performance that when he lost the Oscar to Martin Landau, we were all with
him when he mouthed "Shit" on the air?  And who wasn't on the edge of their
seat throughout "The Usual Suspects," just listening to Spacey weave that
story from beginning to end?  Watching one of them is amazing enough, but
when they're both on screen, playing off eachother with flawless chemistry,
it's just pure movie magic.
Now, let me sidetrack to talk about something else.  When reviewing a movie
like this, it's almost a rule that you point out all the little plot holes,
flubs, and generally be extremely cynical about it all, because this, after
all, is a genre-pic, one that has been made many a time before, sometimes
several times in a year.  When reviewing films like this, reviewers often
just say something like "I liked it when I watched it, but when I left the
theatre, I began to realize that the film was weak" blah blah blah.  This
is a fault, and it's something that I've done before as well (just read
some of my older reviews for proof of this).  Of course a film like this
may seem weak when it's over: you're not watching it.  Film, in any genre
or form, is generally supposed to be one thing: an experience.  Unless it's
a very complex film that you're trying to figure out the plot or theme(s)
to, it's pretty much a waste of time to rely on afterthoughts because
they're usually totally ignorant.  I know someone who saw "Titanic" twice
last year, and just now has deemed it crap because they realized
"glossiness doesn't cover up plot holes."  This person damn near cried when
they saw it.
The same goes for this film.  The chief pleasure in this film is just
watching it, and when watching a film that's pleasing, it's not entirely
evident of the plot holes and cliches till afterwards.  It's such a pot
boiler that looking back on it may reveal things that might not work out in
retrospect, but it's such a well-directed film (thank you, F. Gary Gray)
that it's edge-of-your seat the whole time.  He handles all the action well
in short interludes of chaos.  He balances just the idea of a hostage
situation and a mystery that is totally involving all the way.  He gets
brilliant performances from Jackson and Spacey, and even gets strong
support, especially from everyone's favorite actor they don't know, Paul
Giamatti (playing a sleazy, hysterical hostage).  What's the point in
mentioning any plot holes this story may have when it doesn't matter when
this film is just happening?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Flubber (1997)
Director: Les Mayfield
Writers: John Hughes and Bill Walsh (based on the 1961 film "The Absent
Minded Professor" by Bill Walsh)
Starring: Robin Williams, Marcia Gay Harden, Christopher McDonald, Raymond
J. Barry, Clancy Brown, Ted Levine, Will Wheaton, Edie McClurg, Jodi Benson
"Flubber" is the second best example of how to take all the life out of a
film remake an adaptation, and hysterically enough both were distributed by
Disney.  It's the kind of film that may be slightly entertaining to tiny
kids, but anyone else will feel left out as it's boring, slow, and
incredibly lifeless.  What could be a film with cinematic magic is instead
dead in the water, and it's a shame because it could have been a great
film.  Hypothetically, I mean.
"Flubber," as you probably know, is a remake of the Disney Classic I never
saw, "The Absent Minded Professor," where a, well, absent minded professor
played by Fred McMurray created an erratic substance known as "Flubber,"
you know, flying rubber?  The new one keeps the basic plot, but appears to
have added a lot else, like more absent-mindedness on the part of the
proffessor, some more villains, and several "show-stopping" moments, like a
big rumba with the flubber, and some more elaborate setups, none which
really make it any better, but instead make it worse.
The basic plot revolves around a college professor, Philip Brainerd (Robin
Williams), who creates lots and lots of inventions, but is sadly absent
minded.  In fact, he's forgotten his wedding to the college's president,
Sara Jean Reynolds (indie actress Marcia Gay Harden), two times before he
forgets it again at the beginning.  Doesn't this warrant some kind of
mental treatment?
Anyway, on his wedding day (the third one), he invents the Flubber, which
not only bounces off of everything like a super ball on speed, but can also
change shape like the aliens in water form in "The Abyss."  Philip believes
that this invention, once fully realized, will save his college, which is
in threat of being shut down by a millionaire tycoon/villain, Chester
Hoenicker (Raymond J. Barry), which is ironically enough the same college
his brat son (Will Wheaton - thought he was dead) goes to.
Through a plot twist, Hoenicker's goons, named Smith and Wesson (ha ha -
what a great sense of humor this film has) who are played by Clancy Brown
and Ted Levine (both who needed the pay check), discover it the hard way,
and try to steal for Hoenicker, who wants it just 'cause he's evil enough.
A sub-plot involves Philip's attempts to win back Sara, who's angry at him
(and with good reason), but who is being seduced by who is basically
Philip's Belloq, Wilson Croft (Christopher McDonald, playing the
hysterically suave-yet-unsuave asswhole once again).  And in another
subplot, Philip's day-timer robot, Weebo (voiced by the one-and-only Jodi
Benson), falls in love with him.  Yuckity-yuck.
What's most pathetic about this film is how dull it is.  You don't need to
be a cynical college student to be able to see right through this film,
which is another in a long line of cheap attempts at making a quick buck by
Disney, who have essentially become the Puff Daddy of the film industry,
half-assedly re-mixing classics (or non-classics) for distribution to the
general public, who sadly eats it all up.  Earlier in '97, they released
"Jungle 2 Jungle," an adaptation of a really awful French film, "Un Indien
Dans la Ville," which, yeah, improved over the original, but not by much. 
Disney's in about as bad shape as Warner Brothers right now, only
creatively.
In the rush to ship out a film for distribution, Disney has forgotten to
give this film a little thing called "magic."  Such scenes as dancing
flubber, a flying car, a basketball team that pretty much sucks flying all
around thanks to some carefully placed flubber, and an elaborate ending all
fail to amaze, delight, or even cause people to laugh.  I sat there the
entire film stone faced, chuckling perhaps twice, and shaking my head at
all the bad jokes.  Who could really laugh at a scene where Philip enters
the wrong classroom and starts teaching chemistry?  Didn't think so.
It doesn't help that our protagonist is essentially unfunny or even really
respectable.  Philip is not a lovable absent minded professory, just a
really dumb man being played by Robin Williams.  Williams is a brilliant
comic actor...okay, a brilliant actor in general, but here he's given very
little to do but occasionally get hyper over something, and other times act
sad.  Those times, he's not bad.  But what are we supposed to think of a
man who's forgotten his wedding thrice?  Maybe it was funny and/or
respectable in the 60s...
I like Disney, and I usually enjoy their films, not only animated but live
action, and their recent films (save for "Hercules," which was good, but
not great) have been worse than lackluster, they've been pathetic.  "Jungle
2 Jungle" is probably the worst film I saw last year.  "Flubber"'s probably
second.  What do they need to do?  Perhaps create something new.  Get
writers who can write something that's universally entertaining.  Films
like "The Parent Trap" and "Mary Poppins" are films that are live action
(or in the latter case a mix of both), but even I can still watch them
because they're not only written to be magical to children, but to be fun
to adults.  What's more torturous that taking a child to a film that
insults you and annoys you at every turn?
And my god, couldn't they have done something else with Edie McClurg?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Trainspotting (1996)
Director: Danny Boyle 
Writer: John Hodge (based on the novel by Irvine Welsh)
Starring: Ewan McGregor, Johnny Lee Miller, Ewen Bremmer, Robert Carlyle, 
Kevin McKidd, Kelly MacDonald, Peter Mullan, Irvine Welsh, Keith Allen, 
Andrew MacDonald
I'm reviewing this film immeadiately after I've reviewed Kubrick's "A 
Clockwork Orange" because they are so similar yet different (If that makes 
sense).  Both are similar in their social satires but different in their 
styles and targets.  While the aim of "A Clockwork Orange" was violence and 
its necessity in society, "Trainspotting" puts a kind of 90s twist on it and 
says drugs are also a necessity in society as well as violence.  Now all I 
have to do is make a film where I show sex is a necessity in society and the 
trilogy of amoralness and how it is needed to create society is completed.  
But while "A Clockwork Orange" took its time in telling its story (it ran for 
about 2 hours and 15 minutes, give or take a second), "Trainspotting" goes 
quickly and energetically at a brisk 93 minutes (also give or take a second). 
 From the moment the protagonist's feet hit the street in a giddy chase scene 
to Iggy Pop's "Lust for Life," we are taken full speed into a world of 
despair and self-destructiveness that is more fun than any action film, more 
thoughtful than any hokey Hollywood drama, and more clever than a typical 
Hollywood romantic comedy.  Of course, this film comes from England where it 
was all the rave.  There, it's the equivalent of "Independence Day."  Here, 
it's a cult hit with a minor release but with a good sized following from 
those of us who paid attention to the news (or saw Boyle's earlier work, 
"Shallow Grave," also written and produced by the same people and starring 
this film's star, the amazingly awesome Ewan McGregor).  
Contrary to popular opinion, "Trainspotting" is not really all about drugs.  
Sure it's "anti-drug" and all, but I would hardly classify this as an 
"anti-drug film."  It's really a social satire in the vein of "A Clockwork 
Orange" (which also wasn't really all about violence and how bad it is).  The 
drug of choice in "Trainspotting" is heroin, although it shows other drugs 
being used, such as hash, alcohol, and even valium.  In "Trainspotting," 
which takes place in 80s Edinburgh (instead of the near future of "A 
Clockwork Orange"), everyone has their drug fix.  The protagonist, Mark 
Renton (the aforementioned Ewan McGregor, my pick for new breakthrough actor 
of the year), is a part of a group of mates, most who do heroin (including 
Sick Boy and Spud).  Another friend, Begbie, does alcohol.  Yet another 
friend, Tommy, doesn't do drugs, but lifts a lot and likes to videotape 
himself having sex with his girlfriend.  Renton's mother is even a drug 
addict, albeit a socially acceptable one, doing valium.
Renton, or "Rents," isn't really the leader, just the more sensible one.  
Sick Boy (Jonny Lee Miller) is the resident Sean Connery knowitall, 
theorizing endlessly on Bond and his own personal meaning of life ("Well, at 
one time, you've got it, then you loose it, and it's gone for ever").  Then 
there's Spud (Ewen Bremmer), who's the least harmful and selfish of them all, 
but very weak-like.  He's the second most sympathetic character in the film, 
other than Rents.  Then there's Tommy (Kevin McKidd), who as I said, hates 
drugs but once his girlfriend dumps him (after a hilarious mix-up, see the 
film to find out what) he gets into it with tragic results.  How could I even 
forget Begbie (Robert Carlyle), who gets off on beating people up.  He drinks 
furiously and has a temper so bad it makes Sonny Corleone look like Florence 
Henderson.  He's the most disturbing character, obviously.  All of these 
people are clearly defined as they drift in occasionally.  Rents is in most 
of the scenes, hence he is the most likable one, the same way Alex DeLarge 
was the most likable character in "A Clockwork Orange," but Rents is far less 
amoral than Alex.
The film takes us viewers through what it is like to be on drugs: starting us 
off without them in a highly satirical beginning which shows how dull life is 
without them.  In this first Act, many of the funniest parts occur, including 
the infamous "Worst Toilet in Scotland" scene that is humorous, surreal and 
disgusting at the same time (and will have you talking about it no matter 
what you thought of it).  Then we get back on drugs and everything is great 
for a while, but then some horrible things happen: Rents get arrested for 
looting for money to afford drugs and he later O.D.s in a brilliantly shot 
scene where he sinks into the floor in a red coffin and is taken to the 
hospital to be cured while Lou Reed's "Perfect Day" is ironically played on 
the soundtrack.  The final Act has the film trying to form a drug-selling 
plot which ends the friendship between the clique and has Rents choosing to 
stay off drugs and lead a normal life.
"Trainspotting" shows why people use drugs: to get away from life.  In the 
first opening speech, Renton says the famous, "Choose life.  Choose a job.  
Choose a career." etc speech, which is so utterly satirical that it's 
amazing.  Drugs make everything unimportant and when you're off them, "you 
are suddenly obliged to worry about all sorts of other shite.  You have to 
worry about bills, about food, about some football team that never wins, 
about human relationships and all the things that really don't matter when 
you've got a sincere and truthful junk habit."  It's so true that it pretty 
much makes you want to get a junk habit.  "Trainspotting" shows the pro-sides 
of being on drugs.  The forgetfullness of life.  The pleasure.  Then it turns 
right around and shows all the billions of down-sides, quickly quieting all 
yearning to ever pick up a junk habit.  
First off, you HAVE to worry about things in this kind of society.  You just 
can't turn yourself off and hope to just lie around injecting skag your 
entire life.  In one part, a woman with a baby who has a heroin addiction, 
wakes one day from her haze to find her baby has died from her not caring for 
it.  Then there's the whole risk of getting a bad stash.  At one point, 
Renton O.D.s from a bad stash and launches into the aforementioned "Perfect 
Day"/sinking into the carpet scene.  Then there's the whole AIDs thing, which 
happens to the only character who picks up the habit later on in the film and 
dies in a horrible way (still I laughed at the circumstances, so would you). 
The other thing is the whole friendship thing.  Danny Boyle certainly has a 
knack for showing cliques in trouble.  In "Shallow Grave" he showed a group 
of obnoxious flatmates who turn on eachother when a suitcase of money is 
found.  In "Trainspotting," the friends have defined themselves by the drugs 
they use.  They all really hate eachother (except Spud, 'cause he's such a 
darn nice guy) but they put up with eachother because they all like doing 
drugs with eachother.  At the end, when all of them are totally sober, Renton 
takes the opportunity and screws them all in hopes of helping himself with 
his life.  
Then there's the title.  What does it mean?  Well, my friend (with a cool 
"Trainspotting" homepage) made it clear for me: "Trainspotters" are losers 
who write down all the schedules of trains - the guys in this film are told 
to get a life, hence "Trainspotting."  I thank my friend for this one.
In the end, "Trainspotting" is a biting satire of a society where it sucks so 
much that people have to escape into a drug-induced state just to get any 
kind of pleasure.  In this film, the phrase "Get a Life" is broken down and 
analyzed.  Would getting a life be really good and make one happy?  And if 
you chose not to get a life, will you be able to not have a life for a 
pro-longed period of time and still be happy?  The answers are both clear 
"NO"s.  This film knows that and it makes an anti-drug statement in a 
brilliantly realized social satire.  
The film is very well made by Danny Boyle, with a sort of enthusiastic style 
which is kind of like a drugged-up "Hard Day's Night."  It is very episodic, 
but it is very smooth and moves at high speeds.  The violence, drugs, and sex 
are all presented full-forcedly, the way they need to be.  Danny doesn't 
glamorize these, just brings them down to our level for analyzation.  The 
writing by John Hodge, who adapted the HUGE novel by Irvine Welsh (who plays 
Mikey Forester, a 3 scene, 2 line role), and made it interesting, witty and 
brilliant.  He should have received an Oscar for his endeavor, but he lost it 
to Billy Bob Thornton.  At least he didn't lose to "The English Patient." 
(laugh track)
The acting is pretty much flawless.  Newcomer Kelly MacDonald is wonderfully 
non-ignorant as a Catholic schoolgirl who fools Renton (heh heh - won't tell 
how).  The rest of the cast, including Miller and Bremmer among others is 
absolutely fantastic, but the best two performances come from Robert Carlyle 
(as the insanely brutal and blunt drunk/jerk Begbie) and of course, Ewan 
McGregor.  Ewan was awesome as the obnoxious, funnyman Alex in "Shallow 
Grave," but here he shows depth as Renton, who isn't a jerk or anything, but 
a very sympathetic, deep character.  He gives the film what it needs to be 
whole.  To paraphrase "Jerry Maguire", he completes the film.  (Shut up!  You 
had me at hello!  --- sorry, Cameron Crowe posessed me for a second there)
"Trainspotting" is a lot like "A Clockwork Orange," from its socially 
satirical message to its choice of amoral protagonists with bad habits.  But 
the two are different in their approach and while "A Clockwork Orange" is 
better, "Trainspotting" holds it own and is my pick for best film of 1996.
*Note: Also like "A Clockwork Orange," "Trainspotting" is an assault on the 
senses and might not be good for people with a weak stomach.  It has graphic 
language, graphic sex, graphic drug use, and even graphic violence.  Graphic 
film, I might say.  And, please, view this with an open mind.

Title
Review for Metropolis (1927)
Director: Fritz Lang
Writer: Fritz Lang (from the novel by Thea von Harbou)
Starring: Alfred Abel, Brigitte Helm, Gustav Fröhlich, Rudolf
Klein-Rogge
Before Orwell wrote "1984," before Aldous Huxley wrote "Brave New
World," and way before Ridley Scott directed "Blade Runner," German
director created "Metropolis," one of the oldest films to deal with the
future as bleak, if not the first.  "Metropolis" is one of the few films
that is deemed a classic, and is also brilliant besides that.  And even
if it was silent, and extremely old, I was never bored.
"Metropolis" is a world in the far future (maybe 21st century) where the
rich and elite live above ground, while the workers slave underneath the
city with horrible conditions.  The king of Metropolis is the fascist
and selfish John Frederson (Alfred Abel), who has no love for the
workers, even if they are basically running his life.  He's so feared
and respected that when he fires a worker, the worker tries to shoot
himself.
One day, his son, Freder (Gustav Fröhlich), is hanging around in his
Pleasure Garden with some people, and a mysterious woman enters - Maria
(Brigitte Helm) - with a bunch of kids, who are the children of the
workers.  She causes him to actually take a peak at the workers and
their environment, and he unfortunately witnesses a horrific accident,
which claims the lives of some of the workers.  From that point on, he
has total sympathy for the workers, and will try his best to be their
futuristic Moses.
Meanwhile, John has met with the twisted scientist/inventor Rotwang
(Rudolf Klein-Rogge), who lives and works in a bizarre little wooden
house in the midst of the giant city.  It turns out Rotwang has invented
a robot who can do everything the workers do, only better, thus
rendering the workers obsolete and expendable.  But as the two learn
about the rebellious workers, John decides to try and make the robot
look just like that of Maria, who is the rebel's official or unofficial
leader and philosopher.
Thus begins a masterpiece of a film which satirizes the class system,
slavery, and even unions.  Besides that, it's also just one hip little
flick.  The world that it creates is totally memorble, even if it has
been ripped off in hundreds of films.  One of the many amazing things
about this flick is how innovative it is.  The special effects are
surprisingly good for a film made in 1926, with a couple
realistic-looking explosions, a robot that moves believably, and a set
which looks absolutely stunning (with buildings reaching up as far as
the eye can see, although the flying cars are just usual planes).
I was going to rent this once, but found it was only available in video
stores under the 1984 re-release.  Let me explain why you shouldn't rent
this (even though I haven't): it includes some extra scenes not put
together by the director (Fritz Lang, who would go on to direct that
serial killer classic, "M"), a tinted frame and some coloring instead of
the gorgeous black and white photography, and a musical score by...Pat
Benatar, Loverboy, and Queen, among others.  I don't know about you, but
this just causes me to cringe up, and even though I could just turn the
volume down, it would still be tinted and all messed up.  So I settled
for paying 5 bucks for a pre-recorded crap copy by "Hollywood Gold,"
which distributes old films in "highest quality EP mode," which is
pretty much an oxymoron, but sometimes it's the only way one can see
classic pictures without seeing them all screwed up.  This is the only
acceptable way to see this film, until a better non-Queen version comes
out.
At the end, we are left with just pure satisfaction.  We've gotten a
wonderfully crafted satire, all wrapped around with awesome visuals and
great effects.  Some stuff that sticks in one's mind is: the workers
being ferried off to work; the first big explosion; Rotwang showing off
his robot invention for the first time; the giant riot towards the end;
and the witch-burning scene; among several others.  Even if this weren't
a powerful narrative, it'd still be cool to watch.
"Metropolis" is one of the most innovative and amazing films I've really
ever seen, and shows that old sci-fi doesn't have to include a dumb
story and bad special effects.  "Metropolis" is a film about ideas, and
it incorporates the cool special effects not only without taking from
the story, but actually adding to it.  If you're a fan of anything
futuristic, I would recommend you check out this absolutely brilliant
masterpiece.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for American Werewolf in London, An (1981)
Writer/Director: John Landis
Starring: David Naughton, Jenny Agutter, Griffin Dunne
With the upcoming "An American Werewolf in Paris" coming out Christmas
Day (and looking way too hokey rather than comical), I thought I'd
finally check out "An American Werewolf in London," the original film,
and one of comical director John Landis's first.  What it does is take
the old melodramatic horror films and kinda mocks them with great black
comedy.  Still, it has its flaws.
"An American Werewolf in London" (great title) deals with two Americans
David and Jack (David Naughton and Griffin Dunne, respectively) who go
to London to bum around Europe, get laid, etc.  They are dropped off
after a bit of hitch-hiking around the moors, where they meet some
creepy brits, who mysteriously warn them to "beware the moon" and "stay
away from the moors."  They kind of laugh at this (once they're out of
there, of course), and soon find themselves off the main road, and near
the moors...and with a full moon out.  Soon enough, they are attacked by
a giant wolf, who slaughters Jack, and merely wounds David, before it is
shot by the villagers, and subsequently turns into a human.
David awakes from a coma, and has a series of nightmares, fantasies,
etc, including one where a decomposing Jack visits him, and tells him to
commit suicide since he's a werewolf...and once he dies, he can actually
go on to the next life.  But David has soon fallen in love with his
nurse (Jenny Agutter, from "Logan's Run"), and just thinks he is going
insane.  Then one night, he turns into a werewolf...
The chief positive note about "An American Werewolf in London" is the
humor...and the effects.  If you've ever seen a John Landis film
("Animal House," "The Blues Brother"), you know he has a cool sense of
humor.  Here, it's very dark, as he finds humor from almost anything. 
So we don't take this seriously, he places cool ironic oldies on the
soundtrack, including a couple different versions of "Blue Moon," and at
one instance, CCR's "Bad Moon Rising."  This makes us kind of grin at
the whole thing, even when David is a werewolf and chasing people around
London.
The effects are also quite amazing.  The legendary Rick Baker (who also
worked on "Men in Black") did the creature effects, including the
greatest mutation-into-a-wolf scene in celluloid history (how many of
those have you seen?).  It's disgusting, humorful, and just plain cool
all at the same time, and even look realistic.  I mean, this was made in
1981, and David Naughton's hand is shown actually growing.  And for you
Michael Jackson fans, there's a shot of hair growing behind ears that
was used in the "Thriller" video (also directed by Landis).
The acting's good, especially from Naughton, who's great and comical in
the title role, as well as very likable.  Griffin Dunne all but steals
the film, but what else would you expect from the man who created the
Kafka-stare (in "After Hours").  Jenny Agutter does a good job too, as
the nurse who takes David in to her house, and subsequently screws
around with him a bit.
But as I said, the film is still flawed.  The film is way too short,
seeming to be afraid to expand on any themes it presents.  At roughly 90
minutes, the film moves slowly for the first hour, then speeds up in the
final 30 minutes, which is when he first changes into the wolf.  There
isn't any real depth to the film, even with the romance between Agutter
and Naughton, even if they have fairly good chemistry.  And the ending
is almost anti-climactic and ends way too quickly.  Sure the second the
credits role, I laughed, but it ends on way too serious a note.
Still, "An American Werewolf in London" is an 80s classic (not a bad
thing, believe me), and still a very entertaining little flick.  The new
one looks way too over-produced and effects-y.  This one uses the
effects perfectly, without overcoming the story.  I personally believe
that minimalism would be the best thing to use with this film, and I'm
glad that Landis could make a good film, even if he hasn't made one now
in awhile.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
Director: Barry Levinson
Writers: David Mamet and Hilary Menken (based on the novel "American
Hero" by Larry Beinhert)
Starring: Robert DeNiro, Dustin Hoffman, Anne Heche, Denis Leary, Willie
Nelson, Kirsten Dunst, William H. Macy, Craig T. Nelson, Woody
Harrelson, David Koechner, Harland Williams, James Belushi, Jay Leno
Before I saw this film, I thought that films like this weren't even made
anymore.  You know: the comedy that causes you to laugh the whole time,
but contains another level to it that might even creep you out to think
about.  While we're laughing hysterically at it, we can't help have a
couple moments pause to think about how truthful this whole film is.  I
mean, thanks to Oliver Stone, we all know that the government lies to us
- but this film expounds on that idea to say that not only does the
government lie to us, but the media, whom we usually trust, helps them
out.
In this film, the President (of the United States) has eleven days until
election day, and it has just been discovered that he did some hanky
panky with a "Firefly Girl," opening up a huge scandal that could
obviously destroy him (in fact, the other Presidential candidate, played
by Craig T. Nelson, starts airing campaign commercials featuring that
Maurie Chevalier classic, "Thank Heaven for Little Girls").  So the
White House staff calls for Conrad Breen (Robert DeNiro) to help them
out.
Conrad is the best spin doctor in the business, and is capable of coming
up with wacky yet plausible lies to cover up almost any scandal.  But,
teamed with presidential aide Winifred Ames (Anne Heche), he goes to
Hollywood for help, as this one's a little hard to do.  He journeys to
the mansion of Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman, tanned
to the brim) to help him produce a war, which is to be against Albania
because those darn Albanians are apparently harboring a nuclear weapon
in Canada that is about to make its way to the states...or so Conrad
says.
With Stanley, the three begin to stage a war, since war is not really
about killing, but about marketing.  Civilian americans are never on the
battlefront, and rely on the media to alert them about it, so why not
use the medium against them, and to not only distract the new scandal
from the president, but also make him out to be a hero.  For a war, you
need a small motive, some news coverage, a song(s), catch phrases, and a
hero left behind.  And not only do these liars need to convince the
American people, but also the other branches of government.
The story, however, does sound a bit gimmicky.  It could be just a bunch
of lies about one thing, and the story goes absolutely nowhere.  But the
story is always moving, with lots of wacky problems thrown the way of
our "heroes."  The story is smart, and that's why we have an encounter
with some CIA men (led by William H. Macy), a huge twist in mid-story
which would defeat most spin doctors, and even a hilarious problem
towards the end, which actually ends up helping them out more.
The script is hysterical, no shock since it's co-written by David Mamet
(a god among playwrights).  He has always been a connosieur of writing
great dialogue, and here is no exception.  In fact, he writes more great
one-liners and zingers than you can shake a stick at.  Every line is
intelligently written, and sounds exactly like something the respective
character would say...something that is often taken advantage of in
modern films.  I hope he and Hilary Menken, the other co-writer get
nominated.  
And the acting is brilliant.  DeNiro, who can play virtually any role,
is amazing as the schming Conrad who is payed to lie through other
people's teeth.  He has so much energy in his performance, and he's
brilliant with others (this might actually be his best performance in
the, like, thousand films he's in that are being released around now). 
Hoffman pretty much steals the film though, and might get an Oscar
nomination out of this.  He also has a ton of energy, albeit of a
different kind, and when he goes off on rants of creativity, coming up
with slogans and various ideas, it's true magic (his catch phrase: "This
isn't a problem," which is used for any size of problem that befalls our
protagonists).  And Heche holds her own between the two deities, showing
she's a great actress, and has a knack for comedy (her scene with DeNiro
and Macy is hilarious).
In the supporting cast, Denis Leary is predicatbly hysterical as the Fad
King, a great liar/friend of Hoffman's, who shows up to come up with
lies for the story.  He and Hoffman have great chemistry in several
scenes.  Willie Nelson shows up as - you guessed it - a drunken hick
song writer, and is hilarious.  Child actor Kirsten Dunst ("Interview
with the Vampire") has a small role as an actress playing in the one
news clip they make of war in Albania, and is pretty funny, as is Macy,
who plays more of an intelligent man than the trailers hinted at (his
line "When the fit hits the sham, somebody's gonna have to stay after
school" hints at another wacko role from him).  And Woody Harrelson is
just ingenius as the "war hero" Sgt. William Schuman, who turns out to
be a little...off kilter.  And look for a cameo from Harland "Rocketman"
Williams.
Director Barry Levinson, who's not had a good film since "Bugsy," which
was years ago, causes things to move slowly at first, but to pick up
eventually into mad camp, all while remaining plausible.  Although there
are times when I would have preferred more wackiness (his use of
acoustic music at times is kind of distracting), but he has a knack for
comic direction, and even makes things seem a little bit
documentary-like with quick close-ups and what-not, giving this a feel
that it's what's really happening, not some war.  I was very scared that
the director of such "gems" like "Toys" and "Sleepers" (the former which
was pointless; the latter which bored me to tears), but then again, this
is the same director of such real gems as "Diner" and "Rainman."  Now I
respect him again.
But the real greatness of "Wag the Dog" is the overall feel.  I laughed
the whole way through the film, and in between the laughs, I thought
that if looked at another way, this could be serious as hell.  We laugh
at the absurdity of everything (not to mention some truly funny lines
that are funny no matter what), but the thing is this film is probably
not absurd in the slightest.  I have no doubt that the character of
Conrad Breens is based on a real spin doctor.  I'm completely sure that
somewhere in Hollywood is a Stanley Motss.  This film hits so close to
home that it kind of scared me, making me realize that a lot of what
I've heard about politics may be as fabricated as the lies these
characters make up.
After all, we only hear things through the news.  And the news only
hears things from other mediums.  Are the people who are controlling
what we see people we've never even heard of?  These are people who make
lies up but can never take credit for it or they will endanger the
morale of our country.  We never find out if everything this film says
is true (even a final joke may or may not be fabricated), and that's the
point.
Although there are some slight flaws in the film, "Wag the Dog" is one
of the funniest and most satirical films I've seen in decades.  Though
it does not have the extreme bite of Kubrick's "Dr. Strangelove" or the
lenghty discussion-making of Ashby's "Being There," it is still a film
that will go down in history as one of the most intelligent and
brilliant satires of all time.  Though that may not seem so now, it's
still one of the best of the year, as well as one of the funniest.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Last Temptation of Christ, The (1988)
Director: Martin Scorsese
Writer: Paul Schrader (based on the novel by Nikos Kazantzakis)
Starring: Willem Dafoe, Harvey Keitel, Barbara Hershey, Verna Bloom,
Harry Dean Stanton, David Bowie, Andre Gregory, Juliette Caton, Victor
Argo, Irvin Kershner, John Lurie, Barry Miller
What happened if Jesus Christ was given a choice in whether or not he
was crucified and died "for our sins?"  What if Jesus wasn't as perfect
as he is said to be, and was instead a human being, almost cursed with
the thought that he was the Messiah, the son of God?  Director Martin
Scorsese's epic motion picture, which retells the traditional story of
Jesus in a whole other manner ponders these questions, and does it in a
way that presents a kind of film that is extrememly rare: a
philospophical motion picture.
Based on the novel by Nikos Kazantzakis, the story tells the latter part
of Jesus's life (played by Willem Dafoe, who, well, looks like
Jesus...or the general perception of him), with most of the pretty
important parts (like the Sermon on the Mount, the whole fasting in the
desert with the temptations of Satan, the Last Supper, etc.) being told,
but in a way that shows that Jesus was a human being.  I've never read
the bible personally, but when you're forced to go to church for the
first 18 years of your life, you do hear a lot of stories from the
bible, and one of the big myths is that Jesus was a flawless man.  This
film breaks him down to be a man.
Of course, why wouldn't he be a regular man with a tremendous burden on
his shoulders?  Although being born to a virgin woman (played by Verna
Bloom, who was also Dean Wormer's wife in "Animal House"), he still grew
up a man.  It seems that him being perfect was just a myth in the bible,
a way that the different men who wrote it bent the truth a bit to touch
people (which is touched upon later in the film).  The way that Schrader
(who wrote the script), Scorsese (who directed the film), and Dafoe (who
played Jesus) present it is that he's a man who's almost cursed to die
for everyone's sins, and is saddled with the birthright of being this
perfect human being, when he confesses to a couple confidences that he
can't help but want to have sex with attractive women when he sees them,
just like the rest of us...well, sorta.
The film poses the question "What would happen if Jesus was able to live
like the average human being?"  Luckily, it doesn't arrive at this
question until the two-hour mark.  Before this time, the film shows his
life prior to the crucifixtion where he is told he's allowed to come off
the cross and be a regular schmo by a young female angel (Juliette
Caton).  Why is it lucky they did this?  Because the film would seem
gimicky if they had just jumped to it without backing itself up.
For the first two hours, the film tells his early story, from when he's
making crosses for the romans, to when he's being followed around by
Judas (Harvey Keitel) and eleven other apostles, to his inevitable
crucifixtion.  Not being of great knowledge as to his mid-life (the most
details I know about are his birth and death, since the Christmas and
Easter seasons are so close together on the church calendar), I don't
know how much is true, but this is a work of fiction, since everything
has a new twist to it.
For example, he is constantly confessing his fear of living the way he
does, and shows constant apprehension to die for everyone else, which
brings on the anger of Judas, who calls him a coward throughout the
film.  He also has to suffer the cruelties of others thinking of him as
a madman, as he does sound like one a lot of the time.  And, of course,
he suffers scrutiny for taking into his little clique the prostitute,
Mary Magdalene (Barbara Hershey, saddled with a near impossible role of
being the woman who is the object of Jesus's affection), since he's
supposed to be this big sign of purity.
The final forty-five minutes of the film chronicle his life after being
let down of the cross, where he marries another woman named Mary
(hinting at an oedipal complex with his mother, also named Mary...or
maybe not...), and settles down to a simple and happy life, with lots of
children.  There is a powerful ironic ending which thankfully stays in
tact with the rest of the film.  Also, instead of being just a cheap
ironic twist, it spurns out a deeper philosophical idea, which makes
this a brilliant work of biblical satire.
The way the film is constructed is interesting, as it seems to bring out
a fascination Scorsese has with his best works: concentrating on a
person or persons who are trapped by a lifestyle or something deeper. 
In "Goodfellas" and "Casino," the mafiosos were trapped by the lifestyle
they had chosen; and in "Raging Bull," Jake LaMotta was trapped in the
world of boxing, the boxing ring being a metaphor for his life.  Jesus
is similarly trapped, but by the fact that God chose him to be his son. 
It's a tragedy of a movie, as Jesus discovers that his place was never
to be a man like everyone else, but to be the ultimate martyr - to stop
death, and save everyone's soul.
The direction is very bizarre, and creates a film that is extremely
surreal.  The opening is dizzying, probably to get the sense of the
confusion Jesus is suffering at the particular point in his life.  And
there's lots of scenes of nudity, blood, and assorted gore, including a
freaky deaky scene where Jesus approaches his desciples after fasting in
the desert, and he pulls out his heart and holds it in front of them. 
The surrealism helps the film, though, and also creates a hypnotic feel
to it, which holds the audience's attention the full way through.
Unfortunately, as brilliant and philosophical as it is, the film is one
of the most controversial pieces of art of all time.  Like Monty
Python's "Life of Brian" (which was a comedy that dealt with a man
mistaken for Christ, but not once picking on Christ himself), the film
spurned a lot of picketing, featuring people who had mostly not even
seen the movie.  It's a shame that people are so narrow-minded and don't
take a chance of expanding their thinking to something higher and more
profound.  Sure, there's a scene where Jesus does have sex with Mary
Magdalene.  But it's not pornographic, and never flashy - it's just
poignant.  People need to realize that just because a piece of art
expounds on the "holy scriptures," it doesn't necessarily mean it's
"blasphemy."  The passages in the bible were meant to be thought about
in such a manner.  At least that's my opinion; I could be wrong.
The acting is not amazing, but does feature a wonderful performance from
Willem Dafoe, who creates a sympathetic and pithy Jesus.  This man is no
Brian Deacon - he shows Jesus in a completely different way, and he
pulls it off amazingly.  Harvey Keitel is a great Judas (sorry, folks,
there is no hanging scene), and there are two great cameos from
character actor Harry Dean Stanton as Saul/Paul (see the movie to
understand this), and David Bowie as none other than Pontious Pilate (he
rocks in his one scene).
Scorsese received a well-deserved Oscar nomination for his directing,
which is luckily never heavy-handed or preachy.  Every scene is a
mini-masterpiece (save a corny scene where Jesus raises Lazarus from the
dead), as he paints each scene with the appropriate feel.  He shows he
is once again one of the best directors, if not the best, working today.
"The Last Temptation of Christ" is one of those hard-to-find films which
is overly-bashed for moronic reasons.  I'm not even a Christian
(agnostic, if you must know), but I found the film to be a poignant, and
brilliant way to look at the gospels of Jesus.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Foreign Correspondent (1940)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: Charles Bennett and Joan Harrison
Starring: Joel McCrea, Loraine Day, Herbert Marshall, George Sanders,
Albert Basserman, Edmund Gwenn, Edward Cianelli, Charles Halton, Ian
Wolfe, Harry Davenport, Robert Benchley
Propaganda in film is always best when it's extremely subtle, as it was
in John Ford's "Young Mr. Lincoln," which was propaganda against FDR at
the time.  But this film proves that blatant propaganda in film can
work, if it doesn't harm the story or anything else, but works as just
one of the many things that the film goes for.  Not many filmmakers can
these elements together.  But that's why Hitchcock's a god and you're
not (hee hee).
"Foreign Correspondent" pulls an interesting albeit not very huge twist
on one theme that's pertienent in almost all of his film: an innocent
man wrongly accused.  Our protagonist is an off-the-wall journalist for
an American paper - Johnny Jones (Joel McCrea) - who get himself
involved in all sorts of espionnage, danger, and various other cool
stuff in his pursuit to discover the truth about everything.  Instead of
running from trouble all the time and trying to get to the authorities
like protagonists in most Hitchcock films, he's almost looking for it.
Johnny is sent over to England to be the foreign correspondent for his
paper when the correspondents over there aren't gathering much
information.  He's a wild boy, and does anything for a story, and that's
why he's sent over there by his boss, Mr. Powers (Harry Davenport), who
changes his name for the "better" to the more formal and dashing Huntley
Haverstock.  Over there, war is brewing, and he begins to get info for
his paper, and does so in the most direct way possible: by actually
confronting some of the major politicians over there.
After the witnessing the public assasination of an italian diplomat, Mr.
Van Meer (Albert Basserman), up close and personal, he chases them to a
prairie populated by windmills.  Various twists in the storyline pop up,
most notably the discovery that Van Meer was not actually killed, but
was a double so some devious men can hold him hostage.  Twist upon twist
pops up, leading up to a startling discovery half way through the film,
and then finding a way to save Van Meer and alert the media about it.
There is, of course, a romantic subplot (what Hitchcock film would do
well without one?), involving Johnny/Huntley and Carol Fisher (Loraine
Day), daughter of a famous politician, Stephen Fisher (Herbert
Marshall).  But this relationship is not a boring one (what Hitchcock
romantic subplot is uninteresting?), carrying several twists and turns
in itself, of which I will not divulge because they're just too much
fun.
One of the greatest things about this film is how everything is balanced
well.  The plot, the intrigue, the propaganda, the romantic subplot, and
the humor are all at the correct levels they should be to bring out the
maximum effect.  The story is constantly moving, and the twists are
plausible and shocking.  The propaganda is blatant without becoming too
discreet or too blatant.  The romance is believable, funny, and always
interesting, and never harms the story, but actually adds some depth to
it.
And the humor is great.  Like "The Thirty-Nine Steps," this film has an
amazing screenplay, filled with great lines, banter, and zingers here
and there.  A friend of Carol's as well as a journalist much like Johnny
is Scott ffolliott, who explains that the reason the first letter of his
last name is lower-case is because "one of my ancestors has his head
chopped off by Henry VIII, and his wife dropped the captiol in the
letter to commemorate the occasion."  There are scenes that are
humurous, clever, and plausible at the same time, such as a scene where
Johnny isn't allowed to transmit information to America, but does so in
a very sneaky and hilarious way.  I love Hitchcock the best when he adds
comedy to his intrigue, and this is a prime example of how brilliant he
is with this.
Hitchcock is also well-known for his amazing set pieces which stand out
in the brain long after the film is over.  There are several here, my
favorite being the assasination of the fake Van Meer scene, which takes
place in the rain, and has the assasin sneak away through a crowd of
people who are all holding up black umbrellas.  It's an amazing
sequence, stunning to look at, and clever as hell.  There are also the
scenes with the windmills, a hysterically clever escape attempt by
Johnny where he not only escapes but is able to create enough
pandemonium to get his clothes under the nose of his perpatrators, and a
scary-as-hell plane crash over the Atlantic which looks surprisingly
realistic for the time period.
Also notable is how well his characters are defined and the wonderful
actors who portray them.  Joel McCrea creates a down-to-earth Johnny,
who jokes around all the time, but is still obsessed with getting his
story.  Loraine Day adds intelligence to what could have been just
another woman role, even tricking Johnny a couple of times, and playing
hard to get for awhile.  Herbert Marshall adds human qualities to his
role, who may be just a tad shady.  Edmund Gwenn, who would go on to
play Santa Claus in the original "Miracle on 34th Street," is hilarious
as a would-be-assasin.
But the acting prize, for me, goes to George Sanders as Scott ffolliott,
who is an amazing scene stealer (and was one in Hitch's other film made
in '40, "Rebecca"), and plays his role with the right amount of
suaveness and humor.  If his cool voice sounds familiar, that's because
he was also the voice of Sherr Khan the lion in the animated version of
"The Jungle Book."  Anyway, his performance is just one of the many
great things about this movie.
"Foregin Correspondent" is actually one of Hitchcock's underrated films,
but even today, it is one of his most satisfying, hilarious, and
intelligent films.  Many thrillers strive to be too many things and can
never level anything out exactly, but this film shows that it all can be
done: humor, intelligence, propaganda, and plot twists are all balanced
wonderfully.  I know it sounds almost redundant to say that this is one
of his best films (aren't most of them?), but this one truly is one of
his very best and satisfying films.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
Director: John Frankenheimer
Writers: J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz (story by Zeik)
Starring: Robert DeNiro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone, Stellan Skarsgĺrd,
Jonathan Pryce, Skipp Suddeth, Sean Bean, Michel Lonsdale, Katarina Witt
"Ronin" is the latest spy/secret agent film, and it's nicely original that
it deals with secret agents who have no national affiliate(s).  The title
"Ronin" refers to a Japanese term referring to Samurai who have lost their
leader, and are therefore supposed to roam the world trying to avenge their
leader's death.  Not one character in this film aren't Japanese, but are in
fact an international group of secret agents who have lost all connection
to their countries and are now ready to sell themselves to the highest
bidder.
There are five Ronin members in this film: Sam (Robert DeNiro), the
leader-type and an ex-CIA opperative; Vincent (Jean Reno), a Frenchman;
Gregor (Stellan Skarsgĺrd), a Russian computer-expert; Larry (Skipp
Suddeth), an expert car-driver; and Spence (Sean Bean), an unexperienced
British arms-man.  As the film begins, they are all working on a job for a
mysterious man whom they don't meet at first (Jonathan Pryce), but who is
represented by an Irish tough-as-nails opperative, Dierdre (Natascha
McElhone).
The running gag, of course, is that they don't know eachother and have no
ties to anyone but themselves.  Each character is cloaked in mystery, even
from the viewer, and since nothing short of short sentences are said about
their past (When asked why she became a secret agent, Dierdre says she was
"tricked by a man."  Weirdly enough, the same goes for Sam), all you can
tell about each character is from the way they talk and act in the
beginning of the film, in a long and drawn-out sequence that acts like it's
going to be an introduction to their activities and instead ends up being
an introduction to their personalities.
Their job, as charged by Dierdre, is to steal a much-coveted metal suitcase
from a French billionaire of sorts who has it in his possession, but is
desired by several countries, namely Ireland and Russia.  Like the suitcase
in "Pulp Fiction," it's contents are never revealed, but as the film
proceeds, it's passed from person to person, and from country to country,
all the while being pursued by the Ronin members, or what's left of them as
the film proceeds.
It's a lot like many other espionnage thrillers, what with it's
overly-complex story, cliched use of betrayals, and its insistence to
follow up several of the twists with car chases.  On the other hand, the
story is exciting and always in motion; not too many dull or wasted moments
here.  The betrayals are nicely done, as the characters are always
interesting yet mysterious so that you at least have someone to really like
or really hate when they come to pass. And the car chases, namely two of
them, are so amazingly exciting that even if you feel that they're
unnecessary (and at least one of them is), you can't help but get caught up
in them.
The film was directed by old school director John Frankenheimer, a man
who's had a sad up-and-down career, with ups such as "The Manchurian
Candidate" and "Seven Days in May," and downs such as, well, 1996's "The
Island of Dr. Moreau."  Here, he directs with visual flair.  Every scene is
tensely directed, and difficult not to watch.  He allows his actors to
really show their talents in small bits of human comedy.  And most notably,
his direction of the two chief car chases are so well-done that they
almost, almost rank up there with the likes of the ones in "Bullit" and
"The French Connection."  They are taut, exciting, and brilliantly edited,
especially with several shots taken from the point of view of the cars,
which are usually going about 80 miles per hour and either on packed
highways or car-less European streets.  When watching them, I had one thing
to say: "Wow!"
The actors are all in top form, especially Robert DeNiro, who doesn't just
play the silent-but-tough character; his Sam is a witty, human character,
and DeNiro hits every single right note in his performance.  Other great
performances come from Reno, who's becoming more and more comfortable with
the camera with every performance; McElhone, who's tough and cold, almost
lovably so; Skarsgĺrd, who's dryness is almost unerrving; and Pryce, who
sinks his teeth into a role that you just can't believe is this
over-the-top.
One other major reason this works so well is a script that is excellent,
and with a good reason: it was co-written by none other than David Mamet,
who appears under the psuedonym of Richard Weisz.  The dialogue is key
Mamet: it has rhythm, it's witty, and it exhibits each of the character's
idiosyncrasies deftly.  The scenes are surprisingly uncorny, especially a
couple of the shake-down scenes (a scene between one character and
Skarsgĺrd in a car is just amazing).  Just goes to prove that a script by
Mamet can really benefit any film.
But it's really the little moments that push the envolope for "Ronin" and
make it much better than your average secret agent thriller.  Some scenes
that are played for either plot or moodiness really have some nice payoffs,
in particular one where DeNiro and McElhone try to spy on the French
billionaire with the suitcase.  And who can deny that the
soon-to-be-infamous surgery scene wasn't the most disgusting and
painful-but-in-a-good-way scene to watch since the toilet scene in
"Trainspotting?"  Little moments are often the things that really make a
film enjoyable - could "Good Will Hunting" have been a really good movie if
it hadn't had the "Do you like apples?" moment? - and when this film takes
off, it's not because of the mechanics of the plot, but those moments that
just thrill us in one way or another.
"Ronin" could be called a bit of a mess, though, and it can be called
confusing.  The plot is very mechanical, and it jumps around so much that
it may be a little disorienting to try and shuffle things out and come to a
conclusion.  But "Ronin" is not about plot.  It's about the experience and
thrill of espionnage.  When what's left with the Ronin group keeps trying
to get back the suitcase long after any reason would be justifiable, the
only thing that keeps them going, really, is not honor or pride, but just a
mad desire to do the job they love.  That's what keeps the audience going
when the plot has become so complex that it's tough to understand
everything that has happened: they're just having such a good time.
Frankenheimer has really made a soon-to-be classic with "Ronin."  It's
exciting, intelligent, fun, as if it were a non-serious adaptation of a Tom
Clancy novel, although with some Irish and Russian politics thrown in for
good reason.  What can you say about a film that features performances from
not one, not two, but three Bond villains (them being Michael Lonsdale,
Sean Bean, and Jonathan Pryce) other than "wow."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
Director: Paul Verhoeven
Writer: Edward Neumeier (based on the novel by Robert A. Heinlein)
Starring: Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Neil Patrick
Harris, Patrick Muldoon, Jake Busey, Michael Ironside, Clancy Brown,
Seth Gilliam, Marshall Bell, Rue McClanahan
Sure, "Starship Troopers" is no "Star Wars," but it has enough fun-ass
gore, cool futuristic satire, and hysterically bad 90210-esque melodrama
to keep me interested and satisfied for the full time.  I mean, sure
it's jam-packed with stupidity, gratuitous nudity, and zero
characterization, but it's a sci-fi gorefest, and a fun one at that.
As the trailers have been saying for almost a year, "Starship Troopers"
deals with a bunch of futuristic marines who go across the universe to
battle a bunch of evil, deadly, giant bugs on their rocky home planet,
armed with little but a couple detonators, and machine guns, as well as
a couple nukes, just in case.  And yes, there's some attempts at
creating memorable characters, most who are slaughtered mercilessly by
the razor-sharp legged bugs, and yeah, that fails pitifully, but the
whole bit with the bugs, which takes up most of the last half of the
film, is what we came to see, and the film knows it.
The film brings us a bunch of pretty Spelling-ites...and Neil Patrick
Harris (who's the biggest name in the no-name cast), who interact with
one another during the film.  The protagonist is Johnny Rico (Casper Van
Dien), who is dating the hot Carmen (Denise Richards), who is crazy over
him, but soon falls for the hunky Zander (Patrick Muldoon, from "Melrose
Place"), who are both going to be pilots in the army.  Of course, she
still loves Johnny, but she can never see him, even if he joins the army
to be sorta near her.  Soon Johnny finds that the chick from high school
who had a crush on him, Diz (Dina Meyer), looks more attractive than she
used to.
This all takes place in the far future, a fascist world of pure high
tech-ness, where we hear about televised executions, public beatings,
and about obtaining citizenship.  The film presents some of it in the
fashion of a Riefenstahl-esque bit of propoganda that goes on throughout
the film, showing people working hard, and glorifying the deadly
marines, even when they're being torn limb by limb by the bugs.  This
satire is one of the saving graces of the film.
For the first hour, we get the aforementioned melodrama, as well as the
whole spiel of boot camp, where the drill sergeant (Clancy Brown, who
obviosuly took notes from R. Lee Ermey about how to act like one) trains
them in horribly nasty training, sometimes even wounding them (he breaks
a guy's arm, and throws a dagger into another's hand).  These aren't
great, but they're cool to watch.
The big part which we were all waiting for comes at about the halfway
part, and is hardly disappointing.  The first time we see the bugs is
cool, and we are predictably slaughtered mercilessly by them, as it
takes about 5 guys shooting them for about a minute to take just one
down.  And yes, we use machine guns on them instead of just nuking the
shit out of them, although we do that once, only killing the ones on the
surface, since they live underground.
Oh, and I suppose you're all wondering where Mr. Doogie Howser M.D.
himself is included here?  Well, Neil plays none other than a psychic
scientist/classmate of Johnny, Carmen, and Diz, who basically becomes a
big power in the army.  Yeah, I know, it's stupid, but it's so weird
that it's campy.  Oh, and look for ex-"Golden Girl" Rue McClanahan as a
biology teacher.
There's not a lot of humanity in the characters, and even scenes where a
well-known character is killed isn't as moving as it should be.  Sure
when one of the four leads was killed, I was moved, but most people are
just sent to war just to get killed, which kind of works as satire in a
way, I suppose.
The real star of the film is the special effects, which are brilliant,
man.  Of course, this is from Paul Verhoeven, who is a genius with
special effects that look realistic ("Total Recall" won an Oscar for
them), and the ones in this look absolutely realistic.  The bugs
interact perfectly with the actors on the screen, creating a sense of
realism.  They become scarier just because they look so realistic, and
when they attack a human, it looks just as realistic.  My personal
favorite use of this is when the giant base is surrounded by a literal
sea of bugs.
The charm of "Starship Troopers" is that it's just plain fun and it
knows it.  Director Paul Verhoeven is just trying to bring an
entertaining piece of brain candy to the big screen, complete with
hundreds of little guilty pleasures.  I mean, the shower sequence where
we men and women bathing together is one of the funniest things I've
ever seen.  And the huge amount of gore (people being chomped in half,
appendages laying around everywhere, etc, etc, etc) is just awesome. 
And how he pays homages to everything from Riefenstahl's "Triumph of the
Will" to his earlier "Total Recall" is awesome (Verhoeven staple Michael
Ironside plays a one-armed general or sergeant or something, and he lost
both his arms in "Total Recall").
There's a kind of campy fun to watching all these Spelling-ites sent to
a far and away place to be slaughtered that satisfies something in
ourselves.  And even while "Starship Troopers" might be about as dumb as
Forrest Gump himself, or not even follow the novel very well (I never
read it anyway), it's still a bitching time at the movies.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Director: Roland Emmerich
Writers: Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin (story by Emmerich, Devlin, Ted
Elliott, and Terry Rossio)
Starring: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria, Kevin
Dunn, Harry Shearer, Michael Lerner, Lorry Goldman, Vicki Lewis, Doug
Savant, Arabella Field
All "Godzilla" needs to really be is 2 hours of big, loud, entertainment
that somehow taps in to the part of our psyche that loves to be frigthened
by cataclysmic scares, and soothed by massive destruction (preferably of
Manhattan).  I won't say this for many films, but when I heard they were
making this flick, all I wanted was a couple semi-interesting characters
there for some human and comic relief, and a whole lot of destruction. 
Godzilla, you have all of Manhattan island to play with: go wreck some shit
up.
We get a little bit of this towards the end, when, in the last, oh, 30
minutes, the film takes off into a visceral, intense, and downright
thrilling experience, thanks to a twist in the story where the four main
protagonists find what has to be about a hundred Godzilla eggs in Madison
Square Garden, all within seconds of hatching.  From this point on, the
film takes off into, yes, a rip-off of "Jurassic Park," but still an
edge-of-your-seat rollar coaster ride of gradual tension, not meaning that
the tension increases, but that the quality of the tension increases.  By
the time the four protaonists have hopped into a cab and are driving as
fast as they can from a pursuing Godzilla, I was actually pretty into the
film.
What "Godzilla" needs is more of this, and less of other things, like most
of what occurs in the first hour and forty minutes or so of the film, which
is redundant, moronic crap on a stick.  Do we need a half-assed romantic
subplot?  Do we need all the cheap attacks on Godzilla if they're not
riveting?  Here's a film with about 160 million or so dollars, with a great
locale, and they do almost nothing with it.  "Godzilla" is a creature
feature: it needs to act like one.
Director Roland Emmerich and Producer Dean Devlin, the guys behind the
shitty "Stargate" and the
fun-ONLY-if-you're-in-a-packed-theater-of-participating-members
"Independence Day," have written and crafted the film, but the real
brilliance behind the film is in the advertising.  For a year, anyone who's
seen a movie in a theater has been munundated with countless teaser
trailers for this flick, which featured only scattered, brief shots of the
beast, and ensured that when the film actually arrived, it would be big, no
matter what the story is.  You ask someone if they're going to see
"Godzilla," and they say, "yeah," but if you ask them why, they can't
answer that.  Hell, I paid to see this and I don't know why I bothered.
This would be all cool if the film delivered.  James Cameron teased
audiences similarly in 1990 to 1991 for his sequel to "The Terminator," but
at least he delivered a film which is one of the most amazing cinematic
experiences of the decade...and he was able to squeeze in tons of
breathtaking, intense action while still creating characters we care about,
and even lots of depth on humanity.  "Godzilla," for all its hype and
grandness, is suprisingly bland and dull.
That goes for Godzilla himself, as well.  Emmerich and Devlin sure have a
knack for stealing ideas for their big delivieries, making them come off as
nothing short of anticlimactic.  In "Stargate," the military guys travel
through a warp through billions of light years to arrive in...an Egyptian
desert...populated by humans.  In "Independence Day," the aliens travel
light years to conquer Earth, and when we see them, they're...octopus men. 
When we see finally see Godzilla after all the quick tease shots of him,
building up the first real look at him, he's...Tyranosaurus Rex.  Sure, the
old Godzilla was a man in a plastic costume, and this is a multi-million
dollar special effect that looks real, but it has lost all its wit in the
process.  Gone is the face that shoots up, and the perfectly erect back,
and the firebreathing done without so much as leaning over, and here is the
T-Rex, straight from "Jurassic Park," complete with the same biting
technique.  Of course he's terrifying, but he's not Godzilla.
Even his offspring suffer the same fate: they're a bunch of raptors, and
all their movements are stolen completely from "Jurassic Park."  The big
differences: there's more of them, and they have scales on their backs,
just like their parent.  Even the scene where we see all the eggs is stolen
from the ending of "Aliens."  Luckily enough, they're still frightening to
look at, and their scenes are done well enough that we forget that their
carbon copies, if only for a brief couple seconds here and there when the
action and tension has subsisted for a bit.
Oh, yes, and there's a plot, or at least an attempt at one that is in place
of the first 100 minutes or so.  Godzilla is the result of nuclear testing
around French Polynesia, where we see a couple lizards looking one at the
blasts (so where are the others?  guess there's gonna be a couple sequels),
and when he begins to destroy some ships and whatnot off the coast, they
bring in nuclear scientist, Dr. Nick Tantopopolous (Matthew Broderick, who
needed the attention, I guess), who was busy studying worm mutations up in
Chernobyl (they call him "the worm guy").  He concludes that he's a victim
of nuclear testing just as Godzilla swims on over to the Big Apple (why the
Big Apple?  because it...uh...it has lots of stuff he can destroy, I
guess...or because Emmerich and Devlin don't know where else to stage
destruction anymore).
Also in the story is Nick's ex-college sweetie, Audrey Timmonds (Maria
Pitillo, who brings out the worst of sitcom style acting), who works for a
pompous news anchor (are there any other kind?), Charles Caiman (Harry
Shearer, the voice of Mr. Burns and others on "The Simpsons"), and is
trying to break into anchordom, regardless of the fact that she is terrible
at it.  And there's her friend's husband, Victor "Animal" Polotti (Hank
Azaria, voice of Apu, Chief Wiggum, and several others on "The Simpsons"),
a wild cameraman who is just trying to get the best footage of the
beast...at any cost.  Soon, they're working along with Nick, trying to help
him stop the beast and his eggs.
Since the military and local government are exercising their stupidity in
handling the situation, in comes some French Secret Servicemen, led by a
man named Philippe (Jean Reno, known to American audiences as the
helicopter pilot in "Mission: Impossible"), who are trying to destroy the
eggs as well as the beast so that their government doesn't suffer because
of their nuclear testing.  They are actually kinda nicely presented, shown
in brief shots doing things we don't understand until later on in the film,
although the film really shows how culturally ignorant it is in terms of
their presentation and running gags: all the french guy, with the exception
of Reno, are named Jean-something, and all they talk about is the lack of
croissants and how bad the "French Roast" coffee is.  Yes, all french
people are like that, I forgot.
After awhile, the film slips into a cycle: the military tries to stop
Godzilla in the dumbest ways possible (my favorite was the submarines in
the East River), Godzilla runs and ends up destroying them, and the
military freaks out while Nick tries to tell them what's going on and is
subsequently ignored.  Only when it changes its pace a bit in the last half
hour does it really take off, and one almost forgets how deadly dull the
first hour and forty minutes were.
It also doesn't help that this film has an IQ of about 4 1/2.  The script
is one of the worst of all big budget flicks, filled with terrible
dialogue, and some really awful plotting.  The mystery of what those French
guys is intriguing for a bit, but soon becomes annoying, and when revealed
what their mission really is, it becomes anti-climactic.  The film takes
itself so deadly seriously (a big mistake - it's a Godzilla flick!) that
when any jokes pop up, they're distracting (the worst, most unfunny running
gag is the fact that the Mayor looks like Roger Ebert, and is named Mayor
Ebert, and his chief aide is named Gene, and looks like Gene Siskel -
obviously a totally unsubtle attempt at revenge by the creators of the
film, who's past films were panned by them).  Also not working at all is
its attempt at being "King Kong" and humanizing Godzilla from time to time,
then copping itself out and making his killers into heroes.  And then
there's the romantic subplot of "Will Nick and Audrey
*ohmygodohmygodohmygod* get back together?!?!"  I say if you're not going
to make a romantic subplot, the thing that every film seems to need by the
Law of Big Budget Movies, I dunno, interesting, then you might as well
trash it.  Then we wouldn't be burdened by the acting by Maria Pitillo
(ugh).
Also sadly, no actors really take off.  Matthew Broderick tries to say
Emmerich and Devlin's awful dialogue with a straight face, but can't help
it that his character is less than paper thin.  Even comic geniuses like
Hank Azaria and Harry Shearer aren't given good roles...in fact, Hank's
character's chief personality trait is his Brooklyn accent.  The only who
actually does do a great job is Jean Reno, who, sure, plays his role
compeltely straight, but actually makes everything he does believable, and
also a blast.  Jean actually gives a better performance than the lizard
himself.  Still, all the characters are pretty dull, and the result is an
empty experience, filled with little of anything.  The only reason we care
about the people inside the cab in the end is because 3/4 of them are
Matthew Broderick, Hank Azaria, and Jean Reno.  At least in "Independence
Day" they bothered to bring us interesting characters; here, they just want
to show off Godzilla, in all his anticlimactic glory.
The last half hour makes up partially for a lot of the crap that goes on
for most of the film, even if that partiality is minute.  The final action
sequence IS a great action sequence: riveting, intense, wild, proposterous,
exhilerating.  If the film had more of these, it would be great.  I won't
say this for many films, but "Godzilla" needs more carnage and intenisty,
and less of anything else it has.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Spice World (1997)
Director: Bob Spiers
Writer: Kim Fuller
Starring: Melanie Brown, Victoria Addams, Melanie Chisholm, Emma Bunton,
Geri Haliwell, Richard E. Grant, Claire Rushbrook, Naoko Mori, Roger Moore,
Alan Cumming, George Wendt, Mark McKinney, Richard O'Brien, Meat Loaf,
Barry Humphries, Richard Briers, Elvis Costello, Stephen Fry, Bob Geldof,
Hugh Laurie, Bob Hoskins, Elton John, Jennifer Saunders, Kevin Allen
I hate the Spice Girls.  I hate how their music is so catchy that it sticks
in your head for days after hearing it.  I hate how they promote "Girl
Power," yet they dress scantily and pose nude for horny pubescent teenage
boys.  And I hate how they're all over the place, even though they have no
real talent.  Why I saw this movie is a really, really, really long story,
but I did, and one would think I'd despise every minute of it.  But...
Okay, I'm really ashamed of it, but I enjoyed it.  I mean, I admit it's a
really awful movie, a wannabe "Hard Day's Night" (no pun intended), filled
with excuses for them to act wacky as hell, and to provide the locale for
the ninth floor of hell desginated for every single person willing to do a
cheap ass cameo in a cheap ass movie.  The plot is such a mess that it's
terrible.  But I loved it.  Why?  Well...
For those of you who still don't know, the Spice Girls are a quintet of
british bimbos who were recruited to be the next "big thing" in the pop
scene world, and therefore sing really iritating songs that are
nevertheless catchy (after I first heard "Wannabe," I tried to get a
labotomy to remove the section of my brain that remembers every painful
note).  About a year after conquering America, releasing the number one
album of last year, they have a movie in an effort to make them the
faux-Beatles.
But their first movie is hardly "A Hard Day's Night," even if it lifts a
lot from it and drops it into their movie.  Here's a basic sketch of the
plot and see if it sounds familiar: the girls o' spice have a big concert
at Albert Hall, and the film chronicles a wacky week in their life prior to
this gig, including press conferences filled with boring people, boisterous
escapes from their schedule, a big cliff-hanger over whether they'll make
their concert or not, and bitching from their nervous manager Clifford
(Richard E. Grant).  Now, the plot of "A Hard Day's Night:" the Beatles
have a big concert and the film chronicles a wacky couple days in their
life prior to this gig, including press conferences filled with boring
people, boisterous escapes from their schedule, a big cliff-hanger over
whether they'll make their concert or not, and a lot of bitching from a
nervous TV manager, played by Victor Spinetti.
Of course, "Spice World" also lifts a lot from the second, wackier (and
funnier) film, "Help!," which was so weirdly comical, and so incoherent
that it was almost more enjoyable but hardly artier.  "Spice World" lifts a
lot from this one, including some wacky sub plots (one includes a sneaky
photographer played by Riff Raff himself, Richard O'Brien, trying to dig up
anything bad about them for a newspaper who wants to print bad news about
them), a surreal living style (how big is the inside of their bus?), and
some really weirdly funny sequences that may go way over the head of its
target audience (how many Spice Girls fans will understand the dream
sequence starring Hugh Laurie as a faux-Poirot?).
But what the film forgets is that "A Hard Day's Night" was deceptively
brilliant, and wonderfully organized, while "Help!" found the Beatles after
this more artier film and gave them the liscence to just go completely
wacky (Paul McCartney confessed that the plot of the film was determined by
which foreign places they wanted to visit).  "Spice World" tries to combine
these two elements, and comes out snake eyes with both of them.
This doesn't mean that this film is a disaster.  I, who hate the Spice
Girls, do confess that their best quality is their energy, and second is
their sense of humor.  They may suck musically and all, but at least they
don't take themselves seriously, and do what it is they do with a lot of
energy placed into it.  Songs like "Wannabe" and "Spice Up Your Life" are
awful tunes, but when seeing them performed they seem better due to what
the girls put into the act.  In this film, they do the same thing.
The film is really just a series of comic skits, some which are pretty bad,
and a lot which are pretty hilarious and admittingly joyful.  I couldn't
get into a bit where they escaped on a boat, or another one where they were
getting dance lessons from a hard-assed fruity army man (nice idea,
though), but bits like a movie idea proposed by the hilarious ex-"Kid in
the Hall" man Mark McKinney (currently rotting on "SNL") about a film
called "Spice Force Five" left me in stitches.  And the finale where they
try to make it to their concert is hilarious, only because as they're doing
this it is being narrated by McKinney to a suicidial Clifford.
Also, I found myself liking each of the Spice Girls.  I might hate their
act, but I couldn't help kinda loving all of them.  They're very likable
people, and each of them is presented with a distinct personality.  They
command the film nicely, making up for any really big problems with the
film itself.  And, my god, the cameos in this film!  This is fun just to
spot all the celebrity turn-ups, including Meat Loaf as a bus driver,
Shakespearean actor Richard Briers as a bishop, british comic actor Stephen
Fry as a condemning lawyer (getting the film's funniest line), Elvis
Costello as a bartender, and Roger Moore as "The Chief," the omniscent man
upstairs who strokes a pig, and spouts out numerous aphorisms to comic
effect (I think I'm the only critic who liked him).  And I can't be the
only one who just didn't recognize Bob Geldof at first, can I?  Or the one
who didn't automatically realize that the fat head of the villainous
newspaper (Barry Humphries) is really Dane Edna sans dress?
When I left "Spice World" it was the exact opposite of what happened when I
went in - which was "I cannot fucking believe I paid $7.50 to see 'Spice
World!'"  I came out with a big grin on my face, as I had seen a tacky yet
hysterical little flick that had won me over soon into its 93 minute
run-time.  Though I'm really not sure I'd ever see it again (at least for
any amount of cash - I mean, for $7.50 I coulda seen it thrice at a
suburbanite theater), it held my attention span for its full lenght, and
entertained me.  I know I'll be figuritively crucified for giving this film
a positive review, but it did manage to entertain me and by the finale, I
did like the Spice Girls a lot more than I did when I went in.  And that's
probably all those girls really really wanted (sorry for the bad joke).
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Excalibur (1981)
Director: John Boorman
Writer
Starring: Nigel Terry, Nicol Williamson, Helen Mirren, Cheri Lungi,
Patrick Stewart, Liam Neeson, Gabriel Byrne
In most films, the Knights of the Round Table are mainly seen as always
getting along, always trying to do right, and then having tragedy strike
in an almost obvious sense.  It's almost corny.  But with John Boorman's
("Deliverance") adaptation, the tales take a kind of multi-layered,
almost deep, if not sometimes too surreal, stance on the classic, which
was made around the time when making graphic movies was still considered
"inovative."
We all know about King Arthur (Nigel Terry) and the Knights.  We know
all about Merlin (Nicol Williamson) and his bizarre wizardry.  We also
know about how the best knight, Sir Lancelot, fell in love with the
Queen, Guinevere (Cheri Lungi), bringing down the whole establishment
known as Camelot.  And, mostly thanks to Monty Python, we all know about
the quest for the Holy Grail.  This film also covers the early days of
Arhur, including his father, Uther Pendragon (Gabriel Byrne), but it
covers it with a kind of original atmosphere, which isn't as fun as the
other films, but in many ways, more rewarding.
The film goes in chronological order, starting with his father's lust
for his enemy's wife, who thinks is sexy (questionable).  With the help
of Merlin, in a twisted Rumpelstilskin type pact, the result of their
one night is their child, who turns out to be Arthur.  Of course, then
there's the eponomysly named sword, which Merlin gets from the Lady of
the Lake in the beginning, and which, before Uther's brutal death, he
drives into the stone (much like that Disney flick).
The film then zips up to Arthur's adolescence, where, at a jousting
competition where he's his brother's squire (or so he thinks...), he
accidentally removes the sword from the stone, meets Merlin, and
eventually gains not only an army of Knights (soon to be of the Round
Table), but the love of Guinevere, daughter of one of his Knights
(played by a very pre-Picard Patrick Stewart).
But something something rots in the state of Camelot once Arthur
befriends Sir Lancelot, a french knight (with no accent), who just rocks
at everything, and soon takes quite a liking to Guinivere, who soon
begins to return the favor.  Meanwhile, Arthur's half-sister, the
magician Morganna (Helen Mirren, with blond hair), comes out of nowhere,
and begins touching Merlin's other side which he turns from the rest of
the world.
Soon, everything's topsy-turvy, Guinivere is sleeping with Lancelot,
Merlin has disappeared, and Morganna tricks Arthur into this disgusting
incestual sex scene where she conceives their child (yuck), who turns
out to be this little blond bastard named Mordred (who is born in the
second most disgusting birth scene, behind that one commercial in
"Boomerang") who has a sadistic additude.  As Arthur sits in his castle,
mourning his life, he sends them out on the quest for the Holy Grail to
restore the kingdom, which in turn brings about the final confrontation
between Mordred and his father.
The film is kind of simple in its plotting, but what's cool is the
design.  The film is never bright, even if in another film we'd be
seeing it as happy since everything's supposed to Camelot-brand
wonderful.  Merlin says at one point that evil is always present because
otherwise there'd be no good.  John Boorman knows that there's darkness
lying within, that even while all the knights are happy, there's
something horrible lurking within that could tear down the whole system.
We also get several original ideas with the story.  One, which I still
don't understand, is the concept of the "Dragon," which is a magical
thing Merlin conjures up sporadically.  Also, in respect to this and the
style, Merlin is given an original look.  Instead of the long-bearded,
slightly incompetent old man from Disney's "Sword in the Stone," we get
a kind of ominous and respectable man in a long black cape and with an
interesting silver plate on his head.  The film also spews out
intellectual lines like it was some daily calendar with an intellectual
phrase each and every day.
Merlin is the most interesting of all the characters, as he is almost
the center-point of the film, even if he's taken out halfway through. 
He's a symbol of the last instance of purity in the world, as he says,
in a world where men have overcome their gods.  When he disappears,
everything goes to hell, and the men try desperately to find some piece
of purity (i.e. the Holy Grail).  Arthur is also interesting, as a man
who's in love with Guinivere (or at least thinks he is), and is
shattered when she strays, since she only loves him as a king, not as a
man.  And Morganna's an almost dual-identity, or just a really cool
femme fatale.  She sneaks into the court, seduces the only last god
(Merlin), and then ditches him in a stream of vengeance.
The film is deep in its respect to that of Camelot, the mystery of
Merlin and Morganna, the lust/love of Uther and Arthur, the adultery of
Guinevere with Lancelot, and, of course, that of Excalibur, which is a
symbol of purity.
That and all, this film is still kind of hokey.  The dialogue is almost
mechanical most of the time, and a lot of the actors are not
exactly...good.  Granted, the performances by Nicol Williamson as the
bizarre Merlin, who gives him a bit of humanity towards his waning; and
that of Helen Mirren, as the equally bizarre Morganna, are great.  And
you get to see some cool performances from future stars Liam Neeson,
Gabriel Byrne, and Patrick Stewart.
But Nigel Terry as Arthur is simply not very good.  He talks very fast,
and sometimes seems to be a star in an Ed Wood film.  He's just not up
to the task of performing one of the most enigmatic characters in all of
folklore, although he's very good after he discovers Guinivere and
Lancelot.  But perhaps it was just the gray hairs.  And a lot of the
supporting characters are just kind of...crap.
The film is also very graphically violent (this isn't a negative
thing).  We get to see a lot of carnage, blood, nudity, and a bunch of
other stuff you wouldn't expect in an Arthurian tale.  I mean, apart
from the child birth scene (and the incest scene), there's a scene where
a bird pulls an eyeball from a corpses's socket.
Still, the film is a very excellently made film, with a great
surrealistic style that is not usually akin to this legend.  The choice
of music is also pretty fab, with "O Fortuna" from Orff's "Carmina
Burana" used a couple times to wonderful effects, and a great tune by
Wagner used in the titles and some other places.
"Excalibur" is a pretty underrated film.  I mean, yes, it's pretty hokey
in a lot of places, but with its cool style, great scenes, gorgeous
cinematography, and the overall deepness it applies to the classic, this
a very, very good film.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
Director: Simon West
Writer: Scott Rosenberg
Starring: Nicolas Cage, John Malkovich, John Cusack, Ving Rhames, Steve 
Buscemi, Dave Chappelle, Colm Meaney, Mykelti Williamson, Danny Trejo, 
Rachel Ticotin
We all know the mother of all mindless action pics is NOT "Speed," but 
the great "Die Hard."  Not the sequels, the first one.  It was fun, 
action-packed and had an outrageous plot, filled with an invincible, 
wise-cracking hero was shot several times, beaten up by Germans, and 
still lived to get in the limo with his ex-estranged wife.  Not that it 
was totally mindless.  It had some logic to it.  But most of all it was 
fun.
Most films in this little sub-genre (including "Speed," "Passenger 57," 
and "Under Siege" - "Executive Decision" doesn't belong her, it was too 
believable and thoughtful and had little physical action) pretty much 
blow (I'm sure "Speed 2" is gonna suck).  But "Con Air" gets that right 
pitch of fun-filled action with huge lapses in logic and a great, witty 
screenplay from Scott Rosenberg (of indie fame - "Beautiful Girls" and 
"Things to Do in Denver When You're Dead).  He makes it so fun to listen 
to them shoot out one-liners that when there are long lapses in action, 
it's just a thrill to watch them shoot them out - not that the 
dialogue's anywhere near that of Tarantino, they're in totally different 
sub-genres.
This would be crap if it weren't for the direction of Simon West, a 
newcomer, who handles the film with the exact approach it needs.  The 
film KNOWS it's stupid and moronic, and it plays that up in a gleeful 
way.  He creates wonderfully silly action sequences that had me 
laughing.  One scene in particular is when the star, Nic Cage, fights a 
convict to the death in the hull of the plane when he's found out who he 
is.  He first tells the con to put down the bunny he bought for his 
daughter who he is going to see later on, but the con doesn't put it 
down.  They fight, Nic kills him and then says "Why didn't he put down 
the bunny?" or something like that.  Another shot that is hysterical is 
after the cool plane crash at the end, the cops are in there searching 
for survivors and find this one guy who was handcuffed to a bar.  The 
shot shows the guy dead, leaning against the wall with his arm still 
hanging from the handcuffs.  They pull the corpse away and the arm still 
stands there unmoved.  Clever shots like this make "Con Air" worth the 
admission.
The plot is hilariously ridiculous: a plane transpoting cons is taken 
over by the cons, led by the gleefully insane Cyrus the Virus (John 
Malkovich, in his best kind of roles, as wacky villains).  But on the 
plane is Cameron Poe (Nicolas Cage) who served 8 years in a 
pennitentiary for killing man in self defense while protecting his 
pregnant wife.  He has never seen his little girl since he didn't want 
her to see him around all these mean convicts and he is looking forward 
to getting home.  So he wants to use his military training to try to 
stop the cons from escaping to Mexico and killing all the innocent 
guards.
Among the cons, other than Cyrus, are: Diamond Dog (Ving Rhames), who is 
a rascist black militant who wrote a popular book and could get on 
Geraldo if he wanted to; Johnny 23 (Danny Trejo), a rapist with a flower 
tatoo for every woman he's raped ("I'd be Johnny 600 if they knew the 
whole truth!") and has his eye set on the female guard (Rachel Ticotin); 
and Garland Greene, "The Marietta Mangler" (indie uber-god Steve 
Buscemi), who is a Hannibal Lector-esque man who theorizes that he's not 
crazy but those of us who work for 55 years, go into retirement and wind 
up in a nursing home are the true crazy ones.  Also on board is 
Cameron's cell-mate (Mykelti Williamson, completing the whole "Forrest 
Gump" parody since Cameron's from Alabama), who needs his shot of 
insulin or he'll die...but all the needles are broken.
Above all this is Nicolas Cage who, when I first heard about it, seemed 
dreadfully miscast.  He's an Oscar winner who turned to big-budget 
action pics after his "Leaving Las Vegas" role, which he did perfectly. 
 But I'm glad he's picked good action pics so far.  So great as the 
dorky guy in "The Rock," he at first seems awkward as a muscle-bound 
action hero who beats up deadly convicts and runs from fireballs.  But 
he's so convincing that this soon disappears.  He handles Cameron's 
character with style and makes him a soft-spoken man with a lot going on 
inside. But his hick accent kinda drifts into the hick parody of his 
H.I. character in the Coen Brothers' awesome "Raising Arizona."
Also great is John Cusack, who usually doesn't do this kind of fare, but 
he signed up because of the cast and the cool script.  He's not wasted 
but he has an expendable character.  He makes the most of it, playing 
what was sort of like Nicolas Cage's role in "The Rock."  He's no action 
actor, but he does do a great run scene you'll dig.  And brit actor Colm 
Meaney is one hell of a great jerk, with his real name serving as a nice 
little joke.  (hah hah - you don't have to laugh, it was a bad joke, I 
know)
And John Malkovich is gerat as the main villain.  He commands the film 
nicely and steals every scene he's in.
The thing to admire from "Con Air" is it doesn't even attempt to oust 
"Die Hard" from its throne, but puts some nice twists on an old sub 
genre.  I reccomend this to anyone who likes good dumb action pics.  
It's certainly one hell of a ride, albeit a stupid one.

Title
Review for Welcome to the Dollhouse (1995)
Writer/Director: Todd Solondz
Starring: Heather Matarazzo, Angela Pietropinto, Bill Buell, Brendan
Sexton Jr, Matthew Faber, Daria Kalinina, Eric Mabius
I can distinctly remember junior high as being the worst days of my
life.  Not only was I picked on more than O.J. at a comedy club, but my
self-loathing sense of humor had yet to be developed, which would later
cushion the blows of anyone and everyones' mockery aimed at me.  Not
only was my last name mispronounced more than "Sade" is, but I actually
took it personally.  Not only that, but for about a year, I was referred
to as "Erection Boy" because my jeans made a little adjutting in a
particular area.  Those were the days, my friend.
What "Welcome to the Dollhouse" does is present an accurate, darkly
comic view of an entire school year (I think seventh) in the life of the
most-picked on student in a Junior High School: Dawn Wiener (Heather
Matarazzo).  In the first scenes, we see her being picked on as "Wiener
Dog" (ha ha), be called a lesbian by a bunch of vapid cheerleaders, and
suffer one of the most horrific aspects of those lovely years: the
journey for somewhere to sit during lunch.
Dawn seems to be the patron saint of the admonished: she's everybody's
target.  Even a poor helpless little nerd who she tries to help after he
has been picked on by some other students calls her a name.  You would
think a girl like this could escape this world when she goes home.
Guess again.  She was blessed with being the middle child, and her
parents (Angela Pietropinto and Bill Buell) obviously prefer her the
least of all.  Her older brother (Matthew Faber) is a near genius,
always working towards college, like forming a band just so it can go on
his record.  And her younger sister (Daria Kalinina) is mommy's little
princess, always doing ballet, and is cute as an Olsen Twin.
Instead of just meandering around her being picked on, the film
introduces little elements into her life.  One day, she finds that her
brother is helping out a slacker, angst-filled wannabe musician (Eric
Mabius), who she immeadiately falls into a crush with.  He joins the
band, making them sound better, and she starts a sick obsession with him
(in one scene, hysterically trying to feed him, and play the piano for
him while he waits for her brother).
Also comes a mean Nick Stahl-looking jerk (Brendan Sexton Jr) who picks
on her, and one day threatens to rape her after school.  When she
actually shows up, they start a bizarre and meaningful relationship, and
we find out exactly why he's that way over the course of the film,
although there's no turning back for him.
The director wisely doesn't let her get away without any blame.  She's a
selfish, talentless girl, who does all she can to become popular, not
only never suceeding, but actually burning her bridges on her hopeful
way to selfish popularity.  She has a friend who's also very unpopular,
but she begins turning her back on him gradually throughout the film.
And whenever she tries to stoop to the level of her perpetrators (i.e.
doing the old spit ball back at them), she makes things horribly worse.
The never pulls any of his punches.  The ugly duckling never blossoms
into some kind of Ariana Richards mutation, and she doesn't end up like
the protagonist at the end of a John Hughes flick.  At the end, she is
semi-optimistic about the next school year, but you know that it might
actually be worse.
The direction and writing by Todd Solondz (who, if you've ever seen a
picture of, would realize that this might be an autobiographical
story...well, slightly) is incredible.  He paints a surprisingly
intelligent portrayal of Junior High, deepening the parts that go on in
the film instead of letting them just lie as cruel jokes.  The bizarre
thing that he pulls off is that while the students, and her family mock
Dawn, we find ourselves laughing along with them until we catch
ourselves and find ourselves either identifying with the distraught
Dawn, or discovering how cruel we were to these poor kids...or both.
"Welcome to the Dollhouse" is an amazing little film that was snubbed
for any Oscar nominations.  They called this year the year of the
independent film, but if it was truly the year of the independent film,
they would have nominated this (and "Fargo" or "Trainspotting" would
have won best picture).  Now, I'm not going to get into my view on the
Oscars, but I think a nomination for the screenplay would have been
pretty cool.  But nevertheless, this is a fantastically executed film,
and a wonderful black comedy.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Barcelona (1994)
Writer/Director: Walt Stillman
Starring: Taylor Nichols, Christopher Eigeman, Tushka Bergen, Mira
Sorvino, Pep Munne
In last year's "Swingers," the film was plotless, but dealt with a
clique who were all comfortable with eachother, and ended up doing
almost nothing but talk for an hour and a half.  Earlier, Quentin
Tarantino showed us that a film where the characters had little action,
some plot, but talked a lot about internation cuisine, pop culture, and
about how uncomfortable silences are annoying, and still made it more
fascinating than watching some Sly Stallone incarnation try to blow up
stuff and make out with Sharon Stone.  "Barcelona" is part of this kind
of sub-genre of films - the talking film - which is probably more
entertaining and more worthwhile in the end than some other less
talkative films.  By the way, I'm not busting on the silent films.
The two protagonists in "Barcelona" are cousins - Ted and Fred (Taylor
Nichols and Christopher Eigeman, respectively) - who are living together
in Barceloa, Spain over an unsaid course of time, which apparently isn't
that long.  Ted's a businessman, and a very satisfied one at that, or so
he says.  He owns a gorgoeus flat in the city, and begins sharing it
with his navy cousin, Fred, when he shows up out of the blue, gives him
an impromptu phonecall, and then says he'll only be a couple of days.
The characters in this are pretty much thrust together by nepotism,
rather than having anything else in common or being friends at all.  In
fact, they both get on eachother's nerves with their individual
neuroses.  Ted is kind of soft-spoken, and doesn't have much to say,
other than to seemingly repeat numerous books to make him sound very
intellectual.  Fred's more easy-going and sometimes babbles on bizarre
subjects in awkward places.
They also, of course, pursue spanish women, one of them being Mira
Sorvino in one of her earlier roles (also equipped with a very
authentic, and extremely sexy spanish accent), who was a brunette at the
time.  The women are not really given much to do.  Sometimes they seem
rather shallow.  The one who both of them really like, Moserrat (Tushka
Bergen), has very little to say.  However, the guys in this film pursue
these women because they are part of the Trade Fair, which means they
travel and whatnot, and they might be very culturally interesting.  And
of course, they probably speak English.  But when they try to talk to
them about this, they seem rather dazed and confused, and really don't
care that much.
Other than talkng about sex and relationships throughout the film,
there's also a political side to this.  This takes place in the early
80s (the subtitle at the beginning says "the last decade of the Cold
War"), and there's a lot of American hostility.  And, of course, Fred is
very proud of his country, and feels he has to wear his navy suit almost
everywhere.  He's easily offended when people start calling him a
"fascist," and even gets in some heated arguments with the ultimate
lady's man (Pep Munne) about some American consulat bombings in the
city.
What's interesting about "Barcelona" is how we get to see a group of
people we usually don't see in cinema.  Instead of the liberal,
artistic, neurotics of Woody Allen's films, we get conservative,
white-collar types who are still neurotic.  Instead of whining, they
seem to display their inner problems in a more monotonous way, and it
still comes across as funny and amusing.  And the script and acting is
excellent, supplying the little-known actors with some truly interesting
and some very classic dialogue.
"Barcelona" runs a tad over the Woody Allen average (which is about 93
minutes or so) and goes by smoothly, as it pulls you into its
interesting characters.  I'm much more interested in seeing characters
speak their minds than watch them just shoot their way out of
situations, so I'm always happy to see a film that embraces the former,
and in such a cool way.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Director: James L. Brooks
Writers: Mark Andrus and James L. Brooks
Starring: Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Shirley Knight, Cuba
Gooding Jr, Skeet Ulrich, Jamie Kennedy, Yeardley Smith, Lupe Ontiveros,
Jesse James
I love Jack Nicholson.  It's not a sexual thing, but I just think he's
the most interesting actor to watch do his schtick, especially when he's
at his best.  When he goes off, and his eyebrows go all schizoid, it
somehow brings a giant grin to my face.  I mean, this guy's more fun to
describe than Steve Buscemi.  "As Good As It Gets" is, among other
things, a showcase for Nicholson's talents, getting the best performance
from him since 1992's "A Few Good Men," and reminding us how wonderful
and devilish this man can be.
Of course, it's also a poignant and interesting character study/comic
drama from James L. Brooks, who is a master of balancing the touching
with the hilarious.  The films he has directed (like "Terms of
Endearment" and "Brodcast News") and the TV shows he produces (like
"Cheers" and "The Simpsons") all have a way of being comical all while
being deeper than the usual piece of media.  "As Good As It Gets" is
also a reminder of how amazing Brooks is, while still managing to tell
an intriguing story centering on a trio of people who form emotional
bonds with one another over a short period of time.
The film's centerpiece is Melvin Uball (Nicholson), an
obsessive/compulsive neurotic nightmare.  He's a selfish, almost crazy
man who writes trashy and popular romance novels for women (when asked
by a female fan how he writes women so well, he rudely says "I take a
man.  Then I take away reason and accountability"...you saw the
previews).  He's a near agoraphobic, not letting anyone into his
expensive and spacious apartment, being almost as paranoid of other
people than Jerry Fletcher in "Conspiracy Theory."  He's also an intense
bigot - he's a racist, a snob, and a homophobe - and he shouts out
insults to anyone who pisses him off in the slightest.  This is a role
that if Jack had turned down, the entire film would have had to stop
production.
No one can tolerate Melvin, but one can take him in moderation.  At the
only restaurant he eats at, waitress Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt) is the
only one who serves him, not only because she's the only one who Melvin
lets serve him, but also because the other waitresses are deathly afraid
of the man.  A single mom, Carol suffers from being trapped in a bit of
motherhood with her asthma-ridden son, and also living with her mother
(Shirley Knight).  The two slowly begin to share a mutual relationship,
which slowly turns into unforced beginnings of love.
Also in his life, is his gay neighbor, Simon (Greg Kinnear), a painter
who is beaten up severely by thugs trying to rob his flat towards the
beginning.  The two share a very heated relationship which slowly begins
to develop into friendship.  He also owns the dog Melvin throws into a
garbage chute in the opening scene, which stays with Melvin for a couple
weeks while Simon's in the hospital for his wounds.  I just wanted to
say that I really liked how the film didn't exploit his homosexuality a
lot, and how it was only really brought up by slurs by Melvin.
The three characters drive the plot of the film, although we can already
see where it's heading.  We all know that by the end, Melvin will take
the first steps in becoming a "better person;" that Carol and Melvin
will begin a more...personal relationship; and that all three will be in
love with eachother, in one way or another.  But in 90% of films of all
time, you can see exactly what the ending will be from the first ten or
twenty minutes (or from the previews, these days).  It's just a question
of how it gets there.
And luckily, "As Good As It Gets" suceeds.  The film may seem a bit
forced at times, but it never overwhelms the feel or pace of the film. 
The characters never cease to be people, and we never stop caring about
them.  In most films, I could probably care less what happens to them if
the plot didn't make me think otherwise.  Here, James L. Brooks presents
us with three people who I was really caring about throughout, which is
shocking since one of them should get the "Archie Bunker" award for
hostility towards everybody who's not himself.
The lead actors also do an amazing job (and have all received
well-deserved Golden Globe nominations).  Kinnear gives his best
performance to date, showing that he's not just a cool, witty "Talk
Soup" guy (or a "Smile Like Yours" guy).  Hunt continues her tradition
of doing good acting jobs (she was even pretty okay in "Twister"), and
creates a beautifully layered human being.  This is Oscar-nomination
material here.
But Nicholson steals the film from everyone.  No big shock.  He is
saddled with a role that no one else can do the way he does.  The man is
hated from everyone, but he's the lead, and he needs to be likable to
the audience in order for people to care about him.  And Nicholson
doesn't fail.  He makes Melvin Udall a lovable sonofabitch, which is no
easy task, what with the dialogue he has to say at times.  He also makes
a human out of him, and gives one of the best performances of the year.
In smaller roles, Shirley Knight is awesome as Hunt's live-in mother,
and Cuba Gooding Jr rocks in a small cameo-esque role as an art dealer
who shows Simon's artwork.  Also, look for Yeardley Smith in a tiny
role, and "Scream" alumni Skeet Ulrich and Jamie Kennedy in the same
frame.
The writing is very well done, with lots of zingers, and classic
one-liners.  There are scenes that are so delicately written that I just
laughed hysterically, which I often don't do.  And also, a lot of it
actually sounds very human, which is always a nice touch.
Although it does have its flaws, "As Good As It Gets" is a very good
comic drama which can please a crowd without becoming all mushy or
distractingly funny, probably because it has delicate human touches to
it.  And my god, Nicholson's eyebrows...
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Anaconda (1997)
Director: Luis Llosa
Writers: Hans Brauer, Jim Cash, and Jack Epps Jr.
Starring: Jennifer Lopez, Jon Voigt, Ice Cube, Eric Stoltz, Owen Wilson,
Kari Wuhler, Jonathan Hyde, Vincent Castallanos, Danny Trejo
Take a giant, computer-animated snake, toss it in the jungle with a fake
film crew, and toss in a campy Jon Voigt for good humor and you have
what is pretty much "Anaconda," an intelligently stupid creature flick,
not to mention one hell of an enjoyable one.  Like its great
predecessor, "Tremors," "Anaconda" is a tongue-in-cheek bit of fun
scariness that is pretty much guaranteed to entertain as long as you
don't think about it.
"Anaconda" follows a documentary film crew through the jungles of South
America as they make a film about a group of people who live in the
jungle.  The director (Jennifer Lopez, from "Selena") is a first-timer,
trying to get her first break.  Along with her are: her boyfriend and
scientist (Eric Stoltz); her old school chum and cinematographer (Ice
Cube); the sound man ("Bottle Rocket"'s Owen Wilson); the perky
production assistant (Kari Wuhler); the british narrator (Jonathan
Hyde); and the captain (Vincent Castallanos), the latter who pretty much
screams "expendable!"
Along the way, they encounter a broken down ship with a mysterious
pony-tailed Central American old man (Jon Voigt), who gets aboard their
ship and begins telling them how to survive the dangerous jungle they
are in, since he knows all about it.  "This jungle can kill you in a
thousand ways," he says.  And soon, it becomes apparent that he's
actually interested in the big attraction of the jungle: the anaconda.
Of course, we all know what's going to happen: the anaconda - which is
boasted to coil its victims, breaking their bones, them eat them, and
sometimes regurgitate them so they can devour them again - will attack
each of the members of the crew.  The film knows that, and plays along
with it to its fullest extents.  We get early shots of it attacking a
leopard (and squeezing it so hard that an eye pops out), and one of the
crew members (guess who?) is eaten early on.
The film plays with us, not letting us see the anaconda in full view to
well into the film.  And each of the characters, or characateurs, are
well-defined and we care about them...well, most of them.  This makes it
particularly scary when one or a couple of our favorite characters have
fallen into the water.  Director Luis Llosa (who also made the crap
"Specialist") plays with our nerves a bit, including some not-so-subtle
movie allusions to earlier creature-features, like "Jaws."  And he even
plays with the old Ebert cliche BADF (Brother Always Dies First), when
Ice Cube says he's going to go back into the water to check on a missing
crew member (cue: groaning by everyone in the theatre).
The cinematography and sets in the film are incredible.  It's a
beautiful bit of cinematography that lulls us into fake peace, only to
surround us with snakes and various other deadly Amazon creatures.  It's
one of the better traits of a creature film if the cinematographer can
fool us like that.
The anaconda when seen is a pretty cool special effect.  It doesn't look
realistic (though I've never seen one of them in real life), and it
sometimes defies gravity, but it's a cool piece of shockdom.  It moves
incredibly fast, sometimes at what seems to be the speed of light,
although it sometimes stalks creepily.  And when it breaks someone's
bones, it has this great sadistic look on its face.  It's one of the
more impressive uses of special effects, like the dinosaurs in the
"Jurassic Park" flicks.
But to me, the real treat of the film is none other than Jon Voigt. 
Playing a typical river rat, he makes him into a fascinatingly funny
piece of camp.  Voigt's an Oscar Winner, and one of the best actors of
his generation (see "Midnight Cowboy" and "Coming Home," as well as his
other river flick, "Deliverence"), and its hilarious to see him go full
ham on us.  With his cuban or latino accent, as well as his Brando-like
delivery, he makes the film more enjoyable than it is, and he never
overdoes it.  Just to see him smile at Jennifer Lopez cunningly is well
worth the price of admission.
"Andaconda" is a superior creature flick in that it is entertaining,
never boring, and always hilarious.  Besides, it has Jon Voigt.  And Jon
has enough brauvara to make even "Glen of Glenda?" interesting.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Anastasia (1997)
Directors: Don Bluth and Gary Goldman
Writers: Susan Gauthier, Bruce Graham, Bob Tzudiker, Noni White, and Eric
Tuchman (based on the screenplay Arthur Laurents which is in turn based on
the play by Marcel Maurette)
Starring: Meg Ryan, John Cusack, Kelsey Grammar, Christopher Lloyd, Hank
Azaria, Angela Lansbury, Bernadette Peters, Kirsten Dunst, Liz Callaway,
Lacey Chabert, Jim Cummings, Jonathan Dokuchitz
I can't even remember the last animated feature that had big promotion that
wasn't a Disney film.  Maybe it was "An American Tail" (or it's ill-fated
sequel).  Nevertheless, Disney has been the king of animated features, for
better or worse.  And while it's not a great film, it is a breath of fresh
air from the Disney trend, which has been getting kinda lackluster as of
late, and proof that Disney isn't the only company who can make a really
good enjoyable film.
Of course, Twentith Centry Fox, who advertised the film over a year before
its release, have pretty much given themselves a harder job than Disney
does.  Instead of adapting something that's relatively fantasy-like anyway
(stories about mermaids, genies, and gods and godesses), the filmmakers
have chosen to adapt a story based on real life, that of the disappearance
of the daughter to Russian Czar Nicolas and his wife Alexandra, who was
overthrown by the people, led by Lenin.  It's even been made into a 50s
film, which served as Ingrid Bergman's comeback film after a long drought
of nothingness.
Of course, they needed to make it universal to kids and adults, so decided
to make the creepy Russian personage of Rasputin into the film's chief
villain (the film exploits the old curse put on the family by Rasputin, who
is out for vengeance after Nicolas screwed him over).  When the palace
falls due to the revolution, the family flees, but accidentally leave
behind little Anastasia (voiced by Kirstun Dunst; sung by "Party of Five"'s
Lacy Chabert), who conks her head, and receives some nasty amnesia.
After a brief introduction to all of this, the story follows a woman named
Anya who is about 18 years old (voiced by Meg Ryan; sung by Liz Callaway),
and we see her trying to figure out what to do with her life now that she's
kicked out of the orphanage she's lived in what seems to her all her life. 
We're also introduced to two con artists in St. Petersburg, Dimitri (voiced
by John Cuasack; sung by Jonathan Dokuchitz) and Vladmir (voiced and sung
by Kelsey Grammar), who have heard that there is a possibility that
Anastasia still lives, and her grandmother, an Empress (Angela Lansbury)
who fleed to Paris before the revolution, is looking for her.  They begin
holding auditions to find a girl who looks like Anastasia, and who is
willing to be trained to act like her so they can receive an award.  Anya
wanders in, and after a bit of conversation, agrees to go overseas with
them to maybe discover her past.  Of course, Anya is really Anastasia, and
it'll just take some time for her employers to figure it out.
All the while, Rasputin (voiced by Christopher Lloyd; sung by Jim Cummings)
is a living corpse, having sold his soul to the devil for the ability to
exact revenge on the Russian family, and is constantly falling apart (it
was funny the first two times...).  When he discovers that Anastasia is
still alive, and begins to attack the trio on their way to Paris.
Although a cartoon, this film is actually a really entertaining film for
everyone.  Sure, I was a little appalled at some of the historical
inaccuracies, but, like I did with Disney's "Hercules," I soon got over
that and just tried to enjoy the film.  The film has the same kind of magic
of a Disney film, filled with lots of very good music (I can probably hum
two or three songs from this; from "Hercules," none), and some definite
magical moments, like a sequence where Anya enters the run-down palace of
her youth and all the ghosts from her past burst out of the windows and
re-enact a dance from earlier on.  And there's even some very suspenseful
moments, most notably an excellently crafted runaway train sequence.
The animation is more mature than Disney's, with very human facial
expressions from many of the characters.  And the writing and voices are
both excellent, with Meg Ryan and John Cusack seen as having great
chemistry in several of the scenes.  Throughout the first half, they're
constantly bickering, and it actually sounds realistic.  I was very shocked
and impressed by all of this, and also how they could also work well with
more cartoony characters, like a bat named Bartok (voiced by the great
cartoon voice actor, and all-around great actor in general, Hank Azaria),
who serves as the main comic relief.
If there's anything wrong with it, it's that it's too brief.  I know it's
an animated feature, and most of them have to adhere to around 90 minutes
or less, but maybe more time and less editing would have fleshed out some
more of the supporting characters.  Rasputin is only shown a couple times,
and although we fully understand his intentions, sometimes his appearances
are so far apart from eachother that you almost forget he's there.  And
sadly, Vladmir is in much of the first act, but seems to have disappeared
during the second, who falls in love with the Empress's friend, Sophie
(voiced by Broadway great Bernadette Peters).
Nevertheless, "Anastasia" has a lot of energy, and is evenly paced, which
is very impressive as a lot of animated films are choppy and way too
episodic for their own good.  You also have to like how it doesn't insult
our intelligence, and gives us a romance between Anya and Dimitri that is
based on that of a Howard Hawks/Frank Capra film, which is more than
helpful in giving it a lighthearted feel.  This is not high drama, and
thank goodness for that.  Save the high drama for the live action, and
reserve the lightheartedness for the cartoons.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Notorious (1946)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writer: Ben Hecht
Starring: Cary Grant, Ingrid Bergman, Claude Rains, Louis Calhern,
Leopoldine Konstantin, Reinhold Schünzel, Alex Minotis, Ivan Triesault,
Moroni Olsen
If "Rear Window" was brilliant because of how deep it was, and "Vertigo"
was brilliant for how existential it was, "Notorious" is brilliant
because of how simple it is.  It's nothing more than an almost-typical
Hichtcock plot, with lots of tension, espionnage, and attractive stars,
but that's what's so amazing about it.  It is one of the best examples
of Hitchcock making a simple story into a gem.
"Notorious" came out around the time of Nazism, so it has a modern (for
'46) feel to it, as the chief "villain" is none other than a Nazi in
hiding.  The story revolves around a love triangle which takes place
during the wave of nazism, involving a secret agent, a notorious
daughter of a recently deceased nazi, and a living nazi.  With this,
Hithcock tells a simple yet amazing tale, which shows off a lot of his
camerawork, all while telling a story which never stops being
interesting.
The story takes place following the death of a nazi, and then introduces
us to his infamous daughter, Alicia Huberman (Ingrid Bergman), a
promiscious drunkard of a woman.  At a party, she meets a man named T.R.
Devlin (Cary Grant), who turns out to be a secret agent, luring her to
work for the government to expose a nazi hiding in Brazil: Alexander
Sebastian (Claude Rain, rejoining Bergman to get that cool "Casablanca"
feel to it).  The two share a brief non-sexual affair (this is 40s
cinema, after all), and eventually and reluctantly agrees to get the
government closer to Alex by flirting with him.
Soon, Alicia and Alex are a hot item, all while Devlin is still lurking
around, and sneaking around with Alicia.  Despite the fact that Alicia
and Alex are together, she still has a tiny thing for Devlin, and vice
versa.  What results is a fascinating and creepy film, resulting in one
of the best endings to a Hitchcock film ever.
The strength of this film is really in the characterizations and
writing.  The relationship between Grant and Bergman is a touching one,
and one that is always interesting.  Because the writers have made these
two out to have a rocky relationship, the two of them are never boring. 
And with chemistry between Grant and Bergman filling in some answers to
unanswered questions in the script, the two work as a couple.  And, of
course, the two are both brilliant in their roles.
But the best achievement, character-wise, is that of Alex.  Instead of
him being a flat villain, he's more of a semi-villain.  He has a heart
and feelings...I mean, just because he's a nazi doesn't mean he's
totally evil.  He is a man who is trapped in a lifestyle which will
ultimately destroy him: he's a notorious nazi, and seems to be equipped
with a massive oedipus complex, as his mother (Leopoldine Konstantin)
seems to rule his life, much like Norman's mother did in "Psycho."  As
played by Claude Rains, he's almost sympathetic at times.  Rains gives
the best performance of the film.
The film is also a show-off for the talents of Hitchcock.  "The Master
of Suspense" never has any action sequences or anything, but instead
creates several moments of pure tension, and usually in the most bizarre
places.  One sequence which is notable (which we watched in film class
once) is a party scene where Grant and Bergman have to get into the
locked wine cellar of Rains's house to find some clues.  With wonderful
camera movement, tense parallel action, and some truly ingenius set-ups,
it's a classic of American cinema.
Also standing out are a sequence where Bergman finds out that she's
being poisoned by Alex and his mother (complete with some pre-60s
psychedelic pioneering), and the ending, which is nothing short of
flawless.  The latter is perfect because it shows us how truly trapped
Alex is in his life, and uses an ingenius idea and never throws that
particular punch.  The final shot is classic too; a creepy,
grin-inducing finale which remains stuck in memory for eternity.
Many people claim that a film which is simplistic is not extraordinary. 
Not so.  "Notorious" is proof that a director can tell a simple story,
and still make a film which can stand the test of time.  Sure, it's not
"Psycho," "Strangers on a Train," or "North by Northwest," but it's
still one of the director's best because it shows how truly great he was
by showcasing him in unambiguous mode.  I loved every second of it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Blue Velvet (1986)
Writer/Director: David Lynch
Starring: Kyle MacLaughlin, Isabella Rosselini, Dennis Hopper, Laura
Dern, Dean Stockwell
I have a big problem with this film: I don't like it.  I mean, I found
it to be brilliant and all, but it's just not a film I would watch
willingly again.  I know I'm a critic and all, and I'm supposed to like
brilliant films, but I just didn't like this one.  But I'm going to
attempt to give it a very positive review, because it was very good, and
try to find out why I didn't enjoy it.
The film starts off brilliantly: a shot of typical suburbia - kids
crossing the street, firemen waving as they go down the road on their
truck, and a man watering his garden.  But this guy suddenly has a
stroke and collapses to the ground.  As he falls, his dog jumps up and
begins being squirted in the mouth by the hose.  The camera moves down
and we see bugs and stuff in the grass he has been watering.  Like this
first shot, we're going to see what's on the inside of this beautiful
suburbia.
While this wasn't surreally bizarre, we get another weird twist: the
protagonist (Kyle MacLaughlin, who seems to be in almost all of Lynch's
films), who is also the stroke-victim's son,  is walking thorugh a
pasture and finds a severed ear.  That's right - an ear.  He takes it to
the cops, who show little interest in it, so he begins snooping around
like some Encyclopedia Brown, equipped with the one detective's daughter
(a young Laura Dern).  He finds out that there's this woman (Isabella
Rossellini) who may have ties to the ear.
He steals her key while posing as a bug killer, and then sneaks into her
apartment after she sings, you know, "Blue Velvet" at a club.  He hides
in her closet when she comes in, and witnesses a horrific act.  A
gangster in suburbia (Dennis Hopper) comes in, literally swearing every
other word, gets high on some kind of chemical, and proceeds to rape
her.  Of course, he does this every night, so she should be used to it
(just kidding).  He leaves, she finds Kyle, and begins forcing him to
strip, then they have sex.  Soon enough, they have a sado-masichistic
relationship going on.
Of course, Hopper finds out, and takes both of them on a joyride through
the underbelly of suburbia, including some drinking, and a visit to a
brothel, run by the supra-effiminite Dean Stockwell (who Hopper just
calls "fucking suave!" repeatedly).  They then beat him and leave him
for dead, but he's not dead.  And at the end, Kyle has to save
Rossellini and himself from Hopper, in a totally bizarre ending.
What's cool about this film is the contrast it makes between suburbia
and the mafia.  I mean, it's pretty much the perfect front.  And
MacLaughlin's journey through it is pretty fascinating.  Lynch uncovers
suburbia for all its hypocrisies in "Blue Velvet," especially with the
kind of ironic ending.  And another strong point is the cinematography,
which is absolutely gorgeous and dreamlike.  I credit Lynch for his
great directing with this film.
The acting is, however, kind of half and half.  Or really three quarters
and a quarter.  Isabella Rossellini is fantastic, as always, in the role
of the abused lounge singer.  In the most controversial scene, she is
dropped off by the mafia totally stark naked and on Laura Dern's porch. 
Apparently, Lynch didn't restrict anyone from leaving the site, and
Rossellini has been scarred ever since.  Her performance is really
great.  And Dennis Hopper is so fueled with energy (he coins the phrase
used in "Clerks," "I'll fuck anything that moves!") and he becomes the
perfect hatable bully.  Also great is Laura Dern.
But Kyle MacLaughlin.  I mean, the guy's nice and all, and he has acted
well in some parts of his career.  But here, like in most of his work,
he's just not good.  There's this scene where he talks about Guiness
beer where I swore he would turn to the camera and promote it.  That's
how corny he sounded.  He's just not a very good lead for a brilliant
film.  But he somehow is in a lot of Lynch's work.  I don't get it.
This film is probably one of the more weird films I've ever seen.  I
pretty much didn't like it because, well, I saw it in the prime of my
"Pulp Fiction" obsession.  I was expecting some pulp.  But the thing is,
I'm just not a huge fan of Lynch.  I mean, I appreciate the guy, and I
often rave about him.  But I just don't always enjoy his flicks.  Oh
well.
Roger Ebert famously gave this one star.  I agree with some of his
review, but I get the point Lynch was trying to make.  Suburbia is not a
place to escape the problems of the world, because there's an underbelly
to every microcosm.  Even if I didn't like it, I can appreciate it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Miller's Crossing (1990)
Director: Joel Coen
Writers: Joel and Ethan Coen
Starring: Gabriel Byrne, Albert Finney, Marcia Gay Harden, Jon Polito, John
Turturro, J.E. Freeman, Mike Starr, Al Mancini, Steve Buscemi, Michael
Jeter, Danny Aiello III, Richard Woods, Frances McDormand
With the Brothers Coen finally getting the recognition they deserve, what
with the whole "Fargo" thing and "The Big Lebowski" opening in a couple
days in wide release, so it's really a blast going back and retracing their
entire filmography to see how exactly they arrived at what seems to be the
pinnacle of their career thus far (back to the whole "Fargo" spiel). 
"Miller's Crossing," their third film, is a nice combination of story,
substance, and style, as well as being one of the most underrated films
dealing with gangsters, and is actually one of their best films.
"Miller's Crossing" is named after the place in the forest where the
gangsters in this movie go to shoot some of their more pestful problems,
and is the location for the big twist in the movie, where the protagonist
makes a fatal decision because of a cheap and stupid reason.  The
protagonist is Tom Reagan (Gabriel Byrne), an Irish gangster working for
the big political boss in town, Leo (Albert Finney), who not only controls
the police, but also the various mafiasos in town.
One of them, run by the eccentric Italian Johnny Casper (Coen Brothers'
regular Jon Polito), is an angry at Leo over the proposed assasination of a
little gangster rat, Bernie Bernbaum (John Turturro), who just happens to
the brother of Leo's girl, Verna (Marcia Gay Harden).  In the first scene,
an almost-parody of the opening of "The Godfather," Casper asks Leo to have
him killed, but Leo won't budge.  However, Leo doesn't know that his
right-hand man, Tom, is screwing Verna on the side, and she seems to the
person who the characters revolve around.
Soon, Tom and Leo find themselves at odds over her, and Leo kicks Tom out
of his job, so he crosses over to Casper's side, who's trying to overthrow
Leo throughout the film with the help of his menacing henchman, Eddie Dane
(J.E. Freeman).  As the film goes on, Tom tries to manipulate everything,
but towards the middle of the film, rats on where Bernie is, and finds
himself with the task of shooting him at Miller's Crossing.  Here's where
the big twist lies, and it sets the stage for the rest of this film, which
reaches a fateful conclusion.
The story, which is extremely labyrinthine and complex, is nevertheless one
that is endlessly fascinating, as we're introduced to a wide variety of
wacky and eccentric supporting characters, such as the homosexual annoyance
Mink (Steve Buscemi, in a one-scene role), and two hitmen working for
Casper, named Frankie and Tic-Tac (Mike Starr and Al Mancini,
respectively).  The world of the Coen brother is always intriguing in all
their films, as they allow every character to have a distinct personality
and various weird quirks.  While some may argue that the world of David
Lynch's is much more weird and thus more interesting, the Coens combine
style with a better grasp on all their characters and an overall better
control over their world.
What's most interesting about "Miller's Crossing" is how it's always
interesting and fun to watch, but how it also has an interesting take on
the world of classical gangsterdom.  The men in this movie may seem to
dominate, but most of them have a soft spot for women, especially seductive
women.  Poor Marcia Gay Harden is burdened with the role of being the woman
who is manipulating everyone whether she likes it or not.  Not only is Leo
reluctant to have her brother killed for fear that she won't marry him, but
also Tom, who seems all cold, is smitten by her.  What do you think is on
his mind in the famous Miller's Crossing scene of this film?  Is he really
influenced by Bernie's "Look into your heart" pleas?  Gangster pics should
always present an interesting and if possible original take on gangsters,
and that's what "Miller's Crossing" does.  It's a film that shows that
women really ran the show.
But besides that, the style of the Coens, which is eccentric and wild, is
clearly here, not only in how they handle the camera and cinematography (by
none other than director Barry Sonnenfeld), but also in how they present
their story.  This film is filled with lots of black comedy and various
cartoonish effects.  Who can keep a straight face in the scene where a
little boy steals the toupee off of a corpse in the streets?  And who
doesn't giggle every time Tom picks up his hat after it being knocked off? 
Even the violence in this film is handled with cartoonish effect: take a
scene where Tom is beaten around by a bunch of guys and all he gets is a
lip bleed - this film is almost as cartoonishly violent as another 1990
release, "Dick Tracy" (although this is considerably more graphic).
The acting in Coen Brothers films is always over-the-top and just this
shade of camp, but they're always pretty amazing.  Here, we get a barage of
wonderful performances from everyone, like Gabriel Byrne's wonderfully
stone-faced performance, hiding himself under his facade; Marcia Gay Harden
playing oblivious to what she's doing and ending up showing a different
side of the traditional mob moll; John Turturro's wonderfully energetic
performance; Steve Buscemi's wacky little cameo; Mike Starr doing another
fine small role as a doofish hitman; J.E. Freeman exhuming scariness, and
being one of the absolute best things about this movie; and, of course,
Albert Finney's brilliant work (as usual), portraying Leo as not being a
monster, but really being a tough but gentle man, albeit being a bit on the
ignorant and naive side.  Also, look for Coen wife (I can't believe I
forget which one she's married to) Frances McDormand in a small role as a
mayoral secretary.
And what about all those magnificent cinematic treats, like the scene where
Leo beats up Tom after discovering he's been sleeping with his girl; the
scene where Tom is forced to go kill Bernie in the woods; a later intense
scene where Tom is dragged back to the woods; a masterfully frightening
scene in a dark room with a blazing fire where Eddie tries to kill Tom;
and, of course, the famed "Danny Boy" sequence, which is one of the best
directed scenes I've ever viewed.  The Coen Brothers definitely have a
knack for creating beautifully layered films with lots of cinematic
goodies, like these, which linger in the mind long after the film has
ended.
I remember watching "Miller's Crossing" years ago when I was watching all
of their films for the first time, and not being really impressed with it. 
But rewatching it, I was absolutely blown away.  It's a film that almost
requires multiple viewings, not because of the complex story, but for the
sheer pleasure of watching it.  It's the kind of film that blows you away
with its amazing style, and intriguing and darkly comical take on the role
of the gangster, and even if it doesn't impress you the first time, trust
me and give it another try.  Trust me anyway.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
Writer/Director: Neil LaBute
Starring: Jason Patric, Ben Stiller, Catherine Keener, Amy Brenneman, Aaron
Eckhart, Nastassja Kinski
Neil LaBute must be the kind of director who not only wants to show
something about humanity in his films, but he also wants to follow that in
his daily life.  Some research I've done has led me to discover the guy's a
father of two, a practicing Mormon, and a just all-around good guy.  So why
does his second feature film, following last year's controversial "In the
Company of Men," only stumble upon even worse parts of humanity than that
film did?  What makes a man seem so nice and easy-going in daily life, yet
so intense and bleak in his work?
For those of you who found an intense glee in watching "In the Company of
Men," you're still going to have to brace yourselves for this one.  "Your
Friends and Neighbors" is a scathing, bleak, and ultimately claustrophobic
film that tosses you right in the middle of a sextet of Manhattan yuppies,
and forces you, almost like Malcom MacDowell in "A Clockwork Orange," to
watch as these supposedly normal everyday people tear eachother apart
psychologically.  And dammit if it's not a blast to watch from start to
finish.  From it's opening scene of a man practicing how he has sex minutes
before a hot date to the quick yet unsettling finale, it's as arresting as
anything you'll see this year.  And in 100 minutes, LaBute says so much
about humanity and how our insecurities and hang-ups force us to become
monsters to other people.
Unlike "In the Company of Men," which for those who don't know, dealt with
two businessmen trying to sexually humiliate a deaf woman as a form of
revenge, this film has no plot, yet it manages to widen the scope of the
original, not only to twice as many people, but it makes the monsters out
of both sexes in an equal fashion.  There's still three men who are all, in
varying degrees, total jerks, but there's also three women, and all of them
just need a good slapping.  There's the first couple, Jerry and Teri (a
goutee-d Ben Stiller and a butch-looking Catherine Kenner, the latter the
wife of indie-director Tom DiCillo), who's relationship is on the brinks
because, well, he just talks too much during sex; and then there's the
seemingly normal couple, the married Mary and Barry (Amy Brenneman and
Aaron Eckhart), who are actually at ends with their relationship because
he's a sorry-assed cuckold and her sexual self-esteem is at an end.
When we first meet these people, they're already on the cusp of break-ups,
and even before the halfway point, at least one of their members has had an
affair with varying degrees of success.  For Jerry, he becomes enamored
with Mary (nothing to do with his other film out there at all, I believe),
while Teri discovers love with an artist assistant named Cheri (Nastassja
Kinski) as a form of revenge for Jerry's inability to function at her
sexual, well, preference, and later as a retort against his own
infedelities.
Above everything stands Cary (Jason Patric - yes, that Jason Patric), an
almost-redux of the Chad character from "In the Company of Men," only this
time much, much colder.  His quiet intensity suggests a psychotic in him
just waiting to get out, and as the only one not already involved in a
relationship, he becomes the one who is the general violent Cassanova of
the film, though not only treating women badly, but also his buds, Jerry
and Barry (and just for the record, I noticed the names too, though not
until the end credits).
LaBute seals us off into the world of these six, not letting anyone else in
except for maybe a silent cameo, and the result is a film which wreaks of
claustrophobia set in closed-off locales like restaurants, living rooms,
and saunas (where Patric delivers a magnificent monologue that actually
ranks up there with that one scene in Bergman's "Persona" as one of the
most involving monologues ever put on film).  LaBute has become almost like
a modern-day Balsac, commenting on society with a witty acid tongue and
showing how everyone has one thing on their minds, only this time it's sex.
 Although it's not just sex, but it's also sexual humiliation and sexual
hang-ups, which then lead off into near-psychotic outbursts by the
characters on the nearest person.
But don't be fooled - this isn't totally uncomfortable viewing since,
thanks to LaBute, this is a downright hysterical film, albeit totally
disturbing and unsettling, but nevertheless hysterical.  He laces this film
with a witty screenplay, and allows it to come off less straight as "In the
Company of Men," and more darkly comic, which actually makes it all the
more intense.  He opens up his commentary to both sexes, and is actually
allowed to say more about everyman's ability to devastate everyone else
than he did in his first film.  But the real wonder is how he was able to
not only make everything about this movie totally true, but also make it
hysterically funny to watch.  I mean, this film has got to be at least the
second funniest film I've seen in a couple years.  Seriously.
And with a cast that I had 50% faith in (that is for Stiller, Keener, and
Eckhart, the latter who is unbelievably unrecognizable, thanks to a major
weight gain, a pathetic hair-cut, a tacky moustache - all which makes him
look like a "True Lies"-era Bill Paxton - and most importantly, a 180
degree turn from his character in "In the Company of Men"), I was very
pleasantly surprised when cast choices as weird as Brenneman (from "Fear"),
Kinski, and most of all, Patric, all turned in incredible performances,
making everything funny and best of all, realistic.  Patric, in particular,
comes back completely from his past career.  The man who I thought was the
most boring, dull actor I've ever seen when I saw "Sleepers" not three
years ago turns in a performance which, if seen by anyone, will blast his
career off.  What a strange turn of events.
"Your Friend and Neighbors" is absolutely incredible and riveting and
incredibly enjoyable.  Watching it is like watching a horrific accident
take place right in front of you - you don't want to look, but you don't
want to look away, so you don't and you're munundated with a sight which is
firghtening, realistic, and even entertaining in a sick way.  "Your Friends
and Neighbors" is just like that, which is somewhat like LaBute's first
film, only better.  He has made a little miracle here, not only by opening
up his horizons de criticism, but also by becoming better with direction
(thank god he dropped the tedious, stagy long shots).  Best of all, he's
less snobbish and preachy about it.  It's as if he's not pointing the
finger at anything, but rather saying that everyone's like this, including
himself, and that when we act like this, we deserve any unhappiness which
may befall us.  That's perhaps the most disturbing and accurate accusation
made at humanity in a real long time.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Director: Steven Soderbergh
Writer: Scott Frank (based on the novel by Elmore Leonard)
Starring: George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle, Steve
Zahn, Albert Brooks, Dennis Farina, Catherine Keener, Isaiah Washington,
Luis Guzmán, Nancy Allen, Donna Frenzel, Keith Loneker, Michael Keaton,
Samuel L. Jackson
There are two reasons why I just love to read and/or watch Elmore Leonard
novels/adaptations: a) they're so unpredictable, and b) they have quite
frankly the most interesting characters than anything that comes out today.
 The world of Elmore Leonard is filled with interesting characters of
varying intelligence, who all at some point get to step into the foreground
and mouth off to the audience.  The plots are piloted only by them, and we
read/watch with intensity, trying to follow the plethora of characters as
they twist and turn the plot, never leaving us behind and never allowing us
to predict what will happen next.
This is something that Hollywood isn't usually able to handle, but for some
reason, the past three Leonard adaptations - "Get Shorty," "Jackie Brown,"
and this - are incredibly faithful not just to the plotting of the
respective novels, but to their overall feel.  In the past, reading and
watching Leonard adaptations were totally different, but now, it's like
Hollywood has had an epiphany: they've taken the time to read his novels,
understand what makes them so compelling, and hire the right directors to
create them in celluloid form.
If I had never seen "Get Shorty" or "Jackie Brown," I would have proclaimed
"Out of Sight" the best and most fascinating Leonard adaptation.  It fully
understands the way that Leonard feels, allows each character to glow
radiantly, develops some real depth to the film to connect to the audience,
and even has an emotional core.  It even has completely amazing
performances, and turns its two leads, who have both had a bit of trouble
connecting to audiences in the past, into great Hollywood stars in the
tradition of Bogart and Bacall or Tracy and Hepburn (or even Allen and
Keaton).  Is it substantially weaker than the other two films?  No way;
it's right up there with them.
The protagonists of "Out of Sight" are one bank robber and one Federal
Marshall.  Jack Foley (George Clooney, growing his old hair back and
ditching the old school-Doug Ross stuff...not that that was a bad thing) is
the crook who, in the first unrelated-to-everything-else scene robs a bank
in the most laid back (not to mention most hilarious since Woody Allen
tried to rob a bank in "Take the Money and Run") robbery scene in history
by merely telling the teller that a man sitting at a desk with her boss is
his partner.  Unfortunately, his car stalls and he winds up in prison.
Shortly thereafter, the escapes with a little snitching and help from his
friend and assistant, Buddy Bragg (Ving Rhames, still glowing).  But in the
process, he manages to kidnap a tough Federal Marshall dressed in a Chanel
dress, Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez), the other main protagonist.  He stuffs
himself in the trunk with her, and on the way to a rendezvous, chats up
with her about, of all things, the career of Faye Dunaway, discussing
"Bonnie and Clyde," "Network," and "Three Days of the Condor."  He lets her
go and all, but the two both have an attraction and obsession with one
another.
The obsession grows as Jack and Buddy team up with a vicious criminal he
knew from prison, Maurice "Snoopy" Miller (Don Cheadle, showing off his
versatility as an actor once again), to do a job on a sleazy billionaire
they also knew from prison, Richard Ripley (a balding Albert Brooks - so
that WAS a toupee!), who squealed that he had a collection of uncut
diamonds somewhere in his mansion.  Meanwhile, the FBI is trying to track
Jack down with the help of Karen, who can't decide if she wants to catch
him because he's a crook or because she's totally attracted to him.
The film was directed by Steven Soderbergh, who hit the big time back about
a decade ago with the film that launched the craze for independent films,
"sex, lies, and videotape," but has had a rough time making movies since. 
Instead of playing it for laughs like Barry Sonnenfeld did with "Get
Shorty," or playing it straight like Quentin Tarantino did with "Jackie
Brown," Soderbergh directs it with a masterful touch of emotional and
psychological depth.  He freezes frames at key moments, intercuts two
scenes to form one, and uses the humor as a break from the intensity of the
rest of the film.  The screenplay by Scott Frank (of "Dead Again" fame) is
as complex as Soderbergh's direction: he forms the plot so that the film
plays in often non-linear form, throwing in unanounced flashbacks so that
much of the film plays as a series of memories and thoughts of respective
characters.  This is done so much that when one scene which is shot in a
dream-like state arrives, I wasn't sure if it was real or not.
This is easily the most deep of the Leonard adaptations because while "Get
Shorty" was a satire on Hollywood and "Jackie Brown" was just a
psychological caper film, "Out of Sight" actually connects to the audience.
 The two protagonists are easily likable, and their obsession with one
another is the driving force of the film.  We care about these two, and we
see that their relationship is really a tragedy: they're torn between their
love for one another and the boundaries of what they are.  In effect, the
film actually says more about the relationship between cops and robbers
than "Heat" did, and just as an added cherry, the scene where the two
characters take a break and sit down for a drink, which was the most
hyped-up (not to mention the most anticlimactic) scene of the film, is
twenty times better.
The film's basically a battle between what people do for a living and what
they really could be, a battle between a romance film and a pulpy thriller.
 We have a joyously fun caper film here with all the right ingredients
(double crosses upon double crosses, trigger-happy characters, rich
asswholes getting their just deserts, and even some irony), but we also
have a wonderful love story, easily the best of the Leonard adaptions (the
ones in "Get Shorty" and "Jackie Brown" were more sweet than this is), and
acted with just the right amount of sexual chemistry by Clooney and Lopez. 
These two characters have only three or four scenes together, but when they
talk, you just hold your breath in case something amazing happens.  And it
does.
And of course, there are those little things that you have to love about
this film, like the two big shock cameos that pop up (one a tie-in with
"Jackie Brown"), that gory death towards the end which is the funniest one
of those since the head shot in "Pulp Fiction," the opening bank robbery
scene, the opening of the safe in Brooks' house, and two hilarious
supporting roles by Tom DiCillo's wife, Catherine Keener, and Steve Zahn as
a stoner "colleague" of Jack's, who shows to mainstream audiences the knack
for comedy he has shown in other smaller films.  There's nary a dull moment
or character in an Elmore Leonard novel, and it's amazing that a film based
on one of his novels has realized how to appropriately connect two
characters emotionally with their audience.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for King of Comedy, The (1983)
Director: Martin Scorsese
Writer: Paul D. Zimmerman
Starring: Robert DeNiro, Jerry Lewis, Sandra Bernhard, Diahnne Abbott,
Tony Randal, Ed Herlihy, Lou Brown, Dr. Joyce Brothers, Victor Borge,
Liza Manelli, Martin Scorsese, Catherine Scorsese
"The King of Comedy" is a very un-Scorsese-like darkly comic satire on
fame and the obsession with those who have it.  Simply put.  While
underrated because it's not as powerful as his other films, and also
because it miserably bombed at the box office (my friend told me a mere
3 million, while he usually grosses a healthy 30 to 40), it's still a
great film, just not as absolutely amazing as it could have been.
"The King of Comedy" deals with a kind of incarnation of Travis Bickle:
Rupert Pumpkin (Robert DeNiro), a flamboyantly confident wacko who feels
he has a natural knack for comedy, although you wouldn't know it when
you met him.  Instead of coming off as a funny guy, he's merely creepy,
with a giant grin on his face, and a little moustache (which he dug up
for his character in "Copland").
In the first scene, we see him outside waiting for autographs from any
or all of the guests of a hit late night talk show, hosted by a Johnny
Carson incarnation, Jerry Langford (Jerry Lewis).  Jerry is a quiet and
somehow beaten man, who was probably a riot back in his younger days,
but is now rather bitter.  Yeah, he's still funny, but it's more in that
kind of cynical way.  On this particular night, Jerry comes out to go to
his limo, but stumbles upon a little problem when an overly obsessive
fan (Sandra Bernhard) climbs into his car with him.  He gets out,
waiting for security to drag her out of the limo, then hops in. 
Unfortunately, so does Rupert.
Sounding like the typical I-wannabe-a-star kind of loser, he tells him
he wants to have a shot doing his stand-up on his show.  Jerry hears him
out, then tells him to call his office.  Rupert bugs him a bit more,
then lets him go.  Of course, we all know he didn't really mean for him
to call him.  He just wanted to get rid of this wacko.  But Rupert
didn't.
Rupert seems to plaster himself inside the reception room in his office,
handing one of his supervisors his demo tape, and even saying he'll wait
in the room over the weekend, until Jerry listens to it.  Of course,
she's the one who listens to it, disses him, and Rupert's obsession
grows and grows.  He's not aware of his lack of sanity; he's too
confident in himself and his act, which is funny because his comedy is
all about how horrible his youth was.  And when nothing else seems like
it's going to work (since he's too impatient and too old to just build
himself up from nothing, and earn the shot on the show), he goes for the
extreme way.
He and Bernhard, who has other reasons for doing it, decide to kidnap
him on one of his walks through the streets.  This is one of the things
that got to me: why does he do this?  In one scene where he does it, it
starts off seeming like a dream of his to walk down the street and joke
with some of the "plebians," but then turns into reality as people diss
him for him dissing them, and he is soon being followed by Bernhard.
But anyway, they do it sucessfully, and he's soon using him to get his
spot on the air.  Instead of being manic or something, it has a cool
kind of darkly comic presence, with several subtle jokes tossed in (like
a guest appearance by Scorsese).  The ending is brutally satirical, as
it is often realistic, although a tad on the ridiculous side.  I know
that doesn't make sense, but just bear with me on this one.
What's wrong with this film is it seems to be missing something.  Yes,
it's sucessful in its satire, but it's just...I dunno.  Maybe it was the
lack of cool Scorsese touches, like tricky camera movement, dramatic
edges rounded out with the soundtrack, etc.  The last half of the film
is not exactly riveting, but it's satirical enough.  And the comedy is
mainly chuckles, although I did laugh out loud during some of the lines
in the comedy act.
Oh yeah, the comedy act.  This is what really got me.  The way it's
presented, we feel uncomfortable laughing with it, mainly because we've
gotten to know how mentally ill this character is.  And when he talks
about some of the more heinous parts of his childhood, I started to
think that he's not really exaggerating, as much as grinning at them. 
DeNiro also plays it perfectly, not actually having superb comic
presence (his writing hints at a little touch by Woody Allen, but he
seems to deliver them like a vaudevillian), which is right for the
character, methinks.
And I wanted to mention that the whole spiel between Lewis and Bernhard
results in one of the creepiest and most horrific scenes I've ever
seen.  And there's not even any kind of Scorsese-esque violence in it or
anything bad like that.  Just imagine Bernhard sitting on your lap and
you get what I'm talking about (*shudder*).
As far as acting, DeNiro is wonderful as the self-obsessed Rupert.  He's
too blind to see how screwed up he actually is, and he does this
awesomely.  Also, Jerry Lewis gives an amazing performance.  Most of us
are used to him being the predecessor to Jim Carrey.  I mean, I saw two
minutes of one of his flicks with Dean Martin, and that high-pitched
voice of his is STILL stabbing at my brain like the knife in "Psycho." 
Here, he's quiet, and bitter.  I mean, it looks like someone gave him
some prozac or something - he's SOOO calm.  If that's what he's really
like nowadays, I wouldn't be surprised.
Anyway, "The King of Comedy" is not the masterpiece it longs to be, but
nevertheless is a very underrated flick in Scorsese's oeuvre.  While he
would perfect his comedy in "After Hours" a year later, this still shows
that he has a good knack for some comedy with substance.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for On the Waterfront (1954)
Director: Elia Kazan
Writer: Budd Schulberg (based on his story)
Starring: Marlon Brando, Karl Malden, Eva Marie Saint, Lee J. Cobb, Rod
Steiger, Pat Henning, John Hamilton, James Westerfield, Leif Erickson, Fred
Gwynne
"I coulda been a contender," says Marlon Brando in the most famous line in
the most famous sequence of this film, a classic which won a ton of Oscars
back in '54, including a well-deserved one for Brando himself, who was in
the prime of his career.  Sadly, this seems to be all that "On the
Waterfront" is remembered for.  Many great Hollywood films are remembered
for mere sequences, lines, or great performances when there are hundreds of
thousands of things to love it for.  "On the Waterfront" is not just "the
film where Brando says "I coulda been a contender," but is instead a
multi-layered intense drama about the importance of unionizing, and even
deeper, of standing up for yourself...and even deeper, of doing what is
right despite the consequences...and even yet deeper, of being
anti-McCarthyistic.  Allow me to explain that last one.
But first, the story of "On the Waterfront" deals with an uneducated dock
worker named Terry Malloy (Brando, when he was young and thin), who's motto
for life is basically "Do it to him before he does it to you."  Everyday,
he and hundreds of dock workers line up on the waterfront to get jobs, but
the mafia who controls the union always overadvertises, and only a select
group of men can get jobs for the day, leaving many with a cold "Come back
tomorrow."  But Terry always gets picked, not only because his brother,
Charley (a young Rod Steiger), is a major player in the head of the union,
run by the ruthless Johnny Friendly (a scene-stealing Lee J. Cobb), but
also because in one of the early scenes he helped them catch a man who was
going to rat on them to the courts the next day...but unbenknownst to
Terry, they were going to kill him.
Soon, not only does he run into the man's daughter, Edie (Eva Marie Saint,
later playing the mischeavious girl in Hitchcock's "North by Northwest"),
who begins falling for him, but also Father Barry (Karl Malden), who is out
to get the workers to unite and rebel against the harsh treatment by Johnny
Friendly and his goons.  However, no one will join up for fear of murder or
a lack of a job afterwards, but after one of Terry's friends, "Kayo" Dugan
(Pat Henning) joins up with the Father and is subsequently murdered in an
"accident," Terry begins to doubt what he's doing, and begins to think
about his past and what he should do.
Turns out that Terry, who everyone calls a "bum," was once a boxer, and the
night he made it all the way to Madison Square Garden for the fight of his
life, where he knew that he'd be the big winner, his brother, who was
managing his career at the time, forced him to go down for a bit of money,
leaving Terry a broken boxer, and crippling his self esteem.  Terry has
been afraid to take any action for his life up till now, but the film
explores it intelligently, as ratting on his bosses may mean harm for not
only him, but people around him.
The ending of the film, taking place after Terry has gone to court and told
everything he knows about Johnny Friendly and his operation, is heroic and
crowd-pleasing, but also smart and downright wonderful.  It might seem like
a typical Hollywood ending, but has backed itself up smartly, and truly
earns any cheers from the audience.  The film on the surface seems to be
about the importance of unionizing for the downtrodden workers (somewhat
Communistic, which explains why this was controversial even before it was
released), and also about the importance of doing the right thing no matter
what the horrific consequences.  Terry's dilemna is a real-life deilemna,
and the film explores it as a parable about ordinary life, not just about
dealing with unions.
But when one knows the history about this film, they know that the director
Elia Kazan (who also directed the original brilliant "A Streetcar Named
Desire," which also starred Brando) was under questioning in the McCarthy
trials, where he was forced to name names about who was a Communist and who
wasn't.  While this doesn't directly parallel the film (the film seems to
be pro-Communism, sorta, and views the men he has to rat on as really being
bad), it seems to be Kazan's way of trying to get forgiveness for what he
did from his peers.  Sure, it's personal propaganda, but it works anyway.
Seeing as this is a powerful drama, it also features lots of stand-out
acting from various actors.  Lee J. Cobb as the boss Johnny Friendly is one
hell of a scene stealer, while Rod Steiger is wonderful as a brother who
knows he has harmed his sibling almost beyond recognition or forgiveness,
and Pat Henning is brilliant in his short role as a doubting dock worker
who choses the wrong day to go to work.  In bigger roles, Karl Malden is
typically awesome as the rousing priest, and Eva Marie Saint, who won an
Oscar for her performance, is downright wonderful as the loving but
vengeful sister, out to stop the men who killed her brother.
But need I even say the best performance is from Brando?  Brando's an actor
who at his best if the best actor who ever lived, and here, he's in one of
his very best roles, a performance which almost overcomes his acting as
Stanley Kowalski in "Streetcar."  Brando's a method actor, so he's really
Terry Malloy, and he's 100% believable in the role.  Every quirk and
mannerism seems like the character's, and he presents him as a man who's
simple, but filled with a past which haunts him all the time.  Watching
Brando is one of the greatest experiences in all of film history, and his
Terry Malloy is one of the best performances by an actor ever captured on
celluloid.
What's left after "On The Waterfront" is not just the climactic "I coulda
been a contender" scene, but the entire message and feel of the film.  Who
can forget Terry's cynical motto in the beginning?  Or the sight of Brando
caring for pigeons on the roof of his building?  Or the pain in Rod
Steiger's eyes when he pulls a gun on his brother?  Or the finale, which is
filled with so many emotions that we're not sure how to react to them right
away?  "On the Waterfront" is one of the best films I've ever seen, not
because it's a complex execution in film surrealism like a Bergman film
(which it isn't), but because it's one of those films that can inspire and
touch an audience with a unviersal message, move people with an emotional
and powerful dramatic storyline, and even get people to forgive anyone who
is forced to rat on his friends.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
Director: John Dahl
Writers: David Levien and Brian Koppelman
Starring: Matt Damon, Edward Norton, Gretchen Mol, John Turturro, Famke
Janssen, John Malkovich, Martin Landau
"Rounders" spends a lot of time in the cellars and card clubs of Manhattan
and elsewhere to prove one thing to itself: it has no problem with diving
full head into its subject.  This is not a film where the hero learns a
lesson about gambling and the dangers thereof over the course of the film. 
He doesn't win one last card game in the end to prove to himself that he
can in fact beat the best card player in the world so that he never has to
play again.  He doesn't even get the girl in the end.
The fact that it doesn't bullshit itself about gambling is one of the few
reasons "Rounders" works at all.  This film is never more exciting and
engrossing when characters are engaging in a tough game of poker, with the
stakes reaching as high as they can possibly go, smoke teeming from
everywhere, and cool jazz music underscoring everything.  And it's never
more boring than when it's dealing with the melodrama of the plot or the
lives of the characters.  If this film had just been two hours of guys
playing poker games, with a very skimpy plot, I'd actually be more pleased.
But screenwriters David Levien and Brian Koppelman don't have the guts to
do that.  I imagine that the first draft of this film really took us into
the lives of Rounders, the guys who play poker for a living.  Imagine a
stylistic masterpiece that introduced us to the lives of these people, and
showed many games and the methods they use.  Films are never more
engrossing when the characters are the spotlight and plot elements are just
the reaons we watch them, especially when they have such an interesting
subject.
As such, "Rounders" is merely adequate, with signs of brilliance underneath
that go pretty much unchecked.  The film opens nicely, with an intense game
of poker between the film's protagonist, one Mike McDermott (Matt Damon), a
young law student who is a kick-ass poker player, and Teddy, a.k.a. KGB
(John Malkovich), a Russian mobster who is a more kick-ass poker player. 
Mike typically loses, but the film really works because it's not really
about the outcome.  It cherishes the process of playing poker, and the
narration by Mike is so good and fascinating that it sets the film up
unfairly, in a sense.
Mike decides that he's not going to play poker, as a promise to his
beautiful girlfriend, Jo (Gretchen Mol), who comes off not so much as a
nice girlfriend who's really cared about him but more as a painful maternal
annoyance.  Mike's life changes when his old best friend, nicknamed Worm
(Edward Norton), gets out of jail for a gambling rap and needs to make a
ton of money to pay off some outstanding debts to some very bad people.  So
for the first hour, Mike has the dilmena of whether he should help out a
friend and gamble...or fuck him over and obey his girlfriend instead.
By the second hour, though, Mike has given over to the gambling side, and
when Mike and Worm are playing numerous tables, trying to make his money
back, which Mike has agreed to share with him, the film really takes off. 
A worthy subplot is introduced towards the beginning, showing that Worm
likes to cheat, which not only gets him in trouble, but conflicts with
Mike's code of gambling ethics.  It works because there's a real tension
between these two as a result, something we actually care about.  If the
screenwriters could have leveled the male-male bonding with the male-female
bonding in this film, they'd really have something.
The result of all this?  A silly script with some cool scenes, and very
good acting.  Damon, whether we like it or not, is a good actor, and is
very likable in the lead role, although it's dangerously close to his
previous role, Mr. Hunting.  Norton is wonderfully sleazy, showing that
he's becoming one of the most reliable actors around, and only after a mere
four screen performances.  In supporting roles, John Turturro is
wonderfully controlled as a long-time gambler who's made a career out of
being totally careful with his card playing; Martin Landau is really good
in a brief role as a judge from Mike's school who helps him get his life
straightened out with one speech (although his reasoning in one scene
towards the end is weak); and Famke Janssen's sorta just there, although
semi-interestingly so, as a woman who works in one of the house of games. 
Malkovich nicely overacts a bit, with an off-the-wall Russian accent
(agressive = ag-ra-i-seeeev) which makes his character all the more
intense.
But "Rounders" big weakness seems to be the lack of real atmosphere and
devilishness, a big shock since the film is directed by John Dahl, the guy
who directed the devilishly entertaining "The Last Seduction," which
featured a femme fatale who was never forced to pull her punch.  Although
the script pulls its punch in the beginning and works its way back again,
there's nothing truly fascinating about what goes on when poker is not
being played.  The melodrama and character development seems more like
filler than real character development.  The characters, like that of
Turturro's and Janssen's, are there to represent some of the elements of
poker playing, but are sadly underdeveloped (at least Turturro can act well
enough to slighly cover it all up).  And the film just never truly
convinced me that it was a totally important story to tell in the first
place.
However, I did enjoy this film.  It worked for me, mainly because there is
poker that is played, and it works every now and then as an introduction to
that world.  There's a scene where all the big rounders are sitting a table
in an Atlantic City casino, and Mike's narration tells us all about the
suckers who sit down and try to play with the big players.  Scenes like
this are when "Rounders" truly works, and since this is what pretty much
populates the second half of the film, it's almost impossible to not really
like this flick.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
Writer/Director: Andrew M. Niccol
Starring: Ethan Hawke, Uma Thurman, Jude Law, Loren Dean, Alan Arkin, Gore
Vidal, Ernest Borgnine, Tony Shalhoub, Xander Berkeley, Blair Underwood,
Ryan Dorin, Elias Kosteas, Jayne Brook
If you had a chance to create a genetically perfect child, would you do it?
 "Gattaca" is a film which presents a future where society has answered
"yes" to this question, but then ponders if this was actually the right
decision.  "Gattaca" came out only a couple months following the first
genetically engineered creature, the lovable Dolly the Sheep, and with this
in mind, the film only becomes more frightening.  The way the realm of
genetics is heading, it may only take a couple decades until the future
"Gattaca" presents becomes true.
Contrary to the misleading trailers, "Gattaca" is not a sci-fi thriller, in
the way that there's lots of murder, Hitchcockian suspense, and chase
scenes.  This is a quiet, sad film about intelligent theories.  In fact,
the film seems like it would have been written by George Orwell or Aldous
Huxley (the latter who's novel "Brave New World" featured genetically
engineered children).  It's a film that may likely become a cult hit to
people who are frightened by a promise of shallow Utopia, which is exactly
what "Gattaca" presents...and the main reason I dug it so much.
The story revolves around the genetically insufficient Vincent Freeman
(Ethan Hawke), a man with high hopes but a 90% chance of heart problems,
and a prospected life span of around 30 years.  As a child, he was put down
because of the threats of genetics, while his younger genetically perfect
brother, Anton (Loren Dean), was promised whatever his heart desired. 
Vincent yearns to be an astronaut, but when he gets a job at a giant space
company, it's as a janitor (Ernest Borgnine plays his boss!).
But one day, he finds out that it's probably possible that his desires can
come true in the form of a business deal brought out by a black market
geneticist (or something), German ("Wings"' Tony Shalhoub, who did like
hundreds of cameos in films back in '97: "Men in Black," "A Life Less
Ordinary"...), who's client is a genetically perfect man, Jerome Morrow
(Jude Law), who has unfortunately been crippled.  Fortunately, though,
there's no record of the accident, and he's willing to give someone else
his life. Since Vincent looks a bit like him...
After a couple alterations (some minor, some really major), he has donned
the life of Jerome, and is doing his job.  There, he meets a genetically
imperfect woman, Irene (Uma Thurman, who's genetically perfect in real life
anyway, hee hee), and the two begin a kind of relationship, albeit a very
shallow one since romance is deemed by how great a man's stats are.
However, a murder of a high-level worker at his office is killed, and one
of Vincent/Jerome's eyelashes is found by the anal retentive investigators
headed by a semi-wily inspector, Hugo, (Alan Arkin), and none other than
Vincent's long lost brother, Anton, who hasn't seen him since they were
teenagers.  We know Vincent/Jerome didn't do it, but with his older picture
being posted everywhere, not only Vincent/Jerome's in trouble, but also the
real Jerome, who's as much in it as he is.
However, there isn't many big suspense set pieces, which is actually a
blessing because if they were tossed in, the film would lose it's message
and descend into just being a sci-fi thriller a la William Gibson.  The
suspense in the film comes from the idea that Vincent and Jerome can easily
be captured just by dropping a hair or dead skin.  While there are several
scenes which are pretty frightening, there are no big distractions from the
point of the film, much to the dismay of commercial audiences.
What is actually portrayed is the lack of life in the Utopian society that
is created.  Irene has no real spunk in her life, and is rather amazed by
the sheer beauty of a sunrise rather than genetically perfect people.  And
the genetically flawless Jerome is in actuality a bitter man, claiming that
his accident was really no accident.  What Jerome has done is fool the
system in giving a man who yearns for better things a chance at that, and
the ending is shocking as it's a definite work of dystopian propaganda, but
doesn't have the down ending of other works of this kind.
The production design of this film is probably the best I've seen this
year: it's stunning, very pleasing to the eye, but still very cold.  Since
genetics has ruled out any chance of improvement, the world has cooled into
a state of inhumanity, and the sets echo a sense of shallow misery.  And
the sequence of all the high-level workers doing their jobs has a kind of
Gilliam-esque feel to it, showing the nightmare of slipping into a routine
zombie-like life.  The ability to perfect people has left humanity cold and
generally unhappy.
The acting from everyone is great, with Thurman giving a wonderfully cold
performance, and Hawke creating a character who has been beaten down by the
system but has found a new sense of optimism by a bitter man who was
willing to give it out anyway (interesting pointless fact: Uma and Ethan
started dating after this film, and currently she is pregnant with his
child).  But the best performance belongs to Jude Law, who steals every
scene he's in, and creates a character filled with the pessimism over
having such a horrible burden placed on his burden.
I think that people are generally tempted by the fact that genetics can
actually create perfection in a child, but whether or not they would
actually act on this temptation is something I'm not sure of.  "Gattaca"
warns us not to go any farther, chiefly because we'll create a world of
elitism where the elite are shallow and unhappy, and as bitter and angry as
the lesser people are.  And when I see a possible future featuring a
12-fingered piano player, well folks, that just creeps me out.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Earthquake (1974)
Director: Mark Robson
Writers: George Fox and Mario Puzo
Starring: Charlton Heston, Ava Gardner, George Kennedy, Genieveve
Bujold, Richard Roundtree, Marjoe Gartner, Lorne Green, Victoria
Principal, Lloyd Nolan, Barry Sullivan, John Richardson, Donald Moffat,
Walter Matthau
I looked at the "Internet Movie Database"'s awards section for this
film, and found that THIS was nominated for a Golden Globe for "Best
Picture (Drama)."  Anyone who's seen this film can back me up on this:
this is the WORST of the "great" disaster films, and that's not really
saying a lot for this film.
"Earthquake" is basically notable because it originally included some
theatre thing where the theatre shook when the big earthquake occured. 
On video, it's a bland and slow-moving film which gives us a bunch of
different characters (the disaster film requisite), then brings them
together in the struggle against the big disaster.  While this worked
in, say, "The Towering Inferno," it doesn't here for one single reason:
we don't care about any of the characters.
The film gives us Charlton Heston (in one of many crap 70s films he
made, including "Skyjacked" and that classic, "Soylent Green") as a rich
man married to Ava Gardner, who is having a little affair with a young
single mom (Genieveve Bujold); a renegade police officer on suspension
(George Kennedy, in his least humored performance); in the second
weirdest subplot, a motorcycle stuntman (Richard Roundtree, right after
his "Shaft" thing) whose big stunt is he goes on a little track that
goes upside down (yea, snore); and the weirdest subplot: a military
man/bag boy at a grocery store who has a little thing for buxom Victoria
Principal, and eventually gets vengeance on those guys who made fun of
his hair (!!!).
In smaller subplots, there's a pointless bit about people who are flying
OVER L.A. (the city in the film, by the way), one who's playing cards
and married to a boring non-acting husband (you think this one can go
nowhere?  guess again.  he gets interested in the final frames); there's
Genieveve Bujold's moron son, who has a little adventure with wires; and
for some much-needed comedy, there's Walter Matthau (billed as Walter
Mutha.... - the only laugh in the film), as a wild drunkard, who's big
moment is a dance he does at a critical time.
As for the actual "earthquake," it's rather a let-down.  There's a full
hour of character-setups, none of which is interesting, then about 10
minutes of shaking, crumbling, and a bit where a house almost falls on
Bujold (narrowly missing).  This film needed that whole theatre-shaking:
they needed to wake everybody up because they were so bored.
There's little suspense following the quake, although this film tries
for it.  There's an adventure in a crumbling high-rise office building,
the wires with the kid, and the movement of people who are all injured. 
But none of these are all-too suspenseful.  The finale with the
Heston/Gardner/Bujold love triangle is ended in a basic flip-of-the-coin
bit, which brings out a big let-down.  And there's no real finale.  Even
"Volcano" ended nicely, and that movie REALLY sucked.
Not only is it hokey, but you don't care about any character.  Who cares
if Heston dies?  Who cares if he choses Bujold or Gardner (although I
would have chosen Gardner, mainly on the basis that she can actually
act)?  Who cares if Richard Roundtree makes money on his stupid
"stunt?"  Who cares if that idiot kid falls to his death on some wires? 
And who cares about that whole plane spiel?
If anything, "Earthquake" is worth a viewing for the same reason "Glen
or Glenda?" is.  I mean, I laughed at this more than I did at "Bio
Dome."  But that's another story (and review).  In short, "Earthquake"
gives disaster pics a bad name.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
Director: Tim Burton
Writers: Jonathan Gems and Tim Burton (based on the trading cards)
Starring: Jack Nicholson (twice), Glen Close, Pierce Brosnan, Annette
Benning, Rod Steiger, Lucas Haas, Natalie Portman, Martin Short, Jim
Brown, Pam Grier, Michael J. Fox, Sarah Jessica Parker, Tom Jones,
Sylvia Sydney, Joe Don Baker, Lisa Marie, Danny DeVito, Christina
Applegate
Back before this came out, I was proclaiming that without a shadow of a
doubt that Tim Burton's "Mars Attacks!" was to be the "Dr. Strangelove"
of the 90s.  I mean, the previews looked like it would be hysterical,
cartoonish, and even contain some good old Kubrickian satire.  So much
for hype.
"Mars Attacks!" was probably the biggest let-down since the second
season of "Twin Peaks."  I mean, no, it's not a bad movie, and yeah,
it's pretty much over-bashed (even Kevin Smith said his "Mallrats"
wasn't nearly as bad as this - I kinda disagreed).  But all I wanted was
some good laughs and some satire.  Yes, it suceeds in spoofing disaster
flicks, which have been waning as of late (sob), but it's just not that
funny.
Based on some ultra-violent collecting cards from the 50s (the most
original source I've heard in recent memory), the film tells the story
of aliens arriving from, well, Mars, and giving a kind of neutral
message to earthlings.  Scientist Pierce Brosnan says they're
intelligent, and just want to chill with us.  General Rod Steiger (not
his real title) is convinced they're more belligerent than those aliens
in "Starship Troopers," and we should just nuke them.  President Jack
Nicholson (again, not his real title) seems to be just confused.
After about a half hour or so of unfunny jokes, we FINALLY get to the
first meetings with the aliens.  In a brilliantly executed scene, the
part-Woodstock/part-military peace mission turns into a gorefest, with
the aliens shooting everyone in sight with these weird ray guns, which
ignite people into skeletons.  Another meeting to see if it was a
"mistake" (since a dove was the catalyst in the aliens' anger) results
in another one.  The second one (which was in the great previews) isn't
nearly as funny as the first one, but things take off from here.
Now, if you've seen enough disaster flicks, you know that the most
interesting part is not really the special effects, but the wildly
eccentric amount of characters we get to know.  From Shelley Winters as
a diver in "The Poseidon Adventure" to the hapless Fred Aistaire in "The
Towering Inferno" to, well, Randy Quaid in "Independence Day," the film
rests on the characters...or, sorry, characateurs.  And we get some
funny ones, and some boring ones, but none wacky enough for the film.
To also staying with disaster pic spoofing, the film intercuts between
several locations, including Vegas, the government (and the "Dr.
Strangelove"-esque war room, although hardly as menacing), a hick town,
and even the alien ship.  And we, of course, get the wide variety of
wacky and eccentric chracters that congregated in the disaster epics,
and subsequently died, so we could all get off on a big star (like
Charlton Heston) dying.
But when it ends, and you feel violated.  I mean, the previews were
probably the best of the season, in ways of how cool they made the movie
look.  But, really, the film isn't nearly as funny as they were.  Most
of the funny jokes are in the previews (how rare!).  But when the aliens
turn up, it's pretty enjoyable.  Also, the film kind of cheated us with
prayers of satire.  Not only is the word "nuke" tossed around as much as
"commie" was in Dr. Strangelove, and Nicholson has two roles (one less
than Sellars did in "Strangelove"), but it arrived in the wake of the
"ID4" phenomenon, promising to crack the hell out of it.  And when that
didn't deliver, I felt a tad let-down, to say the least.
In short, "Mars Attacks!" may be Tim Burton's worst flick, but it's not
THAT bad.  But it could have been so much more.  Oh well.  "Superman
Lives" comes out soon.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Heavenly Creatures (1994)
Director: Peter Jackson
Writers: Peter Jackson and Frances Walsh
Starring: Melanie Lynskey, Kate Winslet, Sarah Pierse, Diana Kent, Clive
Merrison, Simon O'Connor, Elizabeth Moody
If you've ever seen Jackson's "Dead Alive" or "The Frighteners," you
know that his big forte is the comic horror film.  So why is he doing a
thoughtful study on two girls' obsession with one another?  Why is he
doing a film where the two protagonists try to kill the one's mother? 
And why is there only blood at the beginning and end?  You'd think
Jackson would defintely be the wrong choice for the director of this
film...until you see it.
"Dead Alive" put him on the map because his gorefest was flawless, and
the best ever filmed.  "Heavenly Creatures" put him on the map because
it's an amazing character study, filled with great style, and some
amazing black comedy.  Almost universally acclaimed as one of the best
films of 1994, Jackson showed he can make critically-acclaimed art out
of film, and not just good arty gore.  And it's true that "Heavenly
Creatures" is probably one of the best films of the 90s.
The "Heavenly Creatures" of the title are Pauline Parker (Melanie
Lynskey) and Juliet Hulme (Kate Winslet, in her first film role), two
teenage girls living in New Zealand who meet in their all-girl prep
school, and quickly become good friends.  But soon they discover they
have a lot in common, and are soon becoming totally obsessed with one
another.  They begin hanging out together during all their spare time,
listening to opera singer Mario Lanza, frolicking in their undies, and
soon writing medieval fantasy stories of a place they wished they could
share together.  They are, what they call themselves, the Heavenly
Creatures, isolated from everyone else.  And, of course, better.
But while their relationship is one of the closest I've ever seen (going
far beyond simple lesbianism), they have some obstacles.  For one, their
parents think they're far too close, and need to be seperated a bit,
especially Pauline's mom, Honora (Sarah Pierse), who soon finds that her
relationship with her daughter is faltering terribly, especially when
they catch her in bed with the live-in worker, Herbert (Simon
O'Connor).  The parents soon want them to be totally seperated, but
they're so close that it's almost impossible to tear them apart.
To answer a particular query, yes, there's a lesbian scene later in the
film.  It's not gratuitous at all (there's no real nudity), and it's not
just like the required lesbo scene: it's a wonderfully directed scene
where we see they share far more than it would seem at first.  I mean,
these girls are so close that when Pauline is having sex with Herb,
she's thinking of Juliet, and how she has "betrayed" her.
By the end, there's a murder plot to keep them together, even though it
would undoubtedly tear them apart when the facts were uncovered.  But to
those of you who would bitch about the stupidity of this, it's all done
in the spirit of psychology...and in the spirit of the fact that this is
a true story.  Pauline Parker was writing popular mystery novels under a
pseudonym, when she came out to say that she was the Pauline in the
famous case of these two, prompting the development of the film.  Just
an interesting back story.
And what a film it is.  Peter Jackson may tone down the gore to a bare
minimum (remember, there's a murder to be comitted here), but his style
is as outrageous as it always is.  He presents a surrealistic world for
these two to live in, complete with a bit of morphing and animation for
the world that they create and shelter themselves in when things are
bad.  He presents everything from the two girls' view, even little
fantasies (there's a great scene where a priest is talking to Juliet
about joing the church, when one of the knights from their fantasy world
comes out and hacks him up).  Not to mention the sets and colors, which
always create the perfect mood for each scene.  His direction has never
been better.
And the acting is awesome.  Melanie Lynskey, native New Zealander, is
great as the depressed, mopey Pauline, creating depth in her character. 
And Kate Winslet is jaw-drop amazing in her performance that even bowed
Emma Thompson over (and got her her role in "Sense and Sensibility"). 
Kate is one of the most talented actresses working now (as well as one
of the most attractive), and her performance is full of energy, life,
and depth.  These two share amazing chemitry, making it believable that
they should never be torn apart.  Also good is Sarah Pierse as Pauline's
strict mother, creating in her a bit of sympathy.
"Heavenly Creatures" is definitely one of the most engrossing and best
films of the 90s, and the film that will put Jackson in the history
books.  If you still haven't seen it, I highly reccomend you get your
arse out there and find it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Jerry Maguire (1996)
Writer/Director: Cameron Crowe
Starring: Tom Cruise, Renee Zellweger, Cuba Gooding Jr, Bonnie Hunt,
Kelly Preston, Jonathan Lipnicki, Regina King, Jay Mohr, Jerry
O'Connell, Beau Bridges, Todd Louiso, Glenn Frey, Eric Stoltz
About a year ago, this film came out, and everyone went gaga.  Reviewers
crowned it as one of the best big budget/big production company films of
the year, and it grossed well over 100 million bucks.  A couple months
later, it was the only big-brand film to do any kind of respectable
business at the Oscars (garnering a supporting nod towards Cuba Gooding
Jr, who needed the career boost).  And Tom Cruise proved that he can
actually act so well that he pretty much becomes the character.  It's
the movie everyone loves...well, except for little old me.
I saw "Jerry Maguire" a couple weeks after it came out with very high
expectations.  As you can tell, it had a lot to live up to.  And for the
first third (a little over a half hour), it was really, really good.  I
mean, I was into the story, I cared about the characters, and the
direction and writing were fantastic.  But then at some point, the film
dove into hokey, corny-as-hell, and bizarre waters, and eventually
seemed to collapse under its own weight.  I couldn't believe that the
film that had started off so good had turned into a mess.
But anyway.  The story is all about a sports agent named Jerry Maguire
(Cruise).  Jerry's a rat, but a likable rat, and he explains all about
himself and his work in the great beginning of this film, using
voice-over narration by Maguire himself, and some great montages linked
together to create a seductive, engulfing, and totally intriguing
opener.  Jerry, who's job requires him to lie through his teeth and use
people right and left, has gained a concious after a long time.  We're
not exactly sure why, but when a young son of one of his clients cusses
at him, it seems to be the catalyst for his awakening, although it seems
that it has been a gradual decent into goodness.
In a sweat-full insomniac night at a hotel, Jerry writes a long,
heart-felt "mission statement," where he pours out how he thinks the
agenting business should be more human, and better to their clients.  He
sends this out to everyone in his office who's at the hotel, and pretty
soon he's gotten recognition for saying what they all wanted to say, but
didn't have the guts.  Then he gets fired.  Quickly, he tries to go out
independently, and grabs only one client out of his bunch: Rod Tidwell
(Cuba), a cocky, self-absorbed, but loving husband/football player.  He
also gets only one person from his office to go with him to be his
secretary or something: single mom Dorothy Boyd (Renee Zellweger), who
has a bit of a crush on him.  Then he leaves with Renee, Cuba as his
client, and a fish.  I re-watched it a couple times, to give it more of
a chance, and I pinpoint that the time the film goes painfully downhill
is once he walks out the door.
Jerry has already gone through the business awakening, but he also has
that whole love awakening to go through.  Earlier at a big party thrown
for him, a bunch of his previous girlfriends diss him on a special video
for him (nice gift).  And he begins falling in love with his secretary,
Dorothy, which is way too hokey and unoriginal to do, in my humble
opinion.  If he could have fallen in love with someone else, maybe.  But
soon he and Dorothy are falling in love, having some sex, getting
married, and soon this subplot falls totally apart.
And the subplot with Cuba also falls apart.  The thing that this movie
wants to do with this is to draw a paralellism between the two, how
Jerry has trouble with love, and Cuba has trouble with giving his all
sportswise.  It goes okay for a while, although it seems to be highly
edited in contrast to the Dorothy subplot.  But then its concluded with
a bit of luck.  Cuba goes through no awakening, and is therefore there
for no apparent reason, other than to give Jerry a client.
The screenplay is kind of half and half.  Crowe has a definite knack for
dialogue (there's this one very long line that Jerry says in the
beginning that is definitely classic).  But while there are some great
lines and some very good dialogue, there is way too many stupid/corny
lines that are almost guaranteed to make you vomit (i.e. "YOU...COMPLETE
ME!" and all the other lines featured in that crap "Secret Garden"
Maguire-edit).
On a plus side, the acting is excellent.  Zellweger, who I don't really
like, gives a very good performance, although there's this one scene
where she looks absolutely stupid trying to get mad at Tidwell.  Preston
proves herself a lovely scene-stealer as Jerry's girlfriend at the
beginning of the film (her first line is indeed classic).  Bonnie Hunt
is fantastic as Dorothy's sister.  I can't really grade Jonathan
Lipnicki, who's Dorothy's very young son, but let's just say he's
"cute," and leave it at that.  Gooding is amazing, but I'm still not
sure if he should have won that Oscar (I still think it should have been
either Edward Norton or William H. Macy).  In smaller roles, Jay Mohr,
Regina King, and Todd Louiso are great.
But the most amazing part of this film is Tom Cruise.  We all knew he
could act (look at "Rainman" and "Born on the Fourth of July"), but here
he's absolutely incredible.  He becomes the role, gets all his quirks
and little neuroses, and nabbed a well-deserved Oscar nomination.  He's
the best part of the film.
"Jerry Maguire" is, ultimately, a failed idealism.  It tries to be the
emergence of indie fare into big budget fare, but just fails in the
end.  But it's just my opinion, and since everyone else seems to love
it, I could be wrong.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer (1986)
Director: John MacNaughton
Writers: Richard Fire and John MacNaughton
Starring: Michael Rooker, Tom Towles, Tracy Arnold
I imagine if "Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer" had been directed by,
say, David Lynch.  He would have made a big joke out of it, and gotten
itself off on the fact that it's about a man who kills for no reason
whatsoever.  He'd have made it into a black comedy, and thus destroyed the
entire effect of the film on the viewer.  John MacNaughton (who would go on
to direct less controversial fare, like "Mad Dog and Glory" and the recent
"Wild Things") takes a completely realistic and serious look at it and the
results are not only disgusting, fowl, and wretched, but also ingenius,
wonderful, and just plain amazing.  No one said you had to be clean to be
intelligent.
"Henry" is a portrait of a guy named, uh, Henry (Michael Rooker), who lives
in Chicago in a terrible apartment with a guy named Otis (Tom Towles),
who's not a serial killer, but knows that Henry went to prison for
murdering his mom when he was a teenager.  The two met in prison, and we
discover that Otis has a parole officer who has gotten him a job working at
a gas station.  We come to realize that neither of them really knows the
other's dark secret, Otis's being that he's a sex offender.
As the film opens up, we see Otis picking his sister, Becky (Tracy Arnold),
up from the train station, and taking her to live with he and Henry.  Becky
is running away from a husband, as well as a whole other life (Becky was a
stripper), and thinks she can find refuge with the two.  She discovers that
Henry killed his mom early on, but instead of being repulsed, finds herself
drawn to him sexually.
As the film goes on, Otis discovers that Henry is a serial killer, and
instead of freaking out, decides he wants to become one as well.  We know
that Henry isn't a serial killer who kills for a reason, or has some kind
of overall method or print that he leaves on every victim.  In the
beginning, we learn that Henry has killed a whole bunch of people just in
the opening minutes, but that all of them were innocent people.  So Henry
shows Otis the ropes of being a successful serial killer (successful in
that you never get caught), but telling him to kill people via different
methods, and never leaving anything to incriminate one's self.
The film is apparently loosely based on the life of a real serial killer,
Henry Lee Lucas, and it almost looks like a film crew sat in with him,
followed him around, and then editied it all together (although we know
that Michael Rooker, the guy who plays Henry, is an accomplished actor,
most recently seen as the sheriff in John Singleton's "Rosewood," so we
know it's not realistic).  MacNaughton's direction is extremely bland,
although I don't mean that negatively: he portrays Henry in a very
realistic manner, not adding any wild directing techniques to what he does,
and because of this digs deeper into the character than any other kind of
film would have.
The film was made in 1986, but wasn't released until 1990 because the film
is so controversial.  It's easy to see why: the film is unrelentless in
portraying Henry without any subjectivity that every scene is eerily
realistic, so realistic that perhaps someone out there might view the film
as a "How To..." on being a serial killer.  But if anything, the realism
scares anyone out of the possibility of becoming a serial killer, because
that means you have to be as screwed up as Henry is.
There's one scene that really got me: Henry and Otis attack a family in
their home, with Henry shooting the entire thing on a video camera.  It's
an unbroken shot, and it's all the more frightening when you learn that the
woman playing the mother, who gets fondled by Otis, went into shock after
the scene was over.  It's one of the most frightening things I've ever
seen, and it would have been really cheap if it had been screwed over with
by some directorial interruptance.
As unrelentless as this film is in being realistic, there is one technique
that MacNaughton uses that not only causes the film to become less gory,
but also to become more scary.  In the beginning, we see a bunch of corpses
of people Henry killed recently, and in the background, we can faintly hear
the sounds of what transpired when he was killing them.  Instead of showing
the scenes, MacNaughton adds even more scariness to the film.  Is it
actually scarier than seeing the murders?  Of course, it is.
And it doesn't hurt that Michael Rooker is incredible in his performance. 
There's a moment in a diner where he seems just like a normal everyday
person, paying his bills, and about to go on his way.  But then the film
cuts to later, and everybody in the place is dead.  There are other scenes
where he's friendly but not too creepy, but others when he's just scary as
hell to even look at.  His performance is unrelentless, just like the film
is, and never pulls its punches, much like the film (again).  The others,
Tom Towles and Tracy Arnold, are also great, but not as great as Rooker
(probably why Rooker actually has a semi-career).
If there's a problem, it's that we never really understand Henry.  The film
doesn't dig down into why he does things, and we never really get to know
what Henry's about.  But isn't not really knowing everything about a person
what a portrait is?  The film simply portrays Henry for who he is, and
there are no reasons applied to why he's a serial killer.  Yes, we learn
that he killed his mother because she was a "whore," but then why does he
kill a waitress at a diner who merely rings up his bill?
By not giving reasons, the film actually becomes stronger.  We learn to
notice things for ourselves, like how Henry may not be able to really
function with people, and anyone who gets too close to him, or even ask of
him any friendly compliments, may ellicit some homicidal tendencies in
Henry.  Or maybe it's just that he can't help it, and he can't explain why
he does things.  Instead of being bogged down by some director who wants to
put an imprint on this film, MacNaughton is wise and doesn't allow anything
to interfere with the portrait of this horrific and unexplainable human
being.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Jungle2Jungle (1997)
Director: John Pasquin
Writers: Bruce A. Evans and Raymond A. Gideon
Starring: Tim Allen, Sam Huntington, Martin Short, Lolita Davidovitch, 
JoBeth Williams, David         Ogden Stiers, Leelee Sobieski
Okay, I just don't know why, but I seem to be getting this diversion to 
Disney-made real-life actors movies...as well as real-life acting Tim 
Allen movies.  I couldn't even make it through "The Santa Clause," so 
why did I even see this?  (just to make an idle point, I DID like "Toy 
Story," but that was good)  Also, I have this aversion to bad French 
farces, and if they remake them into American films.  Well, this is my 
excuse: it was prom night, I'm not a prom person, my best friend and I 
impulsively went to the Drive-Ins where they were playing "Grosse Pointe 
Blank" - wouldn't mind seeing it again - but I had to suffer through 
this first.  I agreed to go.  Ugh.
In all fairness, I can say that at least this inane plot wasn't dreamed 
by an American.  It was originally a french film released in America 
under the pseudonym of "Little Indian, Big City" (French title - "Un 
Indien dans la ville").  I stayed away from it like it was limburgher, 
and according to Roger Ebert, that was a good idea.  But I can only 
imagine how bad that must be if this is an improvement.
The stupid plot concerns a father who just learns he has a son from his 
current marriage. Let me clarify: his wife (JoBeth Williams) left him 
years ago, and I mean years - around 13 or so - and went to an island in 
the Carribean or something.  He goes to her to FINALLY get the divorce 
papers signed so he can remarry this...thing (played with an emphasis on 
over-done by Lolita Davidovitch, who is usually good).  She tells him he 
has a son as his boatman goes off.  He meets him, he has a weird name 
(Mimi Seku, I think...or as the bad joke goes - "Mitsubishi" - laugh 
track cue), he knows english, they fish, more bad jokes, pirhanna joke, 
the kid has a pet spider, he makes a promise to take him to the statue 
of liberty...you know the drill.
Now this is where the plot complicates (well, complicates for this one, 
at least): the Fish-Out-of-Water joke switches from Tim Allen on an 
island to his island son in New York City.  Tim is a stock broker and 
his coffee profits are plunging because his laptop died and he wasn't 
able to communicate with his assistant or whatever he is - Martin Short. 
 A russian mob is tossed into the plot somewhere (how come in EVERY 
hokey french import, there is a mob?!)  Tim learns a lesson of life from 
his son and we discover that cellular phones can operate on an island 
even though there are no sockets to recharge the batteries.  
The story is crap, the jokes are hokey and not really funny, and the 
actors have to struggle to make it interesting.  But the material is so 
fowl that even a rewrite by Quentin Tarantino couldn't help it.  The 
whole time, I kept thinking that a grown person had to think this up and 
several more grown people had to do this.  At the end of filming, did 
they all scream out, "We've made a great movie, guys!"  I sure hope not. 
Big Question to Get From This Film: why would someone want to remake 
what was billed as one of the worst films of all time if they're just 
going to do it the exact same way?  Huh?  
MY RATING (out of 5): * (for some of the actors' names and a joke or two 
that made me chuckle, I guess...okay, so I really feel bad for it, so I 
only gave it one star)

Title
Review for Sex, Lies, and Videotape (1989)
Writer/Director: Steven Soderbergh
Starring: James Spader, Andie MacDowell, Peter Gallagher, Laura San
Giacomo
In an age where sex is shown in its entirety, where graphic sex scenes
seem to populate more and more movies, it's a blast to see a film that
blatantly talks about sex but never features any actual skin.  And it's
even more of a shock that not only is there no skin and very little
actual sex, but that it's actually more erotic than all of those little
cheapie films.
"sex, lies, and videotape" was the film that basically made the indie
film chic, back in its early days of the late 80s.  Writing the
screenplay in about 7 days, Steven Soderbergh made this very talkative
film, sent it to Cannes, and came home with the coveted "Palme D'Or." 
Truthfully, it's not a masterpiece, really, but really a fantastic
character study out to prove a point: talking about sex is more of a
turn-on than actualy sex.  And it makes its point wonderfully.
The film is about, well, sex, lies, and videotape.  Centering around
four characters, all with some screwed-up aspects of sex in their
individual respects, it's a fascinating film that holds one's focus for
its full 100 minutes.  It unfolds like a wonderfully-written novel,
introducing us to characters one-by-one, then tying them together
brilliantly.  This is not only brilliantly written, but also brilliantly
directed and acted, with all four leads giving no less than amazing
performances.
James Spader plays Graham, who basically lives in his car, and roams the
country like a drifter or nomad.  We learn very little of him at a time,
and he's the most intriguing character in the whole film.  Anyway, the
film's plot takes off when he arrives at the home of his old college
roomate's, John (Peter Gallagher), a lawyer who's married to a sexually
barren wife, Ann (Andie MacDowell, before she became moderately big),
who thinks sex his over-rated.  But John is really conducting an affair
with Ann's more liberal sister, Cynthia (Laura San Giacomo, from "Pretty
Woman" and the current sitcom "Fired Up").
Ann is as fascinated with the mysterious Graham as we are, and ends up
apartment shopping with him one day.  Following this little shopping
excursion, they have lunch together, where they do a bit of flirting,
and begin confessing a bit, where Graham announces he's impotent.  He
ends up buying an apartment, and when Ann goes over to see him, she
finds a bunch of tapes he's made with woman.  At first, she thinks there
kinky tapes of him having sex with woman (then she remembers he's
impotent), but he kind of calmy announces that they're his personal
project: videotaping women talking about sex.  She, and we, are
disturbed (and with good reason), but are undeniably fascinated by
what's going on.  She leaves awkwardly, turned off, but, of course, not
being able to put this away in the back of her mind.
Thins happen with the four characters, and soon, not only does Cynthia
find Graham's little fetish intriguing as well, but she has soon made a
tape for him, finding it much more of an actual turn-on than actual sex
with John.  When Ann makes a tape, it's probably the best scene in the
movie, since it becomes the enzyme which fuels the characters to come
out in the end the way they do.
This is, of course, a film primarily fueled by characters.  The plot is
moved only by characterization, not some cheap plot device.  The use of
videotaping sexual confessions is not a cheap plot gimmick, but rather
an outlet that is created by one of the characters to compensate for a
lack of interest in sex.  This is really true-to-life, since sex is
basically interesting for a while, but gets old, but talking about it is
pretty much immortal.  The scene where Graham interviews Ann for the
camera is one of the greatest film scenes in recent film history, as it
shows the characters opening up in ways they wouldn't before.  Each
character is mysterious, but soon shows they are human and unique.
The acting is superb from all four leads.  James Spader, who has never
made it big, but is pretty much a great actor in most of what he does,
has created a role which would be laughably bad if done by a lesser
actor, but he hits all the right notes, making him mysteriously
seductive, yet still human.  Spader's one of the more underrated actors
around, but shows us here that he is a fantastic actor.  Andie
MacDowell, who is often criticized for her acting, is also amazing here,
and also hits all the right notes in her character.  She seems like she
would be the wrong choice for the role, judging by what she usually does
in her work as of late, but shows she's a very talented actress, making
her character multi-leveled and human.  Peter Gallagher, who's also very
underrated, has the tough part in the respect that he's the least
likable character in the film.  He's the adulterous, lying husband, who
never really fully understands the videotaping, but is nevertheless
brilliantly acted by Gallagher.  And Laura San Giacomo, who also never
made it big (I'm sensing a trend here), rocks in the free-spirited role
of Cynthia, making her likable even though she's doing a horrible thing
to her sister.
Alas, this film is brilliant, but is probably not one of the greatest
films of all time like it may seem.  It's definitely one of the most
important films, and one of the best executed films I've seen, but it's
not a film that has a ton of depth to it.  But the message gets across,
and it gets its job done, and gets it done with flying colors.  It's
mildly erotic, but always interesting.  So, it might not have absolutely
deserved the "Palme D'Or" (I have no clue what else was up that year),
but it's a landmark film in indie history, and it's just a great film to
watch.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Gone with the Wind (1939)
Director: Victor Fleming
Writers: Sidney Howard (based on the novel by Margaret Mitchell)
Starring: Vivien Leigh, Clark Gable, Olivia De Havilland, Leslie Howard,
Hattie McDaniel, Butterfly McQueen, Thomas Mitchell, Barbara O'Neill,
Caroll Nye, Harry Davenport, Leona Roberts, Everett Brown, Howard C.
Hickman, Laura Hope Crews
I've been reading a lot of reviews of the most recent re-release of "Gone
With the Wind," the epic Civil War soap opera we've almost no doubt been
brought up on by our parents, and I'm actually shocked to find that the
words "Gone With the Wind" and "overrated" are used in the same sentence. 
What do I have to say to this: shame on you.  "Gone With the Wind" is not
great primarily because it's a classic, or because it merely portrays a
civlization that is gradually dying.  It's great for many of the same
reasons some people complain about: it's too long, it's story's a little
dated, and it's melodramatic.  And I personally wouldn't have it any other
way.
"Gone With the Wind" is the great sentimental view of the South during and
following the Civil War, depicting the gradual death of slavery,
plantations, and the introduction to segregation and intense capitolism,
all seen through the eyes of the film's famous (or infamous) protagonist,
Scarlett O'Hara.  Played by then-newcomer Vivien Leigh, Scarlett's the
classic Souther Belle: selfish, manipulative, egotistical, lovable.  We
first meet her when she's young, still living on her family's giant
plantation of Tara, the symbol of Southern Pride and the place that will go
through radical changes as the story progresses.
As the Civil War comes and goes, we don't see battles or carnage, but we
see everything from the perpective of Scarlett, who has fallen in love with
the suave but shallow Ashely Wilkes (Leslie Howard), a neighbor of hers who
has unfortunately fallen in love and proposed to his fragile cousin,
Melanie (Olivia De Havilland).  While Scarlett plots and plots to steal
Ashely from Melanie, mostly by befriending her and doing it that way, she
discovers someone else who has affections for her: Rhett Butler (Clark
Gable), the blunt, obnoxious, and intelligent lady killer who makes one of
the most interesting first impressions on Scarlett towards the beginning,
staring at her as she walks up the stairs at a party ("He looks as if he
knows what I look like without my shimmy," she remarks to a friend).
As the film progresses, Scarlett will loose everything, including a couple
husbands she marries not out of love but out of revenge and financial
desperation (in that order), and as the Civil War ends and the North claims
the South for its own, we see a battle between Scarlett's obsession with
Ashley and her unrequited love for Rhett, the former who loves her in that
nice way, the latter who simply adores her ("What a woman," he says once). 
Since the film runs about four hours or so (with an intermission, of
course), a lot happens, and instead of the film ending when Scarlett
realizes after she has lost everything that she "will never be hungry
again," the film keeps on going, mostly because this film is not about
Scarlett coming to the realization that she is an independent woman, but
has to come right back to the beginning of the film again.  Through four
hours of film, everything and nothing has happened.
For the fans of this film, this plot summary will probably be a refreshment
of the fun of just watching the events of the film unfold, which perhaps
may result in going to see the most recent reissue of this film, a ten
million dollar re-enhancement by Ted Turner that is currenly playing in
theaters (a weird experience, simply because the aspect ratio is that of a
TV - just one of the many older films that I wish had been filmed in
widescreen, if it had been around back then).  For those of you who've
never seen it before, this may be a good reason to actually go see it for
your first time.  Why?  Because of the two reasons many people give for
liking this film: because it's a classic and it's a masterpiece.  Two
reasons to see any film.
I don't consider every old film to be a classic or a masterpiece, mainly
because they are two completely different things and not every film made in
the past is one of them, let alone both.  "Gone With the Wind" is, though. 
It's a classic because it's not dated at all; it has effortlessly stood the
test of time.  We watch films like "Forbidden Planet," a great film that is
horrifically dated, not because the special effects have been improved, but
because of the hokey stench that it wreaks of.  "Gone With the Wind" has
none of that.  There are no unintentional jokes in this film.  Many of the
laughs in this film (and there are many, believe me) are laughs that we
could share with the audience of 1939, who saw this for the first time. 
Not to mention that Vivien Leigh and Clark Gable have lost none of their
appeal: she's still a babe, and he's still the man.  Watching them interact
is still one of the most engaging and wonderful cinematic experiences of
all time (their banter is killer).  "Gone With the Wind" is one of the few
films that has lost none of its power to entertain in its 60 or so years of
being in existence, and that's why it's a classic.
Why it's a masterpiece is a little more complicated.  But I can sum that up
in just a few words: becuase it tells a great story and it tells it well. 
There's not one chief character in this film who is not likable and who is
not seen in their full dimension.  Scarlett, even though she's a
manipulative bitch, is a lovable manipulative bitch who we root for and
againt without even thinking about it.  We all want her to get with
Ashley...and we don't because we don't want to see Melanie hurt.  And don't
tell me that you're not both saddened and satisfied by the film's final
scene, where Rhett answers her question of "What am I going to do?" with a
hilarious and sarcastically cold, "Frankly, dear, I don't give a damn." 
She got what she deserved and we're happy she did, but we also feel
something for her in that ending, some kind of pathos.  It's damn near
cathartic.
Scarlett could be seen as the sole tragic character in the story if most of
the main characters weren't tragic as well.  Rhett Butler is a man who has
everything he could possible have except the love of the woman he loves,
which ultimately destroys him and leaves him more cynical than in the
beginning.  Melanie is one of the saddest: a woman who is nice through
everything and becomes one of the main reasons for Scarlett's sadness in
the end.  And Ashely is the inept fool of the film, never realizing his
true importance and winding up losing the one woman he loves.  The sole
voice of reason in the film is Mammy (Hattie McDaniel, who won an Oscar for
her performance), the African American nanny to Scarlett, who is faithful
to her owners even after the War, and who lends pragmatic advice throughout
the film ("It ain't fittin', it ain't fittin', it ain't fittin'!").
And who can deny the scope this film places on its story?  We actually see
the passage of time contrasted in the story of the characters.  We see the
Old South die and be reborn, only differently, as we see Scarlett die and
be reborn, only differently.  We see Atlanta thriving as a busy city, then
burned down, and then rebuilt.  This film knows what happened during this
time, and it effortlessly portrays an accurate history lesson while telling
a delightfully absorbing melodramatic story about characters we like.
But none of these reasons are really why "Gone With the Wind" is such a
great film, and so worthy of being placed on the same list of great films
of all time as "Citizen Kane" and "Lawrence of Arabia."  The real reason is
because it never bullshits us about its story.  It just tells it, and never
denies us anything that we should know.  The film is about four hours long
because it has a long story to tell, and to leave out anything would result
in a lesser film.  This film is great because it has a great story to tell.
 Becuase it has amazing acting.  Because Vivien Leigh and Clark Gable are
the perfect mis-matched couple of all time.  Because it has a killer
script.  Because Victor Fleming (and all the other guest directors, like
George Cukor) knows how to set up shots perfectly (my favorite is still the
pull back to show Tara at sundown in the beginning - orgasmic).  Because
it's a bit dated.  And because for four hours you can see one of the very
few times when Hollywood just got a film right, and wasn't afraid of a
lengthy running time or cost.  I really don't want to compare "Titanic" to
this, because it's just not going to be as great as this film for at least
another 30 or 40 years, but when Hollywood really pulls out the stops and
is concerned with everything at the same time, including the story, that's
when a great film emerges.  And "Gone With the Wind," for all its 222
minutes of running time and seeping soap opera structure, is one of the
greatest films of all time.  That's inarguable.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Natural Born Killers (1994)
Director: Oliver Stone
Writers: Richard Rutowski, David Veloz, and Oliver Stone (based on a
script by Quentin Tarantino)
Starring: Woody Harrelson, Juliette Lewis, Robert Downey Jr., Tom
Sizemore, Tommy Lee Jones, Rodney Dangerfield, Edie McClurg, Bathalzar
Getty, Steven Wright, Arliss Howard, Ashley Judd, Rachel Ticotin, Denis
Leary, Mark Harmon, Jared Harris
"Natural Born Killers" is a tough flick to review.  On one hand, the
message that is to be presented - that the media glorifies serial
killers too much, and one day it's going to self destruct into a giant
stream of pandemonium.  But on the other hand, the film's first half has
almost nothing to do with the second half, thus quieting some of the
blows the second half tries to pull off.  Yes, the film manages to bring
its brilliant view to the screen, and the message is conveyed.  But
something is missing.  So, this is basically a flawed masterpiece.
As the films previews and general media and contreversy over this state,
this is a film about two serial killers who capture the eye of the
media, making everyone seem to love them.  The serial killers in this
film, named Mickey and Mallory (Woody Harrelson and Juliette Lewis,
respectively), are hick young adults who kill Mallory's parents, and
head off on a long killing spree, where 52 innocent or not-so-innocent
people are brutally killed.
The media jumps in on it when they are discovered, represented by a
hyprekinetic Aussie journalist named Wade Gale (Robert Downey Jr) who
hosts a TV show called "American Maniacs," which not only presents
coverage on serial killers past and present, but also glorifies the hell
out of them.  We don't learn a lot about Wade, since he's basically a
characateur (and rightfully so), but we do learn that he is the
stereotypical view on the reporter: selfish, egotistical ("Where are the
close-ups of ME?!," he screams out once), and amoral.  I mean, the guy's
not only married to the daughter of a rich man because he got her
pregnant, but he also has a mistress.
The film starts off with what seems to be a typical Mickey-and-Mallory
bloodbath: the two are in a little diner, are provoked by a couple
rednecks, then take everyone out except for one (chosen in a
horrifyingly sadistic, not to mention darkly comic, game of "Eeeny,
Meeeny, Miny, Moe!" - I'm trying my best to spell these, folks), who is
the chosen to tell the tale.  It's a wonderfully done scene, filled with
lots of black comedy (shots on a bullet about to hit a woman's head,
then stops, then shows blood flying against the wall), lots of cool
violence (again the bullet and the woman), and even some great music (a
great chick punk tune blares out on the soundtrack).  It's glorification
of what they do fits in perfectly with the movie, as we see the real
Mickey and Mallory viewed in the way a movie would present them,
although an Oliver Stone flick, judging from the style.
>From here, though, the film looses its way for about an hour.  Instead
of viewing the message that's supposed to be given here, Stone goes off
on an ADD-filled ride.  We see how they started out (in a brilliant
although kind of useless sequence where her family life is viewed as an
American sitcom, complete with a laugh-track).  We see how they met, how
they killed her horrible father (Rodney Dangerfield, great job) and her
passive though chiken mother (Edie McClurg).  Now this was a problem I
had with the movie: I felt bad that they killed the mother.  I was happy
when Mickey beat the hell out of the father (that guy gets NO
respect...sorry, bad joke).  But the mother was merely scared of him.
Of course she didn't do anything - the father would have kicked the hell
out of her.  I mean, I shouldn't have felt bad for the mother dying, I
guess.
The film introduces Wade, his crew, and his stupid TV show, but then
drops him and goes off with Mickey and Mallory for a bit.  This is where
it really goes wrong.  The film tries to explain the two, how they fight
for no reason, how they felt bad for the accidental killing of an Indian
who tried to help them.  But this fails.  The scene where they are
caught at a "Drug Zone" where they are buying some poison-killer since
they were bitten by rattlesnakes is effective, with a Rodney King-esque
beating at the end, and a lot of great mood and composition.
Here is where the film goes right and doesn't wimp out until the final
credit has rolled by.  We see them in prison after a year, seperated,
and Wade wants to do a live interview with Mickey after the superbowl,
mainly for high ratings.  For the final hour, we get the mayhem the film
has been waiting to deliver.  The story's boiler erupts, and we see what
happens when all these elements are mixed together.  The broadcast of
the interview prompts a large-scale prison riot, and in this mayhem,
Mickey takes out all but two guards, and takes Wade and what's left of
his crew hostage on his search for Mallory's cell, the woman he hasn't
seen for an entire year.
The ending is brilliant, with great symbolism, and brings the film to an
almost satisfying conclusion, if it weren't for the lackluster first
half.
Anyway, the style of the film is definitely different than anything I've
ever seen before in a big-budget film.  Oliver Stone, who is famous for
his quick editing (which was used to perfection in "JFK"), kind of
overdoes it.  Yes, I know what he was getting at with switching between
black/white and color, regular Hollywood cameras and super 8, live
actoin and cartoons.  But for all its worth, it's pretty headache
enducing.  He sometimes switches things at wrong times, and I kind of
feel bad for the actors and crew, since they would probably do a couple
lines, then switch it off and get a whole new camera.  And I pity the
man who had to edit this goddam thing.
The acting is very good, if not sometimes cartoonish.  Olvier Stone has
said the film is supposed to be that way, since it's a ludicrous
situation.  He's right.  It's a fable, and any way to tell it in some
kind of gritty, realistic way would ruin the impact of the film.
Anyway, Woody and Juliette are a fantastic couple, each with his or her
great perks.  Robert Downey Jr and Tommy Lee Jones REALLY go for the
high camp, and I can't even decide which one was more so.  I'm not
saying they were bad, just a tad high on the cartoonish.  I mean, when
Robert Downey Jr. talks about Elton John confessing his bisexuality to
Rolling Stone, he really goes so overboard that he makes Mickey look
sane.  I also want to talk about how funny Steven Wright was, playing a
psychologist being interviewed by Wade...well, that was pretty much it.
I didn't like this film that much the first time I saw it.  It was right
in the middle of my obsession with Quentin, and I couldn't believe that
Stone would be dissing Tarantino's original script so much.  I've read
the Quentin version, and I kind of like it better (the whole first half
is pure Stone), but I'm glad Stone directed this, 'cause it wouldn't be
as good with Tarantino directing.  But anyway, the second time I saw it,
it was the director's cut, and that, mixed with the fact that I was a
little over my Quentin obsession, I actually liked it.
With the director's cut, we get some extra footage that didn't make the
theater version of the film for various reasons.  Interlaced with the
film are a couple brutal shots, like more of Woody raping that one
hostage, and a shot of Tommy Lee Jones's decapitated head on a stick.
But we also get some extra full scenes afterwards, narrated by Stone
himself.
The one that really got me was a further explanation of the
Indian-killing part.  This seemed to deepen it, even if I found it kind
of unnecessary to the message of the film, but he took it out for "time
limiatations" (???).  There's also a scene where Mickey kills a witness
(Ashley Judd) during their trial, and a totally unnecessary albeith
entertaining bit where Denis Leary gives a rant to the camera.  We also
see the alternate ending, where Mickey and Mallory are killed by the
guardian angel guy (Arliss Howard), but the other ending was chosen
(thank god).
To bring a long story to a quick close, "Natural Born Killers" is
basically a flawed masterpiece, but at least gives its message across.
I'm not up for giving it a perfect rating, nor am I up for awarding it a
crap one, but since the positive things outweigh the negative, I'm
giving it a thumb up rating.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Defending Your Life (1991)
Writer/Director: Albert Brooks
Starring: Albert Brooks, Meryl Streep, Rip Torn, Lee Grant, Buck Henry,
Leonard O. Turner, Ethan Embry, Susan Walters, Shirley MacLaine
Probably the reason Albert Brooks is a cult favorite rather than a big box
office draw is because he's like a much less cinematic version of Woody
Allen: he makes films that look and sometimes feel like big budget comedies
like "Father of the Bride" and "Mrs. Doubtfire," but contain so much
intelligence and wit, and deal with some broad and narrow human hang-ups
(mostly his own, but we can all relate).  The thing is if a normal
moviegoer (i.e. not me) went to see one of his films, they'd probably laugh
their goddam asses off because his films are hilariously clever, all while
never shooting over the audiences' heads.  The philosophical ideas are
general ones, and can easily be dissected from the surface.
"Defending Your Life" is one of the funniest and most clever comedies that
I've seen released this decade.  On the surface, it's just a really witty,
and hilarious film about what happens when you die.  But underneath is a
film that's about the way we judge everything we do, about the way we
punish ourselves for missing opportunities, and how we often forget to
merely be human.  The film was written, directed, and co-produced by
Brooks, one of the funniest men alive, who also stars in the film as Daniel
Miller, a reasonably happy man with a lot of neurotic hang-ups, and who one
day hits a bus head-on while driving home in his new BMW (while listening
to Barbra Streisand do "Something's Coming" from "West Side Story," no
less).
Instead of going straight to heaven, Brooks takes his character to a sorta
limbo world called Judgment City, where everyone who dies in America (from
the West Coast, of course) has to go to be calmed down from their "trip,"
and then be forced to "defend their lives."  Right away, this film is
hysterically witty: Judgment City looks like a normal American
city/vacation spot, complete with tall buildings, numerous hotels,
nightclubs, comedy spots, restaurants, and even golf courses (miniature and
real).  It even has billboards, and one woman who works in the city who
tells Daniel that if he has any suggestions on how the city can look more
like a city on Earth, there's a suggestion box at every corner.
As far as "defending his life," Daniel is given a lawyer, Bob Diamond (Rip
Torn - PERFECT casting), as well as a prosecutor, Lena Foster (Lee Grant,
another bit of perfect casting), who has a bit of anger aimed at Bob right
away (Daniel tries to get a mistrial because of this).  Daniel discovers
that he will have four days of trials in a tiny courtroom with only
himself, the two lawyers, and two judges presiding, where he will watch
movie versions of certain episodes of his life that show him as being a
wimp or being strong.
Meanwhile, Daniel meets a woman his age, Julia (Meryl Streep), who has also
recently died in a stupid accident, and the two immeadiately hit it off,
and find that they are entrapped in an earthlike romance.  Both have
varying degrees of unhappiness, and they soon find that they may be parted:
those who win their trials can go onto the "next part of existence;" those
who lose go back to Earth as someone else...and it looks like Julia will be
winning and Daniel will be pathetically losing.
One of Albert Brooks specialities is effortlessly blending hysterical bits
of comedy with warmer more sentimental parts, all without ever becoming
sappy or cheap.  Here, he blows us away with his many pokes at ideas of
afterlife, like how when you die, you can eat whatever you like and how
much you like, all without ever gaining any weight...and it's the best food
you'll ever eat.  And then he gives us a romance which is quirky AND
heartwarming, all because he and Streep have such great chemistry together.
 Brooks makes the cynical jokes while Streep laughs at them, all the while
being subtlely attracted to one another.  It's not often that you see a
comedy that can give us a romance that is not only interesting and moving,
but is also intelligent.
Everything that goes into this film is a part of Brooks and his certain
hang-ups, and his films are comic zeniths of imagining ways of overcoming
his fears and anxieties.  Here, he attacks the way that many of us are too
judgemental and hard on ourselves.  He shows Daniel as having two lawyers,
one who is making excuses for him and trying to show that some lackluster
moments were actually good for him; the other who is constantly criticizing
everything he does, and never really being able to let go of them.  The
fact is that Brooks is probably still plagued with these problems, as we
all are, but this film is a way of being able to at least understand them,
and maybe slightly overcoming them.
Still, if you're not blown away by the way he adds numerous amounts of
depth to his film, you'll at least be bowled over by his great sense of
humor, which finds laughter in basically everything, all while possessing a
good amount of intelligence.  His creation of Judgment City is inspired, to
say the least.  After all, wouldn't God or whatever created us try and make
those who die more comfortable to the massive change of lifestyle?  And
don't you all fear having to explain a very embarassing moment (or moments)
in your life to someone who has control over where you go after death?  And
don't you think that after all your failed relationships that the one time
you meet that someone who you want to spend your entire lifetime with is
after you die?  Isn't that just like life?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Kabinett des Doktor Caligari, Das (1920)
Director: Robert Wiene
Writers: Han Jonowitz and Carl Mayer
Starring: Werner Krauß, Conrad Veidt, Friedrich Feher, Lil Dagover, Hans
Heinrich von Twardowski, Rudolf Klein-Rogge, Rudolf Lettinger
It's amazing how older films like "Metropolis" hold up today: even when we
can do pretty much anything with special effects, films like this still
astound us, not just because it's incredible that the filmmakers were able
to do such wild things, but also because they just look amazing.  What
would otherwise be interpreted as "inefficient" by today's standards is
labeled as "moody" and "incredible."
"The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari" is a simple, subversive film made all the
more interesting because of its style, some of which is due to exactly how
old it is.  For instance, the sets are incredible as they are, but are
given an extra eery tone precisely because of the lack of technology
available at the time of its creation.  Any film which would use lighting
this bright in some cases would be deemed awful and its crew incompetent. 
But here, it creates a great sense of atmosphere which is unavailable
today.
"Dr. Caligari" is also a pretty amazing film, not just be a technological
standpoint, but also becaues the story is so fascinating and creepy.  The
story deals with a crotchity white-haired old man, Dr. Caligari (Werner
Krauß), who gets a booth at a traveling fair to show of a zombie-like
somnambulist named Cesare (Conrad Veidt), who has the ability to tell the
future to any paying customer.  But at night, Caligari sends Cesare out to
kill innocent people.
One of the victims is a friend of a student named Francis (Friedrich
Feher), who becomes obsessed with tracking down the friend's murderer. 
When his fiance (Lil Dagover) is almost killed by Cesare also, the evidence
leads him to Caligari, who, as it turns out, is the director of the local
Insane Asylum.  From here, there's the fantastic finale, and big twist
which concludes this film (which is only about an hour long).
This film, along with such films as Georges Melies' "Trip to the Moon,"
Fritz Lang's "Metropolis," and King Vidor's "The Crowd," is heralded as one
of the best examples of the silent era, and perhaps the best example of
German Expressionism at its most expressionistic.  The sets are some of the
best ever put in a film: every building is designed so it looks crooked,
and everything is grand and wild.  The ligthing, which would be off today,
puts every shadow in the correct place, giving the film an intense
atmosphere.  The costumes and make-up, particularly that of Cesare's, are
out of a nightmare, sticking in the mind long afterwards.  Some images are
just incredible, such as the look of Dr. Caligari, who is one of the
scariest characters ever put on celluloid.
Apart from being visually stunning and ultimately engrossing, the film is a
protest against the government's attempts to control the population like
zombies.  Cesare is the representation of society in the film, blindly
following the mad Caligari, who's thoughts and orders are totally devoid of
contemplation or reasoning.  It's a film that is so angry that it's
difficult to believe that it was ever given the get-go in the beginning.
But, as the story goes, the government interfered with Robert Wiene, the
director, who was then forced to tack on a beginning and ending to his film
where the entire message was supposed to be reversed.  In it, the entire
story, which works as angry, perfect satire against the government, is
revealed to be a lunatic story by a member of the asylum.  But looking back
at it today, especially with that final shot, it actually makes the film
creepier and scarier.  We wonder if the story did or did not happen, and
this the fact that we never really find out is even scarier.
One of the things I like most in films are when they combine a great
stylistic atmosphere and an intriguing story, which holds our attention,
and may even carry a strong political message.  "The Cabinet of Dr.
Caligari" is a perfect example of this kind of film.  Here's a film which
was made when film was still in the pioneer stages, and it takes advantage
of everything it has, turning any kind of fault it may have into an
advantage.
Afterwards, we're left with not only an idea of how many people felt of
themselves being a society as well as their government, but we also see
some of the best example of style ever put on celluloid.  Images like that
of Dr. Caligari looking up at Francis midway through the film, and the
streets of the city are what remain with us forever.  A scene like that
where Cesare tries to kill Francis' sleeping fiance and the following chase
are what we'll always remember.  And "The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari" is a
film which is not only one of the best films of the silent era (or the
German Expressionist era), but also one of the best films ever made.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Se7en (1995)
The writer of this film, Andrew Kevin Walker, went to my high school.
There I said it, and I'm not lying (Andy, if you're reading this, I went
to MASH and the school colors are maroon and grey).  However, this may
have influenced me more to become a writer (though not a good one yet),
I viewed this film with a totally open-mind.  Anyway, this is a
near-brilliant film, written and plotted ingeniusely, and directed by
one of the most amazingly visual directors working right now, David
Fincher (of "The Game" and the underrated third "Alien" flick).  Yet,
I'm still not biased.  Okay, maybe just a bit, but this film is still
near-brilliant.
This film deals with a super-smart serial killer in the tradition of
Hannibal Lecter, but, in a genius idea by Andy, is not even seen until
the end.  And, of course, he's played by one of the best actors right
now, Kevin Spacey (who I knew of back in junior high, just to brag).
The two cops are: Sommerset (Morgan Freeman), a brilliant old
intellectual detective, who thinks rationally and is just generally
intelligent (the guy has a chess board and uses a metronome to go to
sleep); and - (Brad Pitt), a overzealous rookie who is almost the exact
opposite of Sommerset.
In the not-so-genius vein, we get the cliche of the retiring detective
(Sommerset) helping the rookie (Mills) start out in the big city.  Of
course, look what he has to start out with - a case that starts off with
a giant Orson Welles type who is found to have been fed to death by
someone.  Then they find a lawyer who was tortured to death in his
office over the weekend, with the word "Greed" printed on the floor in
blood.  Sommerset goes back, finds the word "Gluttony" in the fat man's
dark apartment, and, following a trip to his local library, comes up
with the conclusion that this killer is killing non-anonomously and
according to the seven deadly sins.
No matter what the trailrs suggest, this is not a race car of a film.
The plotting is very leisurely and allows us to take everything in.
David Fincher is a master of creating memorable visuals and creating
atmosphere (again, look at "Alien 3"), and we see some of his
spectacular visions, even if we have to squint because this film looks
like they canned all the lighting crew on the first day.  Things are
VERY dark, and the flashlights only help in a minimal way.  But shots
inside the killer's apartment, not to mention all the other ones, are
chilling and damn-near flawless.  Even though the pacing isn't fast and
ferocious, we become tense watching it, mainly due to the direction, and
the dazzling editing, which was snubbed at the Oscars for the more
politically correct choice, "Apollo 13."
And the writing by Andy is amazing.  He has created a memorable film out
of what could have been just a typical run-of-the-mill "Oh, no!  There's
a serial killer on the loose!" film (i.e. that season's "Copycat").  Not
only is the killer a genius, but he has devised a plan where there's
almost no way he can loose.  Praying on the character flaws of the two
detectives, he brings them into his web, allows them to get close
enough, then uses them for his "message."  Andy has created a man who
has a strong message that is almost indisputable and would probably be
made by some "wacko" down the road sometime.  He has pretty much made
this guy useless by creating a character who gets his message across.  I
mean, after I left, I was depressed because the message was so true.
And besides, the bad guy won, which is a Hollywood no-no.  And this guy
went to my high school (another interesting fact, Dean Koontz taught
English at my high school before he was what he is, I guess).
The acting, of course, is great too.  I mean, look what they're working
with.  Morgan Freeman, who seems to me to be kind of underrated, is
perfect.  I mean, this guy is just one hell of an actor, and he's
likable and intelligent thorughout the whole film.  The way he speaks
slowly, and all his expressions, deem a man who is no less than
brilliant.  And Brad Pitt is very good here.  He's a put of misplaced
energy, which is exactly what his character is.  And Gwyneth, who has
three whole scenes (four, if you count...well, just see the flick), is,
of course, awesome.  Trite, but awesome.  R. Lee Ermey, who was the
drill sergeant in Kubrick's "Full Metal Jacket," has a small role too,
but he makes the most of it (one scene involving him, a phone, and the
wrong desk is a classic short joke, in my humble opinion).  And, of
course, Kevin Spacey, captured in the year where he did four films, and
finally got attention, is nothing short of brilliant.  Like Sommerset,
he speaks slowly and seems to always be deep in thought, sometimes
rational, if you go along with what he was doing.
Still, with great direction, amazing writing, and wonderful acting,
somehow this film got mixed reviews.  I mean, what is wrong with this
film?  Is it nothing short of a genious film?  It's dark, brooding,
occasioanlly funny, satirical, smart, and entertaining.  Along with
"Silence of the Lambs," this is one of the two greatest serial killer
films ever made.  And the guy who wrote it went to my high school (I'm
not bragging, am I?).
In short, "Se7en," if you've never seen it, is a great film, a highly
underrated film, even if it grossed $100 million at the box office
(mostly because of Pitt), and definitely should be worth seeing.  And
Andy, if you read this, e-mail me, man.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
Writer/Director: Don Roos
Starring: Christina Ricci, Martin Donovan, Lisa Kudrow, Ivan Sergei, Lyle
Lovett, Johnny Galecki, Colin Ferguson
Love.  Sex.  Motherhood.  Matrimony.  Obsession.  These, along with others,
are just some of the American ideals that are given a good skewering in
"The Opposite of Sex," a film that is as hilarious as it is blunt about
life, and is as edgy as it is trashy.  We have here a refreshing, amazingly
acted, and sometimes even romantic comedy that holds more outrageous twists
and selish and/or shallow characters than the entire run of "Melrose Place"
ever will, and makes itself extremely entertaining thanks to a fresh format
and a plot that just never stops becoming more and more weird.
The key to the whole film is that at some point, all of the characters
becomes selfish in one way or another, all because of ideals they hold
higher than anything else.  They bullshit themselves about things that
don't matter as much, and the one character who doesn't bullshit is the
film's protagonist, Deedee Truitt, a 16-year-old bottle-blond Lousiana
trailer park scumbucket who just happens to be the composite of every smart
blond from any film matched with every single femme fatale to ever grace
the screen.  Two catches: she's played to perfection by Christina Ricci,
who is finally coming into her own as a serious actress by destroying her
childhood movie career (and sucessfully); and she's our friendly narrator
for the entire duration of the film.
The film is just jam-packed with plot, so here's a quick run-down: Deedee
runs away from home with her one-testicled Christian-as-hell boyfriend
following the death of her tryannical stepfather, and ends up ditching him
so she can stay with her wealthy half-brother, Bill (Martin Donovan), an
openly gay school teacher.  She soon seduces his young dim live-in lover,
Matt (Ivan Sergei), who allegedly impregnates her after a couple romps in
the sack, and upon Bill's discovery of their tryst, the two hike off with
$10000 of Bill's.  That's only in the first fifteen minutes.
I won't reveal much more, but I will reveal some of the important
characters in the story, the most notable being Lucia (a non-dim Lisa
Kudrow), a bitter shrew who's opposed to sex and is friends with Bill
because her brother, Tom, was Bill's boyfriend for years until his
sorta-recent death, leaving the two in different forms of mourning.  Also
on the character list is Carl (Lyle Lovett), the lonely local sheriff who's
forced to investigate Bill because of molestation charges brought on by a
gay ex-pupil of his, Jason (Johnny Galecki), yet another weird character in
the film who's funniest moment comes towards the beginning when his pelvic
skwirming is explained as a "new piercing."
As the 100 minutes of the film fly by, covering everything from a sloppy
stakeout to even a murder and a birth, this film completely trashes every
ideal that its characters bring up, all skewered by our lovely narrator,
Deedee, who's cynicism is so seductive that some scenes I almost prayed for
her to come in with obnoxious commentary...and she did.  Two characters
will be discovering they are finally in love and Deedee will suddenly come
onto the soundtrack and say "Yuck."  Just what we were thinking.  Deedee
gives the film the exact feel it is going for, that of our reaction to
people's bullshit actions at that point in our lives when everything seems
phony.  Like Holden Caulfield, Deedee is convinced that everyone is not
being true to themselves, and that they are the only ones in the entire
world who are actually not lying to everyone else, even when she's twisting
people's arms and screwing people over.  She's just being true to her
nature, after all.
Nevertheless, the characters in this film who are not Deedee are for the
most part likable, especially Bill, the poor guy who's career and basically
entire life are trampled over by the results of Deedee's actions, but who
still retains his dignity and respect.  And the film even boils down and
finds depth in the character of Lucia, who's at first just a bitch with a
whole bunch of great one-liners up her sleeve, but then discovers
everything she didn't know in the first place by finding love with the last
person in the cast you'd think would be a suitable mate.
It even deepens Deedee, who's unswerving for the basically the entire film,
and comes out of it as the one character who doesn't discover something
about themselves after all the shit has come down.  She comes off as a lot
like Linda Fiorentino in "The Last Seduction," and is played with the same
amount of talent by Ricci, who has finally come across as one of the best
younger actresses around, and one of the few, like Jodie Foster, to make
smart career moves by starring in risky movies.  Her character, who says in
the beginning "I don't have a heart of gold, and I don't grow one later,"
is almost the tragic character of the film, the one who spoils everything
yet learns nothing.  Yet by the end, we're still not sure if we want her to
grow a heart or not.  Would it spoil the movie or wouldn't it?
The film was written and directed by Don Roos, writer of such chick flicks
as "Single White Female" and "Boys on the Side," but who has finally struck
gold with "The Opposite of Sex," his directorial debut.  It has all the
edginess and hilarity it needs to suceed, and never comes across as cheap
or bitchy.  His direction is also extremely competent, and he proves
himself a great director of good actors, getting amazing performances from
everyone, most especially Donovan and Kudrow, the latter who proves she so
much more than the ultimate vapid actress.  Even Lyle Lovett's apparent
woodiness in acting actually works with his character, who ultimately comes
off as sweet.  But it's really Ricci's picture, and she embodies her with
so much flare that she's impossible to hate or root against, mostly thanks
to her narration, which is exactly what we want to hear when things are
happening in this film even if they aren't always the human.  And weirdly
enough, the best thing about this film is that it does eventually allow
humanity to seep in without corrupting its integrity.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Mirror Has Two Faces, The (1996)
Director: Barbra Streisand
Writer: Richard LaGravenese (based on the script "La Mirror a Deux
Faces" by André Cayatte and Gérard Oury)
Starring: Barbra Streisand, Jeff Bridges, Lauren Bacall, Mimi Rogers,
Pierce Brosnan, George Segal, Brenda Vacaro, Austin Pendleton, Elle
MacPherson, Amber Smith
Barbara Streisand's "The Mirror Has Two Faces" is fluff, but at least
it's good fluff.  It's the kind of film you aren't intellecutally
challenged by, not blown away by, but are entertained for it's full
lenght because of it's wit and the likability of the characters, and
come away from with a smile on your face, even if that is fleeting.  Of
course, it is surprising, what with all the bad press surrounding it,
that it isn't some masterpiece, but oh well.
Even before seeing it, "The Mirror Has Two Faces" is possible of scaring
you off, simply because it is another American remake of a French film,
this time "La Mirror a Deux Faces," which I've never even heard of,
which is a relief.  Many remakes of French films, especially farces, can
be awful, as their source can be even worse.  Take last year's "Jungle 2
Jungle," a remake of the (I hear) putrid "Un Indien Dans La Ville"
(renamed "Little Indian, Big City"), which was only slightly better than
the original (I hear).  But there are times when this works, most
recently with "The Birdcage," a successful remake of a good French
farce, "La Cage Aux Folles" (I personally found the remake funnier than
the original, but that's just me).
Like many french comedies, this film has a pretty unique gimmick: a man
and woman marry not out of lust or even love, but out of respect for one
another.  I mean, it certainly sounds francais.  Of course, this was
directed by Babs herself (who also stars in it), and written by the cool
Richard LaGravenese ("The Fisher King"), which means that it's not just
your regular french remake.  Babs actually gives this film some depth,
even if it does reflect her own insecurities about her looks, which
she's been doing since the 60s (a Premiere magazine that came out around
the release of this film noted that in most of her films there are
scenes where the actors talk about how beautiful she is - these guys
were acting, of course).
Babs plays Rose Morgan, a single college professor who lives with her
still radiant mom (Lauren Bacall, in her best role in like a decade or
probably more), and pines to be beautiful and have a passionate
marriage.  She wants someone to be bowled over by eveything about her,
to adore every foible and all that good stuff.  Of course, then there's
reality.
But into her life comes another professor, Gregory Larkin (Jeff
Bridges), who is kinda dull (he's a math professor) and dorky (again,
he's a math professor), but when he meets her via a dating service, she
and he get along in a friendly kind of way, and become quite
affectionate of eachother, but not in a passionate way.  Gregory has
suffered a lot from pervious relationships (he was once married to a
woman played by Elle MacPherson - we can all understand that), and after
hearing one of her lectures (which sounds more like stand-up than actual
teaching) in class where she discussed how sex brings nothing but
disaster, has decided he's not at all interested in sex.  And he's
interested in Babs.
She and Gregory marry in a civil service, and go along in seperate beds,
living out a pretty dull marriage (they take turns changing in the
bathroom), but sometimes having hints of sexual tension.  Gregory
doesn't want to "spoil" the marriage with sex, since he thinks that by
eliminating sex from the marriage, they can go to the next plateau which
is celebacy (which is what we all know happens to married couples after
a couple decades anyway).  But Babs just gotta have it, and soon the
film goes in different directions, such as the obligatory "Babs gets a
makeover" sequence and tries to look all hot and sexy, but to be blunt,
really doesn't.
Right away, you know this isn't a brilliant masterpiece.  I did not see
Babs' "The Prince of Tides," but I hear it's a genius piece of
filmmaking.  This is not.  But that doesn't mean it's not good.  The
film is, as I said, fluff, and it plays out exactly as fluff.  It
presents lots of interesting characters, such as the protagonists, and
several interesting but brief supporting characters, like Rose's sister
Claire (the buxom Mimi Rogers) and her newly-wedded husband, Alex
(Pierce Brosnan), who aren't exactly happily married, some friends from
each side (George Segal for Gregory, and Brenda Vaccaro for Rose), and,
of course, Rose's hilarious mother.
The film has its share of problems, as all fluff films do, but still
holds itself together, and is a very enjoyable little film.  The acting
is great from all, especially from Babs, who gets to show she's still a
good comical actress; Bridges, who nails his performance; Rogers and
Brosnan, who are hysterically unhappy; and Bacall, who steals every
scene she's in, even from the fast-talking Streisand.  She's always been
a great actress, and it's wonderful to see her in such top form.
In reference to Bacall's Oscar "snub," I don't think she deserved it. 
She was amazing and all, but both Juliette Binoche (who won) and -- (who
didn't) were better than her.  Still, they gave John Wayne the Best
Actor Oscar for his performance in "True Grit," which was about as
standard as the rest of his, so they could have given it to her for the
good old reason that she's been around awhile and has never won.
Streisand's direction is pretty good here, holding the film up well(even
if she did put a song of hers on the end - a duo with Bryan Adams -
*shudder*).  Though it's a tad long (at 126 minutes), it breezes by, and
provides enough entertainment to give me a small but distinct smile on
my face after it was over.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
Director: Richard Donner
Writer: Channing Gibson (story by Jonathan Lemkin, Alfred Gough, and Miles
Millar)
Starring: Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Joe Pesci, Rene Russo, Chris Rock, Jet
Li, Darlene Love, Traci Wolf, Ebonie Smith, Damon Hines
We have reached that stage called comfort.  Those of you who've seen the
other three "Lethal Weapon" films, that is, like me or my dad or a couple
other people I know.  We saw the first one on video or TV and we adored it
so much that when the second one came out, we were there on opening night. 
We saw the third one opening night as well, and we've seen them all
numerous times on tape and TV and whatnot.  And judging by everything that
has gone down in those films, there's honestly very little you can do with
the series anymore.  Sure, you could, I dunno, make Rene Russo and Mel
Gibson's characters, who discovered an attraction between themselves in the
previous episode, get married and have kids.  Or continue the odyssey of
Danny Glover's character's daughter from baby to wife and mother.  But
would those really hold an entire movie.
So why don't we just give them a throwaway plot that we cut to every now
and then, introduce those elements that are there just to make the
characters change a bit, and then just let the characters...live.  Watching
"Lethal Weapon 4" is almost like a really relaxing reunion for everyone
who's been watching these films for the past decade, and who's just gotten
used to the constant bickering of the two protagonists, and the numerous
deadly follies they get into.  I saw this film on opening night, filled
with a crowd of people who no doubtedly had seen the other three and were
just returning not because the movie's previews looked nice, but because
it's yet another misadventure for a bunch of really likable characters that
have grown on us.
Henceforth, "Lethal Weapon 4" is not so much a continuation of the series
as it is a present for the fans, just to keep them smiling and laughing
along with the characters.  It's as if they all knew that the series would
be pretty stale if they tried to make things fresh, so they gave up and
just had fun with it.  And watching this film is like watching flawless
chemistry between actors and between the audience and what's on the screen.
 Those of us who've come to see this film because it's just another chance
to see Riggs and Murtaugh (Mel Gibson and Danny Glover, still sharing
flawless chemistry) laugh with eachother and their supporting character
friends will most likely laugh right along with them.
The plot itself, as I said, is pretty thin, and seems to be a slight
recycling from the sorta-forgettable anti-Asian Crichton novel and it's
later film adaptation, "Rising Sun."  It's something or other with Chinese
Triad members, some people sold into a kind of modern slavery so they can
live in America, and one really bad-ass guy named Wah Sing Ku, played by a
guy named Jet Li, who acts with a cool distance and is able to do any
acrobatic fight sequence that he reminds us of a wannabe Bruce Lee crossed
with Jackie Chan.  Anyways, it's basically just there to fill time, and,
with the exception of promises of big, fun, over-the-top action sequences
as well as some cool moves from Jet Li (or both), it's pretty much
distracting from the real reason we've come to see this...
...and that's for the characters and what's going on with them.  Things are
constantly changing in their lives, and the film takes the time to show
that Riggs and his now-pregnant girlfriend from the last film, Lorna Cole
(Rene Russo) are actually considering marriage, and that Murtaugh's oldest
daughter is really growing up as she's pregnant and actually hiding her
marriage to a cocky police officer named Lee Butters (Chris Rock) a secret
because Murtaugh doesn't want her marrying a cop.  And Leo Getz is still
there, although now he's a P.I.  And, as an added bonus which is rarely
revisited, Riggs and Murtaugh, out of desperation by the department to get
them out of the streets without firing them, are promoted to Captain.  The
main new addition, taking in accordance with the others which added a
member each installment (number 2 it was Pesci, number 3 it was Russo), is
Butters, although he's unfortunately not really a major character, at least
not as major a character as Getz and Cole were when they were introduced. 
He's mainly there to give the film a new area of attraction since he's
mighty hot right now (and with good reason - he's hilarious, though he's
only allowed to use his hilarious style a couple times).
But we also come to see the action sequences, which in this film are
numerous and always crazy.  This is where the films always differ, and what
makes this film a bit inferior to the other three.  Those films took their
action sequenes rather seriously, and their plots were handled as a kind of
contrast to the hilarity the film had in the downtime.  Sure, they were
witty and over-the-top, but the ones in this movie, at least some of them,
are almost annoyingly campy.  The finale, a huge silent fight between
Riggs, Murtaugh, and Li is a long, totally proposterous sequence that ends
satisfyingly...sorta.  And after awhile, they get a bit tiresome.  The only
sequence which really becomes memorable is one in the middle involving a
car chase and a truck dragging Riggs on a table across a highway that is so
over-the-top that it's brilliantly enigmatic.  It's also so goofy and
hilarious that when it was over, the entire audience, who was in stitches
by the last crash, gave it a hearty applaud.
If anything, this film is disappointing in that it's plot is weak, flimsy,
and basically just there to kill time, something that the plots in the
other films weren't.  We were able to really get a big kick out of the
action sequences, and were always in awe of the plots and their numerous
villains.  Remember how amazingly tense the first one got then how it could
effortlessly shift to comedy (same for the second)?  None of that here -
it's all on autopilot.  But with a nice sugar coating of lots of character
comedy that is basically only humerous to those who've lived with the
characters for so long, this film actually comes off as being sucessful. 
It's all because this film comes as the fourth in the series, and we've
found them at a point when it's not even about the plot or the money: it's
about just getting back together and making a movie they can have fun with.
 And it's about us just coming back because we feel like we're all part of
their extended family.  And basically we are.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
Director: Joel Schumacher
Writer: Akvia Goldsman
Starring: George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Uma 
Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Michael Gough, Pat Hingle, Elle MacPherson, 
John Glover, Vivica Fox, Coolio
The last line (or near to that honor) is the great butler, Alfred (the 
ubergod, Michael Gough) saying, "I think we need a bigger bat cave," or 
something to that note.  That's exactly what this film is - too big for 
its own good because it has too damn much.  Cut Batgirl out.  Cut one of 
the villains.  It's too much to handle in one dosage.  It's so much that 
characters get left behind.  Poor Elle gets a mere 3 scenes and a 
subplot which is introduced but never finished in any way, shape or 
form.  And Elle deserves better.
This is the fourth in the gigantic film series and the second from 
director Joel Schumacher.  It's also the fourth worst in the series (and 
second worst from Joel).  The series has been declining since its 
stunning debut, followed by the almost-as-stunning sequel and then the 
anti-climactic third one (first by Joel).  This one's not anti-climactic 
- I knew it was gonna suck.  It's up to Joel to make it fun though.  
"Batman Forever" was fun.  This is a big bore of over-produced action 
sequences and shallow characters.  I mean, this one bit.
I'm gonna put all the plot in one paragraph: Mr. Freeze (Ah-nold), who's 
wife was dying of some disease, has become the new big villain these 
days.  He's a huge ex-scientist who fell into some weird liquid (Hello? 
 Joker?) and now has a body temperature of a big fat zero and has a blue 
body.  Batman (George) and Robin (Chris) fight him a bit but find 
they're growing apart.  Meanwhile, another villain shows up, Poison Ivy 
(UMA!), who was a dorky scientist chick working on flowers in South 
America with a twistet scientist (John Glover) who kills her when she 
finds out he's used her research to develop an uberman, Bane, who is 
basically a man pumped with chemicals which probably killed any 
personality he ever had.  She emerges from her chemicals (don't ask 
'cause I can't tell ya) as a sexy woman (the real Uma) who's poison when 
or if you kiss her and has some aphrodiasiatic scent she blows at 
people.  She starts to tear away at the dynamic duo.  Meanwhile, 
Alfred's dying of the same disease Mr. Freeze's wife has (but in an 
earlier state than she), and his niece, Barbara (Alicia), comes all the 
way from Oxford without an English accent to get him away from the 
butler trade, but soon (well, not really soon, it takes her 2 hours) 
becomes Batgirl.  MEANWHILE, in an unfinished subplot, Bruce (Batman's 
alter-ego, if you forgot) has been dating the lovely Julie Madison (the 
even lovlier Elle MacPherson) who wants a commitment after a year but he 
says nothing.  End of her for all we know.  Mr. Freeze ultimately teams 
with Poison Ivy and they want to freeze the world and then take it over 
growing new plants as their population (Don't ask!!!).  The trio must 
team together "as family" to beat them.
There ya go.  Not the whole story but no big context clues.  Too much, 
right?  Right!  The films seems patched together of nice little ideas 
which would have made for a couple good sequels.  However, while Tim 
Burton nicely balanced the villain/Batman storyline (although not 
wonderfully), Joel seems to do almost nothing with Batman in this one.  
He gets some corny speeches, a couple clever lines and that's it.  Maybe 
some stunts.  For all this, I can't even comment on George Clooney as 
Batman - I hardly saw the guy!  And when I did, he had horrible dialogue 
to say.  I think Michael Keaton is the quintessential Batman but Val 
Kilmer was too robotic and fake as Batman in the last episode.  George 
is in between them.  He's not quintessential, he's not horrible, he's 
good.  But I'm sure next time when they decide to renovate the series 
since they'll be critically murdered for this sorry effort, we'll get a 
good script and Clooney will shine (if he still has the job).
The villains are the only interesting part of the series according to 
Schumacher.  Last time, we had the brawn of Two Face as played by Tommy 
Lee Jones and the brains/comedy supplied by the Riddler as realized by 
Jim Carrey.  This time we have a somewhat sympathetic and somewhat 
hatable villain (the same guy), Mr. Freeze.  We feel bad for his 
mental/physical collapse but does he really need to kill everyone for 
plants?  Arnold isn't very good - too hokey but kinda sympathetic at 
some points.  When he watches old movies of his wife, he actually looks 
somber.  Wow.
But Uma makes the most of her seductive character, getting the right 
point between hamminess and seductiveness.  It's like she's almost 
parodying herself in "Pulp Fiction" at points.  She's incredibly hot and 
makes the movie pretty much a star better.
As for the lower Bat-people, Chris is the same as he was in "Batman 
Forever," although I think his work in these is too hokey when he's best 
at quieter parts in "Scent of a Woman" or just plain cool parts in 
"Fried Green Tomotoes."  Alicia - I love the girl but she's not 
particularly good in this film.  She can hypotheitically act, we all saw 
that in "Clueless," but her lines kinda sound weird.  And it isn't the 
mushy-mouth this time.  But in all fairness, she has virtually no part. 
 Joel gets around to her occasionally and when she's on, she does stupid 
stuff...although I know I'm not the only one who loved the catfight 
between her and Uma...
And poor Elle.  Poor, poor Elle.  I love that woman and she can also 
hypothetically act (for those of us who saw "Sirens").  But she has no 
part!!!  It seems like Joel had so much footage that he had to edit 
almost an hour out of the final product.  There are no "couch" scenes 
(like my best friend noticed).  Now listen to me on this one - in every 
"Batman" flick, there's a couch scene.  In the original, it was with 
Vicki.  In "Returns," it was a good make-out scene with Selena.  And in 
the last one, it was a chat with Nicole.  This one, it's nothing.  And 
Batgirl does next-to-nothing in this film till the end when she's 
suddenly "part of the family."
Fortunately, we get a lot of Alfred.  He's the always reliable butler, 
in case you didn't know, who has been with Bruce all his life.  He's a 
god.  He's a father figure.  He's also dying.  This got to me.  I love 
Alfred almost as much as Bruce and to see him in a robe, not in his tux, 
and freaking dying just gets to me.  We also get the idea that he might 
have been unhappy the whole time...but this is never answered, as this 
film is too cluttered.
But in defense, it does have some good parts, other than Uma.  For one, 
George IS a good Batman but unfortunately gets nothing to do.  And there 
are some nice touches.  When they show the asylum at one point, they 
show the patient's belongings in a room and we see the Riddler's 
costume.  I laughed.  And during a biker scene (involving Robin and 
Batgirl - another subplot never handled past initiation period), we not 
only see Coolio but a bunch of bad-asses dressed as "droogs" from "A 
Clockwork Orange."  I laughed at all these.
The film falls apart around the five-minute mark during an enormously 
long action sequence which must last around 20 minutes...or did it just 
feel like that?  The film should serve as another in the long-line of 
films which demonstrate that we need more intelligent films nowadays.  
People are fed up with stupid films.  That's why the word of mouth 
killed "The Lost World!"  That's why last year, indy films grossed more 
than ever.  That's why this will have a strong box-office initative from 
people who just want to see it, like me, but will die after a week or 
two when the word around the grapevine kills it.  That's why the next 
two big-budget aciton pics are John Woo's "Face/Off" and Barry 
Sonnenfeld's "Men in Black," both which are the first two to catch on to 
the wave early on.
I like Joel Schumacher more as a person than an artiste.  I like some of 
his films ("Flatliners," "A Time to Kill") but a lot of them suck.  He's 
a really eccentric person and I loved one of his quotes about how he 
admits to being a mediocre director and that's what makes him great.  
But his costuming for Woody Allen's "Sleeper" was more interesting than 
this one (and his costuming WAS cool - look for the nazi number).
I love the "Batman" series.  The first two rocked and I did like the 
last one.  But this one is not going to be one that I watch repeatedly 
like the other three.  Hopefully, this will also serve as a springboard 
to a better Batman next time.  And maybe they'll get smart and bring 
back Catwoman.  And Michael Keaton.  But we can only hope.

Title
Review for Smilla's Sense of Snow (1997)
Director: Billie August
Writer: Ann Biderman (from the novel by Peter Hoeg)
Starring: Julia Ormond, Gabriel Burne, Richard Harris, Vanessa Redgrave, 
Robert Loggia, Bob Peck, Jim Broadbent
An Inuit fisherman stands over a hill in a vast landscape that seems to 
go on for ever in the mid nineteenth century.  After a couple seconds of 
nothingness where the man's attention doesn't meander at all, a large 
shooting star of some sort shoots down and hits the surface.  Of course, 
the hunter's dogs are the first to notice it but as he looks up, the 
meteorite or whatever it is hits and a huge avalance of snow is created 
that begins to quickly move towards the hunter.  He grabs his dogs and 
mushes them along as fast as they can go so they aren't eaten by the 
snow.  But they are too snow and they are swallowed by the avalanche.  
Now what the hell just happened?  Somehow the film moves to the present 
day in freaking Denmark and just lets this lie in the viewer's mind 
until they are good and ready to explain this spectacular looking and 
intriguing beginning.  And somehow, the film has so much restraint that 
it builds up to its explanation in an interesting way.  Somehow this 
film works.
The plot switches to that of a murder mystery done independantly with 
little outiside help from Smilla Jaspersen (Julia Ormond, in an 
interesting hairdo which looks far better than any she has had before). 
 Smilla is perhaps the most complex action hero this mystery genre has 
seen in quite a while if ever.  She is actually three-dimensional with 
character flaws and explanation for all of her actions.  Brought up in 
Greenland, she has a phobia of closed spaces and a keen sense of snow.  
Of course, she is as cold as her snow and distants herself from 
everybody.  She works by herself (except for her snow) and lives all by 
herself as well in an apartment building.
After a few shots of her working and walking home alone, the plot starts 
as she comes home and sees a corpse of a young boy on the ground.  We 
find out he is half-Inuit and was the only close relationship Smilla has 
ever really had (nothing sexual really, but the pedaphilic undertones 
are tapped in a bedscene between the two - Hey!  She was taking care of 
him 'cause his mom was a louse).  In a series of flashbacks, we see how 
she let the boy into her life and taught him Greenlandic history.  But 
now her world is shattered and she is told he fell from the roof while 
playing.  For one, the boy had a fear of heights and the snow imprints 
show acceleration.
Smilla starts her independent investigation immeadiately and we discover 
things as she discovers them.  She comes across bizarre characters and 
facts.  One of these bizarre characters is her neighbor, known as "The 
Mechanic" (Gabriel Burne, excellent, as usual), who has a crush on 
Smilla and stutters when he's around her...of course, she catches this 
early on and makes an arse of him.  He becomes her confidant and helper 
as he is very intrigued by it (or is it just one of those crush things?) 
but he becomes much like Cary Grant was to Audrey Hepburn in "Charade:" 
a man who seems to do sinister things and you just don't know if you can 
trust him.  In one scene in particular, Smilla goes to have lunch with 
her American father (Robert Loggia) and finds "The Mechanic" having 
lunch with one of the supposed enemies - an industrialist or something 
(Richard Harris, also excellent as usual).  When he confronts her and 
tries to explain what he was doing, he asks if she trusts him.  In a 
perfect acting job, Smilla gives him a short look and says straight 
faced and subtely, "No," then walks away.
The third act (which caused me to lower my grade from ****1/2 to ***1/2) 
seems to be too X-Files-esque or Smilla-meets-Indiana-Jones as she 
becomes a somewhat action star, though she doesn't do any real stunts or 
anything.  She stows away on a boat heading for Greenland (refuse to 
explain it - go see the damn movie and find out) and discovers something 
about prehistoric worms that can kill (???) and some shots are fired and 
a hatchet is even thrown.  Of course, none of this is done by Smilla.  
At the end, Smilla watches as she uncovers the final facts in her 
mystery and the enemy drowns in the Arctic.  She does nothing to cause 
his drowning (except not help him) and she sees how bleak knowing 
everything is.  By the end, she has pieced together all the pieces of 
the giant puzzle and we discover what the hell the beginning meant.  But 
we still feel kinda let-down because Smilla has almost destroyed her 
life in search for the truth.  Perhaps the message is something like: 
absolute truth is not absolutely satisfying.  At least that's what I got 
out of it.  I could be wrong.
The things to reccomend about this film are the bleak and unerrving 
atmosphere that is sustained throughout the entire film, the way that 
the film pieces the mystery together as the protagonist pieces them, and 
the fantastic, Oscar-nomination worthy acting job done by Julia Ormond. 
 She basically becomes Smilla Jaspersen and you won't see any bit of 
Guenivere, Sabrina or that lass she played in "Legends of the Fall."  
Smilla is a cold, three-dimensional character, and Ormond fills her 
pesonality to a "T" and makes her as fascinating as a real-life person. 

Title
Review for Gazon maudit (1995)
Director: Josiane Balasko
Writers: Patrick Aubrée and Josiane Balasko (story by Telsche Borman)
Starring: Victoria Abril, Josiane Balasko, Alain Chabat, Ticky Holgado,
Miguel Bosé
Contrary to popular belief, not every single foregin film released to an
American market is a masterpiece.  Some of them aren't even GOOD.  Some
examples of this principle are the aboslutely dreadful "Un indien dans
la ville" (presented as "Little Indian, Big City," and remade into that
crap Tim Allen flick, "Jungle2Jungle"), and this.  What could have been
a clever little sex comedy turns into one mess of a french flick.
"French Twist" (the "cool" American title, not the real one, which was
"Gazon Maudit," literally meaning "twisted ground," or something like
that) deals with a married couple with kids, and the intrusion of a
stranger who kinda screws things up for them.  Loli and Alain Chabat
(Victoria Abril and Alain Chabat) are not exactly happily married. 
Always on business trips, Alain Chabat more than once cheats on her, and
she eventually finds out.  And one day, she meets a butch mechanic,
Marijo (the co-writer/director Josiane Balasko), and they two kinda hit
it off.  So she decides she will get back at Alain Chabat by doing the
obvious: sleeping with Marijo.
But she soons starts to not only fall in love with Marijo, but she's
also realizes she's still in love with Alain Chabat.  So, of course, she
does the obvious from that: she decides to keep them both.  She'll be
(and sleep) with each of them for 3 days each, then on Sunday, she'll
rest by herself.  After all, she needs it if she's gonna have more sex
than Sylvia Kristel.
The film goes on for over an hour and a half, through stupidity after
stupidity, moronic twist after moronic twist, and soon there's the
little ironic (!!!) ending.  I know it's a completely different culture,
and I'm quite familiar with the French and their cinema, but this is
just BAD.  None of the characters are more intelligent than Peter
Stormare in "Fargo" (a movie where stupid characters were backed up to
make a point), and any action they do is pretty much just to get a
hopeful chuckle from the audience.  What's shocking is this was not only
one of France's biggest hits, but it was nominated for a lot of Cesars
(French equivalent of Oscars).
The writing and directing is really the big problem with it.  Josiane
Balasko does a good acting job with her role, but her little sex comedy
isn't very humerous, entertaining, or even deep at all.  Even Woody
Allen's not-very-good "A Midsummer Night's Sex Comedy" is intelligent,
well-written, and possesses some depth.  This is shallow, unfunny, and
pretty annoying to watch.  The film moves at the pace of a snail, and is
damn-near painful to watch.  Thank god for the fast forward button.
The acting, however, isn't bad at all.  The actors do the best they can
with the bad material, and Victoria Abril is pretty likable despite the
script (and the fact that she's stupid enough to try to divide herself
over two people when she has kids).  And Alain Chabat has some funny
moments as the neurotic husband.
But "French Twist" is just pretty lame.  It's not overly horrible, and
has a couple very, very, very brief moments.  But it's just a really
crap film, and an example of an ill-advised distribution of a foreign
film.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Rosewood (1997)
Director: John Singelton
Writer: Gregory Poirier
Starring: Ving Rhames, Jon Voigt, Don Cheadle, Michael Rooker, Bruce
McGill, Loren Dean, Esther Rolle, Elise Neal, Robert Patrick, Catherine
Kellnar, Katherine Meisle, Robert Patrick
"Rosewood" tells the story of one of the most embarassing instances in
American history: in a black and white Florida town in 1922, a lie
turned most of the white folks to riot against all the blacks, causing
tons of lynching, and a lot of murders, mostly towards the black side. 
"Boyz N the Hood" director John Singleton tells the tale, and luckily
isn't either preachy or one-sided about the whole thing.
"Rosewood" is presented in the beginning as a relatively peaceful town,
with blacks and white living together, although not in any kind of
happiness.  Sure, they're free, but that doesn't mean they're liked. 
Even in the earlier 20th century, a total redneck bigot (Bruce McGill)
is telling his son how awful the black men are, just 'cause they're
black.  But at least store owner Jon Voigt is nice enough to have sex
with his young black store assistant.
Into town comes Mann (Ving Rhames), kind of like the Man With No Name in
"Fistful of Dollars."  A veteran of World War I, and still riding a
horse, Mann makes some friends with the black piano-player Sylvester
(Don Cheadle) and a 17-year old member of his family, Scrappy (Elsie
Neal), the latter who has a crush on him.  There's also the maternal,
everyone-loves-her -- (Esther Rolle, from "Good Times"), who's like that
one slave woman in "Gone With the Wind."
One day, an adulterous woman (Catherine Kellnar) is beaten by her lover
(Robert Patrick), and to cover up her adultery, tells everyone that she
was beaten by a black man (although word of mouth spreads that she was
also raped).  So every white boy in town goes out, and begins beating up
any black men they see, and before everyone knows it, an innocent black
man is lynched.
But this is merely the beginning.  Soon every night for a couple days, a
huge group of bigot jerks is going out and lynching any black man they
can find.  And soon Sylvester's house is burned down, -- is shot by some
schmuck, and all the women and children have escaped into the Florida
swamps.
But they have some help.  For one thing, Jon Voigt becomes the big
sympathizer, and is soon hiding black runaways in his house, which would
get his house burned down if they found it.  And Mann comes back into
town after leaving, and is shooting white boys, and basically helping
them escape.  The sheriff (Michael Rooker, at his most unintelligable)
claims to want everyone to stop it, but is almost as rascist as the
others, even if he did tell Sylvester to hop town the day his house was
burned down.
"Rosewood" is, to put it briefly, difficult to watch, be you black or
white.  For blacks, it's horrific to see such bigotry.  For
whites...well, the same, really.  I mean, it's horrible to see people so
narrow-minded that they'd judge people by the color of their skin.  And
even if this is a story of history, it's still disturbing that there are
still people like this in our world.
Thankfully, Singleton isn't a jerk about this, and creates a good white
man in the form of Jon Voigt.  Sure, he's scared for his and his
family's safety, but he still puts his neck out to save everyone who's
being wrongly persecuted.  His character prevented me from feeling
totally ashamed of my white ancestors.
The film is totally engrossing, from start to finish, which is a good
thing for a two and a half hour long film.  In a lesser more preachy
film, I would have been looking at my non-existent watch every couple
minutes, but the time flew.  Singleton keeps the pace constantly moving,
and never stops for anything stupid once the film is in its full and
constant speed.
There are some bad parts, though.  This is "based on a true story,"
which means we have some hokey melodrama, like a really forced
relationship between Mann and Scrappy (the latter who looks like she's a
mere 13 years old, while Ving looks like he's in his late 30s).  And the
ending, where Mann is shooting white boys right and left is
just...dumb.  The film contains so much intelligence up to that point,
but when you have him turning into some giant hypocrite at the end, it
kinda hurts the film.  I mean, people were clapping!  As my one friend
said, it's like clapping when the Nazis are getting killed in
"Schindler's List," or in more analytical terms, if someone claps when a
black man is lynched.  Perhaps Singleton put it in as a test or maybe to
please some people.  But it doesn't work out.  There's a bit at the end
where the one jerk suffers something he's going to have to live with for
the rest of his life: that's more satisfying than seeing them all shot
in some overly-produced action sequence.
The acting's very good, with Ving Rhames performing at his usual awesome
height.  He creates a mysterious figure who's as fascinating as Eastwood
in those Leone spag westerns.  Jon Voigt is also predictably awesome,
proving that his career is indeed back on track, the way it should be. 
Don Cheadle rocks, as usual, Esther Rolle is a great all-loving maternal
force in the film, and Bruce McGill is awesome as the most hateful
bigot.
Nevertheless, the film is well-written (with the exception of a couple
lines, like: "Are you gonna be lonely?" "No, I have JESUS!"),
well-acted, as well as excellently directed.  It tells a very
frightening story, and it does it masterfully.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335.

Title
Review for Exotica (1994)
Writer/Director: Atom Egoyan
Starring: Bruce Greenwood, Elias Kosteas, Mia Kirshner, Don McKellar,
Arsinée Khanjian, Sarrah Polley, David Hemblen, Peter Krantz, Victor
Garber, Maury Chaykin
Every other night, he comes in to the "Exotica" club and gets the same girl
to do an erotic dance for him, and, after a couple hours of this, leaves. 
And every time he does, the "DJ" of the club observes from above, and
sometimes from a tinted window, observing everything that goes on.  The man
doesn't really seem to get a lot of enjoyment from it, but instead seems to
feel cleansed by the act of the particular girl dancing for him.  For him,
it's not just some easy woman showing off her body, but instead it's
something deeper.
Canadian director Atom Egoyan's films always deal with a group of people
who have bizarre connections to one another, and the films usually examine
their relationships, giving us information as it goes on and allowing us to
put it all together.  The same goes for "Exotica," which dives right into
its narrative without so much as an exposition, and forces us to pay
complete attention, and remember everything we see.  He gives us characters
who seem unnecessary at first, but eventually come into the narrative more
clearly, and presents situations and scenes which appear to have no
relevance or meaning, but then blossom as other scenes make more sense out
of them.
Take for instance a scene between two of the characters in the film who are
talking while walking in a field with a bunch of other people.  They
mention that they "joined up" with the event, and that they're "looking for
something," but what they're doing there isn't even mentioned until the
second to the last scene in the film.  It's the kind of film you watch once
to see everything, then watch a second time so that it all makes sense.
Egoyan introduces several characters and slowly allows us to get to know
them better throughout the film by not only seeing what they're doing in
the present day, but also bits from their past which are often tossed in
looking like scenes from either the present or the near future. 
Character-wise, there's: Francis (Bruce Greenwood), an IRS man who is the
guy who goes to the club every other night; Eric (Elias Kosteas), the DJ at
the club; Christina (Mia Kirshner), the stripper at the club who dances for
Francis; Thomas (Don McKellar), a gay pet store owner who's been checked
out by Francis; and Zoe (Egoyan's wife, Arsinée Khanjian), the owner of the
club who is probably the most disjointed person in the film.
One would think that people like an IRS man, a DJ, a stripper, a pet store
owner, and a club owner would never fully amount to a film, but they all
have connections to one another in some way.  Although Thomas seems to be
just a mere subplot that has nothing to do with any other part of the film,
Egoyan eventually gets him into the narrative and also gives his character
some depth.
Watching the film is like watching layers and layers and layers being
peeled back; as the film goes on and we piece things together, the film's
emotional core is exposed, and instead of just a really fun and kinky film,
like some of Egoyan's films ("The Adjuster" is the least emotionally
attached film that I've seen of his; "The Sweet Hereafter," the most), it
shows that it's about people who become more and more realized as the film
goes on, and by the last scene, our heart is crushed because we know
everything.  We get to witness what happens to every character, and piece
by piece, we see what they're doing and why.  In the beginning, we have no
clue why Francis goes to the club every other night, and we think that his
behavior is just a tad off kilter.  But by the end, we know what has
happened to him to make him do this, and we feel all the more for him.
It doesn't hurt that Egoyan has created some extremely interesting
characters who you can care about, and the actors are extremely good in
developing their characters, most of whom are Egoyan regulars.  It seems
that he can only get the same group of actors for each film, save a couple
extras, probably because his characters do such weird things.  Egoyan
regulars in this film are: Bruce Greenwood, who expertly shows a man who is
at the end of his rope; Elias Kosteas, who plays yet another weird
character, and well; Don McKellar, who's performance is wonderfully subtle;
Arsinée Khanjian, who is slightly pathetic once again; a small role from
"The Sweet Hereafter"'s Sarrah Polley; and cameos from David Hemblen as an
inspector in the first scene, and Maury Chaykin as an "Exotica" patron. 
Egoyan newcomer Mia Kirshner is wonderfully sympathetic in what would
normally just be a seductive role, and look for Victor Garber, who recently
played the sympathetic desinger of the ship in "Titanic," as Polley's
wheelchair bound father.
The brilliance of "Exotica" is that it grows on your emotions as you watch
the story unfold.  What starts out as just another bizarro Egoyan film
blossoms into one of the most emotionally profound films of the 90s, as
well as one of the most fascinating.  Of course, this is no shock coming
from Egoyan, who, with this and "The Sweet Hereafter," is now not only one
of the most fascinating directors working, but also one of the best.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
Writer/Director: David Mamet
Starring: Campbell Scott, Rebecca Pidgeon, Steve Martin, Ricky Jay, Ben
Gazzara, Felicity Huffman, Ed O'Neill
There's a scene towards the middle of David Mamet's "The Spanish Prisoner"
where the protagonist, Joe Ross (Campbell Scott, sans Stanley Tucci for a
change), discovers that everything he did in the first half of the film
will get him in a whole lot of trouble he may not be able to squirm his way
out of.  The big deal with this is it took me off guard as well.  Viewing
this film is like viewing two films which work hand in hand: one's an
interesting film where we see a working man get the taste of hobnobbing
with a rich yet somewhat creepy businessman; the second is like something
out of a Kafka story.
In fact, "The Spanish Prisoner"'s second half really resembles last year's
amazing David Fincher flick, "The Game," where a cynical business man had
his life toyed with by an unknown assailant.  I remember that film as being
incredible fun, yet having so many plot holes that it could not be taken
seriously (just for the record, I'm not holding that against it at all: it
was more like artistic liscence than some really bad slip-up on the
writers' part, and it was one of the best films of last year).  "The
Spanish Prisoner" is a lot like that film, although its first half is so
subtle that the second half comes off as a huge shock, almost as much as it
is for the character.
"The Spanish Prisoner" is an art house, low budget thriller, as much as I
can see, that deals with several frightening nightmares, such as knowing
that what you've done in your past will doom your future, not being able to
escape evidence of something you did not commit, feeling like everyone is
against you, and not being able to wash blood off of yourself.  Mamet, as
the screenwriter (as well as director) picks a totally innocent character
as the poor guy to take the big gradual fall, and surorund him with a wide
assortment of characters who may or may not be working against him,
although it's impossible to detect until it's too late.  It's a film that
twists and turns and leaves the audience leaving with a big smile, knowing
that you've survived an intelligent rollar coaster ride of a flick.
But before I go on, let me recap the plot: a hard-working business man,
Joe, travels to a Carribbean island with his working pal, George (Ricky
Jay, who was recently the cameraman from "Boogie Nights"), and his new very
blunt secretary who has a thing for him, Susan (Mamet's wife, Rebecca
Pidgeon), and there runs into a mysterious rich man, Jimmy Dell (Steve
Martin, in a performance so eerily subtle that it just may be his best
acting in a film), who befriends him, and carries on the friendship later
on in New York.
After about an hour of this, the film takes a weird 180 degree turn, and
the film suddenly becomes frightening and crazy.  It's nothing like the
events that happen to Michael Douglas in "The Game," like being shot at, or
being trapped inside a runaway taxi.  It's more like things that seem so
subtle that it's pretty understandable that Joe would not be able to see
them ahead of him.  And there are no plot holes (or "artistic liscences"
for the plot), giving this film a more realistic and scarier feel, mostly
because the events could happen to anyone,  which is extremely effective in
creating tension.
But the really amazing thign about this film is how the first half, which
seems kind of boring while you're watching it, never gives any sign of the
second half coming along.  Some may call this being choppy and dock points
from the film; others (like me) realize that this was essential in creating
an effective second half.  This is not like "The Game," but is really an
intelligent, realistic, and playful film which attempts to toy with the
audience the same way that Joe is being toyed with by showing no one's
perspective but his, and thus taking us off guard as well as him.
If you don't know who David Mamet is, he's one of the best writers working
today, not only writing films (his most recent jobs where for "Wag the Dog"
and "The Edge," and he has directed other films of his own, like "House of
Games," to which this has been compared), but also award-winning plays like
"Glengarry Glenn Ross" and "American Buffalo" (both which have been made
into films).  His dialogue is some of the best written, not because it
sounds realistic, but because it is so playful and easily defines the
characters who speak them.  Here, his dialogue is in tact (some lines are
definite intelligent quotables), but he also shows that he's a master at
plotting.  "The Spanish Prisoner" unfolds brilliantly, shocking us at every
twist and turn, and never insulting our intelligence (it should also be
noted that this film is PG, which shocked the hell out of me, especially
after seeing the "fuck"-fest that was "Glengarry Glenn Ross" - guess he's
trying to expand his horizons or something).
And as with many other Mamet films, the acting is superb.  Campbell Scott
is stiff, but so's his character, and he's easily sympathetic.  Rebecca
Pidgeon delivers a witty performance, all the more admirable as the film
goes on.  She has several scenes where she's so straight forward that it's
comical.  Ricky Jay, who's becoming more and more prominent in films lately
(in addition to "Boogie Nights," he also played a small role in the latest
Bond flick, "Tomorrow Never Dies," as a computer hacker), perfectly speaks
the language of Mamet (which is like a whole other kind of dialogue, kinda
other-worldly).  Also, look for Al Bundy himself, Ed O'Neill, in a one
scene role which is surprisingly effective.  Glad to see him working again
since the cancellation of his, um, show.
But shockingly enough, the actor who really steals the show is...Steve
Martin.  As the subtlely creepy Jimmy Dell, he oozes with a shocking
greatness, and a knack for really fleshing out Mamet's dialogue.  Martin's
an excellent comic actor, but, like Robin Williams, he seems to also want
to show that he can do very effective dramatic leg work as well.  And like
Williams, he's amazing, restraining all his wild and crazy antics, and
turning in a performance which is just plain fun to watch, and even comical
in a different way than he's used to.  He's not great because he's Steve
Martin doing drama; he's great because he's amazing.
But the real star of the film is Mamet, who designs the film so well that
it's probably the most effective and just plain entertaining films of the
year thus far.  It's the kind of film where you shake with the protagonist,
experience all their scares, and come out just as drained as the hero does.
 And when a character nightmares become the audience's nightmares, well
that's a film that has really become effective.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Happy Gilmore (1996)
Director: Dennis Dugan
Writers: Tim Herlihy and Adam Sandler
Starring: Adam Sandler, Christopher MacDonald, Julie Bowen, Frances Bay,
Carl Weathers, Ben Stiller, Bob Barker, Kevin Nealon
While Chris Farley films pretty much rely on Farley's weight problem and
his ability to scream and overact, Adam Sandler seems to more
versatile.  Well, in comparison.  I didn't see his "Billy Madison," and
have no desire to, but he makes far more comically interesting flicks
than Farley, or any of his SNL generation cohorts.  In comparion,
obviously.
"Happy Gilmore" is actually the name of the protagonist, played by Adam
Sandler with great energy and overacting, although far less than
Farley's.  He's a likable over-reactor who wants to play hockey for a
living, but has a problem: he sucks.  He can't skate, he can't shoot,
but he has such a short temper that he could probably take out anyone in
an actual NHL game.  Anyway, so that's as much as I know about the sport
of hockey.
But one day, when his grandmother, who raised him after his father was
killed by a hockey puck, is evicted from her house, and forced to live
in a nursing home (headed by a sadistic Ben Stiller, who uses the old
people to do slave labor), Happy tries to get her money so she can pay
the mortgage on her house, and get it back.  And one day he finds out he
can hit a golf ball farther than anyone else (and hit various people - a
joke that I admittingly laughed at every time).
With his ex-golf player mentor (Carl Weathers, who needed the paycheck)
who's missing a hand due to the fact that an alligator chewed it off
(another redundant gag target), Happy goes to a bunch of golf
tournaments in his hockey shirt, and is soon winning everyone, much to
the disenchantment of the only big golfer (Christopher MacDonald,
currently enjoying a role on that Kirstie Alley sitcom, "Veronica's
Closet") who hasn't won the big tournament yet, where he receives a
yellow jacket.
There's a half-assed love interest that goes on with some chick who
handles the tournaments or something (Julie Bowen), and then there's the
whole fascination with Happy, who is known to yell obscenities at the
golf ball, and beat up mocking people.  And then there's the bit about
his grandmother.  This is all, luckily, handled with the utmost amount
of non-seriousness, and even the skating scene where Adam and his chick
skate to the theme from that Brooke Shields masterpiece, "Endless Love,"
is handled hysterically.
But this film is only funny when watched every now and then.  This is
not a flick you see over and over and over and over again in a short
amount of time.  Sure Adam's a funny guy.  And Christopher MacDonald
makes a hilarious villain (who stumbles on his obscenities sometimes,
making him a good old incompetent nemesis).  And the Ben Stiller
sub-plot is pretty funny. But the film never really becomes the
absolutely hysterical film it should be.  The jokes are usually ones
you've seen before, most of the time earlier in the film.  But luckily
the parts that would be handled melodramatically aren't.
"Happy Gilmore" IS a funny film, and remains more enjoyable than most of
those cheap SNL spin-offs/member vehicles.  But it's still not the
greatest flick, and never shows that Adam Sandler will get the respect
that ex-SNL people like Bill Murray and Dan Ackroyd at one time got 
It's just a minor little film that you forget until the next Adam
Sandler flick comes along.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Braindead (1992)
Director: Peter Jackson
Writers: Peter Jackson, Stephen Sinclair, and Frances Walsh (story by
Stephen Sinclair)
Starring: Timothy Balme, Diana Peńalver, Elizabeth Moody, Ian Watkin,
Brenda Kendall, Stuart Devenie
New Zealand director Peter Jackson's film "Dead Alive" (a.k.a.
"Braindead") gets major plus points for what may be the greatest single
piece of gorefest ever put on celluloid.  And he even gets plus points
for making a great film even before it reaches its big climax with the
aforementioned fest o' gore.  After re-watching this after seeing his
American debut, "The Frighteners," I could hardly believe it was the
same director, and it wasn't just because there was a significant lack
of gore, but because this film is so darkly comical and wild that it's
just widly entertaining.
"Dead Alive" takes place in 50s New Zealand, and deals with the arrival
of a Rat Monkey to the zoo there.  After a trek there, and some good old
limb-hacking, this dangerous Monkey, which turns whoever it bites into a
flesh-hungry zombie, is put in a zoo cage, and after biting one woman,
the film takes off on its surreal, and hysterical path, obviously
leading to a giant climax (ahem, the gorefest).
Timothy Balme plays Lionel, the inept, wimpish son of a rich New Zealand
bitch of a mother, who orders him around, and is more attached to him
than that mother in "Spanking the Monkey."  When he gains a love
interest in the form of a hispanic general store clerk named Pequita
(Diana Peńalver), she becomes insanely jealous, and is bitten by the rat
monkey during her bit of eavesdropping on their zoo date.
Lionel does all he can to help his mother, who is decomposing every
second, and is soon trying to eat the nurse.  When he finds out what's
going on, he tries to stop it, but, being the wimp he is, doesn't have
the guts to ask anyone for help.  Soon, he's keeping four zombies in his
basement, trying to watch over them, even as he's loosing Pequita, and
his obnoxious, oafish, John Goodman-looking Uncle Les (Ian Watkin) is
making stakes on the mansion, which Lionel has accidentally given to him
in the rush of things.
This, of course, brings us to the afore-afore-aforementioned gorefest.
And what a sight it is to behold.  For over 30 minutes, we witness a
large party being crashed by zombies, eventually turing everyone but an
elite few into zombies, who have to fight together.  We see
decapitations, appendages being ripped apart, a man being cut in half by
a rake, a zombie-chick's head being engulfed by a lightbulb, a zombie
baby running around, and a man using a lawn-mower as a deadly weapon. 
It's one of the most enjoyable 30 minutes in a film...if you have the
stomach for it.
"Dead Alive" features non-stop, no holds barred black humor, which makes
this film totally bizarre, and nothing to take seriously at all.  The
film seems to mock old zombie flicks through the entire film.  The
zombies are always presented with a lot of comedy, including two of them
having zombie-sex, and procreating a zombie baby.  And the romantic
subplot between Lionel and Pequita is handled with the utmost
campiness.  There are even some great one-liners - the best being a
zombie-fighting, karate/tai-chi fighting priest's declaration, "I kick
ass for the Lord!"
The acting is also done with huge campiness.  Timothy Balme has a great
knack for the kind of quiet, shy hero who is too meek to let anyone know
he has a group of zombies living in his basement, too attached to do
away with his zombie mother, and too shy to let Pequita know why he has
been ignoring her, as well as too weak to not let his Uncle Les take
over the household.  And Ian Watkin as Les steals the entire movie with
his absolutely hysterical performance.
"Dead Alive" might not be a masterpiece, but it is one of the few
frequently funny and wonderfully concously-campy horror films, and of
course, it just elevates the gorefest to a work of art.  And if you try
to rent it, settle for nothing less than the unrated version.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Demolition Man (1993)
Director: Marco Brambilla
Writers: Daniel Waters, Robert Reneau, and Peter M. Lenkow
Starring: Sylvester Stallone, Wesley Snipes, Sandra Bullock, Nigel
Hawthorne, Denis Leary, Bob Gunton, Benjamin Bratt, Glenn Shadix, Andre
Gregory, Rob Schneider, Dan Cortese
Being a fan of anything dystopian, and not being a fan of much
Stallonian kind of brings me to a big conflict in this film.  We get a
negative view of a futuristic utopian society, which is perfect except
that they aren't able to fight off anything bad, and they listen to
jingles from the 50s as music.  And then we get Stallone - all buff, and
all bad-ass, being tossed into utopia, just to give it a nice twist. 
This flick wants to be like a new wave version of "1984" and/or "Brave
New World," but kind of fails because of its new little clever twist.
The "Demolition Man" of the title is none other than Sly, a renegade cop
named John Spartan in the bad-ass world of L.A. 1997 (the designated
year for all apocalyptic sci-fi thrillers of the early 90s), who has an
obsession with catching uber-psycho criminal Simon Pheonix (the
Rodman-looking Wesley Snipes).  One night, he dives into a large
warehouse of his to catch him, but ends up prompting Phoenix to ignite
the entire warehouse, killing a bunch of innocent kidnapped people.  He,
and Phoenix, are sentenced to the new wave form of capitol punishment:
frozen and rehabilitated through computers.  So John strips down, we see
some stuff we don't want to see, and he's cryogenically (spelling?)
frozen.
Skip a couple decades, and the world of L.A. is now renamed, and has
been transformed into a utopian wonderworld, all run by the high
priest/fascist/big brother Cocteau (awesome brit actor Nigel Hawthorne),
who is aiming for a perfect society.  His only problem is a little
underground pest named Edgar Friendly (the typecasted Denis Leary), who
is trying to rebel against utopianism, and bring back the good old days
of high fat, nicotine, and open pornography.  So, being the smart guy he
is, he unfreezes Phoenix, and tries to get him to do away with Edgar. 
As I said, he's a smart guy.
After a bit of rampaging around town, the cops, lead by the stuck-up Bob
Gunton, decide to unfreeze Spartan, and have him go after Phoenix. 
Teaming up with the highly energized Lenina Huxley (Sandra Bullock,
before that whole "Speed" stuff), he goes after Phoenix, learns about
how stupid and inane the society is, and just gets to kick some villian
buttocks.
Now, let me say, the view of Utopia is nice and all, but it's not nearly
negative enough.  I chuckled at the idea of the jingles populating
"oldie" radio, as well as the whole non-touching policy, and the
no-swearing deal (which is broken not too long after Spartan and/or
Phoenix are unfrozen).  The bit about the "three seashells" deal was
classic, as well as the whole sex bit (which prompts a classic scene
where a giddy Bullock asks Sly if he wants to have sex with her).  Oh,
and the whole Lenina Huxley name was a nice little idea (Huxley being
the last name of Aldous, who wrote the great dystopian novel "Brave New
World," and Lenina being the name of one of the chief characters in it).
But.  There's nothing really negative to say about this Utopia, other
than that the only big restaurant franchise is Taco Bell (not a bad
thing, really).  The people who populate it seem to be happy, with a
couple exceptions.  I know I'd hate it, but all the film offers up is
how Lenina wants "some action," not sure in which context.  The
paralleism it wants to make with that of the Leary underground living
never quite works out, since it glorifies it by having Sly bask in it
all ("Oh! I'm eating a ratburger?  Not bad." - this is not a quote, but
something along the lines of what he says while down there).  Thus the
little trite solution at the end - "You guys get a little dirtier, and
you guys get a little cleaner, and somewhere in the middle is your
solution" - never really lifts the film off the ground.
In fact, the whole bit about the war between Phoenix and Sly is never
really that great.  Sure, the action scenes are fun to watch, and both
of them contribute a lot to the humor and overall fun of it all, but
they never mean anything.  If this is a dystopian satire, why does the
film just shoot it's way to its conclusion?  Then there's the bit about
how they obtain weaponry: just going to the museum, where there's a
plethora of guns, ammo, explosions, etc.  Why not just have them duke it
out weapon-less?  This could have led to an original film overall,
instead of this cheap little bit about them just fighting like in all
big budget action pics.
On a plus side, this film is marginally fun to watch.  The performances
of Sly and Snipes are funny, and they have some good chemistry
together.  Some.  Snipes does overpower Sly in that he has the cool-ass
villain role, and he takes it to its farthest limits, making him
likable.  And Sly actually does a good job with the comedy this time. 
Bullock, although garnering a Razzie nomination for this, has a lot of
energy in a role that requires her to be giddy a lot of the time.  Leary
gets to do a rant, so he's good and all that stuff.  And Nigel Hawthorne
rocks, standing out by giving undoubtedly the best performance in the
flick.  Then again, this guy's done Shakespeare, a feat that no one in
this film probably has done...well, maybe Rob Schneider or Dan
Cortese...
"Demoliton Man" isn't a bad flick.  In fact, it's rather pretty fun to
watch.  But it has failed idealism as a work of action dystopia - a
formula that COULD work if in the hands of someone else.  But Marco
Brambilla, who would go on to direct that Alicia crap-sterpiece "Excess
Baggage," just tries to please everyone, and thus fails.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Fahrenheit 451 (1966)
Director: Francois Truffaut
Writer: Jean-Louis Richard and Francois Truffaut (from the novel by Ray
Bradbury)
Starring: Oskar Werner, Julie Christie, Cyril Cusack
Like works of film and literature such as "A Brave New World," and
"1984," "Fahrenheit 451" deals with a bleak future.  But while those
films criticized politics and showed totalitarian states, this one shows
a government that has outlawed books.  And believe it or not, it's a
nightmare world where people are arrested for having copies of any kind
of literature, the daily comics are without captions, and the TV reigns
supreme as the only outlet of entertainment, creating a shallow world. 
That's right: whether we like it or not, we need books.
So why are they outlawed?  Well, as the fire cheif (Cyril Cusack)
explains, they represent free thought, and if we are to live in a
peaceful society, we can't have it, because free thought can insult
someone out there.  This is the price we have to pay for peace - no
culture whatsoever, because no one can be different from the next.
So what they do is have firemen, instead of saving houses, which I guess
they do too, they find out who is keeping books, then go to their house,
get them, put them on a little pile, and burn them at 451 Fahrenheit
(hence the title).  The protagonist of the story is a highly decorated
fireman (Oskar Werner), who lives with his shallow wife (Julie
Christie), who watches way too much TV (even more than me) and takes
some kind of government provided drug, often too much.
But Oskar meets a neighbor of his (also Julie Christie) who is an
admitted book lover, and she turns him onto them (yes, books are
outlawed, yet everyone knows how to read - it's not the point of the
story).  And soon he has developed sympathy for those he must hurt by
burning their books.  And we get a wonderfully constructed fable about
how books are essential to keep up our culture.
The film is directed by the great French director, Francois Truffaut,
and he does an amazing job with adapting Ray Bradbury's story for the
screen (and also doing his what was his first outing in English).  He
creates tension in some of the fire scenes (mainly attributed by the
awesome musical score by the greatest film composer of all time, Bernard
Herrman) and even makes some of the more futuristic stuff (flying cops)
look pretty cool for the mid 60s.  He even as the ingenius idea to not
show printed credits, but have someone name them as they role.  The best
scene is where this woman, who has an entire library up in her attic,
choses to be burned with her books.  It's a frightening scene that will
stick in your mind afterwards.  Hopefully.
The acting is also very good.  Julie Christie is awesome, as ever, and
Cyril Cusack is amazing as the fire chief.  Oskar Werner is probably
underrated in his performance as the lead fireman.  He's soft spoken,
but always has a different facial expression.  He's in deep thought
constantly, and he always looks that way without looking stupid.
If anything, "Fahrenheit 451" gives us a kind of ironic story of how
books are much better than TV.  All the while, we're thinking, "Hey,
we're watching a movie about how TVs suck compared to books."  But it's
a totally intelligent film with a great message, wonderfully presented
by Truffaut, with the upmost competence.  Hey, maybe some day I'll even
read the book.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Speaking Parts (1989)
Writer/Director: Atom Egoyan
Starring: Michael McManus, Arsinée Khanjian, Gabrielle Rose, Tony Nardi,
David Hemblen, Frank Tata, Gérard Parkes, Jackie Samuda, Peter Krantz
"Speaking Parts" deals with a group of five people who have something or
other to do with films, and tells a story focusing on their distanced
relationships.  Each of them have to do with film in one way: Lance
(Michael McManus) is a film actor (actually extra), Lisa (Arsinée
Khanjian) is someone who watches films, Clara (Gabrille Rose) is a film
writer, Eddy (Tony Nardi) not only works at a video store but also
shoots videos of weddings and parties; and the Producer (David Hemblen)
is...well, the producer.  
There is a lot of drama, dealing with many instances of the different
relationships these people have.  Lance and Lisa work together as maids
at a classy hotel, and Lisa is in love with him, but he always shuns
her, giving her no less than the silent treatment.  Lisa is pretty
obsessed with him, carrying around a photograph of him in her purse, and
renting all his movies all the time.  However, Lance is only an extra in
films, but Lisa likes this better.  She tells Eddy, who notices she's
renting all these films, that talking is not very important.  
In the meantime, Lance has auditioned for a role (his first speaking
role) in a movie about a man who gives a lung to his dying sister.  At
the audition, he and the woman he auditions for, Clara, hit a spark, and
carry on a sexual affair.  He discovers she's the writer of the film,
and that it's very autobiographical (we later discover that her brother,
who she watches videos of, looks exactly like Lance).  When she goes
away to argue with the producer of her film, they keep in touch via
video confroncing (including some video conferencing sex...).  
The film unfolds beautifully, giving us information on a need-to-know
basis, and possessing a hypnotic feeling, drawing us into the lives of
the five characters, and creating a lot of depth.  The film seems to be
asking who has control of media, and examines this question from
different aspects.  Lance tries to help the writer, who has lost a lot
of control over the way the film is presented (the producer wants to
make it into a talk show format, and change the guy giving his liver to
his sister to giving it to his brother), but gets a cold "Who do you
think you are?!" from the producer.  Eddy is able to ask questions to
people at the weddings and parties, but when Lisa tries it out, she
accidentally insults her interviewee, who has her newly-wedded husband
yell at her horribly.  And Clara is never able to get any real control
over the film, although her choice at playing her brother (Lance) is
duelly noted.  
The film is also structured to show the distances between these people,
be they emotionally or physically.  Lance shuns Lisa, who is always
opening up to him ("Let me love you," she says a couple times to him),
but he completely ignores her.  So she watches his videos constantly,
and freezes the frame on him as he's in the background as an extra. 
Lance is distanced from Clara, as they often talk only over video
conferencing (including the distant sex they have), and they grow
farther and farther apart over the course of the film).  The producer is
the most distanced, it seems, as he's only shown on video conferencing
until the end, when he's playing another person.  At the end, in the
final scene, it seems that the barriers have been broken down somehow,
and two of the characters who have not been in mutual contact come
together, spreading a sense of hope that people can open up emotionally
and physically (though not necessarily sexually).  
There are some confusing parts of the film, especially towards the end
when all things to go very surreal.  There's a part where Lisa is
watching a tape she has watched obsessively, and finds it starts to talk
to her and involve her.  While I haven't totally figured this out, it
seems that it means that walls of communication are being broken down. 
And the ending is a quick-cut masterful editing job, featuring a barrage
of images, and we're not sure if they're real, on video, or fantasies
(like Clara putting a gun to her head).  
But even if it can't be figured out totally, we appreciate the way it is
presented, as a lovely art form.  The film really seems to be about
emotional barriers.  The film is often silent, with very little dialogue
(the first ten to fifteen minutes is a montage of people who all look
alike, causing the brain to work overtime), causing it to become
complicated, yet hypnotic.  
"Speaking Parts" is a giant puzzle piece, a lovely connundrum for the
brain to figure out, but with one unifying theme which holds the film
together: that people are often islands, and we need to become more
unified.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Die Hard (1988)
Director: John McTiernan
Writers: Jeb Stuart and Stephen E. De Souza (from the book "Nothing
Lasts Forever" by Roderick Thorp)
Starring: Bruce Willis, Alan Rickman, Bonnie Bedelia, Reginald Vel
Johnson, William Atherton, Paul Gleason, De'voreaux White, Alexander
Godunox, Robert Davi
"Die Hard" is the most riveting, most stunning, most exciting action
film I have ever seen.  It's an intelligent game of cat-and-mouse,
complete with some proposterous situations, a lot of carnage, some male
bonding, one strong woman, lots and lots of one-liners, and it even has
a villain coming back from the dead for one last kiss goodnight.  "Die
Hard" is a classic film which set the trend for most action films,
although none has ever been as amazing as this one.
Bruce Willis set the trend for his wise-cracking lovable protagonist on
"Moonlighting," and he carried it over to the action genre nicely.  He
plays John McClaine, a New York cop who's suffering from a little bit of
workaholicism, as his family has left him so his wife (Bonnie Bedelia)
can have a great job working for a big Japanese business corporation,
which is located in a tall 40-story building in the middle of L.A.  He
decides to come and visit them for Christmas, and arrives at her office
spacious office, while she goes out to the party.  A couple minutes
later, the party is taken over by some nasty terrorists, led by the
German revolutionary, Franz Grueber (brit actor, Alan Rickman, in his
trend-setting role for American films).  But in the pandemonium, John
escapes up a flight of stairs with his gun.
Franz wants all the money in the safe in the giant building, and he
kills the president of the company when he refuses to tell him where
they are.  Meanwhile, he plays the cat-and-mouse game with John, albeit
a claustrophobic and bloody game, as John manages to take them on
one-by-one (sometimes in pairs and trios, by the way), and alert the
police and media.  What results is a tense, tight, and funny thriller,
which is totally gripping from the first minute to last.
Bruce, who is in more bad films than good, gives his best performance,
even though it lacks the depth of his "12 Monkeys" or "Pulp Fiction"
characters.  He shows he's a totally formidable action star, up there
with the likes of Wesley Snipes and, well, now John Travolta and Nicolas
Cage - not Schwarzenegger and Stallone, because Willis isn't some
superman.  He is shot a lot, although sometimes you just have to hold
your belief because even though he's shot and cut and stuff, he still
manages to beat up some bad guys at the end.  Nevertheless, Willis is
amazing in what would become the "Bruce Willis role."
We also get a commanding performance from Alan Rickman as the leader of
the terrorists.  He also became the trend-setter for the villains, as
Willis became the trend-setter for the good guys.  As Franz, Rickman is
funny, creepy, and intelligent, all at the same time.  His performance
also has some form of depth - he's such a well-dressed and proper
villain with his cool suit and suaveness, but as he admits at the end,
it's all a cover-up since he's, at heart, just a thief, although "an
exceptional thief."
And "Family Matters"'s Reginald Vel Johnson plays a cop who sadly
stumbles onto the scene, and ends up becoming the only friend John has
on the bottom, as most of the cops and agents turn out to be jerks,
schmucks or asswholes.  He and Willis have great chemistry, even though
they really only have one scene where they're together, since they
communicate by radio throughout the film.  Their's is the essence of
male bonding in movies.
And we even get a lot of humor.  Willis is a geyser of smart-aleckdom,
joking around the whole movie, coining phrases with style, and sharing
some good old jokes with some of the few people he comes in contact with
during the film.  Rickman is also hysterical, becoming funnier as we get
to know him.  And William Atherton appears as a jerk, obsessive reporter
who tries to cover what happens, and inadvertantly endangers the lives
of McClane and his wife.  But it's all in good fun.
Featuring stunning action sequences, amazing scenes, and a direction
that's so taut that the tension is almost gripping.  It's not just a
stupid action film; it's an intelligent game that is probably one of the
greatest times I've had watching a movie.  But what do you expect from a
film that stars Bruce Willis?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Cop Land (1997)
Writer/Director: James Mangold
Starring: Sylvester Stallone, Harvey Keitel, Ray Liotta, Robert DeNiro, 
Annabella Sciorra, Robert Patrick, Peter Berg, Michael Rapaport, 
Jeaneane Garafolo, Cathy Moriarty, Noah Emmerich, Deborah Harry, Frank 
Vincent
"Stallone.  There's the quintessential thespian.  This guy's got as much 
range as a daisy air-rifle," said Dennis Miller numerous times.  Well, 
Stallone may have drudged through countless Rambo-esque roles, 
occasionally taking a "break" from them to do horrible comedy (but I am 
still going to say that I enjoyed "Oscar."  Sorry.), always emerging 
rich but constantly ostricized by his peers (i.e. Mr. Miller).
When his follow-up film to "Daylight" (*snicker*) was announced as a 
drama and the sophomoric film by writer/director James Mangold (of 
"Heavy," a film I didn't see), who actually cast Sly in the lead, 
surrounding him with actors like DeNiro, Keitel, Liotta, and Sciorra, I 
know I'm not the only one who got a good laugh.  But as the months wore 
on after the announcement, I began to sit on the fence on the topic and 
wait till it actually comes out before I either crucify him or build 
some kind of monument to the guy that's not in front of the Philadelphia 
Art Museum.  And now that I've seen it...
Well, lemme sadistically hold you in suspense for a second here.  The 
story revolves around the slow-moving, kinda-deaf sheriff of Garrison, 
NJ, Freddy Heflin (Sly), and his kafkaesque problem he has to deal with. 
 Now Garrison is a town where almost the entire population is an NYPD 
cop - where the cops come for some form of safety out of the boundaries 
of the nasty city.  The unquestionable and unnofficial leader of them is 
Ray (Keitel), who arranged everything and runs it like some kind of Don 
Corleone who hangs out in bars with his men.
Freddy watches them with envy but with some distance.  See, he went and 
saved a girl when he was young (who would grow up to be Sciorra, who 
kinda resembles Talia Shire a bit in this flick), and, on account of his 
bum ear, was not allowed to be a cop.  And since 99% of the population 
is either cop or wife/kin-of-cop, there's really not much to do.  There 
are only two other officers (Jeneane Garafolo and Noah Emmerich) and 
there duties include dealing with garbage disputes and uselessy doing 
speed checks on a bunch of cops who just tell them "Just say 'Oops, we 
nabbed some good guys.  I think I'll go look for some bad guys.'"
But an Internal Affairs man, Moe Tilden (DeNiro), shows up in town and 
talks to Freddy about the corruption that he already knows about.  
Earlier in the picture, they stumbled up a bit in relation to a kinda 
stupid Garrison cop (Michael Rapaport) who shot a pair of guys who 
sideswiped him since he thought they had a gun.  The guy then jumped off 
the bridge...or did he?  Since Freddy knows all about it and is kind of 
scared to go take on all his friends, he has a giant moral delimna on 
his shoulders.  One angel is scared, the other is speaking the element 
of justice, truth, and good to him.  Also on the scared angel is a bunch 
of people telling him to not screw with the Garrison community which has 
been expertly financed by Ray to ensure a kind of hypocritical peace, 
ruled by a mafia of New York's finest.
The cast is utterly huge, drawing a bunch of scene-chewing actors 
together (i.e. DeNiro and Keitel, who have one lone scene together), 
serving them with an risky topping.  The actual film's exciting and 
riveting enough - but the topping is exciting and riveting no matter how 
good or bad it is.  So this whole "Can Sly do it?" topping is just 
right.
Well, here it is - Sly rocks.  Period.  They guy creates an emmotional 
character who you care about, identify with, and sometimes even almost 
cry with.  Freddy's much like any of us: alone in our principles and 
scared to be alone to do anything about them.  He's such a well-written 
character for the sole reason that he's human.  And Sly, who is almost 
the character anyway, does a fantastically moving job with the role.  No 
more grunting and saying cheesy one-liners.  No more pushing some guy up 
into a staligmate (or is it the other one that points downwards?).  Just 
Sly in his buff - 40 pounds heavier and 1000 times better than he's ever 
been.  This is not only his best performance in years, but simply his 
best performance.
Will Stallone get an Oscar nomination?  I dunno.  If the Oscars were 
nominated right now, he'd definitely be up there.  But I have a feeling 
this film will actually revitalize his sagging career and he might just 
nab a nomination since, well, it's Sly and he actually rocked for a 
change.
The supporting cast is amazing and all, but nothing can stand up to 
Stallone's, probably because most of them are not real humans.  The two 
closest things to human are Freddy's best friend, a coke-addicted 
corrupt cop (Liotta - who else for that kind of character?) who begins 
douting his choice in life, and Freddy's distant love interest, Sciorra, 
who was saved by Freddy and married a jerk cop (Peter Berg).
All the elements create an interesting character study whic borrows 
elements from "High Noon," "Rio Bravo," and "Straw Dogs."  But the plot 
and everything just affects Freddy's character, who finds himself in the 
parallel sitution to his saving-the-girl situation earlier in his life. 
 There, he acted quickly and lost his hearing.  Decades later, he's 
afraid to bust the move and is pretty content to just lay home on his 
couch and listen to Springsteen (yuck).  The Freddy character is what 
will make this film endure.
But even if the Freddy character were not as interesting as he is, the 
film would still kick some great ass.  It's intense, interesting, and 
always entertaining.  And the thought of these cops doing some of the 
stuff they do is just plain creepy.  So, as I said, the Freddy character 
and Stallone's performance is what just adds to this amazing film, which 
is one of the better films I've seen all year.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
Writer/Director: Paul Thomas Anderson
Starring: Mark Wahlberg, Burt Reynolds, Julliane Moore, John C. Reilly,
Don Cheadle, Heather Graham, William H. Macy, Luis Guzman, Philip
Seymour Hoffman, Philip Baker Hall, Alfred Molina, Robert Ridgley, Nina
Hartley, Joanna Gleason
Everyone has something they can do better than anyone else.  Eddie Adams
(Mark Wahlberg) is good at fucking.  With a huge penis that is not shown
until the perfect time (in a hilarious scene), Eddie is nothing but a
good, dumb swinger.  I mean, the guy has a little sideline to his manual
labor job of showing his penis for 5 bucks, and stroking off for 10.
One night at his nightclub job, a man observes him.  This man turns out
to be none other than Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds), adult filmmaker.  He
approaches him in the dishroom, saying "You got something wonderful in
those pants just waiting to pop out," and after a little, uh, soul
searching, Eddie has renamed himself Dirk Diggler, seems to be living
with him, and two fellow porn stars - Amber Waves (Julliane Moore), a
coke-snorting maternal woman who has a kid from another marriage who she
wants to see more of; and Rollergirl ("Swingers"' Heather Graham), a
drop-out who seems to be glued to her rollerskates; among others; and
has soon become a rising porn star.
"Boogie Nights" takes place in the 70s, during a time when porn was
still made for film presentation, and when the artists cared enough to
include a story of sorts, or at least a couple hints of a plot (i.e.
"Emmanuel" and its numerous incarnations, and "Deep Throat," and ITS
numerous incarnations).  Jack himself states that his dream is to make a
porn that will keep the jack-offs in the seats even after they've jacked
off.  This is basically a parallel to fame: after the initial
breakthrough, something or someone looses the interest, and the quality
begins to wane.  That is, unless you're Martin Scorsese.
The film brings all the together in a flashy, almost orgasmic style,
luring us into their world, then watching as it tragically collapses.  I
mean, the story is set up a lot like Scorsese's "Goodfellas," that is,
of course, without the voice-over narration.  The film starts out
introducing us to a wide variety of characters, then brings them
together, then seperates them over the course of the film, as they all
deal with fame and numerous other problems, mostly incarnations of the
fame.
Among the several characters we meet in this ensemble cast are: Buck
Swope (Don Cheadle), an actual actor and very kind person who takes the
porn job to pay money, and who hopes to one day open a Hi-Fi shop of his
own so he can sell stereos (and 8-tracks); Reed Rothchild (John C.
Reilly), another porn star who becomes bosum buddies with Dirk, and ends
up being his a kind of more intelligent side kick of sorts, even though
he's only a hair smarter than Dirk; Scotty (Philip Seymour Hoffman), a
gay and very neurotic boom mike operator and other mechanical things
worker, who kinda has a thing for Dirk (nudge nudge); and Little Bill
(William H. Macy), a behind-the-scenes worker who doesn't seem very
comfortable with his job, especially since his nymphomaniac wife (porn
star Nina Hartley) is always having sex (well, whenever we see her,
which means that this is one of the only women whose name I know that I
have never seen with clothes on).
We also have the management, including a man named The Colonel (Robert
Ridgely), who has a little secret...; and Floyd Gandolli (Philip Baker
Hall), as a man who shows up on the cusp of the decade, with the
foreboding news of the death of porn "film" and the birth of porn
"video," which would bring about the demise of the former.
The acting by all of them is incredible, with no one really sticking
out, which is perfect since this is an ensemble film.  But notable
performances go to Jullianne Moore (big surprise here), the underrated
John C. Reilly (who is a great scene-stealer), Don Cheadle (for giving
one of the most sympathetic and human performances), Heather Graham, and
of course, Burt Reynolds, who gives what may be the performance of his
career.  And Mark Wahlberg is awesome as the lead role.  Who knew Marky
Mark could act?  Except for those of you who saw "The Basketball
Diaries."
While all the actors give stunning performances, the real star of this
film is without a doubt the Paul Thomas Anderson, writer and director
extraordinaire.  He brings us a hysterically funny, and incredibly
dramatic story, which engulfs us into its story, and holds our undivided
attention for the full two and a half hours.  Like "Goodfellas," there
is never a dull moment, and the story never fails to generate interest. 
I was shocked how this film didn't run out of steam for the full time. 
Not many directors can do that. 
And the film is very funny, with several great scenes throughout that
are laugh-out-loud hilarious.  But, structured in the way it is, it's
mostly funny in the beginning, and gradually what was funny becomes
tragic and sad.  Take the whole Little Bill subplot, for instance, as
well as the whole Scotty spiel.
As far as direction, Anderson has an amazing flair for style, with lots
of steadicams, great zooms, tricky camerawork, and close-ups at the
perfect time.  He also has a great knack for picking the perfect music
or song to accompany a scene, with notable uses of "Mama Told Me Not To
Come" (hee hee, I said "come") during an introductory steadicam shot,
and the 80s classic "99 Luff Balloons" during a tense scene of
violence.  It's almost kinda like deja vu...that's because it's a lot
like that of Scorsese!  As I said, this is a lot like "Goodfellas"
story, theme, and structure-wise.  But also directing wise.  Some could
call him a "hack," but one has to realize that to pull it off so
perfectly is pure genius.  There's a reason Scorsese is so lauded by us
film geeks: part of it is because he's so original; the other is because
every frame and shot is choreographed to get the maximum effect for each
scene.  And Anderson knows damn well how to do this, so even if it
originated with Scorsese, you still have to respect Anderson a lot.
Besides, this film starts out as a homage, but just when it seems to
head into pure rip-off, it luckily steers towards parody (accentuated
with a hilarious scene based on the final scene of "Raging Bull").
I want to make a litte side-note about a great scene towards the end
during a little drug deal, which is one of the most tense scenes I've
seen in awhile.  With the potential of a bloodbath, bringing out the
impending death of three of the characters in this film, Anderson gives
the scene every kind of potential fear: loud, annoying music; a
drugged-up buyer; a large bodyguard with a gun; and to top that off, a
little boy in the house setting off those annoying-as-hell sounds that
sound distinctly like shots.  There are a couple things going on during
this sequence too, each tense in its own way.  I just wanted to point
that out, since it's one of the film's strongpoints.
I was blown away by "Boogie Nights," and the world it brings out so
garishly.  The whole film is amazing in bringing out the world of the
late 70s and early 80s, especially in such a mircrocosm.  Of all the
films I've seen so far this year, this is the best I have seen.  And of
all the new directors to arrive as of late, Paul Thomas Anderson will
probably get my vote for the best.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Myth of Fingerprints, The (1997)
Writer/Director: Bart Freundlich
Starring: Rod Scheider, Blythe Danner, Julianne Moore, Noah Wyle, Michael
Vartan, Laurel Holloman, Brian Kerwin, Hope Davis, James LeGros, Arija
Bareikis
"The Myth of Fingerprints" is the "art house" version of every Thanksgiving
film you've ever seen, complete with a large disfunctional family, long
lost loves, new love found, bickering, sex, and even two parents who aren't
sure what to make of their grown-up kids.  It has everything that other
Thanksgiving films have except a sense of realism, a way of communicating
these fears to the audience, and even a bit of originality.  Hell, I even
swear I saw the house in every other Thanksgiving movie as well.
The story concerns itself with a New England family coming together for
Thanksgiving, and spending a couple of days at the big house with the
parents, and sadly, every child is either a cliche or a stereotype (or
sometimes neither, and not even a person).  There's Mia (Julianne Moore),
who's "the bitch who begins to wisen up thanks to someone else;" Warren
(Noah Wyle), who's "the disaffected guy who doesn't really get along well
with his parents and has a long lost love who's in town for awhile;" Jake
(Michael Vartan), who's just, like, there; and Leigh (Laurel Holloman, from
"The Incredibly True Adventures of Two Girls in Love"), who's the "wacky
child."
And three of them have romances or significant others with outsiders.  Jake
has a girlfriend, Margaret (Hope Davis), who's basically just horny and a
tad too honest.  Warren's long lost love (Arija Bareikis) comes to see him
and they hit it off again.  And Mia has a boyfriend or husband, Elliot
(Brian Kerwin), who spends the entirety of the flick pissed of at Mia's
bitchiness, but ends up falling for an old school chum named Cezanne (James
LeGros), who starts off as being compeltely annoying and overbearing but
takes a 180 degree turn and becomes the intelligent guy she always wanted,
who's willing to discuss a book she tried to read but couldn't finish
because her father used the last 300 pages as kinling.
And last but not least, there's the parents, Hal and Lena (Roy Scheider and
Blythe Danner, respectively), who come out as the reason this film works
even slightly, partly because they're given a shade of mystery, and we
never completely understand them.  The film was obviously written from the
point of view of the younger generation, who are so young they don't yet
understand their parents, and this lack of knowledge actually works because
deep down, our parents are complex and shadowy figures who we will probably
never figure out completely.  Why did Hal kiss Warren's girlfriend when she
began sort of flirting with him?  And why does Lena still love him if not
more than she did before?
It's the parents that I was really intrigued with, partly because the
children were given such shallow roles.  Why should we really care if Mia,
a bitch, finds new love when we could be more intrigued with the parents
who act strangely but still love eachother?  Why should we really be
fascinated with a cliched story like the one about Warren getting aquainted
again with his ex-girlfriend when we see a mother and father dealing with
their kids growing up, and feeling more human instead of god-like beings?
If "The Myth of Fingerprints" had stuck with the concept of parents
becoming equals with their kids yet still remaining mysterious people, it
may have been a really amazing film.  Instead, we get cheap subplots that
were probably chalked up in a second to bulk up the storyline, and we end
up being distracted by them in the long run.  What saves the film from
being terrible is the concepts of the parents, and a good amount of acting
from the entire cast, with special mention going to Moore, Holloman, Wyle,
LeGros, Davis, and Danner.  Roy Scheider actually does amazing, as he's
being kind of bad as of late in films (did you see "Romeo is Bleeding?" 
okay, no one did).  He's actually given a scene where he sits on the edge
of one of his son's beds in the middle of the night, singing a song, and
looking more pathetic than crazy.  Not many actors can pull that off.
The film's final shot is something which makes this film seem more special
than it actually is: it's poetic, unnerving, sad, and realistic, all at the
same time.  When you see it, you'll understand.  If it had not tried to be
so much like a "families suck" picture and instead become a reflection on
kids growing up and parents just getting older, then this final shot would
have been even more meaningful, and probably worthy of the film it's now
stuck in.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Krippendorf's Tribe (1998)
Director: Todd Holland
Writer: Charlie Peters (based on the book by Frank Parkin)
Starring: Richard Dreyfus, Jenna Elfman, Lily Tomlin, Natasha Lyonne,
Gregory Smith, Carl Michael Linder, David Ogden Stiers
"Krippendorf's Tribe" is a film that is funny some of the time, but for the
rest, we're left with a really weak one-note comedy which never goes
anywhere, and never enlightens past its outrageous premise.  It's a film
filled with some talented (and not-so-talented) actors who you can tell had
a good time making this film, but just because making a film is fun doesn't
mean the movie will be.  In the end, "Krippendorf's Tribe" is exactly what
was hinted at in the trailers: an occasionally witty film that never
reaches beyond its boundaries.
As you probably know from the trailers, "Krippendorf's Tribe" deals with
James Krippendorf (Richard Dreyfus), an anthropologist who was searching
for a lost tribe in New Guinea, but on his search his wife died, leaving
him to raise their three kids (played by Natasha Lyonne, Gregory Smith, and
Carl Michael Linder), and, of course, he didn't find the lost tribe.  His
days consist of him roaming around the house drearily and spewing out droll
one-liners (he picks up a carton of milk, reads the date, and says "April
3rd?!  I need a year!").
Unfortunately, his days of depressed slothness have rendered him ignorant
to the fact that he has to give a speech one night, and the day before
that, a perky assistant of his, Veronica Micelli (Jenna Elfman, from
"Dharma and Greg"), stops by, and tells him.  He tries to make up
something, but ends up lying through his teeth, naming the tribe
"Shelmikedmu," after his three kids names, and coming up with some bogus
practices, like the family unit is run by a single father.
But he needs proof.  So he begins filming false movies of rituals in his
back yard, using his three children, and, later on, including a drunken
Veronica, who, luckily for him, still has a crush on him.  Meanwhile, a
stuck-up colleague of his (Lily Tomlin) is out to prove him wrong, and
journeys with her assistant to New Guinea to track down the tribe herself. 
So James has to come up with even more lies to cover him, or he'll be going
to jail, or be sued, or, worse off, have his reputation tarnished.
Sounds funny?  I didn't think so either.  Most of the time, we get lame
jokes, and some really forced situations which we, the audience, are
expected to swallow.  The premise in itself does have some promise, though.
 In the hands of better filmmakers, this could have turned into something
that was brilliantly funny, maybe even a little satirical.  But this film
takes the easy way out: never really going anywhere that is interesting or
even intelligent, and never trying to go beyond what the trailers hint at. 
In fact, this film doesn't even really have an ending; it's almost a redo
of the beginning.
"Krippendorf's Tribe" is set up so that it moves in circles: we get a
problem set up, the problem apparently solved, then another problem set up.
 And James never changes at all.  This film is too lighthearted not to
bring him to a conclusion that perhaps his life is really not in the best
position, and maybe he should change it.  The only thing that changes is
his family's respect for him, but come on, how could they respect this guy?
 I mean, sure he's likable, but he's a baldfaced liar who never figures out
that lies are bringing him more and more dilemnas.  In fact, not only does
no one realize the error of their ways, but they get worse (one character
starts off being kinda likable, and ends up much worse off than she was
before).
It's too bad, because there are some geniuinely funny moments, mostly due
to the fact that the lead actors are actually good.  Just because it's a
bad comedy doesn't mean it doesn't have some good comic performances. 
Richard Dreyfus is not only a great actor, but a comic genius, and here we
get to see him doing what he does best: acting immensely stressed in
extremely tight situations.  He brings this film above what would be bad
comedy hell, and into something which we see just to see him.  He's
partnered up with Jenna Elfman, who's also a great comic actor in her own
respect, and the two have some really geniune comic chemistry.
Most of the supporting cast is wasted (most notably David Ogden Stiers, who
is brought in then suffled aside), but Lily Tomlin, though horribly
underwritten, is funny a couple times, and Natasha Lyonne, the narrating
daughter from "Everyone Says I Love You," hits the right notes as James
bitter daughter.
What's left is a film that I laughed at a couple times, but the rest of the
time was pretty cold towards.  If the film had gone somewhere other than in
circles, it may have been a good, fun comedy.  If it had expanded on its
themes, it may have even been a classic (I know that's a bit of a
stretch...).  But what we have is only marginally funny, and highly
forgettable.  But at least it has Richard Dreyfus, which was a start.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
Director: David Fincher
Writers: John D. Brancato and Michael Ferris (with a re-write by Andrew
Kevin Walker)
Starring: Michael Douglas, Sean Penn, Deborah Kara Unger, James Rebhorn,
Armin Mueller-Stahl
There's a scene late in "The Game" where the protagonist suffers what is
probably the most kafkaesque, surreal, and literally breath-taking
sight.  I'm not going to go out and say what it is, because, well, I
want you to see this movie, but when I saw it, even I felt as alienated
and paranoid as the protagonist.  This is the skill that David Fincher
has: to pull us into the movie so much, that we're as scared and
thrilled as the protagonist.  So basically, this is the most thrilling
thriller in a long while.  Well, since "Se7en."
Nicholas Van Orten (Michael Douglas) is a millionaire entropeneur-type
who owns a big company, a giant mansion his dad gave to him, and a new
ex-wife.  It's his 48th birthday, and he's more miserable than usual
since that was the birthday when his father killed himself by throwing
himself off the very roof under which he lives.  He's a control freak,
but more of a calmed-down one, instead of a frantic Steve Buscemi-ite,
who calmly yet with a sense of fatigue, works in his giant yet
claustrophobic office, and even has to be told by his secretary that
"Rachel on line 2" is his ex-wife.
That day, he also gets a visit from his black sheep brother (Sean Penn,
originally Jodie Foster, whom I can't picture at all in this) who gives
him his birthday present: "The Game."  It's something from a company
called "CRS" (forget the breakdown of this ackronym) that is meant to
relax rich people or something.  Nicholas is reluctant but eventually
goes to their offices, has a little chat with one of their heads (James
Rebhorn, finally getting a farily meaty role after all these years), and
is launched into an hour of bizarre exercises.
We, like him, have no clue what this game is about or the purpose or
anything about it.  They say it will come to him, and it eventually
does.  Weird things begin happening to him - i.e. he finds a clown
draped across the front of his house, dressed like his dad; his
television starts talking to him; and he gets a note telling him he must
follow some waitress he accidentally got fired from an elite restaurant
(Deborah Kara Unger, from "Crash").
The events start out like little pranks, but they soon become eery and
dangerous.  More and more bizarre things begin happening to him, and he
soon becomes incredibly paranoid, as do we.  We go through everything he
does, mainly because we get to know the character so well that he soon
becomes like one of those Hitchcock everybodies: a flawed human being
who plumets into a world of intrigue and surrealism.  Soon, Nicholas is
fighting an unknown assailant, trying to find the purpose of the game,
and trying to get out of it before anything worse happens.
By the time the film's over, we're as ragged as Nicholas.  We're with
him, praying for an explanation for what he and we have been through. 
And the ending would be a huge let-down if it weren't for the great
direction, which finishes up masterfully.
David Fincher is quickly becoming one of the better directors around. 
With his underrated "Se7en" behind him (not to mention the very
underrated "Alien 3"), he has proven that he can combine great style
with substance.  While "Alien 3" was just pure atmospheric fun, "Se7en"
had a satirical message, and "The Game" manages to try and fill in the
gaps of what's missing in the life of the modern-day Ebenezer Scrooge.
He's also obviously very influenced by Hitchcock.  As I said, the
Nicholas character is a pure Hitchcock character, but that's not where
it ends.  We also get a kind of bleak and gritty version of one of his
movies, some straight-out homages, and the strong sense of message
Hitchcock was so flawless at attaining.  I mean, all that's missing is a
walk-on by Mr. Fincher.  We even get scenes that are near duplicates of
some of his work, as well as some of the themes.  There are two scenes
straight out of "North by Northwest," there's a touch of "Vertigo at the
end," and there's probably even more if I went back and disected more
carefully.
But not only is this a kind of tip-of-the-hat to Hitchcock, but it's got
Kafka written all over it.  Nicholas is alienated, and is absolutely
alone at more than one point in the film.  And as the film goes on, he
gets more and more paranoid.  This kind of twisted horror view of the
world is exactly what Kafka wrote about, and this film is basically
modern-day Kafka.
As far as acting goes, Michael Douglas gives the best performance he has
in years, presenting a very flawed yet very likable man.  He's easy to
sympathize with, and you can just see him getting more and more crazy as
the film goes on.  He's in almost all of the scenes (okay, so he's in
all of them), and most of the actors are pretty much cameos or short
walk-ons.  
Sean Penn, in fact, is almost a cameo.  He has about three scenes in the
film, but he uses them nicely.  He's very slimey (he's the black sheep
brother, remember?) and at one point is incredibly nervous.  He does a
much better job than Jodie would have (even though Jodie probably could
have pulled it off, since she's one of the best actresses in the world).
Also, Deborah Kara Unger (who I had yet to see act) is amazing in this,
and should be picked up for more cool movies in the future.  She has a
very naturalistic style to her acting, making the lines seem more
down-to-earth than they would be coming from the mouth of another
actor.  James Rebhorn (who was in such films as "Scent of a Woman" and
"My Cousin Vinnie") is also very brief, but is excellent with what
screen time he has.  And Armin Mueller-Stahl is good in a very, very
brief role.
The writing is ingenius.  Yes, there are very agape plot holes, but they
never seem too incredible at the time, but that's really due to the
direction.  But we get a leisurely written film, starting off slowly and
letting us know the protagonist before everything hits the fan.  The
dialogue is witty and interesting, with some very funny lines that come
naturally instead of force-fed.
And, of course, the direction is amazing.  David Fincher combines
engrossing visuals with depth; atmostphere with purpose.  He brings
things to such high tension that there were whole scenes where I
literally held my breath until the big shock came.  As I said, he is
becoming one of the best directors around.
"The Game" is probably going to be written off as just a "very good
thriller."  But really, folks, thrillers this good do not come around
every month or so.  They're about as rare as a visit from the Comet
Kahoutek.  So appreciate this film, because we won't see a better
thriller until the next David Fincher film.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Pillow Book, The (1996)
Writer/Director: Peter Greenaway
Starring: Vivian Wu, Yoishi Oida, Ken Ogata, Ewan McGregor, Hideko Yoshida,
Judy Ongg, Ken Mitsuishi, Yutaka Honda, Barbara Lot
They say that a film reflects the man who made them.  Or at least I do. 
That's why I'd like to find out what kind of a person director Peter
Greenaway really is, especially after seeing two of his films, "The Cook,
the Thief, His Wife, and Her Lover" and "The Pillow Book."  The first
features tons of sex, full nudity of both sexes, people eating escrement,
and cannibalism.  The latter, his latest film, features some more sex, some
more graphic nudity, and, for a little cherry on top, calligraphy being
written on naked human flesh.  Something tells me this guy was a bit of an
outcast in pre-school.
Compared with "The Cook," one of the best films to be released in the 80s,
"The Pillow Book" seems rather shallow.  Instead of being against gluttony
and being a thinly veiled attack on politics ("The Cook" attacked Margaret
Thatcher...somehow), "The Pillow Book" has a smaller and more general
vision.  It's a film about gaining life experiences.  That's all.  It also
dabbles in vengeance, sensuality, the connection between literature and
sex, as well as love, but these are mere ingredients in the big picture,
which is a very simple work complexly and originally told by one of the
most interesting directors working today.  I'm not sure if he's one of the
best, but he's definitely intriguing.
"The Pillow Book" centers around the early life of a Japanese woman named
Nagiko (Vivian Wu), who shares a deep affection for her calligrapher father
(Ken Ogata), since when she was young, he would write on her on each of her
birthdays, telling the same story about how God would write in every
feature on his clay creations, and wrote their names on them so he would
not forget them.  Unfortunately, she discovers at an early age that he's
not a very successful writer and must therefore satisfy the sexual urges of
a homosexual and tyrranical publisher (Yoishi Oida), who becomes the object
of Nagiko's anger because of this.
After a pathetic arranged marriage goes bunk, she high tails it to China to
become a writer like her father, and to try to get vengeance on the
Publisher, all the while trying to find a lover who can satisfy her
sexually and shares the same fetish she does, which becomes writing
calligraphy on naked flesh.  Eventually, she runs into a Scottish linguist,
Jerome (Ewan McGregor - yes, that Ewan McGregor), who not only shares her
fetish to almost equality, but also just happens to be the Publisher's
young lover.  Soon she begins to come up with a bizarre vengeance on him...
Though it takes awhile to really get into the film, "The Pillow Book" is a
endlessly fascinating film, told in a surreal and sensual fashion.  The
direction by Peter Greenaway is definitely original, as he develops his
framing bizarrely, cropping shots so that they fill only a fraction of the
allotted screen space, and features images to pop up in the screen, and
sub-titles to sometimes appear...and sometimes not.  The film is filmed in
about four different languages, and only sometimes does what the actors are
saying become dictated for American audiences.  And sometimes French song
lyrics from the soundtrack quickly roll across the screen, giving the
entire film a kind of documentary/music video feel.  Something tells me
Greenaway should dabble outside of narrative film.  I don't know why...
The story's not extraordinary, as it sometimes contains cliches and
allusions to past Greenaway efforts (most notably "The Cook").  The whole
idea of a delicious kind of vengeance was used in "The Cook," while another
scene is almost an exact retread of a late scene in "The Cook," with one
small exception (as small as it is).  But once looking past this, it's easy
to realize how complex this film is.  Scenes and moments don't make sense
when you first see them, but later on they're made totally clear. 
Characters show up for maybe a scene and then show up later on to become
one of the major characters (most notably Jerome).  And the focus of the
film seems to be straying but once the finale comes, it appears that it
hasn't lost its focus at all.
The most amazing film about this film is the way it feels.  Greenaway is
one of the most sensual directors, a man who can make a film just FEEL
great by using bizarre cinematic techniques.  He makes the story of
Nagiko's life seem more amazing than it really is, just like the life of a
regular person.  But what is The Pillow Book?  It's a book by an ancient
courtesean recounting her experiences, which is something which Nagiko
reads and tries to duplicate in a bizarre fashion.  This is what Greenaway
is doing with Nagiko's life, retelling it in a bizarre fashion.  And it's
one of the more amazing experiences I've had watching a movie lately.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
Director: Mike Nichols
Writer: Elaine May (based on the novel by Joe Klein, who would like to
remain anonymous)
Starring: John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Adrian Lester, Kathy Bates, Billy
Bob Thornton, Maura Tierney, Paul Guilfoyle, Larry Hagman, Caroline Aaron,
Diane Ladd, Stacy Edwards, Tommy Hollis, Allison Janney, Robert Klein,
Mykelti Williamson, Rob Reiner, Tony Shalhoub, Chelcie Ross, Larry King,
Bill Maher
To be blunt, "Primary Colors" is one of the angriest and cynical films
about running for political office ever made, but luckily it doesn't allow
these two overpowering feelings to crush the film's power as entertainment.
 What could have been a really cynical reflection on working for the
Clinton campaign back in '92 (which is what the book by Joe "Anonymous"
Klein is) is instead an epic intelligent satire on a campaign very similar
to that one, not showing what an asswhole Bill Clinton may be, but what the
campaign road does to the people working on it.  Which, of course, suits me
just fine since I would have voted for him if I had been of age back then.
The focus of "Primary Colors" is, in fact, not even on Bill and Hillary
Clinton (as well as Chelsea), but on a man named Henry Burton (Adrian
Lester, nicely faking an American accent) who's the son of a famous civil
rights leader, and who becomes the film's version of George Stephanopolous.
 He's interested in working for an Arkansas governor named Jack Stanton
(John Travolta, done up in Clinton-gear), but before officially signing on
to the team, finds himself on his private jet to New Hampshire with Stanton
sleeping on his shoulder.
Before he can even get new clothes from his house, Burton has been swept
away by Stanton and his ideals (he sees him cry over a speech an uneducated
man played by Mykelti Williamson who describes his inability to read), and
has been given a head post of a campaign office.  Burton respects Stanton,
and has convinced himself that he is a good person and candidate, even
after seeing how he acts when not with people who can further his political
career.  As the film goes on, Burton finds himself on the road with Stanton
and a couple of other team members, such as: a James Carville-esque
political strategist, Richard Jemmons (a great Billy Bob Thornton); a
fellow worker named Daisy Green ("NewsRadio"'s Maura Tierney), who begins a
relationship with Burton more out of a lack of nothing else to do than out
of love; and others, like a member played by Paul Guilfoyle, who's been in
everything recently...or at least it seems that way.
The truth is, though, that Stanton's weakness is his libido, and the film
not only has a Gennifer Flowers for us, but also a young daughter of a
friends' who he may or may not have gotten pregnant.  Stanton seems to not
be able to control this, even after speaking to him about it, and this
obviously becomes his big weak point in terms of the media's coverage of
his race to become president.
The film is obviously and unsubtlely a caricature of the Clintons, even
giving Travolta the exact look of Clinton (right down to his eyebrows), and
portraying Stanton's Hillary, Susan (Emma Thompson, also faking a nice
American accent...or at least giving a good try), as a tough woman, almost
totally resembling Hillary's rough outer edge.  This may seem cheap, but
the film actually doesn't try and show how they are alone, and we never see
how Jack's infidelities hurt Susan.  There are at least three occurances of
Jack and Susan being left alone by someone else so that they can argue, but
we leave along with the people, never seeing what occurs in private.  This
is a wise choice: how does the film know what goes on?  Trying to come up
with a solution to the question of what goes on behind their closed doors
would lead to a mistep in the film.  The fact that Jack Stanton isn't in
all of this film is one of the film's major benefits.
There's another chief character in the film in the form of Kathy Bates (ha
ha) named Libby Holden, a woman who is hired by Stanton's staff to uncover
any secret information about Jack that could harm him (a woman uncovers a
time when Jack was arrested and released by a Senator).  Kathy plays her as
an extremely tough woman, bullying anyone who gets in her way, and taking
on a very demanding presence in Jack's staff.
One of the great things about this film is how it treats her character:
she's seen as a stereotype when she walks into the film for the first time
(the tough lesbian, sleeping with little staff member Stacy Edwards, who
just starred in "In the Company of Men" and is currently residing on
"Chicago Hope"), but as the film goes on, she is forced to do some
reconnaissance work AGAINST the main opponent (who soon becomes none other
than Larry Hagman, sans Jeanie), and reveals herself to not just be a tough
woman, but a woman with a strict moral center, who is only up for
protecting people from themselves, not hurting innocent people.
The film presents all of this with a touch of cynicism (after all, it's
told from the point of view of someone who has to endure all of this), but
with the right amount of reflexion, seeing that the problem with the
campaign road was not with Jack Stanton and his infidelities, but really
with being on the road itself.  Campaigning is shown to tear people apart,
make them crazy and do horrible things as things get worse.  Where else
would all of a person's past occurances come to light and be scrutinized
like it was something they did yesterday?
The greatest thing about this film is its presentation of Jack Stanton,
who's seen as a man with a severe character flaw, but is still a very good
person, and one hell of a politician.  Seeing him sitting down and
listening to people is something that is a very sellable political trait,
and the fact that his main wont in life is to help people makes him a good
person, not just a very good politician.  And the fact that we don't know
everything about him is one of the film's best traits.
"Primary Colors" comes off as being more honest than cynical, probably
because it tells it more as a reflexion of being on the road, remembering
what it was like those lonesome nights in the hotel room, and watching the
TV nervously, wondering what place the candidate your working for will get
a high rating.  It's bitter about how the media took advantage of the
candidate's past, trying to make them out to be horrible creatures, and
then how the other candidates tried to use this information for their own
benefit.  And it's even a little annoyed by the talk show hosts who mock
political leaders (represented by Bill Maher - what?  Leno was busy?),
taking advantage of the weakness of being completely in the public's eye. 
It's angry and pissed off about this, but it's not overbearing.
"Primary Colors" is only the second film to be pissed off at the media in
terms of the way they handle politics in under six months (the others being
"Wag the Dog" and "Bulworth"), but this film actually comes off as being
more human and epic than those.  One of the best things about "Primary
Colors" is how it's mad as hell, but it has the intelligence to not let
that bring it down.  It's concerned with the way it affects people, making
them do terrible things to other people, and how it drives the people who
work for it sometimes over the edge.  I guess it's not so much an
adaptation of the bitter novel as much as it is a reflexion on it much
later with more facts and deeper recollection.
Just this week there was a primary in my home town where the one candidate
sent out newsletters to potential voters, telling them a bunch of lies
about the opponent, resulting in his win by over 50 percent.  Do I think
the guy who did this is an asswhole?  Well, I don't know him very well
(although I did shake his hand once), but I'm just assuming he did this out
of the stress of working so hard to run for political office and worrying
that it may result in nothing.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Adjuster, The (1991)
Writer/Director: Atom Egoyan
Starring: Elias Kosteas, Arsinée Khanjian, Maury Chaykin, Gabrielle
Rose, David Hemblen, Jennifer Dale, Don McKellar, Rose Sarkisyan, Armen
Kokorian, Jacqueline Samuda, Gérard Parkes, Patricia Collins, Stephen
Ouimette, Raoul Trujillo, Tony Nardi, Paul Bettis
One of the true joys in this life is watching an Atom Egoyan film.  The
Armenian-Canadian director of such films as "Speaking Parts," "Exotica,"
and "The Sweet Hereafter" structures his films like no one else does: as
a complicated puzzle of characters that the viewer has to piece
together.  Events are presented in a bizarre manner with no explanation,
but later on, they are never blatantly explained, but cunningly hinted
at.  While this may piss off a lotta people, who are more adept at
trying to sympathize with someone and make a straight-laced film out of
it, others will find it to be as enjoyable as doing the Jumbo every day.
There's not really any plot, but we do get three weird tales interlacing
with one another throughout the film.  The Insurance Adjuster of the
title is Noah (Elias Kosteas), who's job it is to claim everything that
was lost in an accident, and generally take care of his clients.  But
Noah is a workaholic.  He works any hour of the day to help out his
clients in any way possible, even sexually.
He lives in a house with his family in a once-budding development that
went bankrupt in production and left it being the only house built
amongst the dirt.  Around their house are signs for houses to be built
later on, but no soon signs of any development.  In the house with him
is his wife, Hera (Egoyan's real wife, Arsinée Khanjian), their son
(Armen Kokorian), and Hera's sister (Rose Sarkisyan), who we barely see.
Meanwhile Hera works as a film censor, watching pornographic films all
day, and pushing buttons to show each censoring problem with the films. 
However, she brings along a small camcorder with her to tape them
uneditied.  Does she get off on it?  Is there another reason she does
it?  But the answer will come soon after a young censor (Don McKellar)
catches her and alerts her violation to their boss (Egoyan regular David
Hemblen).
The other story deals with a bizarre rich couple - Bubba and Mimi (other
Egoyan regulars, Maury Chaykin and Gabrielle Rose, respectively) - who
use their wealth to stage bizarre fantasy acts, sometimes dealing with
some kind of weird sex act.  Their first scene in the film shows Bubba
disguised as a bum on a subway train (where Hera is) and Mimi dressed
like a business woman, and her sitting next to him, grabbing his hand,
and sticking it up her skirt.
Every scene in the film has a weird, unnerving feeling, and is presented
in the most loose, and surreal manner possible.  Every scene is
presented this way because Egoyan wants us to piece everything together,
and therefore every scene is at least 70% more weird than it would be if
we knew the facts surrounding it.  A lot of people who see his films
will probably walk out or give up early on in the film because they're
presented this way, and those who stay might not even understand it
completely by the final frame.  I can't say I can explain this
perfectly, but the film has remained with me, it's images and scenes
stapled into my brain to think about over and over again.
Although the film has a bizarre and creepy atmosphere, Egoyan has said
that this is basically a black comedy.  The characters all do bizarre
things, and the only reason we don't laugh at many of the things they do
(although I did crack up in a scene where Mimi pretends to be a
flirtatious cheerleader in front of about six horny football players) is
because we're not sure what to think of them until later on in the
film.  This kind of struture allows many things to become a mystery even
after the film and to alienate its viewer's emotionally.
But this film is not trying to depress us or even make us cry.  It's a
puzzle, with lots of themes going through it about materialism and sex
being presented, not a normal film with characters you can sympathize
with or a plot you can follow without thinking.  Egoyan's films,
especially his earlier kinkier films, are an aquired taste, mainly
constructed for people who love to do all sorts of puzzles, but those
who do must also be able to tolerate all sorts of bizarre sexual
instances.  But if you can piece it together, it's extremely rewarding.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Jane Austen's Mafia! (1998)
Director: Jim Abrahams
Writers: Jim Abrahams, Greg Norberg, and Michael McCamus
Starring: Jay Mohr, Lloyd Bridges, Christina Applegate, Billy Burke,
Olympia Dukakis, Pamela Gidley
"Mafia!" comes from one third of the creators of "Airplane!," a film that
defined the gag-a-minute form of comedy, and did it with such sheer surreal
delight that it's even more of a classic than the film it was parodying,
"Airport."  That person is Jim Abrahams, who is also one of the creators of
"The Naked Gun" and "Hot Shots!" movies, which were also hilarious films. 
Why were they hilaroius?  Because a good percentile of the millions of
jokes told were funny.  A film like this can never really fail as long as
there are funny jokes, and it only works incredibly well if the jokes are
not only funnier but frequent.  The longer the space between the good
jokes, the worse the film gets.
Such a film is "Mafia!," a gag-induced treatment of three mafia pics - "The
Godfather," "The Godfather: Part II," and "Casino" - as well as assorted
other flicks, everything from "Forrest Gump" to "The Gold Rush" to "Il
Postino."  I did laugh during this film, but there are two differences
between this film and the other earlier greater films: 1) when I laughed,
it was more of a chuckle then a whole-hearted laugh, and 2) these laughs
were widely spaced between jokes that just fell completely on their ass and
got more of a "nice try" reaction than anything else.
Take one early scene in the movie: Lloyd Bridges, in his final role, plays
the Brando part in the first "Godfather" movie, and during his daughter's
wedding, a tall henchman dressed as a priest walks up to him and says, "Say
hello to my little friend."  Instead of wipping out a gun like Pacino did
in "Scarface" when he said this line, he opens the crease in his pants, and
a little dwarf comes out with a gun and shoots Bridges.  I laughed
(although I laughed harder when I saw it for the first time in the
previews).  Then the dwarf continues to shoot Bridges over and over and
over and over and over again, and as he's being shot, he starts doing what
looks like dances, and the band plays whatever dance they think he's doing,
everything from Swing to the Macarena.  Just not funny.  Nice try, though.
I'm not sure why the jokes aren't that funny.  Abrahams is very adept at
creating gags-a-second on his own, gags that are for the most part pretty
hilarious.  And he has some good performers on hand, like Jay Mohr, who was
killer during his brief stint on "Saturday Night Live" and awesome as a
scene stealer in "Jerry Maguire."  He even has Bridges, bringing comic
grace a la an older Leslie Nielsen, and giving it the right note of
sentimentality since we loved him and he's gone.  My god, he even somehow
got Olympia Dukakis to show up in an all-too-brief performance as Bridges's
aging, hunch-backed mother who at one point drinks prune juice during a
parody of a famous scene in the first "Godfather."
Maybe it's not that funny because basically the plot of the parody, if you
can call it that, it extremely sloppy.  Even "Airplane!" had a coherent
plot, sorta, one that you could say was well-laid out.  The jokes in that
movie came out of the scene itself, which were milked for all its comic
worth.  Here, the story moves primarily because of the plot.  When a scene
is over, it's because the writers ran out of jokes, and the parodies of the
three chief movies just don't work together.  The film opens with a parody
of the opening scene of "Casino," with Jay Mohr playing the DeNiro
character being blown up in his car, and then goes back to his father's
childhood and early adulthood a la "The Godfather: Part II," then goes to
the opening of the first "Godfather."  These films don't it together as
well, though, and even though I probably shouldn't be complaning that a
plot is sloppy in a film like this, it may be part of the reason why it's
just not that funny.
But the main problem with this film is the jokes aren't that funny.  The
best parts are the ones in the casino, where there are games like "Chutes
and Ladders," "Candyland," as well as games like "Guess the Number" and
"You Can't Possibly Win This Game."  The worst parts are things in between
the good jokes, the fillers, like how everyone runs into things and knocks
them over.  Maybe the biggest travesty is they do next to nothing with
Lloyd Bridges.  It's not that I'm sad he didn't get more screen time
because it was his final performance - he was a great comic actor and he
deserves more than a scene where he just falls down and closes venitan
blinds on his head.  They don't even allow him to do a Brando
impersonation, the key to any joke made at the "Godfather" films.
But really, who wanted to see a parody of these films anyway.  They're so
intensely serious that any joke that had been made at them has probably
been made already.  Brando's performance is a laugh in itself - show me one
person who can't at least try to do a Brando imitation?  I said a film like
this couldn't entirely fail, but this one comes pretty damn close.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Frighteners, The (1996)
Director: Peter Jackson
Writers: Peter Jackson and Frances Walsh
Starring: Michael J. Fox, Trini Alvarado, Peter Dobson, Jeffrey Combs,
Jake Busey, Dee Wallace-Stone, Chi McBride, Jim Fyfe, John Astin, R. Lee
Ermey, Troy Evans
"Dead Alive" (a.k.a. "Brain Dead") was a hilarious darkly comic horror
film with the best single gorefest ever put on celluloid.  "Heavenly
Creatures" was a wonderfully disturbing character study/black comedy
which examined two school girls' strange obsession with one another,
going WAYYYY past simple homosexuality.  Compared to these two amazing,
amazing flicks, "The Frighteners," Jackson's American debut (and
subsequent box office flop) is rather tepid.
That's not to say that it's not a good flick.  Often when foreign and
acclaimed directors arrive to make American films, they have a bit of
trouble settling in (it's natural; just ask John Woo and Danny Boyle). 
In some cases, it's because they're homeland material is a tad too
risque for our elite, censored-as-hell American tastes (most of Woo's
Hong Kong flicks are "unrated," which also applies to "Dead Alive;" and
I still haven't seen the uncut version of "Trainspotting").
Granted, Jackson's arrival is a tad more well-done than that of Woo's
and Boyle's ("Hard Target" is considered a "failure," and...I mean, it
starred Van Damme; and "A Life Less Ordinary" MIGHT peak 5 million bucks
and might get more than 10 good reviews out of the whole country).  But
it's just not as good as his earlier films.  I've never seen his early
early work (like "Bad Taste," and the sick Muppet parody, "Meet the
Feebles" - both are more rare than finding a gas station in Philadelphia
- inside joke), but I'm pretty sure that "The Frighteners" is just as
tepid as it seems.
Not to say it isn't a shock for us Americans.  The film's mood twists
and turns: it starts off as an off-beat comedy, then ultimately settles
into wild horror.  The film opens spectacularly, giving off hints of
Jackson at his most manic, with a ghost chasing a screaming woman (Dee
Wallace-Stone - you remember the mom from "E.T.") through a crumbling
mansion, seeping through walls, and creeping under the carpet, and
ending in a great shot that scares the hell out of the viewer.
The we meet Frank Black (Michael J. Fox, right before "Spin City" came
out), a bitter, world-weary con-man, or so it seems.  He says he's a
psychic and can exorcise ghosts, and no one really believes him...until
a ghost starts poltergeisting (a word?) them.  Then Frank comes in, does
his stuff, and no more ghosts.  Maybe he's the real thing...guess
again.   Yes, he can communicate with ghosts, but they're really his
buds, and are working with him (or for him) to get him money and
business, a pure example of the cleverness of the script.
But soon numbers are appearing on people's heads, only seen by Frank. 
And soon enough, they turn up dead.  It seems a serial killer ghost is
doing the nasty deeds, and making it look like Frank is the culprit. 
The film shifts into horror, yet never really looses the twisted humor
from the first parts.
The humor in this film is in no way as great as that of "Dead Alive" and
"Heavenly Creatures."  A typical joke in "Dead Alive" featured a woman
turning into a zombie sitting at lunch with a group of people who don't
know she's a zombie, and accidentally eating her eyeball, which has
fallen into her soup.  And a "Heavenly Creatures" joke involved great
style, and acting by one of the actresses, especially a scene where a
paranoid father was checking up on the two girls who were in the
bathroom, taking pictures of eachothers' clevage.
But "The Frighteners" is a little more off-beat, and more American. 
Sometimes there's some good old American slapstick, but then there's
some good old American movie allusions.  One of the funniest film geek
jokes involves a graveyard where the general of it just happens to be
the robotic, insulting drill sergeant from Kubrick's "Full Metal
Jacket," reincarnated as a ghost and played by the exact same actor as
in the film, the great R. Lee Ermey.  And cult horror fans will love
that Jeffrey Combs ("Re-Animator") shows up halfway through as a totally
bizarre and surrealistic investigator who's hung out with way too many
cults.
But the humor just isn't as wild and manic as it was in Jackson's
earlier "Dead Alive."  I mean, I probably laughed more during the final
30 minutes of that movie than I would have if I watched all of Chris
Farley's movies, and multiplied the number of times I laughed at all of
them combined by one thousand.  But "The Frighteners" is much more
restrained, and there-in lies its main problem.
Sometimes when a film is too structured, it looses the impact it would
have needed.  Sure, "Heavenly Creatures" was structured, but it was a
more dramatic film than his other flicks.  But "Dead Alive" was funny
because it went wild.  "The Frighteners" needed this same kind of touch
to it, to differentiate itself more from American flicks.  I mean,
there's a reason why we bring acclaimed foreign filmmakers over here to
make films: money.  But the other reason is to bring a part of their
culture over to this one.  When they assimilate, they kind of loose
their luster, and "The Frighteners" looses that.
On better news, the film works on its own anyway, although it's nothing
absolutely spectacular.  The acting is also very good, with Fox doing a
strangely good job in a role he was definitely not typecast for.  Trini
Alvarado ("Little Women") does a good job as his love interest (there
has to be one: it's American).  Jake Busey plays the big villain, and
has that same kind of creepy-ass visage his father once had...hell, he
still has it.  John Astin, unrecognizable under layers and layers and
layers of make-up and special effects, does a good job with a small
role.  And Jeffrey Combs is...wow, he's a cool guy.
"The Frighteners" works, but is not as jaw-droppingly amazing as
Jackson's other films, yet still shows that Jackson can at least do a
pretty good job on his American debut.  But if you want to see a real
piece of Jackson-ography, see "Dead Alive" and/or "Heavenly Creatures."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Crash (1996)
Director: David Cronenberg
Writer: David Cronenberg (from the novel by J.G. Ballard)
Starring: James Spader, Deborah Kara Ungar, Holly Hunter, Elias Kosteas,
Rosanna Arquette, Peter MacNeill, Yolande Julian, Cheryl Swarts, Alice
Poon
I'm not really sure what to think about "Crash."  On the surface, it's a
cold, boring, unerotic porn with name starts, a name director, and some
cool camerawork.  I mean, it left me completely bored, unsatisfied, and
generally kinda weirded out.  But then again, not every film's supposed
to leave you entertained.
"Crash" is structured to play like a porn flick, but with significantly
more plot and dialogue.  While we see several extremely taboo scenes of
weirdo sex, we also have a skimpy little plot going on (mostly towards
the beginning), and maybe just a hair of characterization.  Not to
mention the acting is generally pretty good, and we don't really see a
lot of the actors completely exposed.
But what makes it supremely different from a porn is the fact that this
is not an erotic experience.  This film does not posess the erotic
hypnotism of "Henry and June" or the just plain horniness of, say, "Deep
Throat" (not that I've seen it).  If one was to be made completely hot
by this film, it would probably mean they were also into the whole "auto
eroticism" thing.  The film leaves you cold erotically (and maybe in
many other ways), but what it does is present a group of people who live
on the edge.
The film opens up on a woman, Catherine (Deborah Kara Ungar, of "The
Game"), pressing her bare breast up against a car in a public air
hangar.  Suddenly, a man enters the frame and begins to take her from
behind (the film doesnt' show all this though, even if it is NC-17). 
The next scene has a film director, James (James Spader), having sex
with a camera woman (Alice Poon) in an office on the highly-populated
set of his movie.  The next scene has the two coming together, revealing
to us that they're husband and wife, and them sharing in one another's
escapades.  While the two are arguably freaky people, we at least know
they love to live on the edge.
Soon afterwards, James is driving down the road at night, reclessly of
course (he's reading something), when he drifts into the other lane, and
then hits another car face on.  James is not killed, but the passenger
in the other car flies into his seat (obviously dying), leaving the
driver, Helen Remington (Holly Hunter - in a porn?), also alive.  The
two go through therapy together, and when getting out, they run into
eachother again.  When James gives her a ride home, they almost get into
another accident, and immeadiately afterwards, they go to an unbusy
parking lot, and have a little quickie, as they were aroused by the
accident.
You wouldn't think there would be many people who shared this same kind
of fetish, but they run into a freaky guy named Vaughan (Elias Kosteas)
and his crutch-carrying girlfriend, Gabrielle (Rosanna Arquette), who
are also into it.  Vaughan is into living on the edge as they are, but
he takes it to another level: he loves to recreate famous car crashes. 
In one scene, he and a friend, Colin Seagrave (Peter MacNeill) recreate
James Dean's car crash without any padding or safety belts, and suffer
some concussions, but nevertheless get a rush (and the attention of the
police).  Soon, these five are all having sex with one another, be it
straight, gay, or lesbian sex.
While this is admittingly all a bit comical (the film is almost like a
black comedy), the film does do a pretty awesome portrayal of people
who's main fetish is living on the edge.  I'm sure somewhere there are
people who get aroused by car accidents, but I personally don't see a
connection between car crashes and sex.  The main connection Cronenberg
shows us that both give a definite rush.  His car crash scenes are quick
and exciting mini-masterpieces: we're at first not sure if they'll take
place, but everytime it looks like it may occur, we gasp.  Then when it
happens, we hold our breath.  The same thing happens with sex, although
not in the same fashion.  These people are merely taking it to another
level.
The only problem with the film is that it's a tad redundant.  A normal
porn lasts from an hour to an hour and a half.  This goes on for about
100 minutes, and it just seems a little too long.  The sex and car
crashes are far between one another, and the time between them are a tad
on the boring side.  There's no characterization, although it could
definitely be argued, that hey, it's a porn, and we're not here to
sympathize.  But still, they coulda cut it down a bit.
But the film is saved with its presentation, as well as some other
elements.  The atmosphere is very dark and forboding, creating a kind of
cool weird feeling.  And there are several scenes are just amazing.  One
scene has Catherine and James having sex, while she softly asks him
questions about being with a man, which sounds almost erotic the way she
says it.  A sequence involving one character's death is filled with all
the edgy disjointment that the film needs.  And the final shot is shot
perfectly, creating an image of a car crash, and a couple having sex in
front of it, despite the fact that she's wounded.
The acting is also pretty good, especially for what is almost a porn
(ousting Linda Lovelace as best actress in a porn).  While James Spader
is pretty boring (he's usually pretty intense), Deborah Kara Ungar is
amazing.  She speaks all her words in almost zombie-like hushes, and
when she's having sex, she has a blank look on her face, not showing the
viewer whether she's enjoying it or not.  In one scene, she actually
looks dead while someone is having sex with her.  Holly Hunter, who gets
extra credit just for appearing in something like this, is pretty good,
and so is Rosanna Arquette (who adds a kinda cool kinkiness to her
role).
But the film is stolen by Elias Kosteas who plays his character so
intensely that he almost upstages everyone.  He often speaks as he is
out of breath, showing a definite affinity for his way of life.  He has
a great deal of energy in several scenes, especially one scene where
he's taking photographs of a picture, and a later scene where he's
getting a freaky tatoo.  He and Spader share sexual chemistry in several
scenes, foreshadowing a later scene.  Kosteas is a little known actor
(his biggest role was Casey Jones in "Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles"),
but here he shows a DeNiro-like presence, hinting that he's capable of
bigger roles.
While I hardly enjoyed "Crash," it's still a pretty intriguing portrayal
of a group of people who, if the exist, are some of the strangest and
most bizarre people in the world.  These people are able to share a rush
between two completely different entities, and the film, which doesn't
exactly pain them in a negative light, is sucessful in bringing them to
light, even if it leaves the viewer unnerved and generally freaked out. 
Despite the hardcore nature of the film and the subsequent NC-17 rating
(there's also an R-rated version, but I wouldn't even go near that
thing), anyone looking for a quick turn-on should just rent a regular
porno.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Lolita (1962)
Director: Stanley Kubrick
Writer: Vladmir Nabokov (adapted from his novel)
Starring: James Mason, Sue Lyon, Shelly Winters, Peter Sellers
"How did they ever make a movie like 'Lolita?'" said the posters for the
1962 Kubrick adaptation of the raunchy novel by Vladmir Nabokov of the same
name.  After reading it, I wondered the same thing.  Here's a novel dealing
with the sexual obsession a middle-aged man has for a 14-year old "nymphet"
with the eponomys name, and in the early 60s, a film is being made from it.
 To readers of the novel, this means an unfaithful adaptation to adhere to
the early 60s censors, which the film does.  Anyone looking for a faithful
adaptation should wait for the new one directed by Adrian Lynne to find an
American distributor.
But as unfaithful as it is the novel, "Lolita" is surprisingly remarkable. 
It has a kind of weird comic feel to it, with small chuckles coming out of
scenes that are funny because of character, not situation.  And it has a
kind of Sophoclean depth to it, mostly due to a structure that was forced
upon the film by the distributors.  The first scene of the film is the last
chapter of the novel: our protagonist, Humbert Humbert (played with
brilliance by James Mason, who you may remember as the head villain in
Hitchcock's "North by Northwest"), goes to kill the object of his hatred,
the man who stole his Lolita from him, Claire Quilty (Peter Sellars).  This
was done because the distributors wanted Humbert Humbert to seem like a
murderer before he's a pedophile.  But it instead gives a brilliant scope
of fate to it.  Like Oedpius, Humbert Humbert is forced to live a tragic
life, his tragic flaw being his obsession with Lolita.
The novel by Vladmir Nabokov is a brilliantly written novel, told from the
perspective of Humbert Humbert himself (maybe revealing a bit about
Nabokov...), and filled with clever word play much like James Joyce.  The
novel is the journals of Humbert upon seeing everything in his life, and
being a writer, Humbert has a sardonic, pretentious wit about everything. 
With a narration by Humbert throughout the film, maybe the point is that
Humbert sees his future because of his lifestyle but can't change who he
is.  He's trapped to be Humbert Humbert, the pedophile.
The plot deals with Humbert who moves to America to write and get a
teaching job, and ends up staying with in a big house owned by the
eccentric, overbearing, sexual-crazed, nightmare mother, Charlotte Haze (a
remarkably thin Shelley Winters), primarily because he sees her daughter,
Lolita (Sue Lyon, actually a little over 16), tanning in a bikini in her
garden.  The film's only flaw is its backup for Humbert, which the novel
supplies as being that he lost a childhood sweetheart to death, and she
reminds him of her.  Although this isn't a big flaw, it does make Humbert
look more like a pedophile than he is in the book.
Soon, Humbert has married Charlotte, solely so he can see Lolita more and
wait for Charlotte to die of a failing kidney she has.  But when Charlotte
discovers his diaries, which he kept for more of thrill with the situation,
she storms out and is thankfully hit by a car, killing her instantly.  He
goes off with Lolita on a road trip, and is constantly running into people
who we know is the same person: Claire Quilty from the beginning, another
pedophile writer (though this time a playwright) obsessed with Lolita.  As
the film goes on, Quilty is constantly disguising himself as various
different people: a police officer, a german psychiatrist, etc (hinting at
the kind of chameleon-like role playing Sellars would do in Kubrick's next
film, "Dr. Strangelove") in an effort to rob Lolita from Humbert, who is
pathetically trying to control her.
What's remarkable about this film is its sense of humor.  The film has a
darkly comic feel mixed with the tragic story.  It's like watching Greek
Tragedy with lots of humor in it.  Although one slapstick moment seems too
disjointed from the film (a scene involving a cot, a sleeping Lolita, and a
loud Hotel Attendant), the film maintains humor from the characters and
their nuances.  This is not a film we laugh hard at, but we do get lots of
chuckles out of just watching the characters shine do their stuff.
Stanley Kubrick has always been an amazing director, and it's easy to
dismiss this film from the other films in his oeuvre.  It lacks the scope
of many of his other films, as well as the hypnotism.  But when grading a
director's work, one must ignore all the others and concentrate on the film
as it stands alone.  It's a simple film, despite its taboo topic, and it
never lets its gimmick of a grown man in love with a teenage girl overcome
its purpose of describing a tragic character, and the situation surrounding
him.
Besides, there are so many brilliant things about it, like the gorgeous
black and white photography, showing the sadness lying within the film. 
And there are several brilliant scenes, like the opening which is among
Kubrick's most intense and funniest sequences, with a hung over and crazed
Quilty playing oblivious to Humbert's mortal threats.  Charlotte's death
scene is also brilliant, with a cruel bit humor dumped in for a better
effect.  And the final scene where Lolita explains what happened to her
after Quilty stole her and Humbert finally gives in is sad without becoming
melodratic.  Kubrick easily lets this be funny and tragic without mixing
the two elements wrong.
The acting from all is brilliant.  Sue Lyon, although looking way too old
to play the character at a young age and too young to play the character at
an older age, nails her acting, showing Lolita as a very nuanced character,
exhibiting all her childish bitchiness.  Shelley Winters is amazing,
showing a well-rounded character, and showing that back in the day, she was
actually...dare I say it, attractive.  And Peter Sellars is ingeniusly
funny in his multiple-yet-singular role, stealing many of the scenes.
But it is James Mason who really amazed me.  Despite being a crazy
pedophile, he shows Humbert Humbert as being a tragic character, and easily
gets our sympathy despite being who and what he is.  Mason is an amazing
actor, and he exhibits lots of great personality in his portrayal of
Humbert Humbert.  Scenes where he's trying to rule Lolita are priceless,
especially one where he's just embarrassed her socially, and tries to coax
her back to him.  Mason's one of the many pleasures of watching this film.
"Lolita" has been wrongly presented in history as being one of Kubrick's
underrated films, a hard-to-find masterpiece that has been wrongly bashed
by some as being unlike the novel.  But who cares if a film is unlike the
novel?  Espeically if it has the good excuse that it was the early 60s,
where a novel as frank as "Lolita" could be written, but a film as frank as
it couldn't be filmed.  Besides that, it is as tragic as any old Greek
play, only more humerous.
NOTE: Note how I didn't make one lame joke about this film's relation to
Woody Allen...oh darn...
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Director: Gus Van Sant
Writers: Ben Affleck and Matt Damon
Starring: Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Minnie Driver, Stellan Skarsgĺrd,
Ben Affleck, Cole Hauser, Casy Affleck, George Plimpton
There are certain people in the world who have some talent that very few
people have, but they chose not to take advantage of this for some
personal reason.  "Good Will Hunting" is about one of those people.
The Will Hunting of the (horrible) title (let's face it, this film would
be a bitch to title), played by co-writer Matt Damon, is a mathematical
genius.  He can do almost any mathematical connundrum in about the time
it takes to brew a cup of Irish Cream Cappuccino.  And he works at
MIT...as the janitor.
One day, the professor of one of the most challenging courses,
Proffessor Lambeau ("Breaking the Waves"'s Stellan Skarsgĺrd), puts a
big problem on the board for his students to attempt to complete.  The
next day, it's already done on the board, but no one in his class claims
to have done it.  So Lambeau puts another problem on the board, this
time one that took he and his colleagues over two years to prove.  And,
duh, it's done again.  Of course, they catch the guy who did it red
handed - Will.
Before Lambeau can find Will again (he ran away when he caught him),
Will has gotten into a fight with a bunch of punks on a basketball
court, and struck a police officer, so Lambeau gets him out on probation
with two agreements: a) he work with him on math, and b) he get some
therapy.  After going through some therapists whom he psyches out in one
way or another (for a hypnotist, he fakes being under his spell, then
launches into an impromptu performance of the 70s classic, "Afternoon
Delight").
Finally, Lambeau's old college roomate, Sean McGuire (Robin Williams), a
psych professor, agrees to treat him, and the two begin a rocky
relationship, as Sean tries to get Will to open up.  Turns out Will had
a rough childhood, being abandoned, and placed in foster homes and what
not.  It also turns out that Will does not want to do simple mathematics
all his life; he wants a challenge.  And that is to hang out with his
buds (including the other co-writer, Ben Affleck), and do honorable
jobs, like construction.
Is it right to make this genius follow in the footsteps of Einstein and
Kasinsky?  Should this guy be forced to do something he doesn't want to
do?  This appears to be one of the million questions in this film, which
is jam-packed with greatness, but does not have the totally brilliant
whole it should.
I'm not saying "Good Will Hunting" is a bad film at all.  It's a very
enjoyable film with tons of great moments, and lots of great things
about it.  The acting is amazing, with two Oscar-nomination-worthy
performances from Damon and Williams, who have amazing chemistry
together.  We also get some great support from Stellan Skarsgĺrd (great
name), Ben Affleck, and from Minnie Driver, who plays Will's love
interest, Skylar.
There are tons of individual moments that I adored.  I loved all the
comedy in the film, especially a scene where Damon proves a schmuck out
of a college student who is quoting a historian to impress some chicks,
his various attempts at therapy, and of course, my favorite scene in the
entire film, the one where he delivers a long, exstensive rant to some
NSA agents about the downside of working for them.
I liked the relationship between some of the people, like Will and
Skylar, Will and Sean, Sean and Lambeau, and Will and his friends. 
There are scenes between them which are just amazing to watch.  And
there are even moments in the film which are so honest in their
portrayal, that I felt rightfully uncomfortable.  Like the break-up
scene between Will and Skylar, Will and Sean's first meeting, a bar
scene between Sean and Lambeau, and a scene where Sean tells in detail
how he doesn't regret meeting his first wife, who would later suffer a
slow, painful death, and leave him lonely and slightly bitter.
However, the main flaw of the film is there's too much of everything,
and not enough of it either.  The film tries for deeper relations
between the characters, but they're sometimes either overwritten or
underwritten.  Take for example the relationship between Sean and Will:
the film gets an interesting father/son as well as doctor/patient
relationship going with out any problems, but when it tries to show them
as equals, it falls on its face.  We hear how they went to the same
town, and there are even scenes where the film shows how hypocritical
both of them are at times.  But this never takes off like the other
parts of their relationship do.
Also, Will's relationship with his best friend, Chuckie (Affleck), has a
nice climax, but not enough rising action.  We see them joking around,
but when Chuckie arrives at a decision between the two of them, it seems
more like a superficial reasoning than a more selected one.  Their
relationship never goes beyond "just best friends," and his decision
just seems to be a generalization of any two best friends instead of
something more...human.  Maybe it was just me.  And it also goes for a
parallelism with the relationship between Sean and Lambeau, but that,
again, is underwritten.
And, of course, as in most films like this, the girl/boy relationship is
pretty underwritten.  We never understand what they see in each other,
so when Skylar confesses that she loves him, it seems more like it's
there for plot details that anything else.  Minnie Driver is
interesting, though, and breathes life into her character.
The writing is a bit at fault here, but what makes all this worthwhile
is the little moments in the film where it acheives true awesomeness. 
Sure, it feels overstuffed, but it's extremely enjoyable.  The dialogue
that Affleck and Damon have written is amazingly fresh, and seems
extremely human.  I think that they should get a nomination for their
script chiefly because of the dialogue, which is amazing.
While this is probably director Gus Van Sant's most conservative film
(you'd hardly know it's the same director of "To Die For," the only Van
Sant film I've seen, really), it's still a pretty remarkable film,
albeit a tad overrated (what's this "best picture" deal?).  And if a
film puts a smile on my face despite posessing a lot of flaws, I have no
problem with reccomending it to anyone.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Richard III (1995)
Director: Richard Loncraine
Adapters: Richard Loncraine and Ian McKellen (based on the play by
William Shakespeare)
Starring: Ian McKellen, Annette Benning, Jim Broadbent, Kristin Scott
Thomas, Robert Downey Jr, Maggie Smith, John Wood, Nigel Hawthorne
In the first scene of this adaptation of Shakespeare's awesome play, a
group of 30s soldiers are sitting in a room, when suddenly a huge tank
crashes through the wall.  All the unsuspecting soldiers are shot to
death, and the apparent King is shot in the head by a man who pulls off
his gas mask to reveal he's Richard of Gloucester (Ian McKellen), the
protagonist who seeps evil.  If you're going to do a film adaptation of
a Shakespeare play, the best thing to do is make it interesting and
original (much like Branagh).  And surprisingly, the relocation of time
and the inclusion of graphic darkly comic violence somehow works with
the text.
I've always thought of "Richard III" to be not only my favorite of
Shakespeare's plays, but also the most darkly comic.  The lead is a
selfish, deformed, and cunning villain who acts all kind to people when
he wants to screw them over, then turns to the audience and winks,
letting us in on his treachery.  This film captures all the mood of the
original play, and makes Richard of Gloucester into one of the great
screen villains, wonderfully portrayed by the underrated Ian McKellen.
The back story is Richard, one of three brothers, is the black sheep,
but helps his brother, the king (John Wood) ascend to the throne by
killing the current king, all during the end of the War of the Roses. 
He then decides he will screw everyone over, even family, and takes
several steps to eventually ascend to the throne.  He enlists the aids
of several people, uses them until they crack, then has them murdered
off.
The twist to the story is that he is no longer in the War of the Roses,
but rather in 30s England.  The sets, art direction, and cinematography
wonderfully show us the world of swing music, and cigarettes, and then
we get a satirical view of it as Richard gradually seizes the country
and turns into a kind of fictitious equivalent of Hitler.  Of course, he
burned a couple bridges on the way up, so he constantly has little
problems with become bigger and bigger throughout the film.
The film ousts a lot of the dialogue (the play, if run with all the
dialogue, would be rougly three and a half hours long), making it into a
swift hour and forty-five minutes.  Some characters are missing, and
some are even combined to make one whole one.  But the key to doing
Shakespeare is not the little details, like the prophecies of Margaret,
but rather whether or not we get the story and the theme, which this
film does.
Ian McKellen, who also co-adapted this, actually does a better job than
Lawrence Olivier did in his film, which played it much like the play
(without Margaret), but lost a lot of the comedy and edge in the
process.  This film takes a lot of great risks and original ideas and
puts the great poetry of Shakespeare in with it.  Where else could you
see the "Now is the Winter of our Discontent" speech done at first as a
public speech to the King who he will soon try to have killed, and then
head on into the bathroom to pee while reciting the speech?  Where else
could you see Lord Grey (Robert Downey Jr) be killed like a horny camper
in one of the "Friday the 13th" flicks?  Where could you see the
depressed Lady Anne (Kristin Scott Thomas) injecting heroin into her
thigh?  And where else would you see the doomed Richard leap into a
bunch of flames like James Cagney in "White Heat?"
The direction is fantastic.  As I said, the film grasps the wonderful
30s (with a twist), but he does so much more.  All the scenes are
plotted out magnificently, with several scenes being embedded in the
viewer's mind.  A throwaway scene with Richard's first doomed brother
(Nigel Hawthorne) where he discusses a prophetic dream he had is done in
a creepy and, well, prophetic way.  The ex-Queen's (Annette Benning)
blessing to her doomed sons is moving, shot through a cage for the
maximum effect.  And the ending is wonderfully funny (with Richard's
line "A Horse! A Horse! My Kingdom for a Horse!" standing out, as well
as the chase scene).
But the film, as a whole, belongs to Ian McKellen.  His Richard is the
perfect villain: cunning, and likable, which works so much better since
he's the protagonist.  He cringes and barks to his characters, and
occasionally acts sincere, then turns to the camera and lets us in on
the joke.  He holds off being a king, then accepts, and turns to the
camera and hysterically says, "I'm not made of stone."  And when he woos
Anne sucessfully, even after killing her husband and father-in-law
(which I guess is a good thing) in the first scene, he struts off
acompanied to upbeat jazz music.  He brings pure joy, energy, and life
to a character that was written as a comically tragic role.  I mean,
it's tough to actually do a better job than Olivier, but McKellen pulls
it off with his Richard role.
"Richard III" is a fantastic flick, filled with welcome life, and
hysterically darkly comic humor.  If you're going to do a deadly
Shakespeare flick, make sure you have chain-smoking, graphic violence,
and tanks.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Babysitter, The (1995)
Director: Guy Ferland
Writer: Guy Ferland (based on a story by Robert Coover)
Starring: Alicia Silverstone, Jeremy London, Nicky Katt, J.T. Walsh, Lee
Garlington, George Segal
Everybody in this film's thinking of Alicia.  No, this is not a
documentary on those of us after we first saw the "Cryin'" video.  This
is one of those erotic thrillers, but not like one starring Shannon
Whirry or Shannon Tweed.  First off, there's zero sex, almost no nudity,
and it's not as well-plotted as one of those Tweed flicks.
Well, anyway.  The "plot."  Alicia plays, well, the babysitter, who is
taking care of some kids one night while the parents (J.T. Walsh and Lee
Garlington) go out to a party.  The film, trying to be like one of those
introspective erotic thrillers, shows every characters' thoughts, except
Alicia's.  The thing is Alicia's in most of them in most cases, and the
thoughts aren't too kosher.
First off, there's her boyfriend (Jeremy London, who gave one of the
all-time lousy performances in "Mallrats," and is only a notch better
here), who's a dorky kid who hangs out with a kind of bully, played by
Nicky Katt from "subUrbia" (who shows he's got that quiet creepiness
down pat once again).  They decide they want to crash her babysitting
job, looking for the typical babysitting hanky-panky.  Somethine like
that.
The film intercuts between the subplots (Alicia babysitting, Nicky and
Jeremy, the party) and each characters' thoughts.  We get to see Jeremy
and Nicky's dreams of doing a little threeway with Alicia, J.T. thinking
of coming home to find Alicia naked in the bathtub (she has it all
covered up, the little tease), and, worst of all, Lee Garlington
dreaming of that hunk, George Segal.  It even shows them in bed
together.  Yea.  I SO wanted to see George and Lee Garlington in bed,
though I guess I'm used to George after seeing her and Mary Tyler Moore
fooling around in "Flirting With Disaster."
The ending is some kind of big tragedy thing, but come on.  Like we care
about any of the characters.  The only interesting one is Alicia, mainly
because she's Alicia, and we mostly see her in the fantasies.  So I
guess she's some kind of mystery or something.  But she is never
explored further.  So, basically, this film is just a series of
mastabatory images, sometimes featuring a non-nude Alicia (once again,
sadly), sometimes featuring a scantily-clad George Segal (once again,
sadly).
I watched this on one of those free previews of Showtime or Cinemax one
night, and let me tell you, it is the only way to watch this film.  I
mean, there's a reason they put these kinds of films on late at night:
they're just as good as sleeping pills.  And this one is one big fat
waste of time, even for an Alicia film.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Rashomon (1950)
Director: Akira Kurosawa
Writers: Shinobu Hashimoto and Akira Kurosawa (based on the stories
"Rashomon" and "In a Grove" by Ryunosuke Akutagawa)
Starring: Toshirô Mifune, Machiko Kyô, Masayuki Mori, Takashi Shimura,
Minoru Chiaki, Kichijiro Ueda, Fumiko Honma
Watching Kurosawa's "Rashomon," I was reminded of the bits and pieces I
saw of the O.J. Simpson trial, or really any trial that goes on
forever.  The attorneys are all trying to dig up clues to what really
happened, brining in star witnesses to tell their side of the story, and
wouldn't you know it if most of them conflicted in some way(s) with the
others.  O.J. might have gotten off, but whether or not he did what some
people say he did is something we may never find out.  Truth may be in
the eye of the beholder, but nine-and-a-half times out of ten, it's not
the real truth.
"Roshomon," the breakthrough film for the incredible Japanese director,
Akira Kurosawa (who would go on to direct "The Seven Samurai,"
"Yojimbo," and "Ran," among many others), deals with three people
stranded at Roshomon, the gate of Japan in the medieval days, during an
intense rain storm.  They are: a woodcutter (Takashi Shimura), a priest
(Minoru Chiaki), and a nomad (Kichijiro Ueda).  The woodcutter is
ravaged due to a murder trial he witnessed, and proceeds to tell them
everything that occured for the duration of the storm.
Whilst journeying out to the woods, he stumbled upon a murder, went to
alert the police, and was dragged to the trial, which dealt with a
bandit named Tajomuru (the great Toshirô Mifune) who allegedly raped a
woman (Machiko Kyô), and killed her husband (Masayuki Mori).  His story
says that he wooed her and fought for her in a duel with the husband,
whom he then killed.  But her story is that she was raped, and
accidentally killed her husband because he could not trust her after she
was raped.  Two more perspectives are told, and each one ends up
conflicting with all the others.  Who is telling the truth?
That we don't find out.  Since only three to four people were involved
with it, either directly or indirectly, and each of them tells a
different story, there is no way of knowing the real truth.  Should we
pick one and say that is the general accepted truth?  Even a trial like
the one in this film can never truly discover what really happened.  We
will probably never know the real truth because whomever tells what
happens puts a personal spin on it for some personal reason.
The four stories are deftly written so to provide basis for the
characters who tell them.  They reveal so much about these people, that
it is obvious that none of these stories are the real truth, and that
whatever really happened is probably a composite of the four, with
different things right and wrong in each of them.  These people may be
suffering from guilt or some other personal problem, but each of them
cannot tell the whole truth for some reason, sometimes unexplained
blatantly, but disguised ingeniusly within the respective narrative.
The film is not only a landmark for being one of the most philosophical
and brilliant films of all time, but is also one of the most
entertaining.  At a short running time of 88 minutes (give or take a
second), the film is in constant motion, and is never boring.  Even
though we see the same story four times with different perspectives,
each time it's refreshing and as interesting as the last.  Not to
mention there is some really fun samurai action throughout - a staple of
Kurosawa's work.
Another out of the million things I love about this movie is how it
never explains what happens.  In "Courage Under Fire," we discovered the
truth, but that was for a different reason, although I can see it
actually being better if we never did.  This film presents us the facts,
but allows the viewer to debate over it.  And I don't know about you,
but I adore film as a form of debate.
With amazing direction, wonderful acting, and a deft screenplay, it is
no wonder to why it won the Oscar for Best Foreign Film.  "Rashomon" is
after all a fable of man's inability to tell the truth, and one of those
films which you discuss and rack through your mind over and over again,
looking for the truth.  My argument: the truth is not to be found.  And
that's the cold hard truth about man kind.
Homepage at: http://www.goecities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
Director: Ang Lee
Writer: James Schamus (from the novel by Ron Moody)
Starring: Kevin Kline, Sigourney Weaver, Joan Allen, Jamie Sheridan,
Christina Ricci, Tobey Maguire, Elijah Wood, Adam Hann-Byrd, David
Krumholtz, Katie Holmes, Henry Czerny, Michael Cumpsty, Glenn Fitzgerald
Sometimes in life, the role models we grow up with are as confused as we
are.  Such is the case in Ang Lee's newest film since "Sense and
Sensibility:" "The Ice Storm."  All the people in this film are
immature, but that's just because even the parents have no one to rely
on for help, what being the time of Watergate and the sexual
revolution.  "The Ice Storm" brings us an atmospheric, moody, and
entertaining little morality play which never gets preachy or even
boring.
"The Ice Storm" choses its time and place to be around Thanksgiving in
1973, and in suburban Connecticut.  Here we meet two families: the Hoods
and the Carvers.  Ben Hood (Kevin Kline) is married to Elena (Joan
Allen), but is having an affair with Janie Carver (Sigourney Weaver),
though there is no passion except for that of sexual.  It seems that Ben
is ignoring his wife for Janie, who is ignoring and also being ignored
by her workaholic husband, George (Jamie Sheridan, who played the devil
in "The Stand" mini-series).
This all rubs off on the kids of each family, who are growing up being
raised by confused parents, and of course, with Nixon lying out his ass
on the television.  Wendy Hood (Christina Ricci) is not only very
anti-Nixon and very political in her thinking, but is very sexually
precocious, as she is experimenting with the confused and near-silent
Mikey Carver (none other than Elijah Wood, who made this after his
performance in "Flipper," I think).  Of course, Mikey's younger brother,
Sandy (Adam Hann-Byrd, who was in Jodie Foster's "Little Man Tate"),
lusts after Wendy in the worst way (staring at her butt crack in band
practice, pitifully trying to talk to her, etc).
The other Hood kid is Paul (Tobey Maguire, who's in Woody Allen's next
flick, "Deconstructing Harry"), who is enrolled at a classy prep school
where he lusts after the intelligent Libbets (Katie Holmes).  Paul is
basically the protagonist, as everything is seen through his eyes, even
if he is reminiscing about something which he was detached from.  He's
also a symbol of parental uncaring, as his parents have shipped him off
to a far-away school, and never see him.  His relationship with everyone
but Wendy is damn near silent (he has an awkwardly hysterical scene with
Ben in the car-ride from the train-ride towards the middle).
The film views the parents with a negative light, as they are often
giant hypocrites, and totally immature.  Everyone seems to want to live
without any responsibilities, even Elena, who almost seems like a
martyr, but her character is much deeper than that.  She has a part
where she re-enacts what her daughter does - riding a bike, and
shoplifting.  But the shoplifting, of course, is hardly as sucessful as
it is when Wendy does it, thus the adults cannot be as wreckless as the
kids are.
But in the same vein, the kids cannot be as immature as the parents
are.  Wendy is constantly fooling around with the two Carver kids, and
sometimes with bad results.  Her "I'll show you mine if you show me
yours" game is caught by Janie (who gives a greatly hysterical and
satirical speech to her), while she is later caught fooling around with
Mikey by someone (in a great scene where she puts on a Nixon mask).
The film is highly satirical of both though.  The parents are in a
confusing time, therefore are not totally to blame.  The film is
intelligent enough to not pass all the blame onto them anyway, but
contribute it to the way the world was at the time.  Nixon is being
investigated for Watergate, the sexual revolution is going on...it's
just not a good time.  Everyone is confused, and we see the result of
all this with a tear-jerking tragedy at the end that almost had me
weeping, if I wasn't in a theater.
Like "Boogie Nights," "The Ice Storm" feels exactly like the time it has
chosen to take place in.  We get the full feel of the 70s, with all the
fashion, the waterbeds, the key parties, etc.  Ang Lee choses very
little actual 70s music (I heard some Jim Croce and Harry Nilsson), but
the film feels exactly like the 70s were.  So kudos to whomever did the
research.
The acting is also amazing, with several people standing out for
possible Oscar contenders.  Kevin Kline is predictably brilliant, giving
a wonderful dramatic performance with total human feeling.  The scene in
the car with his son is a prime example of him trying to be a good
parent but failing because he's human and doesn't actually know his son
anymore.  Joan Allen, who might be seeing her third consecutive Oscar
nomination, is also brilliant, creating a full person out of someone who
could just be a shallow character.  Sigourney Weaver also constructs a
multi-layered performance, especially at a scene where she tells Ben why
she ditched him one day when they were about to screw.  Jamie Sheridan
has a very little part, but he's still awesome, especially at the end,
and in a scene which consists of what has to be the shortest sex scene
in cinematic history...well, since that one in "Booty Call."
The kid actors are also amazing.  Tobey Maguire has a very small part,
but still rocks.  Adam Hann-Byrd is just amazing as the younger brother,
and Elijah Wood even gives a great performance.  Hopefully his career
will perk back up after this one (I'm talking about Elijah).  
The best performance, though, goes to Christina Ricci, who finally gets
a chance to shine in a role which is complex, and more human.  Sure,
she's always great (her Wednesday Addams is classic), but here she
actually gets to do human drama.  She has a kind of Lolita-esque draw to
her, and she just gives a mesmerizing performance among everybody else. 
Of course, no one actor steals the show, which makes this one of the
best ensemble films of the year.
Ang Lee has created a pure masterpiece here, and what may be the best
film I've seen all year (along with "Boogie Nights").  If he doesn't get
nominated for an Oscar this year, there's really something wrong,
because "The Ice Storm" is a wonderful film, handled with the utmost
delicacy to every human detail.  Like "Boogie Nights," I was blown away
by this film, but in far more different and emotional way.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Spellbound (1945)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: Ben Hecht and Angus MacPhail (based on the book by Francis
Beeding)
Starring: Ingrid Bergman, Gregory Peck, Michael Chekhov, Leo G. Carroll,
Rhonda Fleming, John Ermery, Norman Lloyd, Bill Goodwin
Psychoanalysis has played a big part in the realm of suspense/thrillers
since the 40s, creating films that would use an analysis to make up for
the typical investigating.  Recent films like "Final Analysis" and "Kiss
the Girls" has relied on a therapist to become the protagonist, and for
his work to play as the detective work in the film.  Well here's the
first one to ever do this: Hitchcock's "Spellbound."  And while not many
thrillers have used this idea as well as this original film, it's still
not the greatest film, especially for a director as amazing as
Hitchcock.
"Spellbound" is nevertheless an intriguing film from start to finish. 
It deals with a female protagonist (not a big thing in thrillers of the
40s): Dr. Constance Petersen (the amaing Ingrid Bergman), who works at
an institute as their only female doctor.  One day, the place is
introduced to a new head of the institute: Dr. Edwards (a very young
Gregrory Peck), who begins to show strange signs of some kind of
psychological intemperment, reacting bizarrely to things as simple as
rubbing a fork against table cloth, or the black stripes on a sweater.
Soon enough, though, Constance and Edwards are hitting it off, and
finding out they love eachother.  But as soon as this happens, it turns
out that Dr. Edwards is not whom he seems.  He is really a man named
John Ballantine, and the real Edwards is dead.  But Constance finds out
quickly that John is not a cold-blooded killer, but really a deep
amnesiac.
Constance risks her entire career to find out about this man since she
loves him, and flees with him into hiding to an old professor of hers,
the eccentric Dr. Brulov (Michael Chekhov - no relation to the Star Trek
guy - sorry, had to be said), where she is sure that she can cure him by
analysis, and discover whether or not he actually did kill Edwards.  The
film unfolds beautifully, holding our interest throughout, but the
ending is somewhat anti-climactic, but works, and even spurns one of the
most tense sequences at the end, even if it is pretty contrived.
There are several flaws with the film, such as: why does Constance risk
her entire life and career for some guy she just knew for a couple days,
even if she does swear she loves him?  There's a great dream sequence
designed by the dream-meister himself, Salvador Dali (Hitch must be a
big fan of "Un Chien Andalou"), and it's great and all, but how does
John, who dreamt it, remember every single detial so clearly?  I know
that when I've had a dream that weird that I can only remember instances
of it.
However, what makes the film rise high above the flaws of the film is
the way that this film is absolutely spellbinding.  The film, as I said,
unfolds wonderfully, and this is so; I was guessing the entire time. 
The film doesn't know a whole lot about psychology, but it at least
knows the basics, and uses these to suspenseful heights, which are
steady throughout the film as you can seldomly see what direction it
will be going in.
The acting from everyone is pretty great, with Bergman showing that
she's a strong woman, although not too strong as she risks her entire
career over an amnesiac man whom she apparently loves (the film could
have backed this up a little bit more).  Peck is great, although his
look of confusion and hypnotism gets so redundant that I started
snickering as the film goes on.  And Michael Chekhov as the wily old man
steals every scene he's in.
There are, of course, the great Hitchcockian moments throughout the
film, some which were pretty innovative for the time.  There is a really
nifty chase scene which is done intelligently as Constance and John are
trying to flee from the police while not making any noticable riffs. 
There's a scene where John is under a trance and it is very forseeable
that he may kill someone (with a brilliant follow-up scene).  The dream
sequence, as I said, is trippy and cool as hell, although too unvague
(and makes too much sense).  And the finale is, as I said, forced, but
with a great POV shot, is done so tensely that yes, I cringed.
Although most of the time, it is, as the title says, spellbinding, it's
still not the greatest film.  Maybe it's the fact that psychology and
suspense are tough bedfellows, but I still can't remember a film that
blended these two ideas together in a neat coherent whole.  It's a minor
disappointment when held up to a lot of Hitchcock's other flicks, but
measured on its own, is a rather satisfying film to watch.  Fun, albeit
not the most intelligent fun it could be, but is still the best suspense
film dealing with psychoanalysis that I can remember.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
Director: John Woo
Writers: Mike Webb and Michael Colleary
Starring: John Travolta, Nicolas Cage, Joan Allen, Dominique Swain, Gina 
Gershon, Alessando Nivola, Nick Cassavetes, Harve Presnell, John Carrol 
Lynch, CCH Pounder, Margaret Cho
I had only seen one John Woo film before this and that was "Broken 
Arrow."  Not a bad film (I give it about two and a half stars) but 
nothing great.  But what I noticed was Woo dealt with a great topic - 
that being nuclear warfare.  And while he didn't really get too into it 
(although I guess one could argue that we really need to treat these 
pilots who have to take care of these nuclear bombs with care and at 
least some respect), he had a lot of action.  And the action overtook 
the idea he had presented and made it into only a fair film.  But with 
"Face/Off," he wonderfully balances bloodbaths with plot and depth.  Not 
a bad move.
"Face/Off" is a film about identity, irony and obsession.  It deals with 
the obsessions of an FBI man, Sean Archer (John Travolta), with a 
maniacal criminal, Castor Troy (Nicolas Cage), who had killed his son in 
a sniper attack on him.  Six years later, Archer finally captures him in 
a beautifully executed action sequence which winds Troy in a coma and 
probably death.  Archer revels in the fact that he can quit the bureau 
and promises his wife (Joan Allen), whom he has secluded from his life 
for the past six years that everything will be better.  
But the thing is before the big capture, Troy planted a huge bomb 
somewhere that could ignite a city block.  The only people who know 
where it is is Troy, but he's in a coma, and his brother, Pollux 
(Alessandro Nivola), a paranoid little man who was captured easily in 
the big opening bloodbath.  Pollux will only tell his brother so a 
surgeon comes in and tells Archer about an operation that could have him 
switching faces with Troy and duplicating his voice and whatnot.  This 
is a totally ridiculous proposition but, to Woo's credit, he handles it 
at least semi-believably, as long as the viewer suspends their 
imagination.  Archer doesn't really want to, since he promised his wife 
a new life, but he's been so obsessed with him that he's the only man 
who knows him perfectly.  So he does it and goes to prison to get the 
location of the bomb.  Then Troy wakes up...
Troy takes his identity and leads his life while Archer (now Cage) is 
stuck in a bizarro prison.  Meanwhile, Troy (now Travolta) is having sex 
with his wife and becoming more or less of a father figure to his 
daughter (the new Lolita, Dominique Swain), who has become someone who 
likes to switch her clothes and identity about thrice a day.  
There is surprising depth to the film, which is mired in ironic scenes. 
 For instance, Archer has to confront many people he put away when he 
was who he was before and two people he pushed around in his pursuit of 
Troy.  And in one of the best scenes in the film, Troy visits Archer's 
son's grave with his wife, knowing he had accidentally killed him.  He 
feels bad about it, since it was an accident, and we see it on 
Travolta's face brilliantly.  There are many surprises in the film, so I 
will not divulge any more of the plot.
There are some problems with it though.  For one thing, it runs way too 
long (Roughly 2 hours and 20 minutes, with 10 minutes of previews).  And 
the final scene is very sappy and doesn't mesh well with the film, which 
is very cool.
But the good things weigh out the bad about 100:1.  There are enigmatic 
bloodbaths, wild scenes, a huge mexican standoff in a tiny, well-lit 
church, and even a grandiose battle scene orchestrated to "Over the 
Rainbow."  And the acting is awesome.  Allen is wonderful as the removed 
wife who doesn't know what to make of her husband acting up and all sexy 
and stuff.  And Swain gets to play an interesting character who is far 
and away from the usual removed daughter.  And Gina Gershon and new 
director Nick Cassavetes are amazing as an amoral brother and sister 
pair.  
But it is Travolta and Cage who shine acting-wise.  They both have to 
play themselves and they do it nicely.  Cage gets to overact in the 
beginning then has to become the brooding, depressed and confused Archer 
after a half hour or so.  And Travolta gets to play the baddie for most 
of the film, which is fun 'cause he's so good at it.  
John Woo has finally made a wonderful film which has depth and wild 
action sequences which are a wonder to watch and fun to laugh with.  
Some of the stunts are actually jaw-droppingly cool.  While many dumb 
action films live up to their name and are totally stupid, this one has 
a brain AND a nervous system.

Title
Review for Blood Simple (1984)
"Blood Simple" is a bit like a horror film interlaced with a film noir
backdrop: the film is filled with a bunch of frightening nightmares (like
being forced to kill someone, an overabundance of blood, being buried
alive, etc.), but the story is an ever-twisting bit of complex film noir. 
It's also the film debut of the now-famous Coen Brothers, Joel and Ethan,
and watching it today, one could easily deduct that the Coen Brothers had
not yet found their style, and therefore the film is kind of lacking or
something or other.  But when viewed as a real film, it's really an amazing
piece of storytelling, and one hell of a fun one at that.
The plot of "Blood Simple" is so complex and labyrinthine that to tell
everything would be to spoil half the fun of the fun of viewing it, as it's
a film that is always in motion, and is chock-full of suprises that are
really surprising (how's that for a concept?).  But the basic plot deals
with a seedy bar owner, Marty (Dan Hedaya), who's wife Abby (a very young
Frances McDormand) is found cheating with one of his bartenders, Ray (John
Getz), so Marty decides after much angered thought that he'll hire a
Private Investigator, Visser (M. Emmet Walsh), the same one who discovered
them for him, to kill them.
Up to this point, it's standard film noir and nothing really spectacular,
but then the film throws us for a loop, which I won't spoil, and the film
from that point on becomes a tense, nightmarish experience, filled with
twists upon twists upon twists, and ending with a final laugh, not on the
audiences' part, but on one of the characters.  What's most remarkable
about this film is that it doesn't try to throw the audience off with cheap
twists; instead it tells it to us as omnipotent viewers, knowing
everything, and because of this we watch helplessly as the characters on
screen stumble around without all the facts.
When one carefully thinks and comes to their own conclusion about this film
(this film is anything but condescending and insulting), one realizes that
no character is one hundred percent certain what's going on.  The film is
told so that the characters are often confused, and we follow each of them
around as they try and figure everything out, and often do things that they
wouldn't do if they knew everything.  One character walks in to a place at
the wrong time, and is forced to do a horrific act that will haunt him the
rest of the film.  And another character discovers that they have left
incriminating evidence around but don't know where it is.  And yet another
character has no clue what's going on until the final couple seconds of the
film.  Even a couple characters live with the guilt of things they did not
even do, but for some exaplainable reason think they did.  The plot of
"Blood Simple" is carefully constructed so that all this is assured with
intelligence and even wit.
This being the film debut of the Coens, we can see that they hadn't really
gotten their wacky, eccentric style down yet, which wouldn't erupt until
their next film, the hysterically funny comedy "Raising Arizona."  But no
matter; this film would be ruined with any of that kind of style.  It's not
the kind of film that would be good if it was hysterical or wacky.  But
this film does have the kind of great direction it needs.  It has lots of
great shots that are very remarkable, including a misleading tracking shot
which at first looks like a POV shot, then turns out to be just a low-angle
smooth steadicam closing shot.  And several sequences are intensely
crafted, like a long bit where one character tries to dispose of a corpse
(including a bit they would recycle in "Fargo"), and the finale, which is
one of the most frightening sequences filmed, ending perfectly with a
little cherry on top at the end.
The performances aren't really amazing or anything, save for M. Emmet
Walsh's, who's predictably brilliant (when isn't he?) as the unscrupulous
and wonderfully selfish crooked P.I.  He easily steals the film.  But Dan
Hedaya's also very good, even though it doesn't seem like he's good at
first (he's usually hysterically tense), but upon closer examination, he's
great as a man who has held all his rage up inside, and can't control
himself when he boils over in fits of rage.  Also good is Frances
McDormand, who mostly plays the frightened woman.  It's no Margie
Gunderson, but what are ya gonna do?  The only not too great performance is
from John Getz, who is remarkably down-playing his part.  Getz's forte is
playing pompous asswholes (in such anti-classics as "Men at Work" and
"Don't Tell Mom the Babysitter's Dead" - yes, I've seen them); here he
seems just a bit weak.
It's often been said "Blood Simple" is the best Coen Brothers film, or at
least a contender for best with "Fargo."  I personally think "Fargo" is a
better film, much more better realized and executed.  But "Blood Simple" is
still one of their best films, a masterfully crafted and executed thriller
film noir that surprises us with lots of twists, and some truly
awe-inspiring sequences which scare the hell out of us merely because we
the audience know to much and are not sure how to react to seeing a
character do something we know they shouldn't do but they don't.  It would
be easy to take "Blood Simple" for granted, calling it merely "a great
thriller."  It's not just that.  It's a film that is so carefully
constructed and so modest about it that it amazes you when you finally
realize it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Daytrippers, The (1996)
Writer/Director: Greg Mottola
Starring: Hope Davis, Parker Posey, Liev Schreiber, Anne Meara, Pat
McNamara, Stanley Tucci, Campbell Scott, Marcia Gay Harden, Andy Brown,
Paul Herman, Marc Grapey
The trailers for this film revelaed that this was to be a quirky,
fast-paced, and very funny little comedy, filled with a great
screenplay, good characterization, a simple-but-loveable plot, and even
some depth.  I mean, yeah, I laughed at some of the good lines, was
hooked by the fact that it had a good cast, and even in a bit of awe
since it boasted it was an official selection to be shown at Cannes. 
So, I was up for a good little bit of indie fun.
Now, granted, this aims for some depth, and has a lot of very funny
moments, but overall, it's a disappointment, failing at nearly
everything it aims for.  It wants to be quirky and funny, and yeah, it
is for a lot of it.  It wants to have good characterization, and some of
the characters are, although some of them are pure characteriteurs, and
not real people at all.  The simple plot is simple and likable, so that
works.  And there is some depth, but not a lot of it.  And any depth it
has is never followed up, and therefore fails.
Well, the plot deals with a woman named Eliza (Hope Davis, a dead ringer
for Julie Delpy, although with a smaller mouth, I guess) who's married
to a book editor, Louis (Stanley Tucci, who seems to be in everything
these days), but one morning finds a love letter in her house after he
leaves for work.  Is it from him?  Is it to him?  All she knows is it
has nothing to do with her.  So she freaks.
She high-tails it over to her parents' house, consisting of her
overbearing, and annoying-as-hell mother (Anne Meara), and her quiet and
soft-spoken father (Pat McNamara).  Also there are her sister (Parker
Posey, who IS in everything these days), and her long-time
boyfriend/possible fiance (Liev Schreiber), who's a very pretentious
writer who's in the process of writing a satirical book about a man with
a dog's head, which sounds like it might actually be a book I'd read. 
Oh well.
So they read the letter, and they decide to ask Louis to his face (since
you can tell if someone is lying when you see them face to face).  So
they all cram into the family station wagon, and head into Manhattan to
find him.  This is a light-weight plot, and luckily writer/director Greg
Mottola decides to go the road not-less traveled and give us a lot of
interesting and funny dialogue, as to waste time and make the trip, and
subsequently the film, more fun.  So we get some little discussions,
sometimes intellectual (Liev Schreiber's character is one of those
pseudo-intellectuals, who repeatedly talks about how bad society is and
how we should be in an aristocracy - this is later challenged).
We also get the occasional supporting character to take up some screen
time with some speeches, lines, scenes, etc.  The most interesting is a
writer played by Campbell Scott (Stanley Tucci's bosom buddy) who seems
to flirt with anyone with breasts, and tries to steal Posey from
Schreiber.  I've never really seen a whole lot of Scott, but he was just
awesome in this flick.  We also get a little pointless comic bit from
Marcia Gay Harden at a party that they arrive at.
The ending aims for a lot of depth, etc, but just seems to end abruptly
without a lot of explanation.  There's a twist, which was much talked
about, and yes, it's clever, but it's not brilliant or anything.  It
basically goes for the quick shock you might not have thought of.
But the big problem with this film is the mother.  First off, let me say
that she is wonderfully played by Anne Meara.  She makes her totally
overbearing, annoying, and does it so much that at one point, we almost
want to cheer at one point where some obvious bottled-up-anger is
released.  But she's a flat character.  There's no depth to her
character.  She's just annoying and overbearing, and that's it.  Of
course, we want to cheer at the point I just talked about - she's
annoying.  Anne does try to give her some depth, but the writing is just
not there for her.  Her character's portrayal in the writing is the weak
link in the film, and brings it down.
I will say that this is more well written than the film actually ends up
becoming. The dialogue is clever, very witty, and the characters are
well-defined...well, almost.  And the acting is very good, with the best
performances coming from Posey, Schreiber, Scott, and...McNamara (I
really liked what he did with the father, I don't know about anyone
else).  And there is a bit of depth to the film, but it's never deepend
to its fullest potential limits.
"The Daytrippers" is an occasionally funny, sometimes dramatic, but
overall unsatisfying little indie film which had potential to be an
excellent comic drama and even a parody of the nuclear family (I
guess).  Anyway, I was pretty disappointed with this film, but it didn't
suck.  So much for advertising.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Swingers (1996)
Director: Doug Liman
Writer: Jon Favreau
Starring: Jon Favreau, Vince Vaughn, Ron Livingston, Patrick Von Horn, 
Alex Desert, Brooke         Langton, Deena Martin, Katherine Kendall, 
Heather Graham
Any movie where the characters have their own kind of vernacular amongst 
them is already a pretty damn cool flick to me.  Any movie that not only 
has this, but has the guts to say Quentin Tarantino rips off Martin 
Scorsese's has got to get some kind of ultra-cool award (It's true, 
Quentin does - you know it, I know it, and the American people know it - 
but the man is still a god).
"Swingers" is perhaps the coolest movie of the year...and it even has a 
neurotic, insecure protagonist.  The guys in this movie are either 
out-of-work or actors-with-crap-jobs living in L.A, going to parties and 
those clubs that have no sign and are a bitch to find.  During the day, 
they go to pointless call-backs; at night, they go around town, 
drinking, dancing, and picking up "digits."  Their unofficial leader is 
the ultra-confident, semi-philisophical Trent (an amazingly great Vince 
Vaughn, now having the cool pick-up line of "I was in Jurassic Park 2"). 
 But the focus is on the depressed Mike (writer and star, Jon Favreau, 
also blessed with a new cool pick-up line: "I was on "Friends" for a 
couple episodes then was taken out with the most bizarre plot twist in 
recent television history.")
Mike has just...okay, so it was 6 months ago...he broke up with his 
girlfriend and after half the year, he hasn't gotten over her.  He's so 
depressed, he sits for days against the wall looking at pictures of them 
and having weird delusions of his answering machine giving him 
confidence boosts (which begins a cool continuum problem - look for it). 
In the beginning, Trent calls him up and they impulsively go to Vegas to 
gamble, but Trent just wants to pick up "babies."  Mike is nervous and 
tells a really hokey joke...then confesses he's actually an out-of-work 
comedian.
The story focuses mainly on Mike, but the other characters - Rob (Ron 
Livingston) is his actor friend who just moved out there and is bummed 
because he's going from doing Hamlet on Broadway to Goofy for Disney; 
and Sue (Patrick Von Horn), who has a temper and basically sucks at NHL 
Hockey for the Sega Genesis mainly because they took out the fighting - 
well, the other characters are presented nicely as well.  There is no 
real plot, unless you call Mike's pilgrimmage from depression to getting 
back into the scene a plot.
"Swingers" has no real big grandios themes and doesn't offer any real 
poetic messages; it's just a really fun, clever and intelligent film.  
While there is some satire from of the out-of-work actor thing and the 
whole swinging/nightlife scene, the main thing to admire from it is the 
acting and the great writing by Jon Favreau.  He writes beautiful 
dialogue and clearly-carved characters, especially Trent, who's got to 
be one of the coolest characters written for the screen since...well, in 
a while.  And who's character, as cool as he is, is presented as the 
true normal-guy-schmuck that he is in the final scene.
The acting is fantastic from everyone, epsecially Favreau and Vaughn: 
Favreau shows great comic flair as the neurotic, down-on-his-self-esteem 
guy; and Vaughn is just, well, "money" (word for cool in their clique). 
 Also standing out is some Melrose Place star (Brooke Langton - what she 
does on the show, I don't know, I don't watch it and I don't plan to 
ever) as one of the girls Mike attempts to pick up but lets his 
confidence and lying get in the way of ever doing well with her.  
Because it's so fun to watch and the fact that I laughed hysterically 
numerous times (and the fact that the published screenplay has a 
glossary for the terms in the back), I highly reccomend "Swingers" as 
one of the best films of last year.

Title
Review for Annie Hall (1977)
Director: Woody Allen
Writers: Woody Allen and Marshall Brickman
Starring: Woody Allen, Diane Keaton, Tony Roberts, Carol Kane, Paul 
Simon, Shelly Duvall, Janet Margolin, Colleen Dewhurst, Christopher 
Walken, Marshall MacLuhan, Dick Cavet, John Glover, Jeff Goldblum, 
Beverly D'Angelo, Sigourney Weaver
When trying to pick the film in a director's oeuvre that should be 
referred to as his or her masterpiece, one should not go for the one 
that was the best over all, but the one that best represents them as a 
human being.  Directors, contrary to popular opinion, are human beings 
and are trying to inject themselves into their art in one way or 
another.  Whether it's Martin Scorsese telling stories of his home town 
in "Mean Streets" or Tony Scott telling homoerotic stories in "Top Gun" 
(you know it's true, that movie is so homoerotic, it's campy), the 
director has expressed himself with his piece of art, even if it is "Top 
Gun."  Well, I pick "Annie Hall" as Woody Allen's masterpiece.  I think 
it IS his best film, although that is up for argument but has nothing to 
do with whether it's his masterpiece.  He has several masterpieces 
("Manhattan," "Hannah and her Sisters," "Crimes and Misdemeanors," 
"Sleeper"), but none better represent Woody as a person.
One thing you must realize is Woody has been bad with relationships.  He 
was married twice before meeting Diane (I think) and, well, you know all 
about he and Mia (I actually read her autobiography - interesting...).  
Well, Woody explains why he continues to go on with them after failing 
at them several times in this film.  On the surface, it's a romantic 
comedy (and a damn good one at that).  If you watch closely (not that 
closely, really), you see that it is Woody giving a theory he has and 
showing an example of it.  His theory?  Glad you asked: Love is annoying 
and pointless and everything, but we're in it 'cause we need it, 'cause 
we need to feel liked and to like someone else and perhaps change them a 
bit, infusing ourselves into their psyche, even if it is just for a bit. 
 We are, in fact, all unique because we've met other people and are all 
walking around with bits and pieces of eachother on ourselves.  Well, 
that's what I got from this film.  
The film is also incredibly autobiographical, although Woody has 
reportedly denied it is (uh huh).  Granted, some of the parts of the 
protagonist's life are very over-exaggerated, I'm sure something similar 
happened to him in his childhood.  Woody plays Alvy Singer, a stand-up 
comedian and comic writer (big stretch).  The film begins with a 
brilliant stand-up routine delivered to the camera as he stands in front 
of a blank wall.  He tells some old vaudevillian jokes (example: "There 
are two women at a resort, and they're eating, and one of them says: 
'The food here is really terrible.'  And the other woman says, 'Yes, and 
in such small portions!'")  He then goes on to explain how each applies 
to his life, giving an odd, universal twist on all of them.  He explains 
that he's pretty tired of himself and how much he was in love with a 
girl named Annie Hall (Diane Keaton, of course, in her Oscar-Winning 
role), and how they are now broken up.  He says he has been thinking 
about their relationship a lot and sifting it through his mind.  And 
that's what we get for the next 90 minutes: sifting of his relationship, 
trying to figure out what went wrong and why he still wants to get into 
other relationships.
The film, done in a great non-linear form, expresses his views on love 
and friendship as we see Woody drifting from scene to scene in the most 
original ways possible.  The funniest scene takes place when he first 
meets her and he goes to her apartment to drink and talk a bit.  As they 
talk about her photography, sub-titles appear below them, stating what 
they are thinking at that exact moment (example - Alvy: "I wonder what 
she looks like naked," Annie: "He's too smart for me; hang in there.")  
It's possibly the most brilliant scene in the film.  Another scene 
involves cartoons when they break up for the first time with Annie 
portrayed as the witch from "Snow White."  Another brilliant scene takes 
place when Alvy eats at Annie's parents house and he comments on how 
different his Brooklyn family is to her New England family.  Then the 
screen splits and we see half of Annie's family talking peacefully and 
the other half is Alvy's family, bickering about passover.
The film has no real plot or anything, but we see Alvy trying to form 
Annie into what he wants her to be, kind of like "Pygmalion" (only 
funnier).  First off, she takes pictures beautifully, but he wants her 
to learn about "asthetics" and take classes on it.  Second off, she 
sings in a club and has never taken a lesson.  Woody urges her to 
continue singing and take lessons and all, but her voice is beautiful 
without them (interesting side-note: Diane is on the original 1969 cast 
album of "Hair" in a minor role).  She's also a tad on the vapid side 
and sometimes has no idea what he's saying (much of her dialogue 
consists of "yeah, oh yeah?" but Diane does it so convincingly that it 
sounds totally realistic), so he convinces her to go to school and take 
some adult college courses.  This backfires as she not only has a crush 
on one of her professors, but she becomes smarter and the two outgrow 
eachother, forgetting why they were attracted to eachother in the first 
place.  This happens all the time with couples: they fall in love with 
eachother but are always trying to change them for the "better."  This 
is probably the reason why so many divorces occur.
One of Woody's biggest pet peeves is California vs. New York.  All his 
films (save a couple) take place in New York, mostly in Manhattan ("Play 
it Again, Sam" was actually filmed in California, but it was a different 
director).  His best friend, Rob (the great Tony Roberts), is a TV actor 
who lives out there and Alvy uses him to not only be his designated best 
friend, but also part of the satire of California.  He's always 
convincing him to come out, but Alvy doesn't want to change himself.  
He's lived in New York his whole life, in garbage.  When he and Annie go 
out to California so he can do a TV special, Woody remarks about how bad 
it is, how superficial everyone is and how it's clean because "they 
dont' throw away they're garbage; they make it into TV shows."  
By the end, Alvy and Annie are done for, but we already knew that.  All 
he's left with is what he got from her, how she has rubbed off on him 
and he is a slightly different person.  He carries around black soap she 
used for her complexion, and she takes later boyfriends to see "The 
Sorrow and the Pity," a 4-hour holocaust film Alvy dragged her to see 
numerous times.  And at the end, Alvy has figured out why we put up with 
relationship: 'cause we need them.
"Annie Hall" is also one of his funniest films.  He creates hilarious 
scenes involving some of his phobias and nebbishes.  One scene towards 
the beginning has him being harrassed by scary guys in front of a 
theatre before a date with Annie where they ask him if he's been on the 
"Johnny Carson show."  Another painfully funny scene (that's a good 
thing, believe me) involves Alvy sniffing a bit of coke and then 
sneezing into a pouch of it that had cost one of his friends about 5 
grand.  But his humor is more realistic and more poignant than his 
earlier comedies.  While most of it is still for satire, much of it is 
more focused on the point he is trying to make.  And the dialogue is so 
perfect that the film seems to shoot right back at the audience, 
reminding them of themselves.
The scenes are short and to the point, as not to waste time.  It's like 
he makes his point and ends them, and then somehow tails them onto the 
next scene.  One scene has Alvy and Annie in bed, but Annie's not in the 
mood so her spirit leaves her body and sits down to draw.  Alvy is mad 
'cause he wants all of her, but her body just turns to him and says, 
"You have my body."  He wants all of it 'cause he says he's a comedian. 
 She asks him if he's always been funny, and he says, "What is this, an 
interview?  We're supposed to be making love!"  And the scene goes to an 
interview he has to write for some sap.
The acting is terrific from a huge ensemble cast, many of who get small 
one or two scene parts.  Christopher Walken gets to say his funniest 
speech other than his on in "Pulp Fiction."  And Paul Simon gets the 
harsh task of playing a music producer.  Shelly Duvall plays someone he 
sleeps with on the rebound (Why?!) and Carol Kane plays as if she's on 
ridlin (compared to her other performances) as Alvy's second wife.  Tony 
Roberts, the underrated man of the 70s, plays his typical best friend, 
as usual.  
But the acting goes to the two leads.  Woody and Diane are a flawless 
comic duo, much better than Mia and Woody (chemistry, please?).  She 
plays right off his jokes, and he plays off her brilliantly realistic 
acting.  Woody is the usual Woody character, but seems more realistic 
this time since the film is more realistic.  Diane creates her most 
memorable character (to date) and does the best acting of her entire 
career.  
"Annie Hall" is one of two Woody films to be acknowledged highly by the 
Academy of Arts and Sciences (the other being "Hannah and her Sisters"). 
 It won four out of the five oscars, including Best Original Screenplay 
for Woody and Marshall Brickman, Actress for Diane, Direction for Woody, 
and the Best Picture Oscar.  The only one who didn't win was Woody, who 
lost to Richard Dreyfus for the "Goodbye Girl."  As much as I LOVE 
Richard's performance in "Goodbye Girl," Woody should have won for the 
same reason John Wayne won in 1969 for "True Grit."  Woody's a fantastic 
actor and he makes his character in this one his most likable and most 
realistic.  
As I've already said, "Annie Hall" is Woody's masterpiece because it 
best expresses its creator.  But also, because it best expresses us as 
the viewers as we sit watching it, meanwhile living a life where we have 
several failed romances and we just can't figure out why we keep going 
out to do it over again.

Title
Review for Crush, The (1993)
Writer/Director: Alan Shapiro
Starring: Alicia Silverstone, Cary Elwes, Jennifer Rubin, Kurtwood
Smith, Gwynyth Walsh
It's kind of sad to see that superstar Alicia Silverstone has made only
one film that's good ("Clueless," by the way).  The rest of her career
consists of some big budget flops ("Excess Baggage" comes to mind), and
these: cheapie thrillers.  "The Crush" is, sadly, the best of them.  I'm
not saying it's good.  This film stinks worse than a big fat pile of
dated limburgher.
Alicia plays the precocious 14-year old daughter of two rich people
(Kurtwood Smith and Gwynyth Walsh), who run some nice housing complex. 
Into her life, one day, comes the dashing Cary Elwes (there's an
oxymoron) sans his fake English accent (which makes him dashing).  He's
a writer who needs a little place to write.  Soon, he's being spied on
by little Alicia, who begins to follow him around and stuff, seeming
just like the typical teenage crush on the older man (but why Cary?).
After a little kiss he gives her (we have no clue why, though she does
look fantastic at the time), she becomes full-fledged obsessed with him
like a teenage Hinckley Jr.  She begins calling him, pulling down her
bathing suit in front of him, and even begins stalking his new love
interest from work (Jennifer Rubin).  By the time she's stripping in
front of him (a body double - I know, I was sad too), we know exactly
where this film will go, and just want to get off the little ride.
Soon, not only is she trying to kill people around him, and annoy the
hell out of him, but she comes up with the ingenius idea of the typical
obsessive film character: she'll try to kill him.  Yeah, that will solve
all her problems.  So the man she loves is dead, AND she's in jail.  And
this girl's supposed to be a genius.  Guess she just tests well.
"The Crush" gets more annoying as it goes on, and succumbs to every
single cliche (writing grafiiti on his car, spying on he and his chick
having sex, breaking into his house, etc, etc, etc, bore, bore, bore). 
There's nothing to really reccomend from this, unless you're trying to
watch the entire filmmography of Kurtwood Smith or something.
Alicia's not even worth seeing.  She won all these awards at the MTV
Movie Awards, and yeah, she looks fantastic, even for a 14-year old, but
she's just not that good.  Then again, the script is horrible, giving
her no depth or interesting character points.  I'll give Alicia this:
she tries her best to give a creepy performance, and become attractive,
but it really never takes off.  Luckily, she was great in a similar role
in the "Cryin'" video.  But yeah, she occasionally gives off some
glimpses of good acting.  If there was a reason to see this, it would be
for her nude scene, but it's not even her real ass.  Alicia has a little
problem with doing screen nudity.  Oh, but she doesn't have something
against doing crap films?!
In short, "The Crush" is just a crap film that shows that these little
cheapie thrillers suck, even if they star a future star (not Elwes).
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Unstrung Heroes (1995)
Director: Diane Keaton
Writers: Elizabeth S. Barton and Richard LaGravenese (based on the
autobiography of Franz Lidz)
Starring: Nathan Watt, Andie MacDowell, John Turturro, Michael Richards,
Maury Chaykin, Anne De Salvo, Celia Weston
There's a scene late in "Unstrung Heroes" when the father (John Turturo)
and his son (Nathan Watt) sit in a giant darkened room, watching film
reels of their wife/mother (Andie MacDowell), who had recently died of
cancer, and for the first time in the film, bond.  Maybe it was because
I was a tad depressed when I watched this, but I cried hysterically.
Now, I usually don't cry at films, so to me, if a movie strikes an
emotional nerve that isn't triggered solely for superficial reasons,
it's an excellent film.  But this is more than just a tear-jerker.  This
is a film with a true heart, which tells of real people, and their
realistic troubles.
The film tells the auto-biographical (I guess) story of writer Franz
Lidz, born Steven (Nathan Watt), who had a very unusual late childhood.
His father, an eccentric inventor (John Turturro), barely speaks on a
human level to him, but treats him as an adult, raising him to believe
that religion is a "crutch," all while inventing bizarre things he
doesn't need.  Then there's his chain-smoking, loving mother (Andie
MacDowell), who, in the beginning of the film, is diagnosed with cancer.
On the other side of his family, as well as the dimension, are his
bizarre-as-hell uncles (Michael Richards and Maury Chaykin), who make
Steven's father look average compared to their eccentric quirks.  They
live in a run-down apartment building, hiding from the landlord, and
stacking all the newspapers they never read all over their apartment.
Seeing this apartment is one of the great sequences of the nineties.
After a little bit of pain in seeing his mother dying, as well as his
father becoming more and more intolerable, Steven runs away from home,
and finds himself at his uncles' apartment building.  He decides he will
shack up with them until his mother is fine (um...), much to the
immeadiate dismay of his parents, who don't want him being raised by his
paranoid uncles, but at the same time, not wanting him to remain unhappy
and in the emotional hell that he was in at home.
"Unstrung Heroes" is a simple film: just showing us little human quirks,
and painting a wonderfully realistic story in a surreal way.  Director
Diane Keaton's humor is not like that of friend Woody Allen's: her humor
is more like the Coens, and is very off-beat.  While I prefer the
Woodster's humor to hers, she shows that she has a great sense of humor,
that stands alone from that of Woody's.
In a lesser film, the humor and pathos that comes in this film would
feel uncomfortable, like that of, say, "Liar, Liar" (well, I couldn't
think of another example off the top of my head).  But Keaton perfectly
mixes sadness and comedy into this film, giving it a truly human
feeling.  The scenes where Turturro narrates his experiments, only to
see them go ineptly wrong are hysterical, but then the scenes where
Turturro lays his head on his dying wife's belly is one of the most
poignant and beautifully sad images I've ever seen.  Just thinking of
the former makes me laugh; thinking of the latter brings a tear to my
eye...well, maybe not a whole tear, but it makes me kind of sad in that
good way.
The acting is excellent.  Nathan Watt makes a wonderful protagonist:
someone we can associate with in this kind of situation, even if we
never felt nearly as kafkaesque as he did.  Turturro gives one of his
best performances, showing us a man who is complicated, all while
sometimes seeming overly-mean.  But when he sees his wife in the old
reels, we feel his pain.  Andie MacDowell, who is usually criticized for
her acting, gives the best performance she has since "sex, lies, and
videotape," presenting a woman who is strong although she is dying, and
is loving towards her children.  And Michael Richards and Maury Chaykin
are priceless as the overly-eccentric uncles.  Who else could have
played these roles?  I think the production would have had to shut down
if either of these two would have denied the roles.
Diane Keaton's direction is beautiful, the acting is incredible, and the
script by Richard LaGravanese (of "The Fisher King" fame) and Elizabeth
S. Barton is poignant, and full of great dialogue.  While it didn't do
much at the box office, this is a fantastic film, and is definitely
worth a viewing, especially for that scene at the end.  Never
underestimate the power of a film that can actually make someone as
unemotional as me cry.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Director: Steven Spielberg
Writer: Robert Rodat
Starring: Tom Hanks, Edward Burns, Tom Sizemore, Jeremy Davies, Adam
Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi, Van Diesel, Matt Damon, Dennis
Farina, Harve Presnell, Ted Danson, Leland Orser, Paul Giamatti
There are two ways that a war film can go, both of them tragic mistakes: 1)
they can glorify it and make it seem like everything the soldiers do is a
great and heroic thing (see John Wayne's "The Green Berets" - a pro-Vietnam
flick); and 2) they try to be totally political about it and ignore the
fact that there's such a thing as heroism, even in the barbarism of war. 
The latter are usually made by people who never had to go through this and
are just viewing from what they've seen on the news and heard from a couple
people.  There's a scene in "The Best Years of Our Lives" that illustrates
what's wrong with the latter.  In it, a soldier who was come back from
World War II with no hands is told he is a "sucker" for going to war by an
everyday schmoo activist, prompting the soldier to attack him in a fit of
rage.  What's wrong with the activist is he's never had to go into battle
and fight for something he believed in, therefore he knows nothing.
And neither did I until about a week ago before I saw "Saving Private
Ryan," perhaps the most realistic, gritty film ever put together by a major
studio.  In the film's opening half hour, we are "treated" to a long,
accurate, and gory depiction of D-Day, namely the Normandy beach siege,
which, from the looks of it, was almost a suicide mission.  We're there in
the boat when it's about to dock with soldiers acting nervous, throwing up,
and the lot.  When the doors open, the first couple rows of soldiers are
gunned down immeadiately, and the remaining soldiers hide behind the blocks
on the beach made so the boats wouldn't be able to drive up onto the beach
any further.
With machine guns blaring all over the surround sound system, jerky camera
movements, people dying left and right, and a group of soldiers trying to
form a little plan at the last minute to complete their mission and stay
alive, we are introduced to one soldier in particular: Captain John Miller
(Tom Hanks), who's hands were shaking before the boats docked, and who's
job it is to command whatever men he can find to try and stop the opposing
army from shooting.  When hiding behind the blocks, the camera closes in on
him, the sound drops, motion slows up, and he looks around as everyone is
quickly and gruesomely being killed.  He even notices one soldier in
particular who, missing his arm, goes back to pick it up and carry it with
him.  Welcome to the inferno.
The film was directed by Steven Spielberg, one of the best directors still
working today, although this film finds him in a career slump: following
the wild successes of "Jurassic Park" and "Schindler's List," as well as a
long hiatus from directing, he made three films in a row, two which opened
last year - "The Lost World" and "Amistad" - and both which were big
disappointments: The former was little more than a cheap way to make money,
and it showed; the latter was too overly ambitious for its own good.  Not
many people realized how important it was that his third film in this trio
really was.  Luckily enough, "Saving Private Ryan" finds him more than back
in his old form, but that he's still as powerful a director as he ever was.
You want to see how great a filmmaker he is?  Look how intensely amazing
the opening Normandy sequence is.  It's probably the most unnerrving thirty
minutes ever caught on film - so unnerrving that I couldn't wait for it to
end, a damn good thing if you're trying to create a war sequence in all its
"glory."  Any other filmmaker, or at least most of them, would falter after
this.  It's such a strong sequence that it could all go down hill from
there.  But Spielberg decides that not only is he going to keep moving on,
but that he's also going to expand his themes, and the result is an
emotional rollar coaster through a realistic debate on duty versus
humanity.
He does this by bringing up a fictitious composite: the Ryan boys, four
brothers who went to war, and three who were found to be killed after
D-Day, with one missing, either dead or alive.  When discovering this, the
heads of the military decide to take strict action: they will send a
platoon to find the last Private Ryan (later played by Matt Damon, who made
this long before he became a star) and bring him home alive.  So following
Normandy, we find that Miller and a group of his en have been chosen to
find him, whether they like it or not (they don't).
The men are a bitter, cynical bunch, showing their anger in several ways:
Sergeant Horvath (Tom Sizemore) shows it by obeying every order and
bitching about it in confidence while Private Rieben (Edward Burns, the
writer/director who needed the good attention anyway) acts completely
sarcastic about everything, hiding his timidness.  Our entry into this
group is with one of the film's many masterstrokes, Corporal Upham (Jeremy
Davies, from "Spanking the Monkey"), a French/German translator who is
assigned to the platoon, and who's never stepped foot in battle before. 
Played to perfect comic nervousness, he becomes the viewpoint of the
audience, wreaking of ignorance and pleading for a little humanity in some
of the film's more frightening scenes, as well as sometimes the only guy
who doesn't know the lingo and attitude that the soldiers have become
accustomed to when being with eachother.
Lingering over all this is Captain Miller, who has the terrible burden of
not only feeling exactly like these soldiers but having to convey a sense
of leadership and emotional stature for the rest of the platoon.  Watching
Miller have to deal with the mighty paradox of commanding when he's as
afraid as the rest of them becomes the film's most human aspect, and thank
god he's played by Tom Hanks who gives what has got to be the best
performance he's ever given.  His is devoid of gloss or cliche; he makes
him into a fully-developed character, worthy of our sympathy, and worried
that his wife will not recognize him because he's been through so much hell
while being in the army.  In his most human moment, he confesses to Sgt.
Horvath that he thinks his mission is bullshit and that Private Ryan
"better be worth it."
"Ryan" could easily be the most anti-war film ever made, what with its
total gory depiction of war and sense of loss we get whenever one of the
soldiers is killed (look at how saddening the scene where Giovanni Ribisi
dies).  But at the same time, this could have been an over-glorification of
soldiers, with everyone gung ho about getting Private Ryan (this premise
could have easily been another vehicle for John Wayne back in the hey day
of war films).  What it is, however, is much better than that: it's a
realistic portrait of this situation that refuses to take sides.  It merely
asks us to look at it for what it is, and make our own conclusions.  He
does this not by having the characters speak the ideas of the filmmaker, as
many films make the mistake of doing, but by showing it through action,
prompting the audience to not see it as propaganda for some personal view,
but to see it as totally and utterly emotionally devastating.
What can be said about the battle scenes in this movie that wouldn't seem
redundant?  What can be said about that shot of the Ryan mother seeing the
army car pull up to her house and the priest getting out that can't be said
just in emotions?  It may not seem obvious right now, but Spielberg has
done and said a lot more about war in this film than any other film in
history ever has.  He has not glamorized it or taken a side with it, and he
has found a new way of hating war and a new way of honoring the men who
risked their lives to fight for their country: these men weren't really
fighting anyone in particular; they were fighting to defend their fellow
men seflessly.  But the most important thing about this film is that it
defies explanation and becomes the one thing that so many films try to be
but never become: cathartic.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Shadow of a Doubt (1943)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: Sally Benson, Alma Reville, and Thornton Wilder (story by Gordon
MacDonell)
Starring: Teresa Wright, Joseph Cotten, Macdonald Casey, Patricia Collinge,
Henry Travers, Hume Cronyn, Wallace Frod, Edna Mae Wonacott, Charles Bates
Alfred Hitchcock was always more interested in human emotions and how he
can play with them than he was in cheap suspense thrills.  He once said
that he enjoyed playing the audience like a piano, and he did this almost
effortlessly in his films, giving us protagonists who we can all identify
with, and then putting them in the most dangerous of situations.  While he
sometimes diverted from this trend, his films nevertheless show a man more
fascinated with humanity than just general chills.  It's what separates him
from any other director of suspense: he knew the secret to scaring people
was preying on real human emotions.
"Shadow of a Doubt" is not one of Hitchcock's best, but is still one of his
most intriguing, mainly because it presents what could have been a typical
chase movie, and instead opts for a complex and very human tale of the
relationship between a serial killer and a close member of his family. 
"Shadow of a Doubt" concerns itself with Charlie Oakley (Joseph Cotten,
friend of Orson Welles), who has been killing numerous women who gain a
fortune from their dead husbands and then do nothing with their lives but
spend it.  When we first meet him, he's trying to elude the police, and
decides at a moment's notice to head to his sister's home to lay low for a
bit.
His arrival sparks the interest of his niece, also named Charlie (Teresa
Wright), a young adult who has become somewhat bored with life and figures
that her uncle, whom she is said to have a lot in common with, will bring
some interest back into her life.  This sets up an intriguing psychological
tale that is constantly twisting: Uncle Charlie is constantly trying to
paranoiacally hide his crimes from his family, and the truth about him is
always on the verge of popping out.  As we watch, we're afraid of many
things: will Charlie find out about her uncle, and if so, what will her do
to her?  Will the police come and take him away, executing him, or will he
get away with what he's done?  The film is a suspense film, but only in
that we're more worried about what will happen to the characters and less
how it happens.
The film introduces a couple sub-plots, the most prominent being a pair of
so-called reporters who come to do a socialogical survey on the family,
conveniently when Uncle Charlie's in town, and soon turn out to be cops,
following a lead (there are two people they think is the serial killer -
Uncle Charlie's one of them).  Charlie soon falls in love with one of them
- Jack Graham (Macdonald Casey) - and she finds herself torn between her
Uncle's possible secret identity and her newfound love.
Hitchcock builds the film up so well, piling on a surprising amount of
depth and emotion for a suspense film, and in turn explores many of his
favorite themes, such as man's ability to commit murder (her father and a
friend of the family, played by a comparitively young Hume Cronyn,
playfully discuss how they would murder eachother), knowledge of a loved
one's crimes, and, most prominently, the duality of man, which elevates the
film to a higher plain than most suspense films like this.  Both of the
Charlies in this film are built up to be like twins, but as the film goes
on, and the truth comes out into the open, we see how different they are. 
They almost become like two battling parts of the human psyche, each
fighting for dominant control.  "Shadow of a Doubt" becomes almost more of
a suspense film at times, and is rather an intelligent debate over the
control of the id.  What other suspense films have this kind of
psychological depth.
It doesn't hurt that the film plays so well with our emotions.  Uncle
Charlie, played to an eerie kind of perfection by Joseph Cotten, is a
sympathetic character, all because Charlie likes him so much.  After
awhile, we begin to see him as a loving uncle as well, and we can identify
with her feelings when his shady past begin to catch up with him.  And the
film is wise in bringing in the other members of the family as well.  The
family is presented as a parallel to a lot of the things that go on,
serving as a lot of comic releif, but later the film fully fleshes out the
mother, who almost needs Uncle Charlie, and would probably be devastated
for life if she learned of his past.
Unfortunately, a couple things crop up later on that bring the film down a
bit.  The last act takes a couple misteps, going for a more traditional
suspense ending rather than really digging deep, and coming to a totally
intelligent conclusion, which is what this film needs.  The ending does
work a bit though, but more in favor of the psychogical undertones, and
less in favor of the dramatic undertones (back to that whole battle over
the id thingy).  And the romance between Charlie and Jack seems more of a
requirement of a film for the time when it was made - they get together
more out of necessity for the plot than anything else.
"Shadow of a Doubt" overcomes these, though, but not totally.  What it
needs is a much better ending, and a lot more development in the romance
department, if it really needs a romance, that is.  You still have to
admire Hitchcock for not making this overtly cheap by giving into every
single suspense tactic in the book.  In fact, the film is very mild
mannered in the action department, and it opts to work with the suspense of
humanity rather than the suspense of just easy thrills.  That's what makes
Hitchcock better than everyone else, and that's why this film is so
admirable.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Broken Arrow (1996)
Director: John Woo
Writer: Graham Yost
Starring: John Travolta, Christian Slater, Samantha Mathis, Delroy
Lindo, Frank Whaley, Bob Gunton, Howie Long, Kurtwood Smith, French
Stewart
If you know me, you know that I think of John Woo as a God.  His action
films are probably the best in the world - filled with stylistic,
balletic, and visceral bloodbaths; plots motivated by characters; and a
strong, multi-leveled opposition between characters.  Indeed, his
"Face/Off" was probably the best film of the summer, and one of the most
entertaining of the year.  But every great director has their little
slip-ups.  Danny Boyle, Quentin Tarantino, Kevin Smith, Robert Altman,
Woody Allen...everyone.
"Broken Arrow" isn't BAD, really, but it's not very good either.  It's
horrible compared to Woo's other films (you'd hardly believe the guy who
directed this directed "The Killer," or even "Face/Off").  But I try not
to review from that particular stand-point (example: "The Frighteners"
sucked compared to Peter Jackson's other films, but was still a good
film overall and received a 3-star review from me), so basically all
this film needed to do was be fun.  Well, it really wasn't.
But anyway, this is the little premise: two pilots (Travolta and Slater)
are ordered to fly some nuclear weapons on a new jet thingy, but
Travolta goes nuts, sends Slater out on a parachute, and steals the
weapons as a tool of ransom.  Slater teams with annoying-park ranger
chick (Samantha Mathis, teaming them up after "Pump Up the Volume"), and
they go on to stop Travolta from ripping off the government, and perhaps
setting one or two of those nukes off.
There's a lot of action, yet the film is never really exciting. 
"Prepare to o ballistic" was one of the little promotional mantras this
had when advertised, but when I saw it (even in a surround sound home
theatre system thingy), I wasn't really all that moved.  I mean, this is
the guy who got adrenalized watching Dustin Hoffman beat up a bunch of
cockney thugs in "Straw Dogs," and I was damn near limp with this one. 
I think Woo's other films are damn near orgasmic, but this was pretty
tepid, even with some cool stuff in it (Travolta's exit is pretty cool).
Why weren't these action scenes as adrenalin-pumping-exciting enough for
me?  I'm not really sure.  He has some slow-mo shots of people dying,
but of course they're not as poignant without the gallons of blood
escaping their body (a cliche, but I love it).  And there's some really
cool little action sight-gags in it (a shot with a helicopter wing
almost slicing Mathis into thirds is pretty cool).
But I think the problem lies within the characters.  In earlier John Woo
flicks (and "Face/Off"), he creates strong characters (in that they're
pretty well-developed, although not all the time); people who we care
about.  When Chow Yun-Fat and Danny Lee are in the church fighting off
the huge gang of their opponents, I was excited.  Because I didn't
really care if Slater and Mathis were shot up or something, I was never
really in any tense situation.  When you have a character you care about
in a life-threatening situation, things get tense.  When you actually
would prefer Mathis to be shot by Travolta so she would stop being
annoying, you have a bit of a tension problem.
John Woo also has a great trademark of creating character opposition
between two of the characters.  In "A Better Tomorrow," the fractured
relationship between the two brothers was pretty moving.  In "Face/Off,"
there was also a parallelism between Sean and Castor, setting up a lot
of irony, and made us care about both of them, even if one was a raving
maniac (actually, it actually asks us whether or not we like the villain
or the hero).  Here, Travolta is likeable JUST because he's funny.  But
Slater is only likable because Slater does a good job with the role, and
because the script has ordered us to like him.  The extent of the
opposition between the two seems to be that they box, and Slater keeps
loosing.  I was not thrilled at all by their relationship, and it causes
the film to suffer.
There are some plusses, though.  The two leads (Travolta and Slater)
both do good jobs.  I mean, I usually don't like Slater a lot, but he
was good here.  And Travolta certainly knows how to make a good old
campy villain.  With his cool-ass cigarette smoking, striking visage,
and...well, everything, he just does a great job of making us like him. 
In later scenes, he seems to show some human qualities to his role, even
if they're not even in there, which actually seems to help the
relationship between the two, even if very minimally.  But at least he
tried where the writers would not.
"Broken Arrow" is not a horrible film, but it's very disappointing for a
great filmmaker like John Woo.  If he and the writers had spent more
time on it, they probably would have been able to make an amazing film,
but alas, they failed.  But at least he came back with the jaw-dropping
amazing "Face/Off."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
Director: Jean-Pierre Jeunet
Writer: Joss Whedon
Starring: Sigourney Weaver, Winona Ryder, Ron Perlman, Dominique Pinon,
Michael Wincott, Dan Hedaya, J.E. Freeman,  Brad Dourif, Raymond Cruz,
Kim Flowers, Gary Dourdan, Leland Orser
I'm an avid fan of the "Alien" saga, so this review is obviously a tad
biased (at least I admitted it).  Of course, that doesn't mean that I'm
gonna be giving this a four-star review or something, because "Alien:
Resurrection," the fourth film in the cool-as-hell series is NOT an
absolutely amazing film, much like the first two were.  However, it's a
very good film which never fails to entertain, and consists of yet
another mutation in the style of the series.  In short, I had a good
time.
"Alien: Resurrection" leaves off 200 years after the last one, where our
heroine protagonist, Ellen Ripley (Sigourney Weaver), the science
fiction genre's answer to Job, had killed herself after discovering that
an alien was inside her body, waiting to pop out like it did to John
Hurt in the first one.  Of course, the last one wasn't very great or
anything (I liked it, though not as much as the first two), and more
importantly, it wasn't financially successful (a tawdry 55 million
bucks!).  So back we are, with Ripley back as a clone, which means we
get another little satirical look at cloning (not that that's a bad
thing, but it's becoming a cliche).
So she's cloned aboard an even more futuristic-looking ship called "The
Auriga" by some doctors (including the necessary bad government guy, Dr.
Wren, played by J.E. Freeman, as well as the little-seen Dr. Gediman,
played by none other than Brad Douriff), mainly because they have a
version of her with the alien still inside her.  Once you get past the
fact that you can't figure out where they got her blood (although I
think it might have been from the blood samples taken by Charles Dance
in the third one), the film's okay.
Also on board are a band of mercenary pirates, including Michael
Wincott, Ron Perlman, Kim Flowers, Raymond Cruz, Dominique Pinon (a
Jeunet sytable) and...Winona Ryder, who plays Analee Call, who turns out
to have a bit of a secret (I won't state it, but unless you've been
shacking up with Salinger for the past two years, you probably know all
about it - although it's nicely covered up).  There's a bit of a
non-sexual-yet-slightly-homoerotic relationship between her and Ripley,
but it's never really deepened enough.  Oh well.
Well, as you might have guessed, the alien and its spawn escape and run
around the ship.  And it pretty much does away with most of the people
on the ship (including some shocks - Dan Hedaya, for instance, who's
death is comical yet sad since, well, he's Dan Hedaya), and the
remaining people (about 7 or 8) are left to try and escape and stop the
aliens from doing any major harm since the ship is heading quickly
towards Earth.
Of course, the plot is all balderdash, and just an excuse for some good
old "Alien"-brand fun.  The real focus of the series seems to be on
style, not really substance (although there's always a bit of it, most
notably in "Aliens" with the relationship between Ripley and the little
girl).  What's interesting about the series is that each film is
stylistically different in its approach.  "Alien" is a claustrophobic
exercise in quiet frights.  "Aliens" is a wild, tense thriller.  "Alien
3" is a bleak, moody piece of semi-noir.  "Alien 4" is kind of like an
off-beat french film, filled with lots of humor, and cool scares.
Jean-Pierre Jeunet (without his usual directing partner, Marc Caro)
creates a ship filled with the kind of scares films like "Das Boot" has,
with echoes hinting at a possible threat.  The chills in the film are
really cool, especially with the music, which is sometimes turned down
completely for certain scenes (there's the most tense surgery scene
since "Face/Off" towards the beginning).  And not every chill turns into
a bloody mess or anything like that.  This all combined with some good
old humor makes this as interesting visually and stylistically as the
others.
There are even a couple scenes which just stick out afterwards as being
brilliantly executed.  One is the aforementioned surgery scene.  Another
one takes place between Call and Ripley, which is just awesome.  The
underwater chase scene and the ladder scene afterwards is one of the
most tense, thrilling, and jaw-dropping scenes in the entire saga (with
a small allusion to Jeunet's earlier film, "Delicatessen").  And the way
they do in the final alien is hysterically cool (with a lovely allusion
to "Goldfinger").
But the best scene in the entire film (I'm sure I'm not the first to
mention it) takes place when Ripley sees all the variations on her as
they cloned her (she has a an "8" tatooed on her arm).  It might be the
most emotionally stimulating scene in the entire saga.
The screenplay by Joss Whedon is not a great piece of work, as it never
really deapens a lot of the characters.  However, it does make us care
about most of them, so that when there's very little of them, and it
looks like one or more of them may become Alien Chow, we are pretty
scared.  And, yeah, there are some very funny lines (Ripley: "Who do I
have to fuck to get off this boat?!" Johner: "Well, I can get you off. 
But not this ship.")
The acting is good all around, with stand-out performances from Ron
Perlman as the male chauvenist pig Johner, and Leland Orser (the poor
bastad in "Se7en" who performed the "lust" sin) as an anxiety-ridden
wannabe Woody Allen who has an alien inside him.  Winona Ryder is good,
but not amazing like she usually is (although she meshes well with the
film).  Of course, and as usual, Sigourney Weaver steals the show. 
Playing a variation on the Ripley character (less emotional, and more
rude and bitter), she pulls it off while still being utterly lovable. 
She's not going to get an Oscar nomination like she did for "Aliens,"
but she's just awesome.
Overall, it's a thrilling, entertaining film which doesn't really amaze
like the first two, but is much more amazing than the third
installment.  The style is the best part of the film, which isn't really
a bad thing, but it being the best part takes away from a lot of the
depth the film occasionally tries to apply.  But it's entertaining as
hell, and it's definitely fit for the "Alien" series.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Lord of the Flies (1990)
Director: Harry Hook
Writer: Sara Schiff (from the novel by William Golding)
Starring: Bathalzar Getty, Chris Fuhhr, Danuel Pipoly
William Golding's "Lord of the Flies" is obligatory reading for the
young student.  So obligatory that I never read it.  I guess that makes
me feel special, but there's something about overly symbolic fables
(i.e. Orwell's "Animal Farm," one of my favorites) that gets me, and I
wish I had.  Of course, I guess I could.  But like most famous novels,
there's a film adaptation that's about half as good as its source.  And
that's precisely what I saw when I watched this on TV impromptu during a
VERY boring Sunday afternoon here at Temple U.
For those who don't know, "Lord of the Flies" is about a group of school
boys who are marooned on an island without any adult supervision (though
there's the pilot, but he's so wounded that he's pretty much insane and
has to be tied down).  The boys need some discipline, so they
democratically elect Ralph (Bathalzar Getty, from "Lost Highway").  But
as things go on, and as they realize that they're really not going to be
rescued in any forseeable future, some become savages, painting their
faces, carrying spears, and running around half-naked, speaking in short
declaritive sentences, like "Cheif brings gift."
The leader of the other clan is Jack (Chris Fuhhr), who is a kind of
asswhole of a kid, who starts off as a bully and proceeds to the totally
evil dictator of what turns out to be a clan of savages, alienating
Ralph and his only friend, Piggy (Danuel Pipoly), who is supposed to be
the wise, overly intellectual kid of them all, who somehow saved his
glasses in the crash.  The climactic ending is obvious, but not
anticlimactic, and, of course, shocking, bringing all the ideas
together.
These characters are all supposed to represent one part of the psyche. 
Ralph is supposed to be the part that is civil and wants law and order. 
Jack is the savage, immature part.  And Piggy, is, of course, the voice
of reason in a increasingly chaotic island (there's also another
character, Simon, who is pretty much not in this film).
And, of course, everything is supposed to be symbolic.  The numerous
misadventures of Piggy's glasses (i.e. it's breaking and being stolen),
causing him to be near blind, is symbolic of him breaking down, and
hoping to be with the other clan.  And the actual "lord of the flies," a
decapitated boar's head is supposed to be a sign of ultimate evil and
horror.  Then there's the "beast," which I guess represents their
gradually declining civility or something.  I didn't read the book, give
me a break, I'm bullshitting here.
Anyway, this is all supposed to happen here in this film...and it does. 
But while apparently in the book, it's supposed to be subtle and we're
supposed to watch the story unfold and think about afterwards...much
like a good novel.  But the director is so paranoid that the Americans
won't get it, so he makes everything in our faces.  This adheres the
story, and makes it seem way too mechanical.  Also, this makes the
symbol less intense.  It's supposed to shock us.  I was just like, "Oh,
he broke his glasses, ho hum."
The acting is also not very good.  While Bathalzar and Fuhhr are merely
passable as the two leads, the guy who plays Piggy can't even complete a
sentence, and he seems to whiny and boring.  I mean, the part where he's
preaching to them (and nearly says, "Why can't we all get along?"), and
some jerks above him push a giant rock onto his head, I was not just
shocked that they've become savages like that, but I was also feeling a
bit of contradiction because I was hoping someone would do that to him
anyway.  The guy can't act, he's annoying, and he's nothing like he
should be.
This whole film is nothing like it should be.  I'm supposed to feel
totally shocked by the story, how these school kids have become the
epitomy of evil.  When they kill Piggy and Simon, they're shown as being
shocked and saddened.  They're not supposed to care (except for Piggy
and Ralph).  And the boar's head is just not as scary as it should be. 
I mean, I didn't even read the book and I was disappointed.
On a positive note, it's not a BAD film.  By the end, I was kinda
feeling depressed, which was probably what the director had aimed for. 
When they killed Piggy, I was hoping someone would just kill those
pricks who did it.  The ending is too short, but the visions we see,
with the forest on fire, and everyone chasing Ralph, who has almost no
chance of survivial except for a little part of deux ex machina, totally
bowled me over.  It was absolutely mesmerizing and almost redeems the
film from a truly bad rating.  And the cinematography is gorgeous, but
seems too much like a film for the rotary travelogue.
This film is wrongly modernized.  The kids swear and talk about "Alf"
(why, in god's name, ALF?!), and there are planes and choppers, and
they're very early American instead of post-war Brits.  What is the
point of this?  To dumb it down?  This modernization just weakens the
story, because even in 1990 there were kids killing kids in our very
American streets.  The scary part of this book is it was written in the
50s and predicted what would be happening now.  This is just like some
"Classics Illustrated" type of spiel, for the kids who don't want to
read the book since there's a movie version of it.  And it's only 90
minutes long, so it will cut down some hours of reading.
But trust me, kids, pick up the damn book and read it, 'cause it's
probably much better than this.  But if, like me, you're bored, and it's
on TV somewhere, it's worth a viewing, I guess.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Meet the Feebles (1989)
Director: Peter Jackson
Writers: Peter Jackson, Danny Mulheron, Stephen Sinclair, and Frances Walsh
Starring: Mark Hadlow, Ross Jolly, Brian Sergent, Peter Vere-Jones, Mark
Wright, Donna Akersten, Stuart Devenie
A friend of mine said to me about three minutes into watching Peter
Jackson's "Meet the Feebles" that (I'm paraphrasing) "This is nothing but
an obnoxious, nasty version of the Muppets; everything that's going on is
just being aimed at the lowest common denominator."  To which I relpied
"Yeah...so?"
"Meet the Feebles" is one of the creepiest, most disgusting films I've ever
seen, and also one of the more interesting, to say the least.  As my friend
said in the quote, it's a nasty version of the Muppets, kind of like the
vile behavior.  The film's about a group of living puppets all working on a
one-hour variety show a la the Muppets, but all on their very first show. 
And the film takes place in a short period time before this show, as we are
introduced to every single character on the show, some of which get more
attention than others, and are shown as bluntly as possible.
The film exposes all the melodrama of the backstage of the show, including
several stores going on at the same time, such as one featuring Heide the
Hippo, an overweight actress hired only because she's a star, which is also
the reason she's married to Bletch the Walrus, the show's double-crossing,
asswhole producer, who's carrying on an affair with Samantha the Siamese
Cat, his voluptuous secretary.  Meanwhile, we meet the quiet, lovable
Robert the Hedgehog, the least depraved of the sort, who has fallen in love
with Lucille the Poodle, who has the eyes of Bletch's Peter Lorre-accented
assistant, Trevor the Rat, who shoots S&M films on the side.
You think these characters are bizarre?  Here's a couple more: there's the
show's bitchy director, Sebastian the Fox, who has a musical suprise near
the end; the dim-witted Sid the Elephant, who has accidentally gotten a,
um, chicken pregnant (don't ask me how); Harry the Hare, another star who
has found out that he may have AIDs; Wynard the Frog, the shaky knife
thrower who does morphine every thirty seconds to calm the pain of a past
war where he was held captive and forced to do Russian Roulette (yes,
there's a "Deer Hunter" parody); and a Papparazzi fly who shows up now and
then.
This should basically give you an idea of what the film is like: it IS the
Muppets made afoul.  This is exactly why the film is fun, though.  And I
was wrong about my first impression that it was merely just this. 
Underneat we have a hilariously scatching satire of the line between how we
view celebrities and how they really are.  On stage, Harry the Hare may
seem like a lovable Bugs Bunny rip-off, but what you don't know is that the
minute he leaves the stage, he's off to take on two chick bunnies in his
dimly-lit room.
No, it's not accurate; it's a puppet movie, and it takes everything it can
to the extreme at any moment.  But this is exactly what the film is about
and why the film is fun.  Although barely released in the States, this film
has a cult status, and it's easy to see why.  I can understand why this
film would seem very fun after a couple friends come over and following a
brief downer of some heavy liquor.  It does pander to the lowest
denominator, that's why it's fun.  And because it has some general depth,
it can also hold up when sober.
If there's anything wrong with the film, it's that it's too long.  97
minutes is nothing normally, but when you have puppets talking and doing
shit for that long, it seems like an eternity.  Although several things are
a riot, this film just needs some good editing, especially in the middle
where it drags horrifically, making for a generally uncomfortable
experience.  Although I have to admit I don't know what could be cut.
But that's all made fine by an ending which is so over-the-top, so much a
parody of "Carrie" and "The Wild Bunch" that I suddenly lept to my seat
when it began.  Yes, it's another typical Peter Jackson gorefest, but he
does them so well that I can't see how anyone could complain with a
straight face.
I kept thinking back to what my friend said (who left after five minutes or
so to do something "better"), and how I wished he had stayed until the end.
 Although it's often a big task to watch, the reward for making through it
is a fiercely funny and satirical film which may be foul, disgusting, and
horrific to watch, but at the same time, entertaining, mesmerizing, and
unforgettable, which isn't always a good thing, but here's an exception.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
Director: Brian DePalma
Writer: David Koepp (story by Brian DePalma and David Koepp)
Starring: Nicolas Cage, Gary Sinise, Carla Gugino, Stan Shaw, Kevin Dunn,
John Heard, Joel Fabiani, Chip Zien, David Higgins, Luis Guzmán
"Snake Eyes" is the most aggravating kind of movie: the kind that shows so
much potential then becomes unbelievably disappointing.  It's not just
because this is a Brian DePalma film, and since he's a great director and
one who's films are always greeted with at least some fanfare.  And it's
not even because this was a film starring Nicolas Cage and since he gives a
brauvara performance, this film is hardly worth his talents.  It's worse
than that.  It's aggravating for the sole reason that its story could be so
much more, could be totally intelligent, and it opens up with absolutely no
subtlety that it will be handled complexly and intensely...then at one
point in the movie makes on wrong turn that leads it to the Hall of Fame of
Half-Assedness.  Or more deservedly, the Hall of Fame of the
Eighth-Assedness.
In certain circles, "Snake Eyes" was being advertised as a kind of modern
day version of Kurosawa's classic "Rashomon," where a crime is told from
the four different (and I mean different) perspectives, and it looks as
though it may actually be just like this with the opening, which, I might
add, is superb.  In one very very very long steadicam shot, we meet the
protagonist, crooked Atlantic City detective, Rick Santoro (Cage), and
follow him before a boxing match as he talks on his cell phone with his
wife, interupts a pay-per-view event on TV, chases down a gambler, enters
the arena all pumped up for the fight, sits down and talks with his bud,
Kevin Dunne (Gary Sinise, who's character should not be confused with that
of actor Kevin Dunn, who's also in this), and watches as it happens.
There's a big name in the crowd, and that's the Secretary of Defense,
Charles Kirkland (Joel Fabiani), who's sitting behind Rick, and who gets
shot a second after the Heavyweight Champion, Lincoln Tyler (Stan Shaw), is
knocked out.  This all happens in the opening shot, and it creates so many
red herrings and possibilities of what happened that it opens this scene up
for close examination and total deconstruction.  What really happened, this
film asks, and it sets this film up extremely well for when Rick begins to
question people and get different perspectives on the scene...and discovers
there's a very good possibility it was a conspiracy.
As we follow Rick trying to learn of more information, we also meet a woman
who was talking to Kirkland before he was shot (Carla Gugino), and who
flees the scene in a panic, and tries to hide from the cops in the arena
and the adjacent casino/hotel since the cops have blocked off the doors so
they can get witness' takes on what happened.  
This is all going pretty fine and dandy, and it's extremely interesting to
watch...then it takes one wrong step.  We follow the wrong character, and
we learn of the answer to the mystery too early on, and way before Rick can
find it out.  But that's not the worst part of it: it's that it's the one
person you didn't think it would be because he was too obviously supposed
to be the red herring, the one you didn't think did it because it would be
stupid and cliched of that person to be behind it.
It only gets worse: the film turns into a chase film about half way through
the film, and since we already know what happened, we can't rely on Rick's
investigation to be all that interesting.  It's as if the film ran out of
the guts to be really complex and original about a third of the way in, and
decided to just fall back on an easy way out, and that just happens to mean
that it has to become less and less credible.  Events become more and more
proposterous, and by the end, the film has decided to rely on the worst
offender in mysteries like this: the deux ex machina.  That's where some
outside intereference brings the film to a sudden conclusion and makes
everything okay.  This time, it's a hurricane, an out-of-control police
car, and a big round ball that adorned the arena.
What went wrong?  DePalma and the screenwriter, David Koepp, are extremely
credible people in their respective fields, and have been known for
bringing life and complexity to mysteries such as this.  DePalma, who
idolizes Hitchcock to death, has done many a film like this, such as his
masterpiece, "Blow Out," where a movie soundman uses movie elements to
uncover a conspiracy piece by piece.   But granted, DePalma at least makes
it intriguing to watch, what with his over-the-top shot set-ups, notably
the beginning and a sequence where the camera pans over top of a bunch of
rooms in the hotel, forgetting anything about boundaries.  At least his
direction makes up partly for it.
Then there's Koepp, who showed such great ability at making a character's
flaws come to life like he did in DePalma's earlier "Carlito's Way," a film
that dove right into the life and past of its character and examined him
extremely well.  He can write a flawed character, but his Rick Santoro
seems to be just a half-assed effort.  He's flawed, and we can see
redemption if the story wasn't so formulaic.  A scene towards the end where
he has to make a fatal decision is cheapened by the fact that his answer
has no emotional buildup.  He may as well have said the opposite of what he
says; it would have at least gone with what the character was like.
This is the most disappointing kind of film because it promises
intelligence and complexity, because it promises disection of a flawed
character and perhaps even redemption, then pulls the rug from under us
just as we were about to be convinced it would be able to go all the way. 
As I was watching the first half hour, I couldn't wait to see how the
mystery would be unearthed, how many different perspectives he'd be given,
and perhaps he'd have to make a choice between who's he has to believe. 
Now there's a film.  Unfortunately, the film has two major deux ex
machinas: one in the disasterous ending; the other, about a half hour in
when the film goes into autopilot and becomes a stale and recycled piece of
crap we've seen all too much before, but never from someone like DePalma.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
Director: Quentin Tarantino
Writer: Quentin Tarantino (based on the novel "Rum Punch" by Elmore
Leonard)
Starring: Pam Grier, Samuel L. Jackson, Robert Forster, Robert DeNiro,
Bridget Fonda, Michael Keaton, Michael Bowen, Lisa Gay Hamilton, Tom
"Tiny" Lister Jr, Margaret Cho, Denise Crosby, Sid Haig, Aimee Graham,
Chris Tucker
I have a feeling many people will be let-down when seeing Quentin
Tarantino's follow-up to "Pulp Fiction" as it is not a "Pulp Fiction." 
Or a "Reservoir Dogs" for that matter.  It's not a hip, non-linear
morality play, doesn't contain any big speeches on popular culture, and
doesn't have a ton of shoot-outs, blood, or a lot of gore.  "Jackie
Brown" is all about simple pleasures, telling us a simple story
motivated entirely by characters.  It's not a retread of either of his
films, yet still remains amazing in its own right, which means one
thing: That's right, Mr. Tarantino is the Real McCoy.
I've read a couple Elmore Leonard novels, and the great thing about him
is that he creates a world that's so seductive that it's almost a pity
that it has to end.  He tells simple crime stories, filled with
characters who are living breathing people.  They have a vernacular all
their own, and they clash off of eachother, creating the storylines
entirely from them.  None of them are stuck in a crime story, they're
stuck in the crime world.  And instead of Quentin doing his own schtick,
he has adapted one of his novels ("Rum Punch"), and it's about time,
because seeing his others films, you know it's a perfect duo.
"Jackie Brown," which is the name of the protagonist changed a bit to be
an homage to that old Pam Grier classic "Foxy Brown," is a simple story,
made complex by the characters.  It centers a middle-aged flight
attendant, Jackie Brown (Pam Grier, getting a career lift, after all
those years of crap Segal flicks), who has a side-line of running gun
money for a small time arms dealer in Compton: Ordell Robie (Samuel L.
Jackson - who else could have done this role?).  The cops have caught
her, and they give her a choice: either spill the beans, and probably
definitely be killed by Robie...or do some time, which would mean she'd
be screwed for life, since she's 44 and all, and a flight attendant.
Meanwhile, a bail bondsman named Max Cherry (Robert Forster, who's
biggest thing other than this was a starring role in that John
Sayles-penned creature feature, "Alligator") who meets Jackie when he
gets her out of jail for Ordell at the beginning, and falls deeply in
love with her.  The two begin helping eachother out and all, and we get
a nice tender love story going on which never feels forced or corny
(thank god).
Also in on the film are two ATF agents (Michael Keaton and Michael
Bowen), who are working with Jackie; a dim-witted ex-prison con named
Louis Gara (scummy-looking Robert DeNiro), who's working with Ordell;
and the beach girl/pot head Melanie (Bridget Fonda), who has a lot of
wit in between her inhalations.  
What's interesting is that all of these characters have intelligence,
and are never restricted by the plot.  These characters do a lot of
talking, and there are some scenes where they're just hanging out that
are just as fascinating if not more than the suspense sequences.  I
loved the scene where Melanie and Louis were talking about a picture,
mainly because it was so excellently written, acted, and subtely
directed.  He pulls us into a world where the characters reign, and lets
us drop in on them just chilling.  That's what's great about Tarantino.
The plot is complex and all, yet simple.  What I liked about it was how
it was never overwhelming, and how it was never in the foreground.  Even
Jackie being caught by the police was justified since one of the
less-intelligent characters gave her away.  Tarantino's characters have
never been as well-defined than in this one, and his dialogue has never
really been as brilliant, in respects to the way he makes the characters
sound like real people.  Sure, there are no big speeches about European
McDonalds, and even no great one-liners like "I'm gonna get medieval on
your ass," but he allows us to get drawn into the characters, and never
overwhelms us with anything else.
The acting from everyone is flawless.  There's not one bad performance
in the movie.  Pam Grier gives the performance of her career, hitting
every single note of her character, and making her seem first and
foremost like a person.  After all, it's kind of a biographical
character.  Here's a woman who's had some good things happen to her (the
whole blaxploitation thing in real life), but is stuck doing a crap
thankless job (flight stewardess in the movie; bad films in real life),
and has a chance to get away rich (the half-a-million in the movie; the
movie in real life).  Watching her in this movie, even I wanted to cast
her in a movie of mine.  She's amazing.
But she doesn't do the best acting job.  That award goes to Robert
Forster, who needed a career face-lift because he's never really had a
big career.  Older than Grier is, he provides the film with heart, and
gives a flawless performance as the older bail bondsman, stuck in a crap
job, and possessing a bit of puppy dog love for Grier.  Watching him act
is one of the true simple joys of watching "Jackie Brown."
Everyone else is great too.  Samuel L. Jackson is predictably brilliant,
shouting out the N-word over and over and over again (last night on
Charlie Rose, Quentin discussed this, and said that's how someone like
Ordell really talks - and also talked about the whole Spike Lee being
pissed off again spiel). DeNiro fits perfectly into the world of
Tarantino (maybe he and Keitel can finally get a film together where
they actually have some good screentime), also hitting every single note
of his character.  Fonda is amazing as the pot headed beach bum who's
motivation it is to get stoned and watch TV - I loved her in every
single scene she had.  And Keaton has a small part, but utilizes it
wonderfully, without every going "Beatlejuice" with it.  Christ Tucker,
who has a very small one-scene role is hilarious without getting too
"Fifth Element"-y (in fact, it seems like he took some well-needed
prozac).
But the best thing about this is Quentin, the man on the marquee (do you
think people are rushing to see this for Pam Grier?).  He's still in
love with every single frame, and it shows.  His style's still in tact,
but it's more subtle this time, to reflect on the state of mind of
Jackie, who's worn out.  This works brilliantly, especially since this
film wouldn't work with anything outrageous.  There's no ear cutting or
male rape; and there are only a few shocking scenes, and even they
aren't really shocking.  There are so many things I loved about this
film that I couldn't even list them since it would go on forever.  
At a running time one minute longer than that of "Pulp Fiction," the
film would seem to go on foerever.  But he directs this leisurely, and
we just chill with the characters.  Quentin directs this like a grown-up
blaxploitation film, starting off with a typical blaxploitation opening
(which hints at the opening of "The Graduate"), with Pam looking all
cool, then shows her just going to work.  This kind of maturity is what
"Jackie Brown" is all about.  This is the film that shows that Quentin
can actually direct.
Along with "Titanic," this is the best film to see right now.  It's a
damn-near flawless little piece of film noir, filled with excellent
characterization, and just the right bit of hipness.  I looked hard but
could not even find one thing wrong with the film.  Every single thing
is in tact with the film.  This is not "Reservoir Dogs" or "Pulp
Fiction."  It's "Jackie Brown": a completely different film.  And that's
what I loved about it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Omen, The (1976)
Director: Richard Donner
Writer: David Seltzer
Starring: Gregory Peck, Lee Remick, David Warner, Billie Whitelaw, Harvey
Stephens, Patrick Troughton, Martin Benson, Holly Palance, Leo McKern
"The Omen" is a scary enough for anyone who has every read anything out of
the bible and was suddenly worried that it may come true someday.  It's
especially aimed at those who take everything that the bible says
literally, especially the book of Revelations, which predicts exactly how
armageddom will take place, including the rise of the antichrist, the son
of the devil (if you didn't already know that).  Apparently screenwriter
David Seltzer and director Richard Donner were influenced by these passages
when they were a kid and decided, hey, let's make a horror flick out of
them.
And so here's "The Omen," a horror film that's the first in a trilogy
(actually, there's four, but few count the fourth one, as it was a TV movie
that had little to do with the first three) about the rise and fall of
Damien, the antichrist.  And surprisingly enough, this first one is a very
effective little picture, filled with just the right amount of melodrama
and enough frights, chills, and little bits of intrigue to make it an
extremely watchable and even creepy film.
"The Omen" opens on June 6 in Rome (the date and locale are actually
important) where we meet Robert Thorn (Gregory Peck), the US Ambassador to
Italy who rushes to the local hospital to witness his wife, Katherine (Lee
Remick), give birth.  However, she has a stillborn, and while under, the
priest there makes a deal with him: they switch his dead child with an
orphan child just born there as well.  He accepts, and little Damien
(played by the eerily adorable Harvey Stephens...who never made another
film before or after this one) comes home with them.
Five years pass, and just when everything is going right, Damien's nanny
(Holly Palance, daughter of Jack) commits a dramatic suicide, which becomes
the first in a series of murders that occur throughout the film.  Upon
getting a new nanny (Billy Whitelaw) without much trouble, things turn
really weird, as Robert is hounded by a raving priest (Patrick Troughton)
who warns him about Damien, and begins to get friendly tips from a local
member of the papparazzi, Jennings (David Warner), that proves that
something is indeed afowl.
Evenly paced, this film starts out with little scares and overly-dramatic
scenes, like one where they try to take Damien to church for the first time
(uh oh!), and then moves on to introducing more and more elements into the
storyline.  The film begins to really take off as Robert is made more and
more aware of the terrible threat he has on his hands.  It seems that every
layer that is pulled back on the story unearths even more vital danger, and
the film becomes a rollar coaster ride of suspense, just because of how
much knowledge is unearthed.
The director Richard Donner constantly keeps things moving, and gives many
of the sequences an extremely dramatic feel, especially several of the
murder sequences (of which there are a number of), which wreak of slow-mo
shots, quick editing, and Jerry Goldsmith's Oscar-winning score, which
features angelic choirs underscoring the satanic overtones on the screen
and builds up the right amount of adrenalin and shock value for the
audience.  Yes, they're overdone, but it works just right for this film,
which is basically an overdone version of the nastier parts of the Holy
Scriptures.
Essentially, this is an intelligent film.  It knows that many of the
audience members are probably aquainted with the inner workings of the
bible, and how much of Revelations is used to scare us from sinning, and it
knows exactly how to prey on this general fear.  It reads several of the
passages, and deciphers them literally, often pointing out that many of the
things that Revelations talks of has probably already happened.  For anyone
who is either a regular churchgoer or was forced to go (like me), this is
especially scary because if Christians actually believe what they worship,
this is something that could really happen.
For others, it's just a really fun horror film, filled with joyously
manipulative undertones of Christian fear that we may or may not believe
in.  But even if we're not scared by it all and just feel cheated by it, we
can always recognize the underlying intelligence this film has, in that the
character Damien is unaware of his evil powers, at least in this
installment of the "Omen" trilogy.  If the trilogy had expanded on some of
the ideas that were postulated by this film, it could have come off as a
cross between a slasher film and a reverse version of Martin Scorsese's
"The Last Temptation of Christ," which postulated that Jesus may have been
just a man who found out he had a terrible burden.  What if Damien is the
same way?  What if he's generally evil, like the way Jesus was generally
good, but he discovers that he's going to bring about the end of the world
and people are trying to kill him left and right?  Now there's an idea for
a movie.  But as far as this film is concerned, it's entertaining and scary
enough to pass for now.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for True Lies (1994)
Writer/Director: James Cameron
Starring: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Jamie Lee Curtis, Tom Arnold, Tia 
Carerre, Art Malik, Bill Paxton, Grant Heslov, Elika Dushku, Charlton 
Heston
In the last 30 minutes of "True Lies," we get to see Arnold 
Schwarzenegger take out three-quarters of a camp of evil baddies armed 
with a pistol, a machine gun, and a combination of a machine gun and oil 
pump; see him leap off a dock after running from an incoming rocket 
aimed at him; see a huge bridge in the Florida Keys get blown away; see 
Arnold pull his wife from an out-of-control car, causing her to dangle 
from a helicopter; and see him attack a bunch of nasty terrorists in 
downtown Miami in a huge jet.  I've seldomnly laughed harder.
Ian Flemming once said of the character he created, "Bond is what every 
man wants to be, and knows damn well he can't."  Well, this is very 
true, and the subject of the film, Harry Travers (Ah-nold), is a regular 
everyday joe (with abs of steel) who is married to a career mom (Jamie 
Lee Curtis), has a daughter (Elisha Dushku), and has a busy computer 
salesman job...or does he?  We meet Harry on one of his Bondish missions 
to an elite party in Sweeden where he must do something cool with a 
computer (how it all works is not relevant, as these tiny details are 
never relevant in the Bond films either).  He works as a kind of 
superman, always shooting right on target, never being hit, and being 
able to walk right in front of a car that skids an inch from his face on 
ice.  Then he can shoot a couple bad guys from behind a truck passing 
the bullet through the window.  Then he returns home, sleeps with his 
bored wife, and talks endlessly about "the exciting world of computers."
The film is divided into three acts.  The first one sets up this whole 
premise, where he lies to his wife about his boring job when he is in 
fact leading a great 007-style life, working for a highly secret branch 
of the government.  His current mission has him doing something with 
some bad, insane Middle Easterns led by the great Art Malik.  Also 
included somehow is the very elegant and sexy Juno (Tia Carerre).  But 
this is all secondary to the deal with his wife, who may be cheating on 
Harry with a suave guy who says he's a spy like Harry (Bill Paxton).  
This is in the hysterical second act which is there to stretch the 
premise to its seemingly limitless limits.  How this whole thing comes 
out is one of the true geniuses of this flick.
The third act is composed of Harry and his wife escaping and trying to 
stop the baddies from blowing up downtown Miami with a nuclear weapon.  
This is where many of the coolest stunts occur, with the bridges blowing 
up, and Harry taking on all the baddies with a jet in downtown Miami.  
While this is just breathtaking to look at, in another lesser film, this 
would be just there to look cool and that's it.  In this film, it's not 
only breathtaking, but inspired.
The way this film is handled is with a kind of authentic absurdity.  The 
filmmakers know the storyline is crap, and they handle it that way.  
They seem to revel in the enormous plot holes in the spy storyline.  And 
they seem to take enormous glee in the whole affair subplot that 
dominates the second act.  The action sequences are great to look at and 
downright hysterical.  James Cameron goes for laughs with everything, 
but does not overdo it at all.  The film is subtle in the way that this 
is all looked at with a kind of that's-the-way-things-are attitude, 
which provides for most of the jokes to actually be funny.  While Arnold 
has done the hokey-comedy ("Twins") and the only-occasionally-funny 
("Last Action Hero"), here he gets to do great comedy which is perfectly 
mixed with great action.
Arnold, in fact, has rarely been better.  Yes, at first he seems miscast 
as the husband who has the boring job.  I mean, look at him - he's built 
more than Conan on steroids and talks with an ominous and sometimes 
unintelligable Austrian accent (that's Austrian, not...oh nevermind).  
But he has a great knack for comedy, seeming to almost parody himself in 
his action flicks.  And he has a great sidekick, the surprisingly 
awesome Tom Arnold, who wouldn't be his sidekick if this was "Eraser."
And somehow James Cameron pulls this all off.  He's always been a great 
director, seeming to stretch the action limits in all kinds of 
directions.  And everything looks great and not just like some cool 
special effects.  This is much more satisfying than any of Arnold's 
other action flicks, with exception to the "Terminator" flicks (also 
directed by Cameron).  What results is a cleverly written, beautifully 
executed action/comedy which is adrenalin pumping AND hysterical.  No 
wonder this was one of the most entertaining films of 1994.  I highly, 
highly, highly reccomend this incredible action pic to anyone who's 
tired of the same boring "Eraser"-esque action flick.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Purple Rose of Cairo, The (1985)
Writer/Director: Woody Allen
Starring: Mia Farrow, Jeff Daniels, Danny Aiello, Irving Metzman,
Stephanie Farrow, Edward Herrman, John Wood, Deborah Rush, Van Johnson,
Zoe Caldwell, Eugene J. Anthony, Ebb Miller, Karen Akers, Annie Joe
Edwards, Milo O'Shea, Peter McRobbie, Alexander H. Cohen, Michael
Tucker, Glenne Hedley, Diane Wiest
I was once engaed in a lunch-time argument back in high school over the
need for films.  My one friend deemed that they're not necessary at all,
and that taking them away would cause no real drift in the morale of the
nation.  I disagreed vehemently: films are, above all, entertainment,
and can enlighten people's lives, open their eyes, and cheer up the
morale of the nation.  And that's what Woody Allen's "Purple Rose of
Cairo" is all about: films are necessary not only as an art form, but as
a way to change lives.
The plot of the film, though, sounds gimmicky (and also very reminiscent
of "The Last Action Hero"): a character from the movies comes down from
the screen to be in real life with a woman whom he wants to meet.  But
that's what's cool about Woody Allen: he takes these kinds of ideas, and
goes off on philosophical rants with them, but never loses sight of the
plot or makes them too preachy.  This is exactly how the film is played
out, and is in retrospect a classic of cinema.
"The Purple Rose of Cairo" is the name of the movie in the film which
our protagonist, the weak Cecilia (Mia Farrow), goes to see to escape
from the unhappiness of her life.  It's the Great Depression, and she
has a horrible waitress job which she's no good at, a louse for a
husband (Danny Aiello - who else could have played this role?) who takes
her pay to gamble and drink, and is just generally miserable.  Every
week, the local Jersey theatre plays a new Hollywood film, and she goes
every week, sometimes numerous times.
In the week of the film, the eponomys film is playing, and Cecilia shows
up.  It's some really hokey yet escapist film dealing with aristocrats
who journey to Egypt and meet a happy-go-lucky explorer named Tom Baxter
(Jeff Daniels), and take them home with them for a "madcap Manhattan
weekend."  After numerous airings of it, and after some more life
complications, Tom begins stumbling over his lines, and looks out into
the audience and begins talking to Cecilia, who's the most startled in
the theatre.  He walks down off the screen, takes her out of the
theatre, and declares he'll never go back.
The rest of the film deals with her relationship with him, and how they
fall in love like in a Hollywood film, but with the major setbacks of
reality.  But while they're dancing and talking around town, the
characters in the movie are stuck on screen since they can't turn the
projector off or Tom will be stuck in the real world forever.  Soon,
Hollywood is notified, and the producers, and the actor who plays Tom in
the movie, Gil Shepard (also Jeff Daniels - duh!), fly out to Jersey to
stop him.
As the movie goes on, more and more complications emerge.  Cecilia's
husband learns of her new romance, and begins making brutal attempts to
reclaim his prize from the fictional Tom.  And Gil stumbles into Cecilia
by accident, and soon, he's falling in love with her, making her chose
between the fictitious Tom, and the real Gil, a rising star.  She
exclaims at one point: "Yesterday, no one loved me; now two people love
me!"
What's magical about "The Purple Rose of Cairo" is how balanced it is in
every way.  Woody deftly creates multilpe themes and thoughts on film
and its relation to reality without ever harming the story, but also
makes the two work hand-in-hand.  By having a reason for Tom to walk off
the screen, he creates a fantastically leveled fable on life, and how
film can truly affect it.
Woody's also very responsible about it.  If taken out of hand, film can
cause people to blur reality with the fictitious, which is made notable
through Cecilia's relationships with Tom and Gil.  Through this
conflict, Woody shows that people often want to be just like the people
in the movie, while at the same time, the characters in the movie want
to be people in reality.
People often rate Woody's films as how funny they are.  "The Purple Rose
of Cairo" is no exception, with lots of hysterical jokes here and there,
and brilliantly funny scenes.  There are plenty of fish-out-of-water
jokes, but they never feel forced, and in fact, seem quite inspired,
even by today's standards.  And any of the scenes involving the
characters stuck on the screen, bickering and trying to pass the days
away are funny as hell.  But all of this has a kind of deeper warmth to
it, allowing some drama to flow effortlessly through the narrative, but
never seem like melodrama.
The acting's also excellent, especially by Farrow, who gives what is
probably her best performance in a Woody Allen film.  She posesses true
likability, and plays her character as weak yet somehow optimistic when
watching a movie.  There's a shot where she's going to see the movie for
the first time where she looks so ecstatic that she looks like she's
going to burst.  Jeff Daniels has a lot of energy in his roles, giving
one of his best performances (special note: the split-screen effect
looks flawless).  Danny Aiello adds some human qualities to his role as
a no-good husband.  And we even get some cameos from Milo O'Shea
(remember Durand Durand from "Barbarella?") as a priest in the movie,
and Diane Wiest as (get this) a hooker (showing that Woody sure has a
knack for writing hooker roles).
The final shot is one of the great Woody Allen moments: a shot of Mia
gazing upon the movie screen where Fred Aistaire is singing "I'm in
Heaven," and gradually, a small smile grows on Cecilia's face.  For this
moment, no matter what the trouble is in the world, she's in heaven like
the characters in the movie.  This is the power of movies: to cause
people to relax and escape from the horrors of reality, if only for a
short time.  This film is a masterpiece.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
Director: Neil Jordan
Writers: Neil Jordan and Patrick McCabe (based on the novel by McCabe)
Starring: Eamonn Owens, Stephen Rea, Fiona Shaw, Alan Boyle, Aisling
O'Sullivan, Andrew Fullerton, Sinéad O'Connor, Patrick McCabe, Ian Hart,
Ardal O'Hanlon, Milo O'Shea
Neil Jordan's "The Butcher Boy" is the tale of a young lad from a small
town in Ireland during the early 60s who has a very traumatic childhood
where every single thing that probably could go wrong goes wrong, and he
begins to take it out on society.  For Jordan, it's a return to some of his
more Irish roots after hitting big with "The Crying Game" and experimenting
with Hollywood with "Interview with the Vampire" and "Michael Collins"; for
us, it means a return or introduction to elements from other films that
have come before and have actually fared better.
First off, "The Butcher Boy" is a very odd, eccentric film, and watching
it, I could see how in about 20 years, this film will have a avid cult
following.  It has a wildness to it that will be appreciated by those who
enjoy surreal and interesting ways in which films are presented, and will
probably even be dubbed "brilliant" by a couple groups.  However, "The
Butcher Boy" is not the amazing film it really sets itself out to be,
probably because it's: a) unoriginal, and b) doesn't really dive into its
topic the way it should.
The film's focus is on childhood and the ways that what we experience when
we are children has a mighty affect on us for the rest of our lives.  The
focus is on Francie Brady (Eamonn Owens, in a stunning debut), who's the
bottom of the lot: he's a bully, he comes from a bad home, and he's just
generally a jerk.  His dad (Stephen Rea, who's been in most of Jordan's
flicks) is "the town's best drinker," and his mom (Aisling O'Sullivan) is
about four flews over the cuckoo's nest.  In fact, one day, Francie comes
home to find her trying to tie a noose and hang herself.
But Francie is able to escape this trauma with his one friend, Joe (Alan
Boyle), who plays games and steals stuff with him.  We see that the only
way he can escape is through this, and also by watching old action shows on
TV like "The Lone Ranger" and reading comic books.  He also picks on a
young peer of his, Philip Nugent (Andrew Fullerton), and steals his comic
books and whatnot because, hey, the boy is a wimp.  I mean, the boy takes
piano lessons, for christ's sake!
It's Philip's mother, referred to as simply "Mrs. Nugent" (Fiona Shaw) who
becomes the object of Francie's hatred.  To him, she's everything that's
wrong with the world: she's a snob, speaks with a delicate British accent,
and seems to delight in torturing him by making him feel bad because of who
he is.  She's the scapegoat for all his problems, and it's only appropriate
because the 60s, as well as the 40s and 50s, were when scapgoating was like
a worldwide fad.
The entire film is told from the perspective of Francie as a middle-aged
man (played by Stephen Rea again, but with some red hair dye so you don't
get confused), who tells it with a nostalgic distancing that allows him to
stay above it, but still get involved with the storyline because he still
understands what he was thinking at the time.  We get the feeling that
though he's still an adult and it's been rougly 30 to 40 years since the
events occurred that he's still the same kind of person, just a little
wiser and with a couple more wrinkles.  But he's still Francie Brady.
Jordan takes these ideas and actually runs with it for awhile, and then
begins to meander around a lot.  Francie's behavior winds him in a juvenile
delinquint home, where he's preyed on by a hilariously perverted pedophile
priest (played by Durand-Durand himself, Milo O'Shea), and then is zipped
around in the storyline before he's brought back for la grande finale,
which brings it right back to its focus.  Episodic storylines work if the
episodes build on one another, but this one actually becomes redundant for
an hour chunk of itself, and then for the last half hour, builds on this.
It would also help if this film was even more original.  The film blatantly
lifts from several films, most notably two great cult favorites: Truffaut's
"The 400 Blows" and Kubrick's "A Clockwork Orange."  From "The 400 Blows,"
it lifts the whole idea of a bully-like boy protagonist, as well as the
somewhat incompetent parents (I'll say).  From "A Clockwork Orange"...well,
the narration which brings the audience in and makes it more of a story
instead of distancing us from it, and, well, the basic premise of getting
back at a society which is pretty inadequate which dealing with criminals
and basically everyone else.  Not only this, but the film uses these like
they were original concepts, trying to be as great as them.  Sorry, Neil:
ain't gonna happen.
But now for some positive remarks: Jordan is very competent in creating the
feel of the 60s in Ireland, and pretty much everywhere else.  We see lots
of talk about nuclear holocaust, and it actually seems like the world could
end any minute.  And he is able to create a very great feeling of being a
kid in this time period, including some really nifty surreal montages using
kid's point of view, and even digging deep into and exposing the way that
kids are taught about violence and hatred through some of the material they
are presented, like comic books.
The film is also interestingly directed by Jordan, who does lots more with
the weird camera movements and whatnot that make this technically great. 
He also gets a lot out of the music by Eliot Goldenthal, who does some cool
work along with placing some interesting tunes on the soundtrack, including
a couple Kurt Weill songs, and even some groovy arrangements of classics
and standards (I loved the modern-day version of Tchaikovsky's "March" from
his Nutcracker Suite).  Even if it's not as great as the films it rips off,
it's gonna be a cult classic nevertheless.
This is where the film works, and since this is what it was aiming for, we
get an understanding that Jordan was not just trying to tell a cool story
so that he can make a cult film, but is able to show that what occurs in
childhood and adolescence really does affect who you are as an adult.  In
some parts of the film, we see Francie talking to a vision of the Madonna
(played by none other than Sinéad O'Connor, avec hair), who comforts him in
some of his more traumatic episodes of his life.  And then when he's older
and out, we see him talking to her again.  There are parts of childhood we
never really get over, and it doesn't matter if we're the town bully or
not; we'll always be the same person.  And by the end we understand not
only this, but why kids often become these so-called "horrible" people.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Forrest Gump (1994)
Director: Robert Zemeckis
Writer: Eric Roth (based on the book by Winston Groom)
Starring: Tom Hanks, Robin Wright, Gary Sinise, Mykelti Williamson, 
Sally Field
I don't know about you, but I cringe when I hear about the "Feel Good 
Movie of the Year."  Sounds like it plays it safe and tries to do too 
much, but does guarantee a couple scenes that are so "touching," they'll 
make you recreate that scene from "Stand by Me."  But my big question is 
what in the goddam hell is Robert Zemeckis doing the "Feel Good Move of 
the Year."  But I guess doing creative black comedies just doesn't cut 
it in this business; you have to go do "Feel Good" movies to get 
superficial recognition.  Also, he put himself around the top of the 
cult film-lovers death wish by butting one of the greatest films of all 
time ("Pulp Fiction") from winning the Best Picture Oscar...AND stealing 
the direction oscar from Quentin Tarantino.  Ironically, this is 
probably at the bottom of his oeuvre.
"Forrest Gump" steals its idea from a Woody Allen film (a crime in the 
usual state, just look at "Last Action Hero" which stole from "Purple 
Rose of Cairo").  This one steals from "Zelig," a brilliant film about 
non-conformity which played as a perfect documentary with more laughs 
than a Chris Farley movie (a good amount for a pseudo-documentary).  It 
tells the story of a simple man, a man with a low IQ who goes through 
life screwing with everyone involuntarily: he tells Kennedy he has to 
piss; he accidentally discovers the whole Watergate thing; he gets us 
back in the Ping Pong competition in China; etc, etc, etc.  These things 
are funny.  But in between meetings with Dick Cavet, we have to put up 
with hokey melodrama, like his relationship with the paper-thing female 
character of Jenny (Robin Wright), who's name is annoyingly uttered each 
time.  If they had maybe made her more of a person OR only spent a bit 
of time with her a la Mia Farrow in "Zelig," she might have worked.  But 
she's just there to get AIDs and take off her bra for Forrest.
The thing that saves it, other than the acting, is the comic timing by 
Robert Zemeckis.  His comedy is so funny that it saves the film.  He 
goes for surreal comedy, subtle comedy, sight gags, intellectual jokes, 
etc.  But his drama is artificial and disgustingly hokey.  The film's 
laughs come easily, but he tries to shove the sentimentalism in our 
faces with a goddam plunger.  But, people love this.  The regular 
filmgoing population is not used to actually feeling something that's 
actually real.  If you wanna see a funny film that's touching in the 
real way, see the similar "Sling Blade," similar because it deals with 
simple protagonists.
Tom Hanks does a great job with his part but it's nothing I would give 
him an award for.  He was so passionate in "Philadelphia" and totally 
deserved the Oscar for that.  But this one's just for popular opinion.  
And so they can compare him to Spencer Tracey.  I would have given it to 
Travolta or Hawthorne or Freeman before Hanks.  Sinise is great as the 
resident cynic who (sniff) finds love from Forrest and gets over the 
fact that he's missing two appendages due to a war.  
The worst thing is the film goes for brilliance when it really isn't.  
It's good for some laughs here and there, but the laughs are only worth 
it if you have a working remote control in your hands with your thumb on 
the fast forward button so when "JENNY" comes on screen, you can 
fast-forward (not that Robin Wright is bad, but her character's an omen 
to whip out those Hefty-brand jumbo-size barfbags).  So is this a 
comedy?  A drama?  An allegory?  Kinda like a mix of the first two, but 
none of the latter.  What would the mesage be?  If you're stupid, you 
have a better life?  Better drop out of school.
It's not a horrible film, but it's highly overrated.  And why it grossed 
so much, I don't know.  It's "Feel Good" for about 10 minutes.  Funny 
most of the time, even if there aren't any intentional jokes in there.  
I used to like it, but I guess I matured or immatured, I dunno.  It's 
funny, but not great.

Title
Review for Carlito's Way (1993)
Director: Brian De Palma
Writer: David Koepp (based on the novels "Carlito's Way" and "After
Hours" by Edwin Torres)
Starring: Al Pacino, Sean Penn, Penelope Ann Miller, John Leguiziamo,
Luis Guzman, John Rebhorn, Viggio Mortensen, Jorge Porcel
What's shocking about "Carlito's Way" is how good it is.  Having gotten
a bit of a bad rap for not being a big box office hit like Pacino's
previous film, "Scent of a Woman," and not having as strong a
performance as he did in that one (he had just won an Oscar), "Carlito's
Way" was destined for underrated heaven.  That's what it is: an
underrated gem of a movie.  And what a shame because Pacino and De Palma
both do amazing jobs with it, and turn it into a great piece of a pulpy
character study.
"Carlito's Way" deals with, well, Carlito Brigante (Pacino), a Puerto
Rican ex-drug kingpin, who gets out of a long jailterm when his
coke-addicted, curly-haired lawyer (Sean Penn) points out a legal
technicality.  Of course, Carlito was actually awoken in prison, and has
decided to go straight, even if he's really a crook at heart.  Carlito,
like Barry Lyndon, is a man who is trapped by fate at every turn, and
can't escape into something he is not.
Carlito's attempts at a clean, legal life are thwarted at nearly every
turn.  When he first gets out, a friend of his ends up leading him into
a big shoot-out, where he has to kill a couple people to survive.  He's
constantly getting bugged by the government to see if he's doing
anything illegal, and his lawyer finds himself neck-deep in a pile of
shit, needing him to try and help him out, which includes him doing some
prison breaking.
Carlito, like Ratso Rizzo, wants to go to Miami (since, according to
film logic, that's where it's at), but needs some funding.  Being a
legend, he is quickly able to get a nice job running a big dance club
(this is the 70s, by the way, and since some of this takes place in
night clubs, we get to hear all sorts of 70s classics, including several
K.C. and the Sunshine Band tunes - my personal favorite).  He gets a
bodyguard (the great Luis Guzman, at his best), and is soon running a
pretty good business, even if he's constantly attracting underworld
young thugs, like Benny Blanco "from the Bronx" (John Leguiziamo), who
is more than once pointed out to be a young version of Carlito.
On the other side, the symbol of promise and hope, is Gail (Penelope Ann
Miller - what happened to her?), his girlfriend from before prison. 
She's a goregeous ballerina, and a stripper, and soon Carlito is trying
to get back with her, and take her with him when he finally leaves for
Miami.  While this relationship is never fully defined or anything, we
get a sense of love between them, and they have some truly interesting
scenes between them (she never gives him addresses or locales - he
always has to track her down).
All of these elements clash together at the end, in a brilliantly
executed, emotional climax, which is inevitable.  When I say inevitable,
I mean we see it at the beginning and then backtrack, putting a great
spin on it.  Sure, it's going to eleveate some of the tension, but it
gives the film a lot of depth, as Carlito is seen trapped by fate. 
What's amazing is the big chase sequence (amazingly done by De Palma)
has a lot of tension and thrills.  Like "Apollo 13," we know what's
going to happen, but we're still thrilled by what happens in the
middle.  It's also very emotional, thanks to a great script by David
Koepp, and amazing performances by Pacino and Miller.
De Palma is famous (or infamous) for lots of violence in his films.  His
earlier flim, "Scarface" (which starred Pacino in the lead), has a ton
of it, especially at the end (and a nasty chainsaw scene towards the
beginning which I'm still not over).  But De Palma actually reigns in
more quieter scenes.  To me, the best scene in the film is when Carlito
is on top of a building, looking down into the room where Gail is doing
ballet.  This is the most brilliantly done, and most emotionally
stimulating scene in the entire film, and probably the best in De Palma
film history.  With a gorgeous soprano duet in the background, and rain
pouring down onto a trashcan lid covering Carlito's head, and a
saddened, remorseful look on Pacino's face, it's a tear-jerker (well,
for me, I dunno about you...).
The acting from all is great, especially from the three leads.  Pacino
was panned for his performance, chiefly because his accent wasn't Puerto
Rican enough and, well, it wasn't as "strong" as his Oscar-winning role
in "Scent of a Woman."  Well, his "Scent of a Woman" performance was
great and all, but it was nothing really but, as comic Kevin Pollack
said, a "Foghorn Leghorn impression."  In "Carlito's Way," he's
emotional, and strong, despite the fact that he's remorseful over his
entire lifestyle, which he cannot change.  I felt more for Carlito
Brigante than I did for the tango-dancing, insult-throwing blind guy in
"Scent of a Woman."
As I said, Penelope Ann Miller is great, and she and Pacino actually
have very good chemistry.  And they're scenes are well-written, with
some good clever dialogue which adds some interest to an otherwise bland
relationship.  And Sean Penn is amazing as the coke-addicted rat
attorney.  Every scene he's in, he has great energy, and even measures
up to the greatness that is Pacino.  In smaller roles, John Leguiziamo
and Luis Guzman are great.
"Carlito's Way" is one of those films which you heard about briefly, but
when you finally watch it, you're absolutely blown away.  It's a
wonderful film, a highly underrated little masterpiece which was shelved
after it didn't do so hot.  But trust me and check it out.  It's a great
little film, and proof that the residential critics and mass populus are
not always right.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Spanking the Monkey (1994)
Writer/Director: David O. Russel
Starring: Jeremey Davies, Alberta Watson, Benjamin Hendrickson, 
Now, first off, the title doesn't really do the film a lot of justice. 
It's more of like that joke about writing the word SEX in big capitols,
and then saying in little writing below, "Well, now that I have your
attention..."  This film does deal with the topic of masturbation, but
it also deals with such non-conformist topics like incest, rape (not the
real kind, the legal kind), and insanity.  It's not just one of the
members in a long line of films that are in some way trying to be the
90s answer to "The Graduate" (an impossible task, in my opinion), but
also an ingenius black comedy and intense character study.
Jeremey Davies is an MIT student, coming home for a week or two in the
summer to take care of his bedridden mother (Alberta Watson)who has just
broken her leg.  His father (Benjamin Hendrickson) is a travelling
salesman and can't afford to stay home for a summer and take care of his
wife, especially since they both don't share any kinds of feelings other
than belonging anymore.  So he shocks his son, who was supposed to
attend a summer program dealing with his major, by telling him he'll be
spending the entire summer at home with his mother, who is totally
depressed.
The film starts off funny in that kind of off-beat way.  You giggle at
some of the little things that happen, and laugh out loud at some of the
funnier parts.  But then your jaw begins to drop at some of the weirder
and more outrageous plot twists, like when he has to hold his naked
mother up while she takes a shower, and he begins looking at her...
He also begins a little relationship with a soon-to-be junior in high
school who wants to go to MIT, and watches as they begin to have sexual
feelings for eachother.  But of course, he has his mother to not only
take care of, but there's that bond between the two that cannot be
broken, and that will gradually drive him into a bit of insanity.
What's great about this film is how well the characterization is.  The
bond between the mother and son is a very intense one.  Through talking,
we find out that she wanted to do the same thing he is studying, but she
made a deal with his father to give it up and have him.  So he's the
price she paid for her loneliness and manic depression, and she seems
hell-beant on keeping him, even if it causes him some emotional
depravation.  By the films climax, we are shocked and deeply moved, but
not in that crap sentimental way.
Also great in this film is the great acting from all involved,
especially the two leads.  Davies shows promise as a young actor, while
Watson gives an Oscar worthy performance on par with that of Anne
Bancroft in "The Graduate."  While this may not be as great as "The
Graduate," it's at least as close as we're gonna get to recreating it,
even if it's the more liberal "Graduate."
It's hard for me to reccomend this film.  Afterwards, I felt horrible. 
Of course, that is precisely what David O. Russel had in mind, so I can
say that this is a great example of fine cinematic craftsmanship.  The
film is utterly depressing in every way, in such a way that I would have
to wait a long time to see it again.  Yes, it's funny, but it's such a
miserable-inducing film that I'd only reccomend it to those who are very
mature.  Any horny sophomoric from junior high who wants to view it as a
prerequisite for entering the Beavis and Butthead club should just skip
out and go for that porno with the same name.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335

Title
Review for Husbands and Wives (1992)
Writer/Director: Woody Allen
Starring: Woody Allen, Mia Farrow, Judy Davis, Sydney Pollack, Juliette
Lewis, Liam Neeson
Woody Allen usually mixes a lot of broad humor in his handling of
serious topics.  Even "Crimes and Misdemeanors" had the usual typical
Woody Allen one-liner that he's so famous for.  But "Husbands and Wives"
is straigh-forward bitter.  I mean, it was filmed around the time the
whole Soon-Yi thing came out.  Yet, even while it's not a typical Woody
Allen drama, what he has created here is a kind of black, black, black
comedy.  I mean, this is almost as comically black as "Dr. Strangelove."
"Husbands and Wives" is an ironic tale, told in a pseudo-documentary
feel (with headache-enducing hand camera for realistic shots - but it's
justified in the name of art), centering around two couples: Woody Allen
and Mia Farrow, and Sydney Pollack (the director) and Judy Davis.  The
two are best friends and go everywhere together.  The one particular
night, when Pollack and Davis come to Allen and Farrow's house, they
announce they're splitting up.  Not divorcing, but splitting.  Both
Allen and Farrow are in total shock, but Farrow takes it especially
hard.
While Davis and Pollack have actually split and are carrying on with
their lives, they're both kind of jealous of the other.  In a
brilliantly executed scene, Davis goes to the house of a man she has a
date with, and constantly is leaving to use his phone to call Pollack
who has already met someone and is moving her in and bitch him out as
only Judy Davis can do.  Meanwhile, Pollack is dating an aerobics
instructor half his age (because she makes him feel young again - duh),
and Davis settles down a bit, and begins sort of dating a man Farrow
works with - Liam Neeson, who likes Davis a lot, but she's too testy and
argumentative to let him really near her.
On the other side, Allen and Farrow are slowly drifting apart.  Allen,
who teaches English at a local college, begins to hang around with one
of his more intelligent students (Juliette Lewis, in a bit of bold
casting, seeing how many times she's done the ditz role), who has had
relationships with older men before (many many older men, as she
hilariously tells Allen).  She's very cerebral and free-spirited, which
turns Allen on, because Farrow's so tight.  And then there's Farrow who
begins wishing she didn't let Davis have Neeson.
The film ends on a kind of depressing, half up/half down note, but armed
with a lot of cynicism towards the prospect of marriage, and also on a
quite ironic note.  It's satisfying, realistic, yet still a big downer. 
It basically elongates the little aphorism Woody used in his
masterpiece, "Annie Hall:" love fades.  The people in this film are in a
"blessed union" where, if drawn out, the two people joined are stuck
together until whomever dies first.  And thanks to the contemporary
prospects such as "trial seperation" and the ever-popular "divorce,"
people don't have to waste their lives with someone who they don't love
anymore.  Allen and Farrow's characters don't love eachother anymore,
it's more like a comfortable fit.  But the four characters in this film
all get to go around and try on some other people, and compare.  The
result is pretty much depressing, yet totally realistic.
As far as the Allen/Lewis thing as well as the Pollack/aerobics teacher
thing, they are both handled with the utmost sense of maturity.  This is
really one of his most mature films.  Bitter, yet grown-up.  Anyway, the
Allen/Lewis thing only results in one single kiss, while the
Pollack/aerobics teacher thing results in refreshment at first, then a
big disaster.  "Husbands and Wives" explores the whole threat of
mid-life crisis, as well as if a marriage is worth wading out for "death
do us part."
The script by Woody Allen is fantastic, featuring only a couple great
typical one-liners that are the writer/director's trademark.  He
intertwines the stories in the great use of the pseudo-documentary,
which is handled more like a personal documentary instead of one like
"Zelig."  And he creates well-defined characters who have a lot of great
dialogue to speak.  And although the handheld bit gets annoying, it
works for the film, showing that there's always some way to better a
technique that doesn't really work most of the time.  And Woody nicely
balances all four characters' stories, evening it all out.
And the acting is amazing.  We not only get gripping performances from
Woody Allen, Mia Farrow (who you have to respect for the sole reason
that she did the film even after discovering those nasty photos), and
Sydney Pollack, but we also get a fantastic peformance from Juliette
Lewis, a wonderful, almost cameo-bit of acting by Liam Neeson, and an
Oscar-worthy performance by Judy Davis (who was nominated for an Oscar
for it).  None of them are truly scene-stealers (except Davis when she's
with someone I didn't mention), and it works because they all seem human
and all mesh well together.  This is not only one of the best directed
and scripted films, but also one of the best acted.
This is one of Woody's best films, but it's also extremely bitter.  It
doesn't overcome the meaning though, which is attributed to Woody's
tight direction and writing.  And, yes, I laughed a lot in the film,
mainly due to some of the pure human-ness of it all.  But anyway, this
is just one amazing film, and I highly, highly reccomend it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Great Expectations (1998)
Director: Alfonso Cuarón
Writer: Mitch Glazer
Starring: Ethan Hawke, Gwyneth Paltrow, Anne Bancroft, Robert DeNiro, Chris
Cooper, Hank Azaria, Josh Mostel, Kim Dickens, Jeremy James Kissner, Raquel
Beaudene
My rule of viewing a film adaptation of a classic novel is this: grade it
as a film, and any changes it makes to the novel either work or don't work
on how they relate to the film.  For instance, the 1984 film adaptation of
Orwell's "1984" is good not because it's very much like the novel, but
because it brings the themes and general misery along with it.  And
Kubrick's adaptation of Stephen King's "The Shining" is great because it's
great, and not bad because it doesn't adhere by the book (it's basically
"Kubrick's 'The Shining'").
"Great Expectations," based on the novel by Charles Dickens apparently has
very little to do with the novel.  I used "apparently" because I read the
book when I was a high school freshman (didn't we all?), and my
recollection of it consists of this: there was a guy named Pip, a girl
named Estella, a woman named Miss Havisham, and a criminal named Magwich. 
That's it.  It's also another in the line of the modern-day retelling
films, like '96's "Romeo + Juliet," which I actually liked (yeah, stone
me).  I felt that "Romeo + Juliet" brought out all the themes in the
original play (well, most of 'em anyway), and was indeed tragic without
becoming melodramatic (much like the play).  Basically all "Great
Expectations" has to do is be good on its own, and maybe even hit upon some
nerves not usually uncovered in the novel.
But somewhere something went wrong.  Somewhere the cool modern-day style by
director Alfonso Cuarón (who did the greatly-received but little-seen "A
Little Princess") and the modern-day retelling part didn't work together. 
The film got too much into telling the love story part of the story, which,
as I recall, is not the only thing that happened in the book.  I don't
remember many of the themes that abounded throughout, but I do remember
that it was not a melodramatic, annoying love story.  The two in the story
came together at the end, I believe, because of some deeper notions, not
because it just had to.  Somehow, everything meant a little more in the
novel.
Anyway, the story revolves around a guy named Finn (Ethan Hawke when he's
older), instead of Pip (Why?  Is Finn more "modern" than Pip?), who lives
in Florida with his uncle Joe (Chris Cooper), and one day goes over to the
decaying, weed-ridden mansion of a crazy millionairess, Ms. Dinsmoor (Anne
Bancroft, acting like Mrs. Robinson gone crazy after 30 years), instead of
Miss Havisham.  While there, he runs into a little snobbish girl, Ms.
Dinsmoor's niece, Estella (Gwyneth Paltrow when she's older), and soon
Dinsmoor has hired Finn to come play with her every week for almost a
decade, even though the two are distanced a bit.  But there's always some
sexual chemistry between the two.
Soon Finn has fallen hard for Estella, and after a little bit of, um,
fooling around, Estella coldly shuns him and ends up moving to Paris,
sending Finn into a pit of depression.  But after years of not seeing her,
he moves to New York to pursue a career in painting, as he was quite the
painter as a child.  Finn soon finds himself in the pit of the 90s art
world, and because of a mysterious benefactor, has become huge all of a
sudden, given a gallery and everything.  And, of course, Estella's in New
York too, and, of course, she's engaged to an aristocrat (Hank Azaria).
But the sexual chemistry between the two is still there, and the two do
fool around a bit, and in one scene, Estella comes over to pose for
him...in the buff.  But she keeps taunting him, then breaking his heart by
shunning him out of the blue.  After sleeping with him in one scene, he
finds out she has gotten married in the next.  Are these two really in love
but their pasts keep interfering?  Was she conditioned by Ms. Dinsmoor to
shun Finn just like her fiance 30 years did by standing her up at her
wedding, thus driving her into a drunken state of insane depression?  Is
Estella trapped by all this, conflicted over her love for Finn and the fact
that she feels she must  continually diss him?
All of this is taken into account, but none of it is ever really rectified.
 It's all show in sequences where there's confessions, like in one scene
where Finn asks Estella "What's it like to not ever feel anything?" and she
gives a long speech about how someone who's been brought up like that can
never turn against it - like she's trapped or something.  But the film
never really explores it any deeper than having characters step out of
themselves to explain themes in a condescending way.  The narration by Finn
is way over-written: it states each of the problems and theories without
ever letting the viewer come up with them on their own, thus cancelling
them out.  Although it could be argued that due to the surreal nature of
the film, many people would be lost, it just makes for a melodramatic film.
 And special scenes, like one where Finn gives a confessional to who he
thinks is Estella in the rain (for sheer camp value, I just wanted him to
rip off his shirt, get down on his knees, and scream at the top of his
lungs "ESTELLA!!!") ends in a cheap twist that's supposed to heartbreaking,
but for some reason seems crap.
But at the same time, there are some redeeming qualities.  The best thing
about this, to me anyway, is the style and direction by Cuarón, who gives
the film a cool surreal feel.  The cinematography in this film is
outstanding, as are the set designs, especially the awe-inspiring
presentation of the Dinsmoor mansion, which is covered in vines and weeds. 
Cuarón works well with his camera, pulling off some truly nifty camera
tricks, such as some impressive steadicam work, and mastering the fading
(the nude posing scene is even more impressive in that you never see
Paltrow naked - it always fades her naughty bits out).  And there are some
truly cinematic moments, most notably a scene (or actually scenes) where
Dinsmoor dances wildly to "Besame Mucho."
But the surrealism doesn't work well with the film, which focuses way too
much on the love story.  "Great Expectations" is not one of the great love
stories; it was more of a coming-of-age tale, and getting over the past. 
Sure, it points out at the end that the past is just the past, and that
memories are things we must get over, but it never seems to really get to
that point.  It gets there because it has to; not because it actually got
there by way of storytelling.  By singling in on this section of the story,
it alienates itself from the other subplots, such as Finn's relationships
with Dinsmoor, Joe, and most notably, with the criminal Lustig (Robert
DeNiro), instead of Magwich, who he helps escape in the beginning, and who
comes back later in the story.  Of all the parts of the film, this is the
one that feels the most edited.  When tragedy strikes these two, we're not
sure what to think because it hasn't even been backed up so well, which
also affects a twist which seems cheap and unsurprising (it was the
opposite in the novel...I think).
And poor Ethan...he's saddled with the tough job of playing the boring
protagonist while all around him are interesting characters.  He does a
good job, especially in a scene where he confesses to another character
that his heart is truly broken, even if it is for revenge (even I almost
shed a tear).  Hawke is one of the finest of the Gen-X actors; he's better
than this.  Paltrow exhibits great seduction with her character, but shows
some human elements broadening her character (alas this is really not
resolved).  Bancroft and DeNiro are priceless in their respective
underwritten roles, while Cooper and Azaria are also very good in even more
underwritten roles (who else can stutter as well as Azaria?).
The result is a disappointing film which is neither romantic nor poignant,
but instead feels like Cliffs Notes on acid.  The problem is not that it
doesn't follow the book (which it doesn't), but that it instead tries to
tell a melodramatic story about people we barely care about if they weren't
being portrayed by such cool actors.  The writing of the film tries to
downtalk to its core audience, who may eat it up, but will eventually spit
it out like it should be, but line up for the next cute film just like this
(maybe an adaptation of "Tale of Two Cities" starring Leo DiCaprio and
Sandra Bullock...).
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Cousin Bette (1998)
Director: Des McAnuff
Writers: Lynn Siefert and Susan Tarr (based on the novel by Honoré de
Balzac)
Starring: Jessica Lange, Elisabeth Shue, Kelly MacDonald, Aden Young, Hugh
Laurie, Bob Hoskins, Toby Stephens, Geraldine Chaplin
"Cousin Bette" presents us with a nasty yet lovable revenge plan that we
follow from Square One, yet the best thing about this film is that the one
doing the revenge is probably the least evil of everyone else in this
movie.  Perhaps it's because she, unlike everyone else, isn't obsessed with
greed or sex.
Balsac's novel, like many of his works, is a scathing little portrait of
the society of his time, where everyone's motivation was the aquisition of
money and the greatness of a man was measured in how rich he was.  When one
man slips into a pit of depression, it's because he's damn near flat broke
and his reputation in society is at an end.  The movie, like the book,
questions our choice of whom to like: the woman who's trying to destroy
everyone else, or everyone else who are all a bunch of greedy gits?
The aforementioned woman is the eponomysly titled character, played by
Jessica Lange with her hair dyed black and always in a bun above her head,
giving her the appropriate feel of bitterness and loneliness.  The cousin
of a rich family, she tends to the deathbed of her cousin, Adeline Hulot
(everybody's favorite living Chaplin, Geraldine), and even though she has
basically raised the children as her own and kissed enough ass through her
days, she discovers that her cousin's death doesn't mean the
sorta-promotion into wealth that she feels she deserved, but rather a new
job title as "nanny."
Bette is pissed off not so much at the loss of money, but more at the lack
of love and adoration she deserves.  She decides to hatch a revenge scheme,
moving everyone she meets like a pawn in her plan.  She first meets up with
a piss-poor sculpturer who lives below her, Count Wenceslas Steinbach (Aden
Young), who just happens to be the type for her cousin's young daughter,
Hortense (Kelly MacDonald, Diane from "Trainspotting," only now British and
a tad older).  Meanwhile, she also manages to enlist the help of one Jenny
Cadine (Elisabeth Shue), a sultry actress of sorts at the local burlesque
house where Bette works, and also the mistress of many a man in Paris,
namely Bette's cousin's widower, Hector (the great Hugh Laurie).
Much of what Bette does is improvisational, and it's a treat watching her
slowly, over the course of almost a year (or so) destroy the very people
who have almost destroyed her (even Hortense, who's still an innocent
victim), but that's not the real point of the film.  Bette is a horrible
person, and by the final shot, it has obtained a kind of scariness that is
simply unsettling.  But it's not so much about the revenge plan that makes
this film interesting, as it is watching all the pawns in her plan meander
around in search of happiness in wealth and sex.  We see Wenceslas turn
from a greedy sculpturer into a pathetic sloth, whose speeches about how
great his work will be are ten fold more intriguing than the final project
(isn't that what it's always like with artists?).  And we see Jenny turn
from skank to hopeful happy person back into skank again, all because she
can't live without two things: money and people who adore her and give her
money.
Directed by Tony Award-Winning Broadway director Des McAnuff, this film is
a lavish period piece, with wonderful costumes, a wonderfully classical
score, and some great period detail (though, sadly, nary a French accent in
the entire film).  But unlike the films that belong in the Merchant-Ivory
category of period pieces ("Howards End," "The Remains of the Day," blah
blah blah), it has a more light, comical feel to it.  Everything from the
casting (Bob Hoskins and Hugh Laurie playing off eachother - classic) to
the bright cinematography (not to mention the sex and nudity - Shue bares
her behind four - count 'em - four times) gives it a distinct feel that
separates it from the other so-called "period pieces."
That's probably because Balsac is so much different from, say, Henry James
or Jane Austen.  Though all are satirists in their own respects (see "Sense
and Sensibility" for some good, fun satire), he was much more bleak and
comical.  The film seems to love mocking the aristocrats because they could
only live with money and spoke as if they actually knew what they were
talking about.  While this does become a tad arduous at times to watch
(especially in the more dramatic moments, which sometimes makes the film a
tad, well, moody), it nevertheless actually carries on into the 90s, and
makes this fairly accessible to modern-day audiences since these kinds of
people still, in fact, exist.
I enjoyed this film, as I do most clever social satires, but what I liked
most is that it chose a very good protagonist.  Bette is a terrible person,
but she's the best protagonist you could come up with, at least in this
film because she's bitter, not greedy.  And she's likable for the sole
reason that out of all the characters in this film, she's the least shallow
and sadly the best person.  Disturbing.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
Director: Frank Oz
Writer: Paul Rudnick
Starring: Kevin Kline, Joan Cusack, Tom Selleck, Matt Dillon, Debbie
Reynolds, Wilford Brimley, Bob Newhart, Gregory Jbara, Shalom Harlow, Dan
Hedaya, Glenn Close, Aaron Eckherdt, Marilyn Ghigliotti, Whoopi Goldberg,
Jay Leno
You've all seen the previews: a suburban Indiana English teacher, Howard
Brackett (Kevin Kline), watches the Oscars with his fiancee to see one of
his old students get a Golden Boy for Best Actor, only to "out" him.  Back
in 1993, something like this almost happened when Tom Hanks won an Oscar
for his portrayal of a gay lawyer with AIDS and thanked his gay teacher
from High School.  Of course, he WAS "out" anyway, but this is a movie.
As the film goes on, the now totally insecure Howard, with his bow-tie,
perfect wardrobe, and love for Barbra Streisand and Ethel Merman, becomes
the big tabloid target of the moment.  He's especially hounded by one
reporter, played by Tom Selleck (sans moustache), who turns out to also be
gay, and is out to bring Howard out of the closet.  But Howard, who really
is gay as it turns out, is trying desperately to convince himself of that,
most notably in scenes involving a bachelor party gone to the Twilight
Zone, and an absolutely hysterical scene where he tries to become a man by
listening to "Increase Your Masculinity" tapes, which include a bit about
listening to Disco music and trying not to dance.  Of course, when I saw
this film, I stood up and danced along with Howard.  I guess I'm gay or
something.
The second half of the film, following a great twist I didn't think a film
like this would take, allows some of the supporting characters to blossom,
including Howard's fiancee, Emily (Joan Cusack), who goes completely beserk
(and won an Oscar Nomination for it); his two parents (the perfectly casted
Debbie Reynolds and Wilford Brimley), who, um, try to understand; and the
old student, a bottle-blond stud named Cameron (Matt Dillon), who's dating
a thin model (Shalom Harlow), and is trying to make ammends for what he has
done.
The ending, a hilarious spoof on the films of Frank Capra, is further proof
of how funny this film can be, walking right on the edge between parody and
preachiness.  Some may say it's not funny or too message-y, but it's the
kind of old time audience rousing experiment that has a serious message but
never feels forced.
I'm actually surprised this kind of film would be made and distributed as a
light-hearted comedy.  It's the best thing to do with it, and you'd figure
that a major Hollywood distributor would axe the idea before it could even
be written.  It's a film that pokes fun at the whole idea that someone
being gay is actually an issue.  It's a film that jokes around with the
whole concept of "homophobia."  And yes, it's a riot.
It does this by being completely politically incorrect and taking
visciously hysterical stabs at everything homophobic.  One of the funnier
moments is one where the just somewhat neurotic High School principle (a
classic Bob Newhart) tries to say "homosexual" and gets there before he
says it.  Or another sequence where a group of jocks sit in the locker room
and try to make some kind of sense out of homophobia ("It's against, like,
nature...and indoor plumbing").  Screenwriter Paul Rudnick, a openly gay
man who also writes a hysterical column in Premiere Magaizine every month
under the psuedonym Libby Gellman-Waxner, has so much fun making fun of
everything that it's hard not to laugh.  His Oscar ceremony, featuring such
Best Actor Oscar nominations as Paul Newman for "Coot" and Steven Seagal
for "Snowball in Hell," is one of the many big hoots of the film.  In
short, Rudnick's script is a gem.
However, it doesn't try and be nasty against heterosexuals in anyway.  Paul
Rudnick takes a strictly lassez-faire approach to the homosexuality
controversy in America - it's as if he's looking at homosexuality and just
saying "Who the FUCK cares?"  And by presenting it as a light-hearted
comedy (I mean, Frank Oz directs - the man is incapable of melodrama), he
gives it a fun air, something that anyone, and I mean anyone, can enjoy.
"In & Out" is absolutely, definitely one of the funniest, most hysterical
films I've seen in a long while, at least the funniest to ever actually say
something about Americana.  I'd say it's the cinematic equivalent of that
great episode of "The Simpsons" where Homer finds out that a good friend of
his is in fact "ho-mo-sexual."  Like that show, it makes fun of all kinds
of stereotypes in life, and comes out as being completely hilarious and
never preachy.  And I almost literally laughed my ass off.  That has to
mean something.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
Director: David Nutter
Writer: Scott Rosenberg
Starring: Jimmy Marsden, Katie Holmes, Nick Stahl, Bruce Greenwood, William
Sadler, Steve Railsback, Chad Donella, Katherine Isabelle, Ethan Embry
I'm not sure who the genius is who came up with the idea of comparing
"Disturbing Behavior" with "Scream."  Maybe it's because they're both
horror films (kinda), both have hot young stars, both have an annoying
alternative soundtrack, and both are aimed at the teenage crowd, which I
guess includes me.  But this is not the next in line with the "Scream"
flicks as well as the "I Know What You Did Last Summer" soon to be flicks. 
It owes less to "Halloween" and more to Kafka and Orwell, which, in my
book, makes for a more interesting feature.
And it should have been.  This is basically a rehash of "The Stepford
Wives," the great 70s film I never saw starring Katherine Ross and dealing,
as I've been told, with a bunch of women who are programmed to be perfect
housewives.  Or something like that.  "Behavior," starring Katie Holmes of
"Dawson's Creek," deals with a bunch of teenagers, deep in angst, who are
being programmed to be perfect teenagers.  Suck-ups.  Preppies.  It
actually, at least to me, sounds like it would work, and with Scott
Rosenberg, that witty penmen who has written stuff like "Beautiful Girls"
and "Things to Do In Denver When You're Dead" (as well as "Con Air"), it
actually sounds like it may be pulled off with the right amount of frights
and satiric wit.
Alas, it's not, and it plumets into that little group of movies known as
"The Movies With Potential That Blow It."  I remember a film called "White
Man's Burden" which dealt with a reversal of Blacks and Whites in society
that did nothing with it's potentially brilliant premise.  Here's another
one.  It could be a brilliant satire on how teenagers NEED to go through
teen angst in order to find themselves.  It's a stage, and this film does
in fact realize that.  It gets its message across and it does it
effortlessly.  Now it just needs to work as a film.
Which it doesn't.  It's too sloppy and too contrived.  It paints a bleak
portrait of high school life...then lets it lie.  It brings us a bunch of
scary monsters who are all a bunch of disgustingly icky kiss-ups who do
food drives and hang out at a 50s diner drinking milk shakes...then gives
it a cheap twist: when they get horny, they become homicidal.  Isn't it
scary enough that they're like this, and can't the real terror in the town
be that you could be next to be just like them - not that you could be next
to die?
The film introduces us two three different characters who, in the
beginning, are considered outsiders because they're not (yet) part of this
clique: the new kid, Steve (James Marsden - dull dull dull dull), who's
having trouble at home because he hasn't gotten over his brother's (Ethan
Embry, in quick flashes so you don't recognize him - I did) suicide; the
renegade girl, Rachel (Katie Holmes, from "Dawson's Creek"), who's chief
personality trait is her prominent nose ring; and by far the most
interesting kid, Gavin (Nick Stahl, the kid from "The Man Without a Face"),
who's the most interesting because he's the only character who's given some
dimension.  In the film's best scene, he introduces Steve to every single
clique, nailing each one's fetishes and hang-ups, and it's the best scene
in the movie because it's witty, satirical, and interesting - something the
rest of this film isn't.
Gavin suspects there's something awry with the preppie kids, known as The
Blue Ribbons, and in the tradition of all conspirators, and even when he
actually shows hard pure evidence to Steve, he's only treated as a typical
raving conspiracy buff.  Here, we have another case of "The Idiot Plot,"
where not only could Steve had done something about Gavin and what happens
to him, but he may have saved this film from being the dreary, dull film
that it is without Gavin, who gives it life and humor.  The only other
half-interesting character is the school janitor, played by William Sadler
as a retarded, scary guy who may not be what he seems to be...but really,
we don't care anyway.
I probably shouldn't mention that this was directed by David Nutter, who's
works for "The X-Files," because that would probably tarnish his
reputation.  Like the show, he's good at setting up weird conspiracies, and
creating a general creepy feel.  Most of this film is shot at night and
with dark eerie shadows for the maximum creepy effect, and some of it
works.  But what this film is not so good at is coming out with a good
payoff.  He keeps too much inside, so much that when the characters journey
to a Mental Institution in the Third Act, you wonder why they just don't
get the hell out of there.  I think what happens to Gavin is proof enough
that there's something rotten in the state of teen angstdom.
What this film needs to be is a lot longer, a lot more colorful, and a lot
creepier.  If the best villain they can come up with is a guidance
counselor (played by Bruce Greenwood, an Atom Egoyan regular obviously just
trying to pay the rent) who still thinks he can get away with it even when
most is revealed, then they need to come up with a tougher, smarter
villain.  If he's so villainous, then why could two dense teenagers who
couldn't figure out there was something going on until it was way too late
find information on him in a couple minutes?  The film, which runs about 80
or so minutes, just needs to work on these things, and become a lot less
sloppy.  At such a short running time and with such lame, boring characters
as these, it's pretty much obvious that leaving this film leaves a horribly
unsatisfied taste in one's mouth, especially mine.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Rebecca (1940)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: John Harrison, Michael Hogan, Philip MacDonald, and Robert E.
Sherwood (based on the novel by Daphne du Maurier)
Starring: Joan Fontaine, Laurence Olivier, Judith Anderson, George
Sanders, Gladys Cooper, Nigel Bruce, Reginald Denny, C. Aubrey Smith,
Florence Bates
The Master of Suspense took a slight turn away from international
intrigue to create his American debut film, "Rebecca."  Instead of
spies, conspiracies, and chases involving innocent men and women,
"Rebecca" is a thriller dealing with the depths of the human soul. 
There are no bad guys or good guys in "Rebecca" - just some people who
end up being psychologically wounded one way or another by result of the
death of one woman: Rebecca de Winters.
We never see our title character, but we more than feel her presence. 
In it, we meet a girl who's name we never really find out (Joan
Fontaine), who is the "companion" of a spoiled rich woman -  Mrs. Van
Hopper (Florence Bates) - in the south of France.  There, she meets
Rebecca's widower: the wealthy and depressed Maxim de Winter (Laurence
Olivier, eight years before he would make his version of "Hamlet," yet
looking like he was around 50).  Over the course of a short period of
time (about a half-hour of film time), the two hit it off, and by the
end of her stay there, he proposes to her, and she gleefully accepts.
But although they're time on vacation was full of happiness, returning
to his giant house, Mandalay, begins to set some nasty vibes off. 
Although welcomed into her house nicely by almost all of the servants,
the creepy (not to mention homoerotic) servant Mrs. Danvers, begins to
give her the chills.  Although at first the film looks as though it's
going to go all cheap and have the new Mrs. de Winters just become the
old Mrs. de Winters (who was drowned), the film steers clear of that
notion, although drifts near it from time to time, and instead goes for
something creepier.
The film unfolds beautifully.  We the audience sympathize with the
noveau riche Joan Fontaine, as she's obviously not exactly comfortable
with the rich life.  And we watch as the past of Mandalay opens up, and
we learn more and more about Rebecca and her impact on not only Maxim
(or "Max"), but on other people, most importantly Mrs. Danvers, who is
said to have "really adored the late Mrs. de Winters").
The final half hour would seem cheap and anti-climactic, as it takes a
completely different direction than what was pre-conceived, but
nevertheless deepens the film.  I actually rewound the movie and
rewatched it with the new knowledge I attained from watching the rest of
it, and noticed a whole other depth to the film.
What's remarkable about "Rebecca" is how it obtains suspense through
non-life-threatening situations.  In a sequence where Joan Fontaine is
making a costume for a big ball of hers, we never see what she's
creating, but I actually hoped I didn't think what she was doing, and
felt some tension before finally seeing her creation.  The entire film
is mired with gothic creepiness, creating moments where I was just
afraid because of the feel of the film.
"Rebecca" is not only notable for this distinction, but also because it
is the only one of his films to win a Best Picture Oscar. 
Unfortunately, Hitchcock goes into the same club of extremely talented
directors who have never won an Oscar for their efforts, inclduing such
noteworthy directors as Martin Scorsese and Stanley Kubrick.  Although
"Rebecca" does not show Hitchcock in his element of damn-near-flawless
direction in his typical thrillers, I think the man should have at least
won for this, since his direction is, as it is mostly,
damn-near-flawless.
The film received a total of 11 nominations, claiming some of them (it
was no "English Patient," after all).  Olivier and Fontaine were both
nominated, and justly, but lost, perhaps justly (I don't know who else
was nominated that year).  Fontaine creates a very sympathetic
character, a protagonist we can identify with (in most cases), and care
about.  And Olivier creates a man who has distanced himself from
everyone else, and who's problem we never fully understand, but just
quickly diagnose him superficially with the old "oh, well, his wife just
died!"
Judith Anderson was also nominated but lost, but I think she should have
won for her Mrs. Danvers is one of the most intriguing and bizarre
characters in all of film history.  She is also a distanced character,
but one who possesses a lot of creepiness, as well as some homoeroticism
(there's a scene where she gets so close to Fontaine, it looked like
Fontaine was trying to escape from her because there was some sexual
tension).  This is not just me; many filmmakers claim that this was
intentional.
In a smaller role, George Sanders (who was in some other Hitchcock
films, like "Foreign Correspondent") is a scene stealer as an old lover
of Rebecca's who turns up mostly in the end to start some trouble with
Max.  Why he wasn't nominated, I don't know.
"Rebecca" is one of the more deeper and stranger of the Hitchcock films,
as it deals more with psychological terror than espionnage terror.  It's
an unforgettable film, and further proof that Hitchcock was one of the
best and freshest directors around, and who's timeless classics make him
one of the best directors of all time.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Patton (1970)
Director: Franklin J. Schaffner
Writers: Francis Ford Coppola and Edmund H. North (based on the book "A
Soldier's Story" by Omar M. Bradley and "Patton: Ordeal and Triumph" by
Ladislas Farago)
Starring: George C. Scott, Karl Malden, Michael Bates, Edward Binns,
Stephen Young, Lawrence Dobkin, John Doucette, James Edwards, Frank
Latimore, Tim Considine
The film "Patton" is a film filled of many contradictions, just as the man
it's portraying was.  General George S. Patton Jr. was the flamboyant
military commander who was at the same time brilliant and clueless, and
came off as being everything that someone like me would say is wrong with
war, and also everything that is right about it.  Watching the film is
seeing an exercise in a film that takes both sides of the story, sits on
the fence, and still gets away with it, mainly because it just knows how to
show both sides equally and doesn't try to make any pro or con statements
against war.
On the surface, "Patton" is at once an epic war film and an intelligent
biopic of a very controversial and notable figure in history.  On one
level, we see a wildly entertaining cinemetic war picture that probably
could have starred almost anybody (probably John Wayne), following one
man's need to conquer in battle and to come out the winner of each and
every battle, primarily because he's such a brilliant strategist.  And we
also see an intelligently and brilliantly layered biopic on a man who's
need to bring the best out of his troops by following a series of codes
ultimately leaves him without anything else to do one he's completed it, as
well as a three-dimensional depiction of a man who most people thought was
such an asswhole because he just wanted to do things right.
The film opens with Patton (played with a fiery intensity by George C.
Scott) addressing several troops (and the audience) about the many codes
one must follow in order to be succesful in war as well as why war is such
a great thing, all while standing in front of a giant American flag (a
stunning and textured shot).  He mentions how individuality is a terrible
thing, how much of war is getting revenge, and other things that many
people will easily take offense at since it's so honest about what war
really is, and what the many costs of war are.  It's easy to pick out all
the problems with war from his speech, but then one must realize that if
you're going to fight a war, this is the only way you're going to win.
The film takes off from there to depict many of his World War II
ups-and-downs, starting out as he takes over a base in North Africa, and
follows right up to his conquest in Germany.  We see Patton as he tries to
shape his new troops up into the right kinds of troops, prohibiting pin-ups
from the barracks, and forcing everyone to wear helmets at all times.  His
strategies are so brilliant because he knows so much about war history, and
is able to manneuver as to what worked before and what didn't, and also
because he's so consumed with the business of war strategies that it's hard
seeing him doing anything else in life.
But with this, there's his many negative traits.  He's almost totally made
of stone, and becomes one of the biggest nuiscances to the American army
because of this and his lack of public bravauda.  When giving a speech
about what will happen at the end of the war, he accidentally forgets to
mention their ally, Russia, and says that America and England will be
ruling the world afterwards, prompting a ton of negative feedback from
everyone, especially Russia.  But Patton has worse problems: he's so
consumed with war and how everyone must be part of a group that he worries
only about those who are physically wounded by the war and not those who
are psychologically so.  His treatment of a soldier who has "bad nerves"
becomes an indictment of his character and the entire American military by
the media, and wounds Patton's career from that point on.
As this goes on, we get a couple asides to pull us away from Patton.  We
not only follow his career, but also that of a colleague and later friend,
General Omar M. Bradley (Karl Malden), who's the exact opposite of Patton:
patient, just, and only following orders.  We see how Bradley's career
actually gets better than Patton's, and by the end, the man who was once
under his command is giving him orders.  We are also privileged to see how
the German soldiers react to him, as they are constantly trying to study
him and understand him, but never do.
Patton was a complex and mysterious man, and the script by Francis Ford
Coppola and Edmund H. North is a brilliant one that understand this notion,
and instead tries to show him as he most likely was.  Seen in history as a
one-dimensional crazy man, the script actually deepens his character, and
by the end, elicits actualy sympathy for him.  This film is not a criticism
of him or war, but really an almost documentary on him, not taking any real
side on him, but showing him as a three-dimensional person.  Scott's
performance is like this: at his most tempermental, you can see why so many
people impersonate his performance; but many times Scott goes down about
100 notches to show him as a man tortured by his own fear of a lack of war.
The film sees Patton not as what is good or bad about war, but really as a
giant contradiction of both of these.  He's a man who basically embodies
everything about war, and when a war is around, he's the best at training
his men to fight a war, and at coming up with strategies that help his side
win battles.  He's so good because he understands that war needs
dehumanization, that people with a high amount of emotion over the idea of
war need to have their spirits broken, and need to learn to be an animal. 
But again, this is exactly what is wrong with war, how it turns humans into
psychotic, unfeeling monsters, and the film shows this as the main
contradiction in Patton's life: he was heroic, but at the same time he was
tragic.
"Patton" is an amazing film, one that is able to stir up emotions for
someone who could easily be reduced to just a simple monster.  It
understands that without war, there was little else of Patton left, and it
is able to touch on a part of all of us that fears becoming obsessed with
accomplishing something, and the fear of what to do next after it has been
accomplished.  The best biopics, "Amadeus," "Raging Bull," were all able to
find something about their subjects that can easily be conveyed to all of
us, and did so in an entertaining manner.  And since "Patton" is as deeply
entertaining and fascinating as it is introspective and brilliant, it ranks
as one of the best films to ever be made.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Terminator 2: Judgment Day (1991)
Director: James Cameron
Writers: James Cameron and William Wisher Jr.
Starring: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Linda Hamilton, Edward Furlong, Robert
Patrick, Joe Morton, Erin Boen, Don and Dan Stanton
I moved to college on Ausust 29th, 1997, which is the same day as
"Judgment Day" in "Terminator 2," which was basically the big apocalypse
that killed most of the population, and, of course, launched the
"Terminator" films.  In a typical film version of this, the action
sequences would be half-assed, and it would be as deep as a Seagal
film.  But under the helm of James Cameron, who's the world's biggest
perfectionist, we get a film with depth and some totally ass-kicking
action sequences, which he's famous for.
In the original film (also done by Cameron), a Terminator (Ah-nold)
arrived from the future to assasinate the mother (Linda Hamilton) of the
leader of the rebellion against the robots in the future, who ruled the
earth after the big apocalypse until the humans rebelled.  But another
human arrived too (Michael Biehn), who not only killed the Terminator
(and was also killed), but ended up being the father of the leader of
the rebellion (a lovely twist).
Jump ahead about 10 years or so, the mother's now in an asylum; the son,
John (Edward Furlong), is a rebellious Bart Simpson-type, living with
foster parents, and riding around on a little moped with his friend; and
two terminators have arrived with different missions: T-1000 (Robert
Patrick), a liquid terminator, sent to kill John; and T-100 (Ah-nold) ,
this time sent to protect him from T-1000.  They both arrive in electric
lightning, totally buck naked, and on other parts of a bad city.
They both get clothes (although T-1000 has a cool thing where he can
imitate anything it impales, and can do other liquid things), and they
both set out to find John.  They both pretty much find him first, duke
it out a bit, ending in a giant Cameron-esque explosion, and soon they
rescue the mother from the asylum, who has also begun to attempt an
escape.
Part of Arnold's programming not only makes him protect John, but do
whatever he commands.  And he soon not only becomes his friend and
pretty much his bitch, but soon he has become a father figure to him,
and with the mother there, they form a kind of family unit.
The plot twists a bit, and we find out that a blooming company found the
chip and arm from the first terminator and has taken that direction. 
But on August 29th, 1997 (a day I still think about), they somehow blew
up the world, and all their robots took over the world, fighting the
remaining humans, led by a grown-up John.  Once this is found out, the
mother decides to make it her business to stop it all by assasinating
the head of the company (Joe Morton), who instead of being a jerk, goes
ahead and helps them stop it by blowing up all the information.  This
leads to about 30 minutes or so of straight action sequences, right up
until the end (which pissed me off when I rewatched it on NBC last night
because they had to cut to commercial at several inconvenient times).
Now, is "Terminator 2" the greatest single action film ever made?
Nearly.  The plot is so creepy and ominous that it's totally
intriguing.  The elements of depth are very well handled, causing us to
care about the characters and even to question the mother's choice in
killing Morton, and even think of Arnold as a near human.  There are
elements to humanize Arnold, and he almost becomes one, though he can
feel nothing, but later on love for who he's protecting, and care for
the mother, as well as a nifty way to not kill people all the time,
causing this to have a surprisingly low body count for such a riveting
action pic.
And Cameron is a master of action scenes.  And since Arnold cannot be
killed by mere bullets, he can go way, way, way over the top with his
scenes.  He also equips T-1000 with a bunch of cool new perks.  For one,
he can mutate, and everything.  But also, when you shoot him, it merely
makes a hole, which is covered up within seconds.  A master of using an
idea to its fullest limits, we not only get him shooting him with a gun
to stop him for a couple seconds, but he later freezes him, uses a
machine gun on him, etc.  His action sequences are not just there to
look cool, but to advance the plot.
This is one instance where the special effects work perfectly.  They
look realistic, they help with the cool action sequences, and they are,
basically, jaw-dropping.  Of course, James Cameron always makes the best
special effects, I mean, other than Spielberg.  The whole idea of T-1000
is an ingnius idea, and the film has the special effects to back his
innovativeness up.  There's also a cool bit at the end involving what
looks like outtakes from John Carpenter's "The Thing."
There is one question of a potential flaw in the film.  A big ass
paradox.  This involves the fact that if they stop "Judgment Day," then
how was John Connor conceived, since his father came back from the
future, which has been stopped by the end...unless they didn't actually
stop it.  I mean, the company could have had diskettes elsewhere when
the plant was blown up.  I dunno.  But I remember discussing this with
other people, and someone pointed out the theory of time lines, where
there are alternate realities that come out (also used in the "Back to
the Future" trilogy).  But, I'm still a believer in the "12 Monkeys"
theory of time: that it's linear.  But oh well.  Let's not try to think
to hard on this one.
The film also features some actually excellent performances.  Arnold is
pretty much at his best here, combining zombie-like creepiness with some
human depths that are meticulously added in the right places.  Linda
Hamilton continues on the Cameron streak of strong female leads (started
with Ripley), and also proves herself a talented actress and powerful
action lead (and has never looked so attractive).  Eddie Furlong is
good, best he ever was.  Joe Morton, as always, rocks.  
And Robert Patrick gives a perfectly delicious creepy performance.  He
has this kind of Malcolm MacDowell "Clockwork Orange" stare, equipped
with greasy pushed-back hair, (big ears) and some little doses of
mechanical humor - like staring as one of his victims struggles or
almost being beaten, then looking up at his enemy, and mocking them
pretentiously.  He has never been this awesome, and I doubt he ever will
(the poor guy's career never really took off, save a cool performance in
"Copland," a cameo in "Wayne's World" as his T-1000 character, and he
also did a grade-Z erotic thriller with Teri Hatcher where he got to
touch her bare breasts - for all you horny bastards, it's called "The
Cool Surface," and it sucks).
But "T2" is probably the second best action film ever made, close by to
"Die Hard."  It involves some of the most amazing action sequences ever
executed, a story that's so engrossing that the film has become one of
the ten most defining films of the past decade (from the "Premiere"),
and features good acting, and a good old paradox or two.  "Terminator 2"
is basically how one makes a great big-budget action film.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Cook the Thief His Wife & Her Lover, The (1989)
Writer/Director: Peter Greenaway
Starring: Richard Bohringer, Michael Gambon, Helen Mirren, Alan Howard, Tim
Roth, Liz Smith, Paul Russell, Ciarán Hinds, Gary Olsen, Ewan Stewart, Alex
Kingston
Every night at "Le Hollandais" restaurant, the owner, Albert Spica (Michael
Gambon), shows up with all his friends, and eats all he can, while talking
loudly, and making a general rucous.  Instead of being a dedicated,
peaceful owner, Albert is actually a vile gangster who has recently bought
out the restaurant from its head cook, Richard (Richard Bohringer), who
nevertheless still works there.  Every single evening, Albert annoys
everyone he can, showing off his power and richness, and every single
evening, Richard holds back his disgust at him with a blank expression, and
replies of "Yes, Mr. Spica...right away, Mr. Spica."
But one night, Albert's bored and beautiful wife, Georgina (Helen Mirren),
glances across the restaurant at one of its many customers, Michael (Alan
Howard), and soon the two begin to flirt across the room.  After he
accidentally walks into the women's bathroom where she is, the two begin a
silent affair, lasting over the course of the film as they have passionate,
quiet sex in every nook and cranny of the restaurant...and with the aid of
Richard, who allows them entrance into little hiding places where they can
continue their tryst.
So begins the fable-like story writer/director Peter Greenaway has brought
us.  "The Cook, the Thief, His Wife, and Her Lover" is a lavishly directed
film, filled with gorgeous production design, wild costumes, and scenes of
such depravity and disgustingness that even John Waters would be shocked. 
It's a film which has the balls to do a scene where Albert beats a broke
man who owes him money by stuffing shit down his mouth, and the
intelligence to back it up with a purpose.
For the first hour, the film gets into a kind of routine: Albert and his
goons (including one played by a pre-"Reservoir Dogs" Tim Roth) arrive, eat
while talking annoyingly, and somewhere in there, both Georgina and Michael
get up simultaneoulsy from their respective tables, and head into a hiding
place to screw around, with some variation in there.  But the second hour,
as with most films which get into routines in the first hour, changes
everything.  After Albert finds out about them from one of the goon's
mistresses, the two lovers flee to his place, a book depository where he
works, and after awhile, Albert finds him, and brutally kills him.
I will not reveal the ending, primarily because it's such a great ending,
truly one of the greatest endings to a film I've ever seen.  But I will say
this: it's definitely delicious (hee hee), and it's bound to have the
audience leaving with a big smile in their face...unless they're completely
grossed out.
There are hundreds of great things about this film, but sone of them are
the direction by Peter Greenaway, and production design by Ben Van Os and
Jan Roelfs, music by Michael Nymann, and costumes by the god-like Jean-Paul
Gaultier, all which contribute into a film which is one of the most
visually stunning films I've ever seen.  The film is incredibly lavish, and
the restaurant, where most of the film takes place, is one of the most
incredible sights on celluloid.  Outside, there is blue fog and lime
lights; in the kitchen, the color is green, and seems to be a giant
warehouse, with a pan shot of it lasting forever; the actual dining room is
an ominous crimson red (which gets more crimson as the film goes on); and
the bathroom is bright white, so white that when the door opens from the
inside, it looks like hell is creeping in.  This is probably the most
gorgeous-looking film in the past decade.
Not only that, but every primary actor deserves individual praise.  Richard
Bohringer, a staple of French cinema, is perfect at portraying a man who
hides his emotions and hatred for Albert under a plastic facade, creating
the perfect look of a pot ready to boil over.  Michael Gambon is perfect as
the obese, horrific Albert, being able to pronouce every line of his
dialogue realistically and with style.  Helen Mirren portrays the bored
Georgina as a woman who's been hollowed out by her marriage to Albert, and
later shows a touching emotion when she finds out she's really in love with
Michael (one scene has her talking to him when he's not there - I almost
cried).  And Alan Howard, who doesn't even speak until about 50 minutes
into the film, is wonderful, playing a man who hints at everything with
facial expressions, and is the exact opposite of Albert.  Tim Roth, in a
supporting role, is pretty awesome too.
I've read that this film is a film about the connection between food and
sex.  I've also read that it's nothing but a wild tale, not really
deserving of the title of "art."  These are both wrong in their own
respects.  "The Cook, the Thief, His Wife, and Her Lover" is actually a
condemnation of gluttony, not so much as in respect to eating, but in
respect to all kinds of excessiveness.  The film is not a contemporary
"Last Tango in Paris," showing a pair of lovers trying to escape through
casual sex.  It's not even really about the affair of Georgina and Michael.
 It's about Albert, a man who's so polluted to the core that he's blind to
his own selfishness and worldly gluttony. 
Albert struts around his restaurant like a king, messing around with people
who are merely trying to eat good food, and talks about changing Richard's
restaurant into a place filled with every excess imaginable.  Not to
mention, he rants on about every subject imaginable, making crude jokes at
others' expenses, and generally speaking way too much on things he knows
little or nothing about.  In fact, Albert has most of the lines in the film
(notice how the film sometimes cuts to other people and places when he
speaks?). Greenaway is trying to point out that this kind of excessiveness
is pure evil, and that anyone who acts remotely like this deserves the
sweet justice he receives, like Albert does in the finale (no specifics, I
promise).  While the stories of the other three protagonists are emotional
and intriguing in their own respects, they are merely acting out as people
who have been harmed by Albert's selfish gluttony.
What puts the cherry on the top of this film is the way the film feels
during and after viewing it.  "The Cook, the Thief, His Wife, and Her
Lover" is a film that lingers in the memory long after, with scenes and
moments stuck in your head.  I will never forget the look of the
restuarant, the way it's so vast and always filled with life.  I can never
get the images of Georgina and Michael making love without talking, and the
love they share for eachother in the second half after the silence has been
broken between them.  And the ending is so incredible that it will hold up
to any film where a character gets his just desserts as a perfect example
of how to do it right and proper.
"The Cook, the Thief, His Wife, and Her Lover" is a film I will never get
over seeing.  It may be disgusting, vile, and even excessive, but it's a
film that will haunt you and never let you forget its message and wild
imagery.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Afterglow (1997)
Writer/Director: Alan Rudolph
Starring: Julie Christie, Nick Nolte, Lara Flynn Boyle, Jonny Lee Miller,
Jay Underwood, Domini Blythe, Yves Corbeil, Alan Fawcett
Watching "Afterglow" is like watching a soap opera, only with depth and
some real emotional stimulation.  The entire time, you know what's going to
happen to these characters, but you can never tell what you're going to
feel like when it's about to hit you.  And when it does, you're not even
sure what to feel like afterwards.
The structure of "Afterglow" is something like a Robert Altman film (he's
the producer of this, by chance), following a group of characters around as
they run into eachother by chance, then examining them as a group or
groups, and as individuals.  We first meet Jeffrey Bryon (Jonny Lee
Miller), a high-level business man living in Montreal, but has lost all
passion for his life, most notably in his job and his marriage to his wife,
Marianne (Lara Flynn Boyle), a lonely but occasionally ecstatic woman who
yearns for a baby, but will find not such help with it from Jeffrey.
We also meet another couple: Lucky and Phyllis Mann (Nick Nolte and Julie
Christie, respectively), a much older couple, probably old enough to be
Jeffrey and Marianne's parents.  Lucky runs a fix-it man business, and also
is a bit of a Cassanova on the side, sleeping with several of his female
customers merely because he enjoys pleasing them and also helping his
wounded libido, since Phyllis refuses to sleep with him.  Meanwhile,
Phyllis lies around all day watching her old movies, and thinking about
life and death, as one of her fellow actors has recently died.
Wouldn't you know it: Lucky gets a call from Marianne to help build a
nursery for her yet un-conceived baby, and the two hit it off.  Lucky not
only helps her do this, but also gives some emotional support for her, and
eventually begins sleeping with her.  As their relationship becomes more
and more serious, Phyllis discovers them, and while spying on them at a
bar, she runs into Jeffrey, who's spying on Marianne.  The more they talk,
the more they become interested in eachother, and without even knowing who
the other is, they begin a relationship that is in direct opposition of
Lucky and Marianne.
This film has been getting some reception most notably because of the
performance by Julie Christie, who is a lot like her character.  Christie
was a big star in the 60s and 70s, appearing in such cinema classics as
"Darling," "Doctor Zhivago," and "Shampoo," but then disappearing from
cinema and the public's eye for a long time, claiming to be happy in her
loneliness.  Of course, last year she played Queen Gertrude in Branagh's
"Hamlet," and has now found her career to be blooming once more.  In fact,
Christie received a very well-deserved Oscar nomination for the role in
question.
What she brings to the screen is a persona that is sad and mysterious,
which is what she does best anyway.  Phyllis is portrayed as a woman who
keeps most of her emotions bottled up behind a false facade, and who talks
with a distanced and somewhat pretentious overtone.  When she finally does
break down at the end, it's almost as powerful as Ian Holm's breakdown in
"The Sweet Hereafter" (another great performance).  But in the meantime,
watching Christie navigate through her role is a pleasure that brings a
smile to anyone's face, and seeing her once again marvel an audience is
pretty astounding.
But she's not the chief reason to see this, as the media has been claiming.
 "Afterglow" is a film which is very multi-textured: it's a black comedy, a
drama, a character study, an exercise in how to be Altman-esque, and a
beautifully cynical film dealing with couples who aren't right for one
another.  The title of the film is cynically ironic, as it is the focus of
the film that the afterglow of these two marriages is anything but sweet. 
The two couples in this film are hanging on by a thread that should be cut,
but unfortuantely they're trying to help themselves through relationships
instead of working at it like they should be doing.  Sure, it may seem like
a soap opera, but it sure has some intelligent depth.
The film can also be looked at as a tale of a couple being told by
examining two paralell couples at different stages (this isn't a totally
thought-out theory, so just follow me on this one).  The Jeffrey/Marianne
couple may in fact be the younger version of the Lucky/Phyllis couple, as
we know very little about their younger life.  And instances happen that
directly parallel that of the other couple, and the ending of the
Jeffrey/Marianne couple seems like it may be headed for the ending of the
Lucky/Phyllis couple.  "Afterglow" unfolds in a way that the details of the
film are given to you as the film goes on, so we can piece the film
together afterwards.
Julie Christie may be the stand-out performance for an Oscar Nomination (or
an Oscar), but she's not the only one who gives a great performance.  The
four leads all give phenomenol performances.  Nick Nolte, who does big
budget films to finance his more subtlely budgeted films (like this),
presents a man who is not really a sex machine, but a man who is up for
trying to please everyone as well as himself.  He's not an asswhole; he's a
very lovable man, and Nolte's performance is more human than anything else.
 Lara Flynn Boyle gives us a performance which is full of energy, even
while her character is also suffering some truly deep emotional pain.  And
Jonny Lee Miller (Sick Boy from "Trainspotting") not only deftly controls a
Canadian accent (I loved his "aboot"), but presents a man who seems like an
asswhole on the surface, but is really incredibly disenchanted with his
life.  Watching him fawn over Julie Christie is another great thing about
this movie.
A side not to anyone who grew up in the 80s: look for 80s semi-semi-icon
Jay Underwood in a supporting role.  Remember him from the kinda classics
"The Boy Who Could Fly" and the Disney movies of "Not Quite Human?"  God,
it's a weird feeling to see him in a movie again, eh?
The ending of "Afterglow" (or the afterglow of "Afterglow") is just like
the rest of the film: slightly confusing as to how the audience should feel
about it.  We know we should feel happy or sad for each of the couples, but
instead we're searching for feelings.  One of the most remarkable and
pleasing things about this film is seeing Julie Christie once again wow us
with an amazing performance.  My god, it's been awhile since we've felt
that way, hasn't it?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
Director: Robert Redford
Writers: Eric Roth and Richard LaGravenese (based on the novel by Nicholas
Evans)
Starring: Kristen Scott Thomas, Robert Redford, Scarlett Johansson, Sam
Neill, Diane Wiest, Chris Cooper, Cherry Jones, Catherine Bosworth
"The Horse Whisperer" is essentially a soap opera, but the best thing to do
with these kinds of stories is to either: a) run with that (as if it's
really a flaw); and b) run with whilst picking out some true depth in the
story, and maybe, if you're at it, say something about humanity.  This film
opts for the latter.
"The Horse Whisperer" deals with many subjects and themes, such as the
comparisons between man and animals, the subject of pain (physical and
psychological), and the concept of looking at things as ideas.  The fact
that it pulls all of these from a melodramatic storyline is something to be
applauded and revered.  The story revolves around the results of an
accident that takes place in the beginning where two young teenage girls,
Judith and Grace (Catherine Bosworth and Scarlett Johannsson,
respectively), end up screwing up while riding their respective horses, all
ending in a truck running over one of them and the other only just
surviving.  Judith is the one who dies, and Grace ends up loosing part of
her right leg.
Her horse, on the other hand, ends up just a little scarred, and very
crazy, so crazy that everyone is talking about killing it to end the pain. 
However, Grace's psychological trauma afterwards is so bad that it ends up
distancing her already dysfunctional family, consisting of lawyer dad
Robert (Sam Neill), and uptight magazine editor mom Annie (Kristen Scott
Thomas, glowing after her Oscar nomination last year).  Annie, fearing she
will lose her daughter completely, decides to hike out to Montana with her
(Robert has to work, of course) to a horse doctor...or "horse whisperer,"
as a magazine calls him...named Tom Booker (Robert Redford himself, marking
his first starring role in a movie he directed).
Although reluctant at first, Booker ends up helping the horse over a long
period of time, or so it seems.  What is horse whispering?  I'm not
entirely sure, but what I saw pretty much consisted of staring at the
horse, and making slow movements until the horse become comfortable with
you.  It so intrigued me that I decided to do this on my dog.  She attacked
me.  Guess you have to an aging Robert Redford to do it.
All the while, Booker begins to aide the two women psychologically.  He
helps Grace overcome her trauma, and causes her to relax and be able to
overcome the fact that she's missing a major body part.  Watching Redford
help her makes up some of the best scenes in the film, and when she finally
is able to smile and interact with people again, it's one of the film's
happiest moments.  Of course, he also helps Annie a bit as well, helping
her relax in the country (as opposed to the city), and to also rekindle her
romantic life once again.  Of course, these scenes lack the luster of the
scene with Grace, but they still work overall.
As the film goes on, it raises interesting questions about pain and
accidents, and how people tend to complicate their own lives with things
that they shouldn't really be worrying about but do anyway.  It does this
by showing a sorta "City Slickers"-esque clash about how city life makes
people worry more, while country life makes them relax and eventually enjoy
life, primarily because it's so simple.  It shows how people create
problems for themselves and often get to worked up about how they feel that
when they finally open up to others, it's a very therapeutic experience. 
It seems to be saying that there's always going to be pain over something;
it's just how you handle it.
Another very intriguing and intelligent concept it brings up, and one that
is so subtlely handled that it's easy to miss (I believe Roger Ebert clued
me into this one, thank you), is how we often get worked up by the idea of
something instead of the actual thing.  The film is an exercise in this
idea: it just seems to relish in the fact that it's taking place in the
beautiful state that is Montana, and often lingers in its gorgeousity. 
Photographed by Robert Richardson (a staple of Oliver Stone's), every shot
in Montana is a beautiful one that just NEEDS to be seen on the big screen,
just because it's almost like being there.
By the way it's shot and directed, it's easy to see how people can spend
their entire lives in the country.  The film never tells us about time or
how long they've been there (could have been weeks), and that was a smart
thing to do because you could probably lay down on the porch one day just
to look at the country, and when you've gotten up, you're 80.  You can
understand how Annie's character becomes so infatuated with living there,
and when Tom shows interest in her romantically, you probably are as duped
as she is: she's not really in love with him; she's in love with the idea
of him (as he is of her: his ex-wife was a city-person who didn't like the
country, so she's like a second chance for him).
As full of depth and beautiful as "The Horse Whisperer" is, the main thing
that makes it so great is its ability to just take what it is and run with
it.  The film is beautifully directed by Redford, who may not have deserved
an Oscar for his direction of "Ordinary People"...lemme correct that: he
DIDN'T deserve it (remember, Scorsese directed "Raging Bull" that year?),
but still shows himself as a wonderful director, one who sets up beautiful
shots, and has the ability to take his good old time telling the story (the
film runs around 160 minutes or so...plus previews), but still never bores
you.  And the fact that he lets the deep parts of the story stay as depth
and doesn't bring them to the surface is just how you make a good movie,
goddamit.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Zero Effect (1998)
Writer/Director: Jake Kasdan
Starring: Bill Pullman, Ben Stiller, Kim Dickens, Ryan O'Neal, Angela
Featherstone
Daryl Zero lives on the secluded top floor of a high-rise hotel, sealed
behind metallic doors with six separate locks, surveillance in every room,
a station of several computers so that he can work efficiently, and a
refrigerator full of Tab sodas, which I thought went out of business but I
guess I was wrong.  He's unlike most detectives in many ways, but the chief
difference between him and anyone else is that he never communicates with
his clients: he was a kind of lawyer helping him out who goes to see
potential clients, and gives them updates while Daryl uses disguises and
aliases to dig deep and find out the answer to whatever job he's hired for.
 He's a master of illusion, he's the best detective in the world, and he's
a total freak.
The weird thing about "Zero Effect" is that it's not really the quirky
thriller nor the plug for a TV detective like it may seem to be at first. 
It creeps up on you where you least expect it, and in the last movie you'd
think to have a heart, you find one.  Before you know it, you're feeling
something for all the characters, and you're more involved in their lives
than you are the mystery that this film poses.
The story revolves around one case of Daryl's, played wonderfully by Bill
Pullman (whose talent seems to decrease as the budget of a film starring
him increases), where he has to find a set of keys to a safe deposit box
for a millionaire named Gregory Stark (Ryan O'Neal, trying to find work),
and subsequently find out who's been blackmailing him for large amounts of
money.  Daryl never meets him, but he begins to sneakily find out things by
posing as other people, namely a millionaire accountant in town for the
weekend and working out at the same health club Gregory does.  There's a
fascinating set of scenes where he confronts him as an anonymous person,
and then goes back to show how he got amazing amounts of information just
by mincing a couple words with him.
The running joke in the movie is that Daryl is incredibly observant about
physical and psychological things, but that he comes up snake eyes when
actually dealing with the emotions of other people he deals with.  His
long-time partner/lawyer, Steve Arlo (Ben Stiller, showing that he's one of
the best comic actors around), detests everything about him, and is
desperately trying to find a way to break it to him that he doesn't want to
work for him anymore so he can marry his girlfriend (Angela Featherstone). 
And he seems to never really notice that he's annoying and rude and selfish
to everyone around him when he tries to do his bizarro detective work,
which makes him completely antisocial.
Instead of the film going on like this, mocking everything that makes up
Daryl, and giving us a mystery we are never really blown away by anyway, it
gives us something better: a love story, in the weirdest movie.  It does
this by introducing another character, a woman named Gloria (Kim Dickens)
whom he meets at the health club one day and is automatically able to
figure out that she's a paramedic since she smells of it.  Although turned
off at first, she begins to be fascinated with him, and soon the two are
discovering more and more about eachother, all the while at least one of
them is lying.
"Zero Effect" was written and directed by Jake Kasdan, the son of famous
directory Lawrence Kasdan, and he gives the film a comic yet dramatic feel.
 There's a real story here about characters that are interesting and
likable, and he allows that to slowly and subtely come to focus while the
mystery plot fades into the background.  If I can say one thing bad against
this film, it's that the mystery itself isn't all that intriguing.  It
uncovers a lot, mysteries where generations are harmed by past generations,
and it allows a couple cool twists, but in all reality, do we really care
about it once the love story has taken precedence?  Why worry about a
secret hit from 30 years ago when you can relish in a touching love story
between two alienated and damaged people?
But, in all reality, that's the strength of this film.  It gradually lets
us forget about the mystery, and we soon become so involved with the
character stories, including the story of Steve and his girlfriend, that we
never even realize that it's taken the foreground. Sure, it's still quirky,
and there's a lot of big laughs here, especially in the opening sequence
which intercuts a meeting Steve has with Gregory and a conversation Steve
has with a friend where he contradicts what he says over and over again. 
But a touching love story and one man's plight into beginning to understand
the emotions of other people is something that I sure wasn't expecting,
what with the opening promising another quirky thriller a la "Grosse Pointe
Blank," but that I was all the more happier to allow happen.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Persona (1966)
Writer/Director: Ingmar Bergman
Starring: Bibi Andersson, Liv Ullmann, Gunnar Björnstrand, Margaretha
Krook, Jörgen Lindström
The thing I like best about Ingmar Bergman's "Persona" is how it's able to
work on so many complex levels yet never separate themselves from one
another.  On one level, there's a story of two people represented two parts
of the human psyche.  On another level, there's a scathing portrait of
method acting.  On yet another level, there's a scathing portrait of films
as mirrors of life.  On even another level there's a tale of unity amongst
different people.  And there's even a level about the way we sometimes hide
another an entirely different persona to escape from our own, as well as
the world.  There's probably a couple other levels this film works on that
I'm not thinking of right now or haven't realized yet.
I like any film that has multiple levels that it works on, but it's so rare
that a film is able to use all its different levels so that they all work
with one another.  Every level benefits another level, like cinematic
puzzle pieces, all interlocking with one another to form a large portrait. 
Sure, I enjoy a film like "2001: A Space Odyssey" where there are several
levels it can work on, even if they don't work with one another, but when I
see a film like "Persona" where it works like this, I just have to give it
much more respect.
"Persona" is a baffling, confusing, and sometimes even confusing piece of
surrealism that often makes little sense until much later.  The underlying
story is very simple: an actress, Elisabeth (Liv Ullmann, in her first
Bergman film), suddenly becomes catatonic during a performance of a play
she's in, and is sent to be cured by a nurse named Alma (Bergman regular,
Bibi Andersson).  The two retreat to a head nurse's summer home on a
secluded island, where Alma tries to get Elisabeth to talk and open up as
she talks her head off, eventually opening so much to her that she exposes
her deepest secrets.
It would seem from this description that "Persona" could be a long, boring,
foreign retread of "The Miracle Worker," the story of Helen Keller and how
she learned to communicate.  But Bergman's way too existential for that. 
He not only takes the story somewhere, as well as adding a ton of depth
(personal and universal), but he really makes it into a big experience. 
Watching "Persona" is hypnotic, not only because it demands full attention
of the audience to what everything means, but because it's so well
directed, and so gorgeous to look at.
>From the first shot, "Persona" grabs our attention, doing so by throwing us
a curveball.  The film shows us lots of random images (including a couple
shots from his older films), such as a man having a nail pounded into his
hand, and a camera starting up, and eventually arrives at a shot of a boy
laying down on a bed, watching a film on a giant screen.  At first, this
seems overly self-indulgent (and you know how much I love self-indugency),
but later makes sense with the rest of the film, as the film ends with a
film projector turning off, and even has a middle part where the film
splices, and picks up in the next scene (Bergman apparently thought this
was an opportune place to put this, as he had no clue how to end the scene
- it works).
The film ultimately shows us how film attempts to mirror life, but kinda
fails, mostly by showing the relationship between Alma and Elisabeth, which
at first seems like Alma giving everything over to Elisabeth willingly, but
later turns into Elisabeth acting as a parasite, taking everything she can
from Alma, but at the same time giving a bit back.  She basically attempts
to become a carbon copy of Alma, coming off as only a bizarre version of
her as she attempts to study her so that she can become a better actress. 
Otherwise known as method acting.
The two eventually become one person, existentially forming two parts of
one person's psyche.  Watching their merging is one of the greatest
cinematic experiences in awhile, as the film uses original and fascinating
techniques to show this development.  At one point, the two sort of embrace
and form one body...at another point, each face is divided in half and then
placed side-by-side to show how much they resemble eachother.  In fact,
Bergman got the idea for the film, or at least the idea of who to cast,
when he saw both Ullmann and Andersson in public, and realized how much
they look alike (the one main difference between them is their respective
hair lengths).  Bergman even goes as far as to show one scene twice, from
two different point of views, to show how they each react to one situation.
Bergman only makes it better as he makes it a surrealistic experience. 
Often a fan of showing things through realistic dialogue and action,
"Persona" shows that his knack at creating surrealism makes his points come
much more alive, and the result is a film that not only demands a second
viewing, but makes it a pretty pleasurable experience.  Watching, say,
"Through a Glass Darkly" twice is a bit of a chore, but "Persona" is one of
the most chilling, disturbing, and even erotic films to ever be made.  The
entire film is beautifully shot by Bergman's favorite cinematographer, Sven
Nykvist, who makes every shot compeltely gorgeous, and well set-up, so that
the film resembles a dream.  Bergman knows that film is not a good way of
interpreting reality, that it's really an art form, and by filming it in
such a fashion, he makes his point come across in an incredibly competent
and rewarding fashion.
The best scene in the film comes about half way, where Alma, having become
more comfortable with her silent partner on the island, tells her of a time
when she cheated on her husband with a young boy while nude sunbathing on a
beach.  Bergman uses as few shots as possible, and only lets her words come
across.  It's a long scene, and it's even more amazing that he's able to
sustain such a high level of eroticism for so long, making it possibly the
most erotic experience ever put on film, and proving the fallacy that
Steven Soderbergh would make over 20 years later in "sex, lies, and
videotape": speaking about sex is much more erotic and satisfying than
actually having sex.
That this works with the rest of the film, in that it portays a mirror
image to the situation just like the film is a mirror image of realty,
makes the film much better, as it probably would have lost some steam due
to such a high increase in eroticism.  The film is able to hold a long
hypnotic spell the entire time, blowing its audience away with a bizarre
opening, and able to hold onto their attention for the entire 81 minute
running time.  There are a ton of great scenes - where Elisabeth panicks
after watching the tape of the Buddhist monk burning himself in protest to
the Vietnam War (or: the cover of the one Rage Against the Machine album);
where the two have a big fight; where Alma discovers Elisabeth's letters -
but they all work with one another, and every scene has the exact amount of
surrealism that it needs, making the film one of the best cinematic
experiences of all time.  Simply put.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Life Less Ordinary, A (1997)
Director: Danny Boyle
Writer: John Hodge
Starring: Ewan McGregor, Cameron Diaz, Delroy Lindo, Holly Hunter, Ian
Holm, Stanley Tucci, Dan Hedaya, Maury Chaykin, Tony Shalhoub, Ian
McNeice, Judith Ivey
I so wanted to love this movie.  I mean, after adoring both the awesome
awesome awesome "Shallow Grave," and the masterpiece "Trainspotting," I
was ready to see another absolutely amazing piece of film work by the
team of Boyle/MacDonald/Hodge/McGregor.  But, sadly, I have to give this
a disappointing rating.  It kills me to do that to a film which I had
hyped up so much, and it's definitely with a kind of tear in my eye that
I write this review.  Well, maybe I'm overly exaggerating this little
melodrama.
Well, as the ads had put it, this was to be a darkly comic twist on the
old 30s screwball comedy, which includes such films as "It Happened One
Night," "His Girl Friday," and "Bringing Up Baby."  Anyone who's seen
either of them knows how awesome they are - cleverly written,
wonderfully acted, and just plain memorable as hell.  After going
Hitchcockian with "Shallow Grave," and Kubrickian with "Trainspotting,"
it seemed that them going Hawks-ian and/or Capra-ian was a clever idea.
And it is.  And for a lot of the movie, the twist is great.  Here we
have the chief screwball element - two completely different people who
bicker so much that they eventually fall in love.  Take this, mix it
with a lot of black comedy, hitmen, graphic violence, and a great style
only Boyle can bring us, and sprinkle a bit of Coen on it, and we have
what this film is.  But this film has so much going on, that it seems to
fall apart after awhile.
The plot, which sounds a lot like the plot of that Alicia masterpiece
(ahem!) "Excess Baggage," deals with a down-on-his-luck loser/semi-idiot
named Robert (the Boyle staple Ewan McGregor) who loses his job,
girlfriend, and apartment in the space of 24 hours, and kidnaps the
dauther (Cameron Diaz) of his ex-boss (Ian Holm).  But the twist is that
these two completely different people (Ewan and Cameron, not Ewan and
Ian or Cameron and Ian) are bound to fall in love because of the help of
two angels (Delroy Lindo and Holly Hunter) who are assigned by the
grumpy Angel Gabriel (Dan Hedaya, perfectly cast) to unite these two in
bliss because God is a little perterbed of the amount of
divorces/seperation/general-love-unrest.
Soon,  the daughter, Celine, is cooped up in a falling-apart house with
her totally inept kidnapper, Robert, who totally forgets to even make
the ransom.  Soon it seems that Celine, who helped herself get
kidnapped, is pretty much running the show, and eventually has become
partners with Robert, whether he likes it or not.
Meanwhile, the angels are running around as hired assasins for Ian Holm,
trying desperately to get them together, because if they don't, they
aren't allowed back in heaven.  And soon it seems that they're out for a
lot of money to back themselves up if they don't suceed with their job.
On a plus side, this film IS very funny.  I mean, I laughed a lot of the
time, especially at Robert's inept antics, which are really never
tiresome.  The William Tell deal is also done very well, ending in a
hilarious conclusion, but never used again (which kind of brings to an
empty experience, I suppose).  The style is great, with lots of the
traditonal Boyle film schtuff, like cool camera uses, and a great
soundtrack which blends nearly-perfectly with the action going on.  The
dialogue is very funny, but then what do you expect from John Hodge? 
The claymation at the end is humorous, and ends the film nicely.
The acting is also excellent.  Ewan is one of the best young actors
working today, or perhaps one of the best actors in general, and he
shows great prospects in comedy.  He has a great sense of comedy, and is
easily likable and sympathetic.  He also has a bit of singing to do, and
he sounds mysteriously like Liam Gallagher from Oasis.  Also, Cameron is
one of the better young actresses, someone who can do big budget flicks
like "The Mask" and "My Best Friend's Wedding," and then slip into indie
fare, like "The Last Supper."  The two of them have great chemistry
together, trying to hit the notes that people like Clark Gable and
Claudette Colbert hit in flicks like "It Happened One Night."
Also good are the two angels, Delroy Lindo and Holly Hunter, and, yeah,
they're two of the best actors out today too (this is getting redundant,
eh?).  In smaller roles, Ian Holm is a cold and funny evil boss/father,
Maury Chaykin is a bizarre backwoodsman who befriends the two
protagonists, Stanley Tucci is a perfect egotistical dentist (who
suffers an accident in one of the first scenes), Dan Hedaya (as I said)
is a flawless Gabriel, and Tony Shalhoub is good in the one scene he has
where he speaks (and we learn once again the horrible truth that his
italian accent is not real).
But.  The film has so much, goes in so many directions, and wants to be
so much, that it just falls apart.  The last half hour or so are
muddled, and the humor is never as hysterical as it should be.  The
karaoke scene should be absolutely mesmerizing, wonderful, and
side-splittingly funny, but it's just fractions of all those.  The angel
subplot, which is a nice idea, is not used to its fullest extent, but
ends on a very good note.  And the film isn't as greatly plotted as it
should be.  The plot should be more frantic, and more tightly-plotted,
which I suppose is Hodge's fault, but I suppose Boyle had a bit to do
with that.  And the direction, while being very stylistic, is still too
American.  In fact, the first scene, which parodies a Quentin movie,
isn't as hysterical as it should or could be.  This is typical of
modern-day romantic comedies, and the only thing saving this is the
black comedy, which isn't as good as it should be either.
Anyone who knows me knows that I worship the brilliant ground that the
team of Boyle/Hodge/MacDonald/McGregor walk on, but this group has made
one slip-up, which is okay.  It seems that a director (or team's) early
flims involve at least one bad film in the first three or four.  While
it's usually the second, it can be the third (like Quentin's "Four
Rooms," if you count that as a film).  Therefore, I think that they will
rebound nicely and realize the mistakes they made with this film.
I just want to say that although it's disapointing, I still had a good
time.  This isn't a bad film at all, just a near-miss.  It's quirky,
it's funny, it's violent, and it's slightly romantic, but it's never all
at once.  If they had found a great balance for it, then this would have
been a great flick.  But, it's not, and therefore the film suffers a
bit.  But even if it's not a great film, it's at least a good film, and
worth a viewing or two.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Per qualche dollaro in piů (1965)
Director: Sergio Leone
Writers: Sergio Leone and Luciano Vincenzoni
Starring: Clint Eastwood, Lee Van Cleef, Gian Maria Volonte
"Fistful of Dollars" consisted of one protagonist.  "The Good, the Bad,
and the Ugly" consisted of three.  "For a Few Dollars More," the second
film in the Man With No Name trilogy (featuring the other two
mentioned), deals with two, and how it is plotted is done by
characterization, and centers around a locale where "Manifest Destiny"
has basically ruined some people, caused them to lose themselves in the
vastness, and are confined to walking around, being paid to kill people
who are only a knotch worse than them.
The Man With No Name (Eastwood) returns in this one, dressing the same,
and looking like he may have lost the money he won in "Fistful of
Dollars."  There's also the Colonel (Lee Van Cleef), an old man who quit
the army and went into the bounty hunting business.  The first half hour
or so shows them wandering around, collecting money for their killings,
and almost crossing paths, as they, at one time, want to kill the same
man.
The actual plot takes off when a big-time criminal (Gian Maria Volonte,
who was the villain in "Fistful of Dollars") is broken out of a crap
prison, launching a campaign to find him.  Through posters, the two
bounty hunters, who have never met eachother, discover him and decide to
go out and search for him individually.  Yes, they run into eachother in
the same town (in a cool scene where they shoot off eachother's hats
over and over again), and yes, they team up in a partnership.
The villain wants to rob a large bank with a bizarre idea for a safe (an
armoir, but a heavily protected armoir) and then split the money up with
his gang.  They sucessfully do it halfway through the film, but when
they go to open it, the Colonel steps in to help them do it without
blowing up the bills.  The plot, as in all of Leone's films, twists and
turns over and over again, finally ending in a ghost town.
The ending is the usual cool-ass duel, but always done in the most
original way.  We find out more about our two protagonists, and even
about the villain, who is given some depth this time.   And the film is
equipped with the bitching kind of style only Leone can peform.  With
Ennio Morricone's amazing score, he sets up beautifully choreographed
scenes filled with shooting and some good old Italian carnage.
"For a Few Dollars More" is always seen as the black sheep of the bunch,
but this film is rather underrated.  It's plotting is ingenius, and the
film is just one hell of a fun film to watch.  It runs a tad over 2
hours, but it really doesn't seem that way since it's so fascinating to
watch.  "For a Few Dollars More" is just another reason why Sergio Leone
kicks ass.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335

Title
Review for Twin Peaks: Fire Walk with Me (1992)
Director: David Lynch
Writers: David Lynch and Robert Engels
Starring: Sheryl Lee, Ray Wise, Moira Kelly, Chris Isaak, Kiefer
Sutherland, Harry Dean Stanton, Dana Ashbrook, Kyle MacLachlan, Grace
Zubriskie, James Marshall, David Lynch, Mädchen Amick, David Bowie, Miguel
Ferrer, Jürgen Prochnow, Frances Bay, Michael J. Anderson, Heather Graham
I saw the pilot for David Lynch's cult classic TV show, "Twin Peaks," a
couple of months ago, and the greatest thing about it was the first hour. 
In it, the entire town discovered that a young high school girl, Laura
Palmer, was found murdered.  As the hour unfolded, we saw her parents
discover (both at the same time, and over the phone), her schoolmates, and
we saw the effect it had on the town.  It was like the place had to be
closed because of it.
The second hour, though, dipped into weirdo surrealism, like it was afraid
to deal further with what occured in the first hour.  Bobby, Laura's
boyfriend, became especially crazy, attacking one guy, landing in jail, and
in one of the funniest scenes in anything I've ever seen, threatened a
fellow cell mate by woofing at him.  Sure, it's funny, but it's nothing
else.  I've seen other episodes in the series, and none really owed up to
the promise the first hour of the pilot had.  Most of them just like to
shock you with weird scenes, like one where Special Agent Dale Cooper (Kyle
MacLachlan), the caffeine-addicted guy on the case, has a dream where he's
in a red room with Laura and a dwarf (Michael J. Anderson), who talks
backwards-yet-forwards, and says a bunch of things which make no sense
whatsoever, but are just humorous to listen to.  But do these things hold
any higher purpose?
Well, here's the ill-fated pre-quel to the series, which ended midway
through its second season, and the film tries to make some sense out of the
series, and to reveal the killer of Laura Palmer which we were all
wondering throughout the series (note: I'm not sure whether or not they
revealed who it was on the series).  The reason it's dead-on-arrival is
that the identity of the killer can be anyone in the town.  It's almost
like David Lynch put all the characters names in a hat, picked one, and
said, "okay, there's our killer."  It could've been the freaking Log Lady,
and they could make it work somehow in this film.
The first half hour of the film is almost like a typical episode of the
series: a bunch of really weird scenes tossed together, filled with empty
symbolism, but lots of surreal laughs.  In it, another Special Agent,
Chester Desmond (Chris Isaak - yes, the singer), goes to a town sorta near
Twin Peaks with another agent, Sam Stanley (Kiefer Sutherland), to
investigate the murder of a woman.  They talk to hard-to-get-along-with
local authorities, question a disgruntled motel owner (Harry Dean Stanton),
and then disappear for no reason whatsoever.  This seques to a little bit
with Dale Cooper, who wonders where they went, and then has a bit where
David Bowie walks into the film, and you can see that the film is taking a
wild turn because from this point on, nothing makes sense, least of all the
reason why Bowie is in it.  Or Cooper, for that matter.
Before you can say "Huh?," the film cuts to a "One Year Later" sub-title,
we see the "Twin Peaks" sign, hear the haunting music from the show, and
meet Laura Palmer (Sheryl Lee), alive, well, and smiling from ear to ear as
she walks to school.  Little do we know, she has another side.  Over the
course of the rest of the film, she sleeps with a bunch of guys, hits on
her best female friend Donna (Lara Flynn Boyle in the show, but eerily
replaced by Moria Kelly in the film), does drugs, goes to a topless bar,
and all sorts of self-destructive acts.
She also finds discomfort at home.  Her father, Leland (Ray Wise), begins
acting all strange, or maybe he did it before, we don't know.  In the first
scene he's in, there's a really humorous scene where Laura and he fight
over the fact that she sat at the dinner table without (*gasp*) washing her
hands.  Her mother (Grace Zubriskie, who played Susan's mother on
"Seinfeld" for awhile) tries to cease the fight between them, but can't do
anything but scream for them to just stop.
Some critic said that this film showed Laura's gradual descent into
madness, and to her eventual murder at the end of the film (I will not
reveal the killer's identity, but I will say that the identity is so
obvious that it's campy).  This is not so.  We first see her looking all
happy, but we then see her doing all the kinds of stuff she does later on
too.  It seems like she's rebelling against something, and that she has
been doing this for awhile.  She starts out this way, and the only gradual
thing is how insane she becomes throughout the film.
Laura becomes plagued by nightmares, weird dreams, and visions.  She begins
seeing things in everyday life, like an old woman (Francis Bay) walking
around with a boy wearing a white mask.  She dreams of the red room from
the TV show, with the dwarf saying empty sentences.  And her death becomes
imminent not just because the TV show revolved around her death, but
because the film unsubtlely hints at it continuously.  Her sins in the film
become greater by the minute, and it seems that Lynch thinks that she needs
some kind of cleansing, that she was murdered because she was so rebellious
and ill-mannered.
Interesting subtexts like these abound, but are just part of the overall
weirdness that Lynch gives the film.  Along with this idea, there's bounds
of things that happen that have no relevance over anything that happens,
like Bowie's appearance, the red room, or the entire first half hour.  What
connects the elements of the film?  Why are we shown characters, like
Madchen Amick's waitress, who show up for a scene or two, are given a bit
of drama, and then are never shown again?  What is the meaning of the ring,
which seems to be the only thing that connects the beginning and rest of
the film?  And why is Laura haunted by a demon named Bob?
Some fans of Lynch say that he's a genius at work, and that everything
means something.  A friend of mine actually thinks that the TV show is
"brilliant," but when I asked him why he thought he was brilliant, all he
did was stutter.  I've come to the conclusion that David Lynch is a genius
at creating atmosphere and mood, and maybe even pretty competent at
bringing up interesting and complex issues about humanity and what not, but
that he has no clue what to do with them.  He knows that talking about
issues like the underbelly of society requires a delicate touch; he's just
afraid to take a wrong step.
This seems to be why he resorts to meaningless surrealistic banter, which
is exactly what everything in this film is.  Lynch is afraid of digging
deep within the story and issues, and instead just tosses empty symbolism
at us, maybe hoping that the whole pretentiousness of it all will make us
watch again and again to get a message, and also that the humor will win us
over.  For some of us, it does.  I laughed at this film.  I laughed at all
the weird things that went on, and that seems to be what Lynch wants.  Why
do you have a dwarf speaking backwards-yet-forwards if you don't want
someone to get a laugh out of it?
What Lynch could do is express something, anything out of this.  I love
surrealism, but only when it works the way it should.  Luis Bunuel was able
to dig deeper into his films by using surrealism, but Lynch uses it as a
cover so he doesn't have to really expose his film for what it is.  What is
"Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me" even about?  Is it about how
self-destructive behavior will eventually result in death?  Is it about how
underneath a seemingly happy society there's a sick underbelly of perverts
and drug addicts?  What is Lynch trying to convery here?
To put it bluntly, this film is a mess.  It doesn't know what it wants to
do with anything, and it tries to pass off everything in a surrealistic
fashion so that no one can see that underneath, it's just confused about
what it wants to be doing.  Surrealism needs focus to exist, or else it
just meanders off and becomes empty, which is what happens with many of
Lynch's films.  Especially now, Lynch needs to look back at two of his
films: "Eraserhead" and "Blue Velvet."  "Eraserhead" was a really surreal
film, but what it did by creating surrealism is show a character who is
completely alienated in society.  It was basically a stylish nightmare, but
it was great in how it was able to present its protagonist and the misery
he feels.  "Blue Velvet" was probably his most focused film: a film about
how underneath society is something which is hideous, but which is ignored
for the safety of society.  There, he was able to use the surrealism to his
advantage, and create not only an experience, but something with meaning
and even humanity.
"Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me" is an experience, in that several scenes
show mood, but none of them have the emotional or intellectual context to
take them further and make them meaningful.  There's a really long scene
where Laura and Donna go to a topless bar, and a band plays so loud that
subtitles have to appear on the bottom of the screen so we know what
everyone's saying.  The mood is great and the scene is atmospheric as hell,
but when it's over, nothing remains but the though that the scene felt
really weird to watch.  Nothing else holds over from it.
The one good thing the film does is create a little bit of sympathy for
Laura, mostly because she's the protagonist and we know that at the end,
she's going to die and there's no way out of it.  It gives it a Sophoclean
subtext, but this is only used as a cheap gimmick so that we feel bad for
her.  Sure, she's self-destructive, but she's going to be murdered
gruesomely, and there's nothing anyone in this film can do about it.
But why was she killed?  And what is this film, or the TV show about?  I
guess what it's saying is that underneath, everyone's weird.  Yeah.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Final Conflict, The (1981)
Director: Graham Baker
Writer: Andrew Birkin
Starring: Sam Neill, Lisa Harrow, Rossano Brazi, Don Gordon, Barnaby Holm,
Leueen Willoughby
"The Final Conflict" ends the "Omen" films as far as the story of Damien is
concerned (there's another one, but that's really not counted as one), and
sadly enough, it does it with an anticlimactic bang.  We've seen Damien
growing up, as people discovered that he's the antichrist, as well as
himself discovering that, and in this film he's all grown up, successful,
and fully aware of what he can do, and willing to do anything in his power
to see that the prophecies of the Book of Revelations, that says that he
will eventually perish, don't come true.  What a bore.
Or at least it shouldn't be.  If anything, the second "Omen" film proved
that despite a film being a total contradictory mess, it could at least be
worthy of some entertainment value.  This film can't even be very
fascinating.  Damien is now the slasher, instead of Satan, and this brings
about a huge problem: the first two, where Satan killed people, was
mysterious and eerie; here, when Damien kills people himself, it seems
bland.  The magic of the original films is definitely gone in this one.
"The Final Conflict" has to do with "The Great Recession," when Jesus'
second coming is supposed to take place, which is a big threat to the
now-30ish Damien (a younger Sam Neill), who's now filled the shoes of both
his father and uncle by not only being the Ambassador to England, but also
the head of the largest company in the world (or something like that). 
Damien wants to rule the world, and overcome the prophecy that says that
God will pervail, and luckily enough has a pretty nice-sized cult of
Satanists to back him up.
Also introduced are a group of monks, headed by Brother DeCarlo (Rossano
Brazzi, who was once a semi-star in the 40s and 50s - he was the lead in
the movie version of "South Pacific"), who have recovered the special
knives that need to be used to kill Damien right (although I think that the
whole killing-him-on-sacred-ground spiel has been voided, or at least
forgotten).  The first hour tracks their attempts to assasinate Damien
somehow, but instead of being competent monks with real passion and
intelligence in killing him, they come off as the Keystone Kops (get this:
one monk tries to kill him in a TV studio while he's being interviewed,
slips, has his foot caught in a stage rope, manages to blow something up,
sets himself on fire, and burns to death - HA!).
The film also tries to balance a cheap love story as well, dealing with
Damien's affair with a British journalist, Kate Reynolds (Lisa Harlow), who
actually sleeps with him (there's something to tell her girlfriends), but
finds that he's much more interested in her younger son (Barnaby
Holm)...for his successor.  Eventually, Kate is visited by DeCarlo, the
only surviving monk from the first half, who takes it on himself to
actually get some aide from others in his attempt to save the world.
The main thing that is wrong with this film is it's passionless.  Although
it still has Jerry Goldsmith's frightening and adrenalin-rushing score to
undertone everything, and even a couple great sequences, the film just lays
flat on screen and assumes that we're really fascinated by it's high level
of Christian paranoia, something that the other two films neatly worked
with.  There are fewer murders, as well as fewer scenes of general horror,
and it actually tries to come off as being a serious drama, and later on, a
part of propaganda for being a hearty follower of Christianity (it has not
one, but three passages from the bible posted on its screen at different
times).  The trilogy has moved from being a series about the rise and fall
of Damien or finding horror in the Holy Scriptures, and is now a serious
way of rounding up people to go to Church and pray for their souls.
This is sad because there are some really great moments in this film,
especially a frightening bit in the middle where we see Damien giving a
speech to legions of his followers, and them on the hunt to kill any male
child born on the night that Jesus was apparently born.  These are some of
the best moments of the trilogy, and it's sad that there weren't more like
them.
The thing is by the third film, and after probably seeing several films
about the coming of the antichrist (need I mention "Rosemary's Baby?"),
you're probably done being scared by the idea of the antichrist coming. 
And it's not like "The Final Conflict" gives you any other incentive for
being scared by it because it's not even a real horror film as much as it
is a bit of melodrama about ideas that are only scary on principle and not
so when put in a film like this.  "The Final Conflict" lacks the fun of the
other two, the way that they weren't afraid to be essentially paranoid
slasher films, and how they preyed on general Christian fears.  This one
tries to play it straight, to save the others from being too gory or
satanic, and instead, it comes off as being, well, lame.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Get Shorty (1995)
Director: Barry Sonnenfeld
Writer: Scott Frank (from the novel by Elmore Leonard) 
Starring: John Travolta, Gene Hackman, Rene Russo, Danny DeVito, Delroy 
Lindo, Dennis Farina, David Paymer, James Gandolfini, Martin Fererro, 
Miguel Sandoval, Linda Hart, Big Daddy Wayne, Bette Midler, Penny 
Marshall, and the immortal Harvey Keitel
>From the 30-some films based on best-selling pulp writer Elmore 
Leonard's books, this (and probably Quenitn's up-coming "Jackie Brown" 
based on Leonard's "Rum Punch") is probably the only Leonard book to 
ever actually be brilliant.  Most just play out his complex plots and 
get some pulp out of it (like the recent un-spectacular "Pronto," which 
was too TV-movie-esque, even for a TV movie) or make nonsense out of 
them (Burt Reynolds in "Stick" - ???).  But "Get Shorty" finally finds 
that nerve that Leonard has and even goes the next level with it - by 
making satire out of it.  
"Get Shorty" compares Hollywood and the crime business in a flawless 
satire which gets more fun and intriguing every time one watches it (so 
it's one of my faves of all time - this review ISN'T biased - swear to 
God).  John Travolta perfectly inhabits the character of Chili Palmer, 
an ultra-confident Shylock from Miami Beach who loves movies.  He can 
name "Rio Bravo" after hearing Dean Martin utter one line.  He can mouth 
the ending to Orson Welles' "Touch of Evil."  He can even quote lines 
from grade triple Z horror films.  He's basically the man, in my 
opinion.  I mean, even I can't mouth the words to the end of "Touch of 
Evil."
The story starts when Chili gets in trouble with a guy from another 
Miami mob - Ray "Bones" Barboni (the also flawless and highly underrated 
Dennis Farina) - who steals his $399 Serpico-esque black jacket in the 
beginning causing Chili to break his nose and later on shoot some of his 
scalp off.  Ray can't touch him because he's from another mob but 
Chili's mob boss dies from a stroke (or something) from a surprise 
party.  Now Chili is Ray's man and he sends him to fix a blank in his 
book having to do with a stupid dry-cleaner (David Paymer) who got lucky 
and missed a flight that blew up but everyone thinks he was on it and 
has taken his insurance money from his poor wife (who hates him anyway) 
and gone to Vegas (smart idea, let me tell you).  Chili goes out to get 
him but also has to pick up money from a grade triple Z "film" director, 
Harry Zimm (Gene Hackman).  Thus starts Chili's life in L.A, the 
Hollywood/Mafia satire and just the beginning of a typically complex 
Elmore Leonard plot (this is just the first 10 minutes, hang in there!).
Chili decides to stay out there and make movies with Harry Zimm, but 
quality movies.  Chili has pitched his story to Harry and he likes it a 
lot but he wants to make another one, a quality flick called "Mr. 
Lovejoy."  But all his money comes from a crooked Limo-service owner, Bo 
Catlett (the yet again, flawless and underrated Delroy Lindo), who gets 
sucked into the movie business after reading the "Mr. Lovejoy" 
screenplay but gets pushed away from Chili who just wants him to give 
the money and keep his nose in its on place.  Meanwhile, they're trying 
to get huge (yet short) movie star, Martin Weir (the flaw...hell, 
everybody's flawless - Danny DeVito) to be in it so they can get 
financing, and the only way to do it is to have Chili talk with him 
("I'm gonna put a gun to his head, say 'Sign the papers, Martin, or 
you're dead,' and that's it.") but also talk with Martin's ex, a grade 
triple Z movie actress, Karen Flores (Rene Russ - you know it...) whom 
Chili can quote from her crap flicks...and who he has a relationship 
with later on.
All these diverse characters come together in a character clash and by 
the end, people are dead and even crooks have switched from the mafia to 
making movies.  One of the great things the film shows is how easily 
crooks can be influenced by movies and movie actors can be influenced by 
crooks.  For one thing, Chili is a walking film encylcopedia who's every 
move has been influenced by a cornucopia of movies.  His jacket's from 
"Serpico," his slicked-back hair is from Michael Douglas in "Wall 
Street" (proving I read the book too), etc.  Yet when he goes to 
Hollywood, it is Hollywood that is influenced by him.  Immeadiately, 
Harry begins acting tough and saying Chili's trademark "Look at me" 
line...of course, he says it to the wrong person.  And after meeting 
him, Martin Weir is dressing like him and giving a pseudo-Chili look to 
everyone...even driving a replica of Chili's rented mini-van which was 
ironically a mistake.
But this satire would be dull if it didn't have a great screenplay, and 
this one actually quotes from the meister of criminal-lingo, Elmore 
Leonard (come on, you know Quentin was totally influenced by him).  
Travolta said in an interview that the screenplay took out all of his 
dialogue and shortened it.  For example, when Chili finds out his coat 
has been stolen, the script read "Where's my coat?  It cost me $400!" or 
something to that forte.  But Travolta claims he had them put it back to 
the long one of something like "Where's my long-sleeved, black lapel, 
with pockets and everything black jacket that looks like Al Pacino's in 
'Serpico?' 'Cause if you can't find it, you owe me $379!"  Again, I 
don't know the actual quotes, but you get the point that Elmore writes 
great dialogue.  His characters are well-defined and well portrayed by a 
wide assortment of character actors.  Even Gene Hackman plays a totally 
different character - a wannabe toughguy yet a wimp.  
Barry Sonnenfeld, who started out as a Coen Bros. cinematographer and 
later directed the two Addams Family Movies (the first one was okay, but 
the second one was classic) and the upcoming cool-movie-of-the-summer 
"Men in Black" - which looks so cool, it's orgasmic - well, he does an 
awesome job with the film, giving it that right pulp kick as well as 
showing a knack for creating priceless comic moments - from the big 
"Stuntman Fall in the fancy restaurant" to the very subtle stupid limo 
driver who shows a guy from Miami Beach the L.A. ocean.  He's a great 
director and should have gotten much more notice than he did for this 
film.
The best acting job from "Get Shorty" really goes to Travolta, who 
stands out at the top of a great cast (with cameos from Bette Midler 
and, as I said, the immortal Harvey Keitel).  He won the Golden Globe 
for Best Comedic Actor but really should have had a chance at the Oscar 
for his priceless work on this film.  He inhabits every quirk of his 
character and presents a character so likable and so utterly cool (that 
it hurts), that he just makes you applaud him at the end.  This film was 
the deciding factor in whether or not Travolta has actually "come back" 
even after stunning everyone in the world with "Pulp Fiction."  They 
couldn't have chosen a better film to show that he has come back - 
everyone went to see it for the man Travolta and even if they didn't 
like the complex plot and/or appreciate the brilliant black comedy or 
satire, they at least could see Travolta giving a commanding performance 
as one of a character so goddam cool he HAD to be named "Chili."
But the best part of it is all fo it.  It works so great as a whole that 
it is entertaining while it is intelligent.  Imagine that.  "Get Shorty" 
was arguably the best film to come out of 1995.  Thank God someone could 
make a perfect film that year.

Title
Review for Sleuth (1972)
Director: Joseph L. Mankiewicz
Writer: Anthony Shaffer (based on his play)
Starring: Laurence Olivier, Michael Caine, Alec Cawthorne
The beginning of "Sleuth" sums up the entire feel of the film: Milo Tindle
(Caine) arrives in a convertible to see famed mystery writer Andrew Wyke
(Olivier) but hears him talking into a recorder in the middle of a massive
garden maze.  Milo attempts to follow Andrew's voice through the numerous
passages in the garden, but cannot find access to where he is.  The only
way in is a secret that only Andrew knows, and for anyone looking for him
to perhaps stumble upon.  But it's not bloody likely.
Milo has come to see Andrew because he is having an affair with his wife,
and wants to talk to him about marrying her.  Instead of acting like an
asswhole about it, Andrew greets him nicely, offers him a drink, and almost
seems to agree with what Milo is saying.  However, he begins to lead him
off of the subject and gets him unknowingly into a game of wits all done by
conversation and convincing.  See, Andrew loves to play games that work on
the mind.  He has graduated from chess to more complex games, and has all
sorts of games throughout his mansion, including dolls that pop out of
nowhere on the cue of a button, and even a hidden safe that is only
accessible if you're coordinated.
He also loves to play with people.  The man is a mystery writer, and so we
know that he loves to manipulate his readers a bit.  If he didn't, he
probably wouldn't be as successful as he is.  And as the film goes on, we
see him convincing Milo to do something which seems silly, but because
Andrew is so convincing, he goes along with it.
So goes the rest of the film: a series of mind fucks not only on both the
characters on the other, but also on the audience.  One of the greatest
enjoyments in watching a play or a film or reading  a book is being
completely fooled only to find out that everything actually works out in
the end, it was just the way you were interpreting it.  Most people feel
cheated when they discover that things were manipulated so that the entire
dupe doesn't even work out in the end, but are amazed when facts are
miscontrued so that you just don't see everything that's going on.  When
games logically work out in the end, you'll find that people respect what
you've done to them and would love to go through it again.
This is what watching "Sleuth" is like.  It's basically a filmed stage
play, and it's better that way.  The entire film lives in the moment of its
language, the way that everything being said may have a double meaning, and
that you may be falling for something without knowing it.  And for two
great actors like Olivier and Caine, it's a chance to show off their acting
talents, and fascinate people with dialogue, not action.
The film runs about 2 hours and 20 minutes, but because the film is almost
entirely filled with dialogue, the film flies by, almost seeming too short.
 The action is only interupted once, by another actor named Alec Cawthorne,
a veteran of the British stage, who plays an inspector invesitgating
something which may or may not have occurred in the first hour.  And when
he interupts, you almost want him to go away so that the action can get
back to Caine and Olivier, who share an amazing amount of chemistry
together, much more than one would have thought.
Olivier and Caine are two great actors and they run wild with the dialogue,
penned by Anthony Shaffer, who adapted it from his play (which has to be a
blast to watch).  Both play their roles with lots of energy, taking lots of
liberties with the dialogue.  Olivier especially goes mad with his role,
tossing in all sorts of great asides and what-not.  It's not suprising that
both received Oscar nominations back in '73.
The film was directed Joseph L. Mankiewicz, a veteran Hollywood director
who has made such films as "All About Eve," "Guys and Dolls," and even the
mondo-budgeted "Cleopatra" with Elizabeth Taylor.  Here, he seems to be
just trying to make an entertaining film, not worrying much about the
grandness of the look, more worried about the dialogue.  He finds the right
note for the film, not interupting the film with many directorial traits,
but merely letting the film's characters tell the story.
But there's more: the film has a surprising amount of depth to it, depth
which doesn't insult our intelligence or become too overbearing that it
causes the film to collapse under itself.  The film is relentless in
showing the effects of man-made isolation, the need to be "above" everyone
else, and the wonderment of playing God with people, primarily because
you're more intelligent than most people.  Underneath all the fun is a
tragedy about a man who is exactly like this, but none of this becomes too
blatant or annoying, which would take away from the film vastly.
"Sleuth" is a film that most people have not heard of today, but anyone who
sees it is guaranteed a film that is so vastly entertaining that it's
almost a pity when the 140 minutes are over.  Every second of this film is
worth watching, and every twist and turn is a shock but not an insult. 
Part of the fun of watching a stage play is living in the moment.  I have
never seen a film that lives more in the moment than "Slueth."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Nineteen Eighty-Four (1984)
Director: Michael Radford
Writer: Michael Radford (Based on the novel by George Orwell)
Starring: John Hurt, Suzanna Hamilton, Richard Burton, Cyril Cusack
George Orwell is probably one of the greatest writers of all time.  And 
his "1984" is probably his best (although I might argue it could be 
"Animal Farm").  The novel, written around 1948, I think, is a bleak 
story of a future where there is peace but the expense is a totalitarian 
state where everyone is miserable and afraid because there are TVs 
everywhere where "Big Brother" watches so you don't do anything 
treasonous.  It's a frightening idea and pretty much illustrates that 
"Give Peace a Chance" might be a bad idea.
Michael Radford (director of "Il Postino") directed this film, 
ironically made in 1984 within the dates the book took place.  He paints 
a futuristic world which doesn't resemble anything else before.  There 
are no flying cars, monorails, or anything.  The world is just a ruin 
with run-down buildings and plain old buses and what-not.  In every 
room, there is a big television where Big Brother, the symbol of the 
state, is watching and the Thought Police are always the threat of even 
thinking of a treasonous act.
Our protagonist is Winston Smith (John Hurt), who really looks like he 
has been beaten down by the state in all senses of the word.  He is a 
state worker who rewrites history the way the government wants it and in 
his spare time, writes in a journal about his dreams of having rampant 
sex, which is prohibited.  One of his co-workers, Parsons (Gregor 
Fisher), is the symbol of the ultimate defeat of the state, since he is 
constantly telling of his love for everything that embodies Big Brother. 
 In one darkly humorous scene, he talks about the processed meat and how 
it isn't even meat and that's why it's good.
Winston runs into (literally) a woman named Julia (Suzanna Hamilton) 
who's also a government worker and who passes him a note (Hello?  Junior 
High?) saying she loves him and wants to meet him.  They carefully plan 
their meetings and end up having intense sex in a far off place where no 
one, not even Big Brother is watching.  Their sex is not actually about 
love, but as a form of rebellion and expression of their way to 
anti-supress themselves.  They try to join the rebellion, headed by an 
O'Brien (Richard Burton, in his final performance), but that turns out 
to wind them up in prison and a torture sequence on Winston where he is 
beaten into admitting that 2 + 2 doesn't equal 4 and stuff like that.  
It's a horrific scene in all senses of the word.
"1984" the film works because it wonderfully embodies the bleakness that 
was the book.  All of the scenes are drearily set and the film is as 
depressing and thought-provoking as the book...well, maybe not as 
thought-provoking.  And John Hurt and Richard Burton are fabulous in 
their respective parts.
I highly reccomend this film for anyone who loved the book, but for 
anyone else, it's not going to be fun.  It's a highly depressing film 
that is so dark that you might have to watch it in two sittings.  But 
the message is still there and that's what counts.  If you want a 
livelier film (and a better one, in my opinion), try Terry Gilliam's 
"Brazil."  But this one will do if you're looking for a good 
intellectual film.

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
Director: Joel Coen
Writers: Joel and Ethan Coen
Starring: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, David Huddleston, Julianne Moore,
Steve Buscemi, Peter Stormare, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Tara Reid, Flea,
John Turturro, David Thewlis, Ben Gazzara, Leon Russom, Jon Polito, Sam
Elliott
The first thing a fan of the Coen Brothers' previous effort, "Fargo," must
do is completely obliterate any recollection of that film and brace one's
self for a film that is arguably the most wacky film they've ever made. 
With a bigger budget, more refined sets, and a wide release on its opening
release date, this film could easily be too awesome for its own good.  The
Brothers Coen could get too ambiguous and too wild with money and make a
total mess of a film, much like Danny Boyle's "A Life Less Ordinary," his
film following the brilliant "Trainspotting."
"The Big Lebowski" is a mess, but my god, what a wonderful mess of a film. 
The film is as disjointed, overly-exaggerated, incredibly weird, and as
disconnected from reality as its protagonist, L.A.'s most lazy and
self-centered human being.  This wonderful person is named Jeff Lebowski (a
long-haired, scuzzy Jeff Bridges), otherwise and preferably referred to as
"The Dude."  We don't learn much about this man, but he lives in a big L.A.
house, goes bowling every couple of hours, drinks White Russians as much as
he can, smokes pot regularly, and is unemployed.  Only in L.A.
One night, the Dude comes home to find a pair of hoodlums who attack him,
asking for some money that he has no idea he stole from them.  To be tough,
one of the men piss on his favorite rug before realizing that they got the
wrong Lebowski.  See, there's another Lebowski in town who's rich, referred
to as "The Big Lebowski" (Charles Durning's dead ringer, David Huddleston,
who was Grandpa Arnold on "The Wonder Years"), and his young nymphomaniac
gold digger wife, Bunny (Tara Reid), apparently owes money all over town,
and that's why the men came to beat up Lebowski.
The Dude's visit to the Big Lewbowski's mansion to get paid for the
pissed-on rug is what becomes the catalyst for the rest of the story, which
really takes off once the Big Lebowski receives a ransom note from some
unknown assailants who claim to have kidnapped the now-missing Bunny. 
Since the Dude met the people (in the first scene) who the Big Lebowski
believes kidnapped his wife, he asks him to be the courrier for the million
dollars he needs delivered to them so he identify them for him.  From this
point on, the plot goes completely wacky, and to reveal what happens
further would minimize most of the fun, which is so weird and wacky that
it's unbelievable.
What the Coen's do best is crete a world disconnected completely from
reality.  No one in their world is supposed to be an exact duplicate of a
real person; they're all distinct eccentric characters who live completely
out of reality.  "The Big Lebowski"'s best feature is the wide assortment
of characters, which is probably the best set they've ever had for a movie.
 Every character is different from everyone else, and each of them is fully
allowed to be their own person.  Even cameo characters are brilliantly
realized.
The most fascinating character is that of the Dude's one bowling partner,
Walter (John Goodman), who was apparently shell shocked in Vietnam (as he
constantly reminds everyone around him), and handles his bowling league
like it was a religion.  He gets so into trying to help the Dude in his
giant dilemna that he ends up making things worse, yet never becomes an
annoying character.  Of the four characters Goodman's played in the four
films he's been in this year alone thus far (can you believe it?), this is
probably his most electric and best performance.
Other characters include: the Big Lebowski's bitter freaky artist daughter,
Maude (Julianne Moore), who tries to help the Dude in several ways; Donny
(Steve Buscemi), the more reserved bowling league partner who always seems
to be out of touch with what's going on; Brandt (Philip Seymour Hoffman,
the boom mike guy with a crush on Dirk from "Boogie Nights"), the Big
Lebowski's hallowed assistant; a wealthy porn producer (Ben Gazzara); and a
group of Sweedish (or German) "nihilists," one of them played by Flea, and
another played by "Fargo"'s Peter Stormare (Gaer Grimsrud), who shows up in
other places throughout to high comic effect.  In smaller cameos are a
hispanic bowling competitor of the Dude's named Jesus (John Turturro), who
makes bizarre threats each time we see him; and an arty friend of Maud's
played by a John Waters-looking David Thewlis.  Oh.  And Sam Elliott stars
as the on-again/off-again narrator, who mocks the process by sometimes
forgetting what he's going to say, and popping up in the story from time to
time.  As you can see, this is one hell of a character line-up.
The plot itself is all over the place, filled with gaping holes, and
unfolded in a leisurely, weird pace.  The film, though, never suffers by
it, and in fact, is better off being this way.  It's a film that may be
weird a lot of the time, and sometimes just plain incoherent, but for those
who can appreciate it, it's a wild, wild ride.  Everything in the film is
exaggerated, and played for the highest comic effect, so much that after
about an hour it almost hurt to laugh.  This is easily the funniest film of
the year thus far, which, when you think of it, is not great feat.
The acting from everyone is brilliant, as everyone is given a character
they can play around with.  John Goodman is easily the best supporting
character, while everyone else does marvelous work with their respective
characters, each giving them individual quirks to make them more
fascinating.  Julianne Moore gives her character a faux-Euro Trash accent,
while Philip Seymour Hoffman seems to have a smile surgically frozen on his
face.  John Turturro oozes with camp, while Steve Buscemi brilliantly
maneurvures through a role where he has to be told to shut the fuck up
every time he speaks.
But the actor who really gives the film some depth is Jeff Bridges, who is
absolutely brilliant as the Dude.  His character is not at all the most
fascinating character, but he's the one who sets the tone for everything to
come.  Bridges is a very talented actor, and here, he's at his comic best,
being completely aware of his slothness, and still not caring about it.  He
makes the Dude the film's most likable character, and is completely
believable every step of the way.
So what's this film about?  To tell you the truth, I'm not really sure.  It
could be a criticism of America's slothness, or a paen to it, as the Dude's
the film's most moral and sympathetic character in a film filled with crazy
people who do way too much.  Or maybe it's a film about trying to find a
happy medium between the two.  Whatever it's about, the thing about this
film is to just sit back and enjoy the ride.  The only problem is not the
lack of any real substance, but the fact that it does go on too long.  By
the end, I was just waiting for it to end, even though once I got there, I
was kinda disappointed.  But the completely wacky and lazy storytelling,
which jumps all over the place at will, is done so to show the world of the
Dude the best.
"The Big Lebowski" is not one of the Coens' best film.  But even the Coen's
worst is still one hell of a film, and this is the weakest Coen film since
"The Hudsucker Proxy," and therefore still pretty amazing.  Anyone
expecting a "Fargo" is at the wrong film.  But if one lets themselves go,
"The Big Lebowski" is outrageously fun entertainment, even if it doesn't
seem to have a purpose.  Oh well.  That's what you get for going to see a
comedy.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Batman Returns (1992)
Director: Tim Burton
Writer: Daniel Walters
Starring: Michael Keaton, Michelle Pfeiffer, Danny DeVito, Christopher 
Walken, Michael Gough, Michael Murphy, Pat Hingle, Vincent Schiavelli, 
Paul Reubens
"Batman Returns" is probably one of the most ballsiest moves in 
Hollywood history: They took a formula that was dark but very light and 
made the film intensely dark and brooding.  But of course, you have at 
your realm the bizarre Tim Burton who does one thing Hollywood's way 
then turns around and does what you're not supposed to do.  For example: 
he made the brilliant "Ed Wood" and turned around and made an Ed Wood 
film, "Mars Attacks!"  While this was probably his only mistake, it's 
still not a bad film and perfectly exercises what Tim's all about - 
being unique.
This is what he goes for with his sequel for the schweppervescent 
"Batman" from 1989 - a film where all the villains are sympathetic to 
some degree.  The Joker wasn't a sympathetic character - just a wildly 
fun villain to root for.  His villains are all reclusive, misunderstood 
people, some who do the wrong thing for a good cause.  Bruce Wayne 
(Micheal Keaton, again) has apparently lost Vicki (maybe why he's 
brooding again) but he falls deeply in love with a girl, Selena Kyle 
(Michelle Pfeiffer), who works for an evil industrialist, Max Schreck 
(Christopher Walken).  Little does he know that Selena found out about 
Max's evil plans to do something bad and selfish with electricity and he 
threw her out of a window.  She was a cat lover and becomes a catwoman 
after all these cats bite her wounds (I don't get it either).  She has 
nine lives, is a tad insane now and constructs a tight leather costume 
for herself and carries a whip when she goes out at night to destroy Max 
Shreck and beat up thugs.  But her real persona is in love with Bruce.  
But little does she know, he's Batman.  This is the most intriguing 
subplot in any of the Batmans and is handled magnificently.
Meanwhile, the Penguin (Danny DeVito), a deformed man who was thrown 
into the sewers by his priggish parents (one of them being Paul Reubens) 
when he was an infant, has decided to rise and woo everyone so he can go 
into office and help Max Schreck do his dastardly deeds.  He's seen as a 
sympathetic character because he's so reclusive and utterly ugly.  He 
has legions of penguins and circus freaks at his side too, so he can war 
against Batman.
Tim Burton carefully constructs the story and adds his great 
psychological depth to the film.  The fight scenes between Catwoman and 
Batman have whole new dimensions because we know that they will be 
fooling around as Selena and Bruce on a couch later on.  When they find 
out, it's one of the most intense scenes in recent action hero history, 
as they are dancing with one another.  And the action sequences are 
amazing to watch, although not as cool as the first one.
The acting is basically stolen by Michelle Pfeiffer.  Yes, Michael 
Keaton rocks once again as Batman, and Danny DeVito is a great Penguin 
and Christopher Walken is at first laughable with his Eraserhead hair, 
but he also rules.  But Michelle is just amazing.  Every move is 
unpredictable, every line is said perfectly and she makes her character 
so seductive, she could make Uma Thurman's Poison Ivy look like Mr. 
Freeze.  Her performance ranks up there with Jack Nicholson's in the 
first one.
This sequel dares to be different, dares to be dark and depressing and 
still has some of the great wit of the original.  It also dares to have 
sympathetic characters and ends with one of them still lurking around 
(hopefully to be brought back).  I highly reccomend this one for being 
fun and still very deep.

Title
Review for Henry & June (1990)
Director: Philip Kaufman
Writers: Philip and Rose Kaufman (based on the diaries of Anais Nin)
Starring: Maria de Medeiros, Fred Ward, Uma Thurman, Richard E. Grant,
Kevin Spacey
I've never read the literature of either Henry Miller or Anais Nin, but
after watching this film, I wouldn't mind it.  Judging from this film,
their works seem like they'd be highly sexual, and very liberating.  As
a film, it is both of these, and incredibly hypnotic and unbelievably
surreal.  Yes, it has its flaws, but its direction makes up for all of
that.
Starting off with the hypnotic and affecting beginning to Stravinsky's
"Rite of the Spring," we get to see the world from the eyes of neither
Henry or June, but rather someone who knew them both intimately, writer
Anais Nin (as in "The Diary of..."), who is played by the round-faced
Maria de Medeiros (who would go on to play Fabienne in "Pulp Fiction"). 
In the beginning, she discusses her discovery of sex thorugh literature
and pictures, then is kissed by her therapist.  Thus begins a
surreal-as-hell film that is not only highly sexually arousing and
liberating, but also the first film to ever be rated NC-17.
Anias (pronounced An-ay-iss) lives in France with her banker husband,
Hugo (Richard E. Grant, equipped with a fake American accent, which
makes him sound robotic and like he's been dubbed as if he's in some
porn movie), who is kind of boring (I think "exciting banker" is an
oxymoron), but nevertheless loves his wife, and is working his butt off
so she can write.  One day, he brings home two writers to see Anais,
since she's written an essay in defense of D.H. Lawrence (one of the
first writers to write about sex): -- (a younger Kevin Spacey), a
bizarre kinda guy who's very horny, and is constantly bitching about his
ideas and works being ripped off by others; and Henry Miller (Fred
Ward), who was one of the primary writers of the 20th century, famous
for his book "Tropic of Cancer," which he writes during the tenure of
the film.
Anais is fascinated by Henry (who pronounces her name "An-iss"
throughout the film), and soon begins hanging out with him.  Henry is
incredibly promiscuous, viewing sex as a part of life, so who cares who
he sleeps with?  He's obsessed with a woman who just happens to be his
wife - June (a young Uma Thurman) - who's picture, which in front of his
desk, features her doing a kind of Malcolm MacDowell "Clockwork Orange"
look which sends shivers down anyone's spine, and is one of the most
arousing things I've seen (no, she's not naked in it).
Anais, who's sex life is near boring (Hugo occasioanally works up the
strength to boink her), starts a free relationship with Henry, who
sexually liberates her, and she also finds herself attracted totally to
June, all the while being attracted to Henry also.  She often compares
herself to both of them at different times, but seems to be the enzyme
to fuel their anger towards eachother.  Thus begins a melodramatic
little subplot between the three of them (who never end up in a menage a
trois, sorry guys).
The story, which was based on Anais Nin's diaries, is true, but is told
in one hell of a surrealistic fashion.  Characters wander in an out of
the storyline, sometimes showing up for no real reason (example: Kevin
Spacey, who shows up to complain here and there, but doesn't have any
real necessity to the plot).  And Anais's relationship with her husband
is never really explained in full.  He starts off boring, then catches
up with her, then disappears till the final scene.
There are scenes which are so bizarre that they're creepy (examples: a
dream sequence where Anais dreams of having sex with June, but then
feels her, um, penis; and a trip to a brothel where Anais and Hugo pay
to watch two girls do it, which is shot through a mirror).  And there
are several truly disturbing shots, as well as a lot of sex.  And not
just sex, but there's a lot of sex talk and eroticism throughout the
film.
The direction is the best part of the film.  Phillip Kauffman (who also
directed "The Unbearable Lightness of Being") makes every scene filled
with the perfect amount of atmosphere needed, and makes the sex in the
film actually erotic.  The cinematography is gorgeously done (it was
nominated for an Oscar), and the film maintains that surrealistic
approach throughout.  It's one of the most truly hypnotic films I've
ever seen.
The acting is not great, but is nevertheless very good.  Maria de
Medeiros does a fantastic job creating the complex Anais, showing that
kind of frailty that makes her likable and interesting.  Uma Thurman has
a very small part (although quite major to the story and characters),
but creates one of the truly sexy characters I've ever seen.  And she's
never even naked in the film (although I saw the side of one of her
breasts).  Her look, her voice (which is deep and with a Brooklyn
accent), and her just overall grace is one of the most erotic things
I've ever seen.  Kevin Spacey, although having a very small part, is
quite the little scene stealer, making his bizarre part comical and
welcome whenever he shows up and for whatever reason.
Fred Ward, however, steals the film with his flamboyant performance as
Henry.  He grunts most of his words, kind of like a brute, but possesses
a lot of depth in his performance, nailing a lot of the complexity that
is Henry Miller.  I read that Alex Baldwin was supposed to play Henry. 
Well, Alec's a good actor and all, but he's not right for this role. 
Ward is wonderful in the role, and it sure seems like it was his only
truly great role.  So far.
So, anyway, does this film deserve the NC-17 rating, or was it just a
bit of promtion to get people to actually see a lavishly produced piece
of arty porn?  Well, yes, it's damn near porn, but no, it's not
excessive like porn - more like tasteful and actually erotic porn. 
Whether or not it good have slipped in at an R rating is questionable
though.  I mean, it's telling the story of Henry Miller, for Christ's
sake.  Anyone who knows anything about "Tropic of Cancer" has to know
that it's a book about sexual liberation.  There's not a ton of sex in
it, and when it is, it's not excessive (although there's a couple lesbo
scenes), but just for what it's presenting...well, I guess it needed an
NC-17 rating.  Yes, content wise, it couldn't have, but it just seems
right that way.
Yes, it has its problems, like any film that dares to talk about sex in
such a frank manner, but it's a truly hypnotic film which resonates
eroticism, which is what it was trying to do.  So while it didn't do a
lot for the NC-17 rating and commerciability thereof, it certainly
achieves what the actual film was trying to do.  Well, in my book, it
did.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Bananas (1971)
Director: Woody Allen
Writers: Woody Allen and Mickey Rose
Starring: Woody Allen, Louise Lasser, Carlos Montalban, Howard Cosell, 
Charlotte Rae, Sylvester Stallone, Roger Grimsby
Before Woody Allen was making thoughtful neurotic character studies like 
"Hannah and Her Sisters" and intense dramas like "Crimes and 
Misdemeanors," Woody Allen was a comedian.  He wrote for several shows 
and even did stand-up.  He created the prototype for what would inspire 
MST3K (called "What's Up, Tiger Lily?") and directed bizarre, 
surrealistic comedies with several kinds of jokes being shot at the 
audience at high speeds.  "Bananas" is one of his better ones, albeit a 
very convoluted one.
The story, which is a backdrop for expressing some of the Woodster's 
views on politics, rebellion and love, moves harshly from area to area. 
 At one point, he'll be in New York, then he'll go to the figmented 
South American country of San Marcos.  He starts the film off as a 
products tester, becomes a rebel and then the President of San Marcos 
then a married man.  It's like this man has more of a life than Zelig 
and in less time.  
The film starts off with a parody of political assasinations and the 
Wide World of Sports (eh?).  Howard Cosell (giving a riveting 
performance as himself) is down in San Marcos covering the assasination 
of its president and interviews the dying man (getting his last words) 
and then the new dictator, General Vargas (Carlos Montalban, brother of 
Ricardo).  The film goes to its silly titles (with a great Latino/Latina 
score by Marvin Hamlisch) and then introduces Fielding Mellish (Woody), 
a neurotic, insecure little loser who works as a products tester where 
they test out horribly inane machines, like the "Execucisor," a desk 
with weights and a basketball net that starts to physically harass 
Fielding.
We follow him around a bit as he gets into all kinds of trouble.  
Perhaps the funniest scene in the entire hilarious film takes place when 
Fielding enters a magazine store with the intention of buying 
pornography but is embarrassed because it is a very public place.  He 
grabs a bunch of nice magazines (Time, The National Review...) and puts 
the magazine "Orgasm" at the bottom.  When he goes up to the register, 
he casually stands there as the cashier sorts through them for prices.  
But he stumbles on "Orgasm" and shouts out to his co-worker, "How much 
is a copy of 'Orgasm?' This man wants to buy a copy."  It's a hilarious 
scene done perfectly.
We also see a lovely silent performance from Sly Stone as a young man 
(looking faintly like Matt LeBlanc...bad omen for him) terrorizing 
people on a subway car...including the Woodster.  He's not hard to find, 
trust me.  To see him is alone a good reason to see this film.
Fielding meets the rebellious Nancy (Louise Lasser, of "Mary Hartman, 
Mary Hartman" fame) and is smitten at first sight.  He follows her 
around, takes her to dinner, goes to political rallies with her, and 
ultimately sleeps with her in a hilarious scene (He: "I love you, I love 
you, I love you." She: "Oh, say it in french.  Oh, please, say it in 
french." He: "I don't know french.  What about Hebrew?")  But she breaks 
up with him for obvious reasons which she can't put into words (but we 
get a good 5-minute scene out of it with some of Woody's funniest 
dialogue).  He's so depressed that he decides to go to San Marcos, which 
was the country she was trying to help out.
The rest of the film has him in San Marcos, becoming a rebel reluctantly 
then becoming its President since no one can do that job.  He ultimately 
goes home to get money for San Marcos and winds up in court in the 
funniest court room sequence before "People Vs. Larry Flynt."  He tosses 
in so many jokes that the film requires multiple viewings to see them 
all.  The film is very short (82 minutes), but it seems a tad 
overloaded.  Still, all the jokes work out, unlike "Take the Money and 
Run," which was a 1:2 ratio.  
The film also works on a satirical level with the government/rebel 
thing, but not as well as in his later "Sleeper."  His plot seems to 
move around just for the sake of jokes.  But how can anyone not laugh at 
the hilarious lines, like the one where the U.S. sends troops to the 
rebellion and the one soldier asks what side they're fighting for and 
the commander or someone replies with, "The American government is not 
taking any chances.  Some of us are fighting for; some are fighting 
against."  The acting by Woody is outstanding, but the others really 
aren't.  They're okay, but they don't get much to work with.  Most of 
the good lines go to Woody, and he does them perfectly, in his neurotic 
tradition.
"Bananas" is a contender for Woody's funniest film and it is definitely 
one that gets laughs the whole way through.  It may be incredibly uneven 
and the plot might be weak, but at least all the jokes work.

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
Director: Bryan Singer
Writer: Brandon Boyce (based on the novella by Stephen King)
Starring: Ian McKellen, Brad Renfro, Bruce Davison, Ann Dowd, Joshua
Johnson, Elias Kosteas, David Schwimmer, Joe Morton, Jan Tríska, Michael
Byrne, Heather McComb, James Karen
There must be something about Stephen King's collection of novellas
entitled "Different Seasons."  From this collection, we've gotten "Stand
by Me" and "The Shawshank Redemption" (based on "The Body" and "Rita
Hayworth and the Shawshank Redemption," respectively), two of the best
King adaptations that have been filmed (which, if you can remember all
the King adaptations, isn't really saying a lot).  This collection
doesn't dabble in the usual King cliches, like supernatural monsters,
but rather stems from real human horror.  "The Body" is a poignant and
totally original coming-of-age story, and "Rita Hayworth and the
Shawshank Redemption" tells an outrageous story about a 19-year-long
escape from prison that deals more with the characters who have eerily
adapted to life there and can't function anywhere else.  Who thought
King was so philosophically interested in humanity?
"Apt Pupil" is sandwiched between both of these in the book, and deals
with a fascinating topic.  In it, a 16-year old genius high school
student named Todd Bowden blackmails a man he believes to be a Nazi War
Criminal in hiding into not giving him money but rather teaching him
about what it was like in the concentration camps.  I haven't read it
(yet), but the key to this film is Todd is already rather evil himself,
having taken the time to make sure the man is who he is, and then
forcing him to unearth his old wounds, and that by hearing about the
man's evil deeds from his past, he begins to get a better hold on his
own personal evil.
That's all well and good, but that doesn't mean this film is necessarily
very good.  Just because a film has a neat philosophy doesn't mean that
that cancels out all the problems with it, such as this film's main
problem, a weak script.  The film opens rather well, though, showing
Todd (played by Brad Renfro, the kid from "The Client," that painfully
mediocre Grisham film adaptation) as not totally at odds with his own
inner evil.  He's a senior, despite his age, and is rather shy though
slightly popular (he has to be: his best friend is played by Joshua
Jackson from "Dawson's Creek," and he actually looks like James Van Der
Beek's younger brother).  He's studying the Holocaust in his History
class, which piques his interest so much that he studies it after
school.
One day he sees a man on a bus that looks like an older version of one
of the pictures of a concentration camp torturer, and becomes obsessed
with him.  When we next see him, he's accumulated all the facts into one
folder, and has successfully blackmailed the man, one Arthur Denker,
who's really a man named Kurt Dussander.  He agrees to tell him all the
stories (which we never hear with one exception - and that exception is
about as creepy as the film gets), but soon the plot twists as Todd
grows more and more in control of his evil, and Kurt digresses into his
old state.
Well, that's how it should be.  The Dussander regression is rather good
for a bit, mostly because the performance comes from none other than
Brit actor Ian McKellen, a brilliant thespian who's performance in
1995's "Richard III" ranks among one of the best of the decade (and one
of the best villains of all time).  He represents all that's great with
the film, slowly allowing his old self to seep in, but at the same time
coming across so mysteriously that he may have been that way all the
time.  When he tells his stories, we sense that he really did enjoy it
and took a sick pride in his work.
But as good as McKellen is, the film suffers from being too much like a
sustained ascent to whatever in the first half, then an anticlimactic
anti-delivery in the second half.  The meetings go on for awhile,
without much insight, and Renfro, who's very good, is left with a
characterization which is too erratic for him to really get a good grip
on his performance, and therefore the first half allows us to be a tad
disappointed in what this film is really trying to tell us.  Is he
really getting a good grip on his own evil, even though he was able to
blackmail a man brilliantly when others couldn't?  Renfro goes all out
in his performance, making him a real bastard, and we wonder if we
should like him or the crotchety old man being blackmailed...and then
other times it's the other way around.
More conflicts are risen, like ones involving his presence at school,
and more importantly, his slipping grades, which are allegedly the
result of him having nightmares as a result of hearing those darned
stories (we can't really get into this because we don't hear the stories
either, but that would require, I guess, someone sitting down with an
actual Nazi War Criminal, which just isn't worth it if it's just going
to be in a silly little film).  Enter Guidance Counselor Edward French,
played by a moustached and surprisingly effective David Schwimmer
(looking like a dorkier Groucho Marx in a short-sleeved shirt), who
begins to try and help him, and only gets himself more involved in the
plot.
The second half, which should bring about the breaking point, instead
brings some really cheap moments of suspense tossed in for
suspense-sake, such as the murders of a wounded pigeon, a cat (this
isn't really resolved though, for whatever reason), and finally, a bum
looking for a drink, somewhere to sleep, and a couple bucks, and is
willing to do anything to get it (played by a very effective Elias
Kosteas).  All of these reduce the film to literal terms, rather than
really exploring the horror within, not to mention that they're there
for audience appreciation rather than anything deeper.  By the time the
film is quoting and misinterpreting John Donne, the film has become one
of those films that takes the easy way out after a perhaps promising
beginning, making the wait rather unworth it.
Still, there are good parts.  The acting is very good, especially from
McKellen and Renfro, who succeed despite some characterization problems
they had nothing to do with.  The direction and all things technical are
the real plus side.  Directed by Bryan Singer, who directed the
contemporary classic, "The Usual Suspects," the film just looks good.
His shots are well-developed, and his inclusion of a controversial high
school shower scene, which morphs between reality and Todd's images of
holocaust victims, is shallow but emotionally effective (just what is
this supposed to be telling us about his character?).  The
cinematography is excellent, and the juxtaposing finale is particularly
creepy.
Therefore, "Apt Pupil" is a modest failure.  It's moments are really
effective, but they fit like pieces from different jigsaw puzzles,
making up a portrait that doesn't quite work.  Still, it has some really
nice throaway moments that make it great, particularly the revelation
that all old German WWII survivors love American cartoons and comedy
(the sight of McKellen loosing it while watching Mr. Magoo is especially
amusing), which makes it just enough to be marginally likable, but just
not totally effective as a disturbing piece of insightful cinema...or as
part of the "Different Seasons" collection.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Buffalo '66 (1998)
Director: Vincent Gallo
Writers: Vincent Gallo and Alison Bagnall (story by Gallo)
Starring: Vincent Gallo, Christina Ricci, Angelica Huston, Ben Gazzara,
Kevin Corrigan, Mickey Rourke, Rosanna Arquette, Jan-Michael Vincent
For some odd reason, many filmmakers these days are stearing away from
making what are commonly referred to as the "self-indulgent" films.  The
personal films of the 70s, where directors explored their own insecurities,
fears, hang-ups, et. al. has all but disappeared, even from the independent
and art house films, where they used to flourish.  So when some director
steps forth, who's not Woody Allen, and makes a film that's, well,
self-indulgent, we all gasp at it, and some of us even go ahead and
criticize it for being such a way.  Not me, though.
"Buffalo '66" is a very self-indulgent film.  It's director and co-writer,
Vincent Gallo, has crafted a film that deals with his own hang-ups, and is
done in an extremely personal way, as if we're living inside the mind of
Gallo and being brought his own little insecurities and hang-ups without
any filtration.  We see scenes that go on for what seems like eternity.  We
take little side-steps and visit places that have nothing to do with the
story, and occasionally a moment will pop up when something bizarre will
happen and after awhile just stop.  At one point, the lights dim and the
entire film comes to a screeching hault so that one character can do a tap
dance, as if it were straight out of a Marx Brothers movie where Harpo used
to play his harp for no reason whatsoever.  Why did he put this in?  Don't
ask me.  But I kinda liked it.
As it's self-indulgent, "Buffalo '66" has a very improvisational feel to
it.  It's as if Gallo came up with an idea and then began to just stick
with the first thoughts that came into his head.  Gallo stars in the film
as a man named Billy Brown, and when we first meet him, he's being released
from a multi-year prison sentence.  We wait with him a bit as he lays down
on a bench, and frames are pasted on top of the surface frame, and we see
glimpses of his prison life.  He then gets up and asks if he can use the
bathroom in the prison, but is coldly turned away.  So goes the odyssey of
finding a bathroom in Buffalo, New York.
Yes, the film picks up.  It even adopts what could be called "a high
concept" concept: Billy stumbled into a tap dancing place, and suddenly
kidnaps a blond woman who's tapping there, Layla (Christina Ricci, who's
battling Parker Posey for the title of "Queen of Indies" these days), and
forces her to act as his wife when he goes home to meet his surburban
parents, who have no clue he's been in prison at all.  Unbelievably enough,
she goes along with it, and as Billy's mom and dad (Angelica Huston and Ben
Gazzara) have soon welcomed her into the family that never really accepted
Billy.
But the film doesn't stop here, and we begin to slowly and sporadically
learn a lot about Billy's past via unannounced flashbacks that first appear
as superimposed scenes then take up the rest of the frame.  We learn that
Billy had a horrific childhood, that his mother was too obsessed with the
Buffalo Bills to really care about him, and that his dad has a terrible
short temper.  In one frightening flashback, we see Billy's dad kill his
puppy for peeing on the rug one too many times, and in one darkly comic
flashback, we see his mother feed him chocolate when she should damn well
know that he's allergic to it.
We also discover that Billy made a moronic bet on the Bills, and that his
punishment was to go to prison for someone else at the request of his
Bookie (Mickey Rourke, in a nice cameo).  We also see that the film may
result in a violent finale, one that it plays with dangerously, and it
seems that the film, in the end, can go in two different directions, both
which are contrived, but one that's at least satisfying.
What Gallo's film does that many self-indulgent films don't do is openly
deal with it, and in the end, reach a level of contrivance that saves it
from ultimately being whiny.  The point, it seems, that Gallo is making
here is that sometimes, we're so self-absorbed, so worrying about our
little insecurities, such as what will our parents think of us, or how will
I get my dignity back, that we often to realize that happiness is right at
our fingertips.  The film's true masterstroke is that character of Layla,
who is hardly a realistic person but is more a fantasy for Billy.  Ricci
spends the majority of the movie with an expression of understanding and
un-patronizing sympathy, and when she begins to become enthusiastic about
helping Gallo, we only gradually notice that she's actually falling in love
with him, for whatever reason it may be.
For Gallo, this is not so much a brilliantly-tuned autobiographical study,
which is what is many critics' receptions, but really a very excellent
debut, not to mention a very mature debut.  He has all the flair of an
original director, one which I'd be interested in following because he
never lets anything get in the way of what he wants to do.  He wants to
have a scene where Layla tap dances in a bowling alley?  Why not, let's put
it in there.  He wants to spend five minutes doing an unbroken scene in a
photo booth between Billy and Layla?  What the hell, run with it.  And he
wants to interupt scenes with flashbacks that explain what's going on when
the audience should know it?  Definitely.
I expect there will be more better things from Gallo in the future.  He's
built a tiny career out of working with really experimental and weird
directors, everyone from Abel Ferrara to freaking Kiefer Sutherland, and
now he joins their ranks with a debut that is a little shaky, but
nevertheless extremely engrossing, saddening, and even smarter than the
works of many of the directors he's worked with.  And the reason for this
is that he makes it his own.  He puts his personal stamp on it, and doesn't
care what anyone else will think when he goes totally unconventional on us.
 And the best thing is that he's distanced himself from his film, and made
this a wonderful self-criticism that never becomes annoying or whiny. 
How's that for a concept?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Director: Peter Weir
Writer: Andrew Niccol
Starring: Jim Carrey, Laura Linney, Ed Harris, Noah Emmerich, Natascha
McElhone, Paul Giamatti, Philip Baker Hall, Ted Raymond, Marc Macaulay,
Holland Taylor, Harry Shearer
Truman Burbank is an insurance salesman who lives on a gorgeous, perfect
Florida island, is married to a perky blond wife, and who has never really
left the island he lives on.  He's also the star of a television show
phenomenon, of which he is conspicuously not aware.  As a baby, Truman was
placed inside a giant dome that covers the entire world he knows of, and
has been raised so that every second of his life is monitored by about 5000
cameras living inside his world.  And Truman has no clue that any of this
is fake.
But every now and then, something will happen that hints at some kind of
conspiracy against him.  In one of the film's earliest scenes, Truman
leaves his house, and a tiny sattelite falls from the sky and lands on the
street outside his house.  A scene later, the radio reports that this was
something that went wrong with a satellite in space.  Sometime later,
Truman sees a bum who looks just like his father, who drowned in a boating
accident, but before he can positively identify him, people come out of
nowhere, drag him onto a bus, and leave him behind.  The morning's paper
says that the city is cutting back on the bums allowed to stay in town.
"The Truman Show" is being billed as Jim Carrey's attempt at drama, after
being heralded by the American Public as a star-studded comic actor, in
such flicks as "Ace Ventura: Pet Detective," "Dumb and Dumber," and "Liar
Liar," but this kind of thinking is only for people who push actors who do
comedy into a corner with all the others, like Robin Williams and Billy
Crystal, and say "You can do drama, but when you do it, you're doing it as
a crossover."  Little do most of these people realize, these guys started
off as regular actors, doing dramas and comedies and everything else, but
found they could make a living starting out in comedy.  Would Robin
Williams become a star as quick as he did if he just did
Off-Off-Off-Off-Broadway dramas?  Because of this typical fallacy, people
will be thinking of this as "The Film Where Carrey Does Drama," which will
make people shudder and stay away, and others going just to see if he can
pull it off.
This is sad because "The Truman Show" is an incredible film.  Whether
viewed as a drama, a comedy, a kafkaesque nightmare, a satirical take on
American media, or even a highly unsubtle Christ story, "The Truman Show"
works, and its star, Jim Carrey, creates one of the most human characters
to inhibit a film in a while, even if he's been living in a giant, man-made
globe his entire life, and has no idea what lies out there.
The key to this film is an incredibly complex yet simple script by Andrew
Niccol, who just wrote and directed one of '97's most intelligent films,
"Gattaca."  That film was one that was filled with lots of great ideas
which worked well together, and it even showed us the powerful emotions of
one man who is struggling to overcome the odds of society.  "The Truman
Show" works on the same kinds of levels.  But Truman, the star of the
universally broadcasted show which airs for 24 hours every day, is a man
who doesn't know that he is limited in what he wants to do.
In the first scenes, we see Truman doing his daily routine of giving
himself a pep talk in the morning, greeting the neighbors with his
catchphrase ("Good Morning; and if I don't see you later, Good Afternoon,
Good Evening, and Good Night!"), driving to work as he listens to a
relaxing piece by Mozart, buying a paper, and working hard at his job.  He
has a big giant smile, which is something Carrey fans will not be shocked
to see.  But we also see him in quiet reflexion later on, and even doing
something secretive that we discover about later on.  He puts on a facade
just like the rest of us, and when he's not around anyone, is as depressed
as the lot of us.
That's why when he really discovers that his whole life is a sham, it's so
devastating.  It occurs all of a sudden, but it's something that he's been
hinted at his whole life.  We see flashbacks he has (shown on his "Greatest
Hits" tapes, which are sold throughout the world), including one where he
fell for a woman (Natascha McElhone) who was not the actress who was
supposed to be playing the girl he eventually marries (Laura Linney, taking
a break from the strong female roles to play a perky wife), who tries to
tell him that his life is a TV show, but fails.  Instead, she becomes one
of the near misses in his life, a woman he pines for.  How many times has
that happned in your life, where you meet someone you're intrigued by, but
who you lose due to something beyond your control, only to peak your
interest for the rest of your life?
As the film goes on from here, Truman tries to escape from his life, and we
begin to meet the men behind the show, who desperately try to cover up,
using anything they have up their sleeves.  The entire show was created by
a creepy looking man named Christof (no, there's no subtlety here), played
by Ed Harris, who at times touches the image he has created which is blown
up on a giant TV set on the wall of the observational hut which controls
the show, sometimes creating music to go along with the events unfolding
(one of them is actually Philip Glass!).  We see him completely obsessed
with his creation, and trying to control it as much as he can, but having
to sometimes deal with TV executives (one played by Paul Thomas Anderson
regular, Philip Baker Hall), and having a crisis when Truman begins
discovering the truth (also, look for one of the control men played by Paul
Giamatti, who played Pig Vomit in Howard Stern's "Private Parts," and
basically stole the film from him).
People may say that all this doesn't sound like a "drama"...well, it ain't.
 It has a serious point, and has some very dramatic moments, but it's
really a very mature comedy.  The film is hilarious, especially in scenes
where we see self-reflexivity in the actual going-ons in the Truman world. 
For instance, the film is run by product placement, and several times in
the film, a character will pick up a product, the camera will zoom in on
them, and they will talk about how great it is.  Weirdly enough, this
gimmick actually gets funnier as it goes on, since the show's veil of
reality gradually weakens as the film moves on.
The film is not only funny, but incredibly moving.  "Gattaca" was actually
criticized for its lack of human emotion (not by me), but people will be
blown away by how much humanity Niccol puts into his script for "The Truman
Show."  We understand the pain Truman lives in because underneath
everything, he's really a human being, and he has to deal with the same
kind of problems we deal with, even if it is in a much restricted space. 
Truman is not some really weird guy who looks like that guy from "The
Mask."  Instead, he's just an average guy who just happens to be the star
of a TV show which he doesn't know about.  The film deals with the fear
that your entire life is one big sham put on for you, basically because a
person only knows what he knows and not what anyone else knows.  We
experience life as it comes to us, not through anyone else.  I've often had
the fear that everyone I know was placed before me on purpose, that there's
some designated course I'm supposed to follow, and I'm sure that there are
other people who have had this fear.  Kafka had a similar fear.  Of course,
I'm not Kafka and neither are you.
This film deals with that idea, but it also has a bitingly saitirical edge,
that all of this works great as a form of media for the masses.  With shows
like "Cops" and "The Real World" being so popular nowadays, it's not long
before something as crazy as this occurs.  We've seen horrific things about
life shown on "Cops" and those stupid Fox specials ("The World's Greatest
Police Chases Part Nineteen!"), and we've seen people who actually WANT to
be filmed for the entire world to see in half-hour doses on "The Real
World;" it's only time before people say they want a real-life "Truman
Show."
This is because humanity's the most fascinating thing in the world.  We, as
humans, love to view other people doing things.  We don't know why, but we
do.  Voyeurism has been dealt with in movies, most notably in "Rear
Window," but "The Truman Show" takes it to a whole other extreme.  The film
shows people all around the world being brought together, and even relaxed,
by watching Truman live his life.  There's a man shown in a tub who lives
his entire life along with Truman, sleeping along with him, and hanging on
to the curtain when something dire happens to him.  There's a group of
Asian people who try to learn English by watching Truman talk to people. 
And there's even a bar where "The Truman Show" is on all the time, and they
even have a counter which shows how many days the show has been on the air.
While this sounds like a horrible thing to do to a human being, the film
accurately, and deftly shows both sides of the issue.  In one scene, we see
Christof arguing with someone over it, and later on, pointing out all the
great things about the world he's created.  There's pain in the world he's
created, but the world has been tailor-made to suit you, while reality is
everyone for themselves.  It's an interesting point, but the other side
just has better ones.
I mentioned it was also an "unsubtle Christ story."  I was getting there,
but I'm afraid it needs little explanation.  Christof is God, and Truman is
Christ, the martyr for the entire world to feel better by watching him live
his life in a sealed-off world.  For those who doubted, even when we
discover that the guy who created the world is named Christof, there's a
memorable scene where Truman walks on the water, or at least seems to.
The brilliance of this film is how it brings all of these ideas together,
instead of seperating them apart and saying "it can be this, and it can be
this, and it can also be this."  This works with other films, but it
woudn't work with "The Truman Show."  While this may seem to cerebral, it's
nevertheless engrossing, and it manages to not shoot over the audience's
head, but also not shoot below.
Oh, and it stars Jim Carrey, who has been a bit of a guilty pleasure for
me, much in the same way Jerry Lewis is.  But here, he emerges as a real
actor, someone who can play a real character, and who can still put his
personal touches on the performance.  Yes, Carrey is funny, and there are
times when he does some of his usual schtick.  But what he doesn't do is
overact, or underact.  And he doesn't look uncomfortable, straining to keep
his hyperkineticity inside.  I used to kinda like him, but now I respect
him because I've seen him act like a person.  If he keeps this up, he may
become the predecessor to Robin Williams instead of Jerry Lewis.  But
really, who cares if the film starts Jim Carrrey not acting incredibly
hyper?  What you want to watch for is the film itself.  And if you're
really going to talk about Carrey, talk about how his performance fits in
with the rest of the film instead of standing apart from it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Drowning by Numbers (1988)
Writer/Director: Peter Greenaway
Starring: Joan Plowright, Juliet Stephenson, Joely Richardson, Bernard
Hill, Jason Edwards, Bryan Pringle, Trevor Cooper, David Morrissey, Kenny
Ireland, Michael Percival
Explaining the plot of "Drowning by Numbers" almost makes it seem like a
high-concept film: one that can be explained in about one sentence (if
that).  In fact, my one film book has one very short sentence explaining
the film, as well as their thoughts on it: "Three women decide to drown
their husbands."  This is essentially what goes on in this film, making it
easy to explain to anyone who asks what it's about.  The weird thing is
that behind the simplicity of the concept, the film is one of the most
engagingly frustrating films to watch.  You watch it once, maybe even
twice, and you're suddenly set off on a cinematic puzzle, desperately
trying to figure out what you've just seen and comprehend it.
"Drowning by Numbers" tells the story of three generations of women, a
delightful trio all named Cissie Colpitts:  there's the mother, played by
Joan Plowright (who has the ability to give a unique droll dignity to any
film she's in); her older daughter, played by Juliet Stephenson (from
"Truly, Madly, Deeply"); and the younger, spunkier daughter, played by
Joely Richardson, daughter of Vanessa Redgrave.  Over the course of the
film, they all drown their respective husbands, starting off with the
mother, who starts the trend when she catches her husband with another
woman, realizes she's had enough of him, and pushes his head underneath the
water level of a bath tub his wading in.
Their shananigans is easily covered up by the local coroner, Madgitt
(Bernard Hill, perhaps known to American audiences as the Captain in
"Titanic," although you wouldn't recognize him here), who lies on his
statements, and requests that his payment for his crooked deeds be that
he's given some sex from each of the women, none who fully cooperate.  All
the while, the film introduces us to games that Madgitt and his son, Smut
(Jason Edwards), play constantly, with Smut narrating the rules of how to
play them.
Just to make things more frustrating for the audience, as well as more fun,
the film gives us numbers throughout the film that are marked either
conspicuously (the film shows a copy of Joseph Heller's "Catch-22" as one
of the numbers) or blatantly (on the rump of two cows), but nevertheless
are shown in order for the audience to count up as the film goes along. 
While this may seem like just a fun thing to do throughout the film, to
count your way until the ending, for others, it intoduces a bizarre mix to
the story, further complicating it as to why it, as well as the references
to numerous games, is included in the context of the film, and how it
relates to all the other elements.
The film was directed by Peter Greenaway, who directed one of my all-time
favorites, "The Cook, the Thief, His Wife, and Her Lover," a film that is
as fascinating story-wise as it is visual-wise.  I have once said that he
is probably the best director of mise-en-scene ever, or at least working
today.  "Drowning by Numbers" is no exception.  It's a gorgeous-looking
film, almost coming off as a living Rembrandt painting.
Greenaway often works with many of the same crew members for his films, and
it's obvious why: they're so damn good at what they do.  Sacha Vierny, the
Director of Photography, and who's worked with Resnais and Bunuel on some
of their films, definitely has an eye for making a shot look absolutely
beautiful, so much that most of the frames in this film, and some of
Greenaway's other films, could be framed and sold as artwork.  Another one
of his members is Michael Nyman, the film composer (who's also worked on
"The Piano" and "Gattaca"), who's beautiful background music effortlessly
gives every scene the right tone that Greenaway is going for, even if much
of it is redundant (and recylced in or from other Greenaway films).  Give
Nyman a couple years and I'll easily say that he's the best film composer
since Bernard Herrman.
One of the resons I like Greenaway's films so much is because not only are
they gorgeous piece of art, but they stimulate the mind, making it work
hard to understand not so much what's going on, but why they are placed
together in the first place.  "Drowning by Numbers" is basically a living
puzzle.  We struggle to look at every shot as a piece in the puzzle,
wondering why things are happening, and why they are included in this film.
 At first glance it seems like a mixture of a bunch of different puzzles,
where some pieces fit together but don't make up the same thing.
This approach is often criticized for distancing the audience from the
film, looking down at them and laughing at them for not being able to
understand what's going on.  This is because the ambiguity is so high, and
it's almost impossible to understand Greenaway's intentions for placing so
many weird devices together in one film.  Why are there numbers throughout
the film?  Why are game rules introduced?  Why did he make it?  All of this
is anyone's guess.
My theory?  The film is making fun of order and trends, and showing them
for what they are.  The first drowning is almost understood, as the husband
had been cheating on her for years, and it's almost like he received his
just desserts for being such a bastard.  But the following ones have a
gradual descent into obscurity, being done possibly as a trend of what the
first one was, and lacking the reasoning and intensity that the first one
had.  There's also other kinds of trends in the film, like Smut who follows
all sorts of rules of games to a T, and does whatever a little girl, who
jumpropes throughout the film, says (like circumsising, for instance). 
There are the games that are introduced that show rule-following at their
peak.  And, of course, there are the numbers, that give the film a sense of
order and duration, that it will only last as long as there are 100 numbers
(after 100, everything becomes bland, as the film points out).
What I got out of the film was a sense of order and trends becoming stale
after awhile, and a loss of originality and passion lacking after awhile. 
The numbers, at first intriguing and fascinating, become redundant, and
soon lose the luster they once had.  He seems to be saying that traditions
cause people who honor them to forget why they were started in the first
place, and instead do them because they just think they ought to.  At least
that's what I got out of it.
Is this what Greenaway was going for?  I have no clue.  But such is the fun
of ambiguity.  We can try and make up explanations of films like this,
never knowing if we're right or not, but intrigued as to whether we are or
not.  It's one of the reasons I like Greenaway's films so much.  As he's an
aquired taste, many people may be put off by his lack of an
easy-to-understand message.  But even if you can't understand this film at
all, and have no clue what he was going for, "Drowning by Numbers" is still
incredibly entertaining.  It has a playful, humorous nature, filled with a
giddy kind of tone, and is endlessly fascinating, never becoming boring,
probably because it's so complex and at times frustrating.  That's why
Greenaway gets away with this film, which would be a big disappointment for
probably any other director.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Slums of Beverly Hills (1998)
Writer/Director: Tamara Jenkins
Starring: Natasha Lyonne, Alan Arkin, Marisa Tomei, Keith Corrigan, David
Krumholtz, Eli Marienthal, Jessica Walter, Rita Moreno, Carl Reiner
There are many reasons why I enjoyed "The Slums of Beverly Hills," but I
think the aspect I admire the most is that it's poignant but never
heavy-handed.  So many autobiographical films make sure that there are many
a funny moment, but then isolate those from the similarly isolated dramatic
moments.  It's as if the film would be the same if it just had someone
enter the scene holding a sign that said "Now here's the dramatic part of
the film."  "The Slums of Beverly Hills" doesn't do that, and it's still
poignant.  It moves effortlessly from hysterical moments to more dramatic
moments but never feels like it's overly organized.
But that's hardly the only good thing about this film.  "The Slums of
Beverly Hills" is a feverlishly entertaining film with a fresh take on that
point in all of our lives when we begin to mature sexually and we're not
quite sure what to make of it.  We all go through that, though not all of
us go through what Vivian Abramowitz, the lead character, goes through, and
that's the sudden rack-dom thereof (read: she got her boobies).  Nearly
overnight, she has jumped from an A cup to a C cup, and in the film's
opening scene, finds she's being given her first significant braissere.
Vivian is played by Natasha Lyonne, the wonderful young actress from Woody
Allen's "Everyone Says I Love You" (and, less significantly, "Krippendorf's
Tribe," which she was actually very good in), who has wild red curly hair,
and seems to be blessed with a face that is both in perpetual snarl and
forever cuteness.  She provides the voice and characterization of the
film's writer and director, Tamara Jenkins, who no doubtedly had a similar
experience back in her youth.
The film takes place in 1976, and we are introduced to Vivian and her
family, headed by her 65-year old father, Murray (a priceless Alan Arkin),
an unsuccessful used car salesman.  Murray's not the greatest father, but
he does indeed have a great love for them that's his big strong point. 
Vivian also has two brothers, one older one, Ben (David Krumholtz, who, I
see, didn't have to change him hair style after doing "The Ice Storm" prior
to this), a hilarious pothead/musical-freak who knows way too much useless
information; and a younger one, Ricky (Eli Marienthal), who's just weird. 
Together they're a strange family, but their strangeness is their own,
making them unique like every other family in the world.
Since Murray has so little money, they have to live in the lower rent areas
of Beverly Hills (they stay for the schooling), and are constantly being
awoken in the middle of the night so they can move to other places so they
can avoid the rent.  The film's main center happens when their cousin Rita
(Marisa Tomei) hikes out to the West Coast from the East Coast so she stay
with them instead of her tyrannical rich father, Mickey (Carl Reiner), who
ends up supplying Murray with a monthly sum if he watches over her and
causes her to try and get ahead in life.
So begins the rest of the film, as they live in a nice apartment, and
Vivian begins to learn all about sex, not only from Rita, who introduces
her to the enigma known as the vibrator (which launches a scene which is
the best vibrator joke since "Everything You Always Wanted to Know About
Sex," and one other extremely poignant and hilarious scene), but also from
a tennant she meets in one of her older apartments, Eliot (Kevin Corrigan),
a marijuana dealer who piques her interest for awhile.
"Slums of Beverly Hills" is wonderfully organized so that it's not so
organized, and as a result it comes off as a sometimes episodic remembrance
of an important period that is often overlooked in autobiographical films. 
It's as if it were a modern-day version of Truffaut's "The 400 Blows," if
it were funnier, less traumatic, and much more randy.  Tamara Jenkins finds
a strong voice, one that is very perceptive to what living in that time
period was like and especially what it was like living during that period
that we all go through.
The film would seem less substantial if it weren't for the flawless casting
of Lyonne, who provides the film with such a strong performance that it
avoids the mistake that many films like this succumb to: she's as
interesting if not more than all of her extremely eccentric supporting
characters.  Most films like this provide us with a boring, lifeless
protagonist, and allow the supporting characters to do all the work. 
Lyonne's Vivian is an increasingly watchable and lovable character, who is
cynical and curious about everything that's going on around her, and by the
end, she's the character we remember the most.
But while it's very personal, it also works as a giant ensemble piece, and
the supporting characters are incredibly wonderful.  Alan Arkin reminds us
what a cinematic treasure he is, with a performance which is perfectly
nuanced and the right mix between stern and malleable.  His breakdown
scene, though featuring an element that just plum doesn't work, is a sight
to behold.  Tomei, who's been in a bit of a career slump as of late, shows
that she's still a great comic actress.  Corrigan, a staple of indie/art
house films, gives a greatly funny performance.  And Krumholtz acts as a
major scene stealer, a more confident symbol of Jewish neuroticism than,
say, Woody Allen.
If there's anything wrong, it's that the ending is a bit of a mess.  A
series of scenes at an airport lack the irony and material to really
succeed.  No matter.  It worked for me in that it brought the film to a
satisfying close that is mature and intelligent.  Which is basically what
you get here: a series of sequences that mostly work, and others that fail
honorably, and as a whole, a film that's not only poignant, but perhaps
more importantly, entertaining as hell.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Jacob's Ladder (1990)
Director: Adrian Lyne
Writer: Bruce Joel Rubin
Starring: Tim Robbins, Elizabeth Peńa, Danny Aiello, Matt Craven, Jason
Alexander, Pruitt Taylor Vince, Patricia Kalember, Macaulay Culkin, Eriq La
Salle, Ving Rhames
Adrian Lyne's "Jacob's Ladder" came out almost a decade ago and I doubt
anyone has figured it out yet.  It's a giant enigma of a film.  Everything
in it contradicts something else.  The plot structure is at once
manipulative and dizzying, and the entire film is like a horror film for
the Vietnam Vet crowd.  It's a combination of bizarre images from hell and
a sad, murky drama about a man who has lost all capacity for telling what
is reality and what isn't.  And dammit if it isn't totally engrossing from
start to finish.
Yes, "Jacob's Ladder" is extremely manipulative, but it's one of those
films that's manipulative for a very good reason.  Many films are
manipulative just so they can pull one over on the audience (ahem, "The
Usual Suspects"), and those are fine and dandy, but "Jacob's Ladder" is one
that does it not so for the sole sake of being clever and challenging, but
so that it can correctly take us inside the head of its protagonist, a
Vietnam Vet who's real life and halucinations from the War are on the verge
on destroying him psychologically.
The film follows three different time lines: the actual events of his
experience one night in Vietnam, when his platoon was attacked, it seems,
and members began to react to something that is unexplainable; his life
years after the war when he begins to experience psychological problems;
and his various hallucinations.  The protagonist, Jacob Singer, is played
by Tim Robbins, in his first major dramatic leading role, as a sad man
who's life probably would have taken a different route if he had never went
to Vietnam.  He was an English professor, but following the war, lost his
son (a young Macaulay Culkin), then his family, left his profession, and
began working at the post office.
When we meet him in what appears to be the main timeline (which appears, I
think, to be sometime in the mid-to-late 70s), he's washed-up, living in a
danky apartment with a woman he works with named Jezzie (Elizabeth Peńa)
who seems to love him but may be just tired enough of his psychological
problems.  When the story begins, we see his daily paranoia: he fears he's
being chased by some faceless enemies, once in the subway station, and
another time on the streets in broad daylight.
Then his life really gets out of hand: his doctor and a member of his
platoon (Pruitt Taylor Vince) are blown up in their cars, and following the
latter's funeral, the members get together and discover they all experience
the same delusions.  They wonder if something happened to them in Vietnam,
and they all hire a lawyer (Jason Alexander, in a great piece of dramatic
acting which easily seals his post-"Seinfeld" career as being sunny)...but
everyone but Jacob backs out for some unknown reason.
It gets even weirder.  He gets a nasty fever one night following a party,
and is saved in a horrifically scary scene where he has to placed in a
bathtub with ice cubes so his temperature will come down.  He discovers
something about his Vietnam record that makes no sense, but may after all. 
And a new timeline is introduced that brings true emotional depth to the
film, something including his dead son, which is concluded in a scene
that's nearly as cathartic as the final scene in Andrei Tarkofsky's sci-fi
masterpiece, "Solaris."
This is all deftly handled by a script by "Ghost" scribe Bruce Joel Rubin
that is frightening, engimatic, and filled with sadness, all at the same
time.  His story really works because the lead character, Jacob, is a real
human being, and he's extremely likable.  We really feel something for his
character not only because he's naturally a real nice guy, but because
through everything, we're right there with him.  We understand very little,
and so does he.  We're as shocked by the bone-chilling hallucinations as he
is.  And when information that contradicts everything he has come to know
comes into light, we're as freaked out as he is.
If anything doesn't work in this film, it's the unearthing of a conspiracy
involving experimental chemicals during the war, something which is brought
to light during the final moments of the film, to give it more clarity and
realistic balance.  This does so, but the film didn't really need this
anyway.  This is a case where the story is so strong, and the filmmaking is
so amazing that something that was already publically well-known as this
didn't really need to surface to make it a "statement."  This is too good a
film to be reduced to such a thing, and it's a good thing that it is kept
as only an afterthought and not the true center of the film.
Adrian Lyne, whose films master in sexual perversity and obsession ("Fatal
Attraction," "Indecent Proposal," and the new version of "Lolita" are
blurbs on his oeuvre), marks that he's a powerful director with this film
who can deal with issues of paranoia and disturbing everday ignorance while
still telling a wonderful story.  His images are unnerrving and stupefying.
 So's his entire movie.
I'm still not sure what to make of this film.  Was it all a dream, or was
it all happening for real, or was there something else I'm not thinking of?
 It's decision to not come to a neat and clarifying close that explains
everything, no matter what the facade was, is one of the film's true
masterstrokes.  It's one of those films you discuss on end, using small
clues in the film as the basis for far-out theories, like "12 Monkeys," the
film that spurned months and months of discussion of what it meant to
anyone who cared.
But if you want to see the real power of this film, you don't really need
to figure out what the meaning is.  "Jacob's Ladder" is one of those films
that is not powerful because it's challenging and tough to figure out, but
because it's psychologically emotionally stimulating.  Some thing were
better left unresolved.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Kiss the Girls (1997)
Director: Gary Fleder
Writer: David Klass (based on the novel by John Patterson)
Starring: Morgan Freeman, Ashely Judd, Cary Elwes, Tony Goldwyn, Jay O.
Sanders, Bill Nunn, Brian Cox, Justina Vail, Jeremy Piven, Roma Mafia
America seems to have a disgusting fetish for serial killer films.  Of
course, I'm no hypocrite; I love them too.  But I only like them when
they're intelligent, non-formualtic, and perhaps even satirical,
carrying a strong message about something.  "Kiss the Girls" is none of
these.  A formulatic yet atmospheric film, it seems to walk on the fine
line between cliche and original filmmaking.  But at the end, the film
trips, and lands on the cliche side.
"Kiss the Girls" deals with a serial killer who's not actually a serial
killer.  He's a collector of fine-looking women, who he cages, rapes,
injects drugs into, and all-around worships...but in that crazy,
psychotic fashion.  We see him, but we only in shadows, and only with a
funky mask over his face, like he were some romantic Phantom of the
Opera.  We also hear him in a deep whisper, and one can only guess that
we see him throughout the film.
We are introduced to forensic psychologist, Alex Cross (Morgan Freeman,
giving the film some well-needed clout), and in the most cliched way
possible: on a case where we witness his forte.  He talks some women out
of killing herself, from which we learn: a) he's a gentle man, b) he's
more intelligent than everyone else we're gonna meet, and c) he's gonna
have to do the same thing again towards the end, but break his own
rules.  I'm only saying this because I thought that when I saw the
scene.
He begins investigating our designated sicko, who calls himself
Cassanova, and meets some other detectives and whatnot, including the
southern-accented Nick Ruskin (Cary Elwes), a guy named Kyle Craig (Jay
O. Sanders), among others.  The actors all do a good job of looking
creepy, but we all know who it is the first time we see him/her anyway.
We also meet Kate McTiernan (Ashely Judd), a beautiful, highly
intelligent med student, who also takes kickboxing (which, by the rules
of cliche, will help her in a couple spots).  She's soon taken hostage
by Cassanova (she has to - she lives in a giant house all by herself,
which she dimly lights just so she can't tell that anyone's there).  And
predictably enough, she escapes in an escape so simple that you wonder
if the killer LET her go on purpose.
Predictably enough, she's teamed with Alex, and the two are doing some
investigating together.  While the first half wasn't actually bad in
establishing mood, this half is a complete mess, as they journey all
around, pick up convenient clues, and even follow a lead (Tony Goldwyn -
I thought he was dead).  The film has what seems to be a nice close, but
we HAVE to have a big cliche-ridden struggle between the two leads and
Cassanova, who turns out to be exactly who I thought it was from the
beginning.  He has a stupid motive, which tries desperately to be
satirical of something, but ends in a big cliche.  I left in utter
disgust.
There are some good things, though.  The film does well with some
atmosphere in certain places, and some key scenes ARE well-directed. 
Her drug-induced escape scene is handled wonderfully, and even her
kidnap is pretty creepy.  And, of course, Morgan Freeman is awesome. 
When is this guy not awesome, though?  The only reason he was cast was
to give it some merit, and he does give it a great edge that wouldn't be
there with any other actor.  Freeman is one of those actors who everyone
likes merely because of his presence, and also because he always nails
his performances.  This is no exception.  Judd is also pretty good too,
but we already knew that also.  But what is Cary Elwes doing here?  I
like the guy, but he's suffered the same kind of fate Anthony Perkins
suffered after "Psycho": he can't do any role convincingly since he was
so awesome in "The Princess Bride."  I found myself laughing at his
performance and for the wrong reasons.  Poor guy.
Director Gary Fleder (of "Things to Do in Denver When You're Dead," the
title to which was better than the movie) tries to make a creepy,
atmospheric picture, but makes a film which lacks in some of the better
elements, particular origninality, and a killer whom one finds
themselves respecting.  Cassanova is a crap serial killer, not because
he's not really one, but because he's not really that fascinating.  He's
crazy, and that's all.  Hannibal Lecter and "Se7en"'s John Doe were more
than that.  They walked the fine line between brilliance and insanity. 
Cassanova is way on the insane side, and is thus not a great killer.
"Kiss the Girls" was a let-down, particularly because the previews made
it look like it may actually stand a chance against such brilliant
serial killer films as "The Silence of the Lambs" and "Se7en."  But it
doesn't, and ends up just another one of those cheap thrillers, with a
bit of clout from the acting.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Star Trek: Generations (1994)
Director: David Carson
Writers: Donald D. Moore and Brannon Braga
Starring: Patrick Stewart, William Shatner, Malcolm McDowell, Jonathan
Frakes, LeVar Burton, Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, James
Doohan, Walter Koenig, Alan Ruck
Not being a trekkie, but possessing the ability to enjoy "Star Trek"
shows or movies (in moderation), I can't say that I was at all pumped to
see this.  And rightfully so.  Sure, it has come up with an interesting
way to pass the torch from TV show to TV show, but there's really
nothing else there unless you're a Spock-ears-wearing,
live-long-and-prosper saluting, die hard Trekkie.  For the rest of us,
we have to put up with hokey melodrama, and a pretty weak plot.
"Generations" introduces us film-wise to the crew of "Star Trek: the
Next Generation," which wasn't a BAD show, but hardly was as cool as the
original series.  Sure, we have some cool characters: Captain Jean-Luc
Picard (Patrick Stewart), Data (Brent Spiner), and...um...Will Wheaton
was cool for the first couple seasons.  But there's no other instances
of cool supporting characters, other than the blind Jordi (LeVar Burton,
who we all grew up with watching him on "Reading Rainbow"), and the
quiet Commander Ryker (Jonathan Frakes).
The film basically has the cool idea of teaming up the current Captain
Picard and the old and dead Captain Kirk (William Shatner), but that's
all it has.  There's a plot that is poorly constructed just to get these
two together in the end, and even that's not really worth watching the
rest for.  The plot deals with a crazy, obsessive man named Dr. Tolian
Soran (Malcolm McDowell - inspired casting, by the way), who wants to
get himself back inside a thing called the Nexus, which is this kind of
heavenly body that is kind of like paradise or something, but he was in
it before and has been waiting 78 years to get back in (not being a
trekkie, I don't know how a man could not age a bit in 78 years).
The Enterprise stumbles upon him when a lab he was working at was
attacked by Romulans (some sort of bad guys, I dunno), and he survived. 
They soon find out he's really working for the Klingons (DUH!), but that
he's really in it for himself.  He wants to get inside the nexus by
destroying a star, which will send the nexus sweeping through a planet
he'll be on, thus sucking him in...and subsequently destroying the
planet.  Eventually, it comes down to a big one-on-one fight between
Picard and Soran, and soon enough both are inside the nexus, and Picard
has stumbled upon Kirk, who was killed in the opening sequence by
it...sorta.
The film's height is at the end, although it's kind of anti-climactic. 
The only thing that saves it is the acting by both actors, as they have
good chemistry.  They are pitted together in a hokey sequence, one which
never really pays off.  
The beginning is cool, with members of the old crew showing up.  We, of
course, have Kirk, but we also have James Doohan and Walter Keonig...and
Sulu's daughter (I guess George Takei was too busy).  Note: no Spock,
Bones, or Uhura.  It's one of the only satisfying parts of the film,
even if Alan Ruck has a pretty unfunny role.
Of course, there's some little unnecessary subplots, like one dealing
with the android Data who has an emotion chip implanted inside him. 
Instead of being intelligent or anything, it just goes for some really
cheap laughs, as in one scene where he keeps making bad jokes.  This is
never explored in any kind of depth, and is pretty much annoying.
I personally like the "Star Trek" movies...okay, I like the even ones. 
They posess a kind of cool-ness to them, and never got overly corny or
anything.  They had depth to them, and they never became blatanly trying
to make some kind of cheap point.  This one has Picard discussing his
nephew wanting to go into Starfleet, but it stands apart from the rest
of the film instead of meshing along with it.  When he gets to this
nexus, and finds he has an artificial family, it's not as moving as it
should be, although the acting by Stewart saves it all.
Another cool thing about the older "Star Trek" is that they could be
pretty funny without being stupid.  "Star Trek IV" is a prime example of
this, which used its gimmick of Spock trying to assimilate into society
hilariously (I never thought I'd hear Spock utter the word "dumbass"). 
But most humor in this is corny, and just bad.  Brent Spiner's a funny
guy, but the writing for his character is so awful in some scenes that
it gets embarassing.  And a scene towards the beginning, taking place on
an artificial boat is just...ugh.
Then there's the nexus, which is supposed to be a place of absolute
bliss, but instead shows stuff that its inhabitants either never had or
once had, but lost.  It's supposed to be a place where you'd never want
to leave, yet Picard and Kirk do, all due to a really simple way of
thinking.  If it were so tempting, it'd be impossible to leave it.
There are some plusses to the messed-up story, though.  There are
certain exciting and awesome scenes, like the beginning, end, and when
the nexus sweeps through the one planet towards the middle (creating one
of the most gorgeous shots in "Star Trek" history).  The dialogue
between Kirk and Picard is pretty intelligent, and witty and all.  And
Stewart is, of course, awesome, as usual.  Oh, and Malcolm McDowell
makes a fantastic villain, even if he's too under-written.
"Star Trek: Generations" thankfully isn't horrible and un-watchable, but
it's so messed up, confused, and cheap that even the sight of Picard and
Kirk fighting together can't save it.  I really wish it could have,
'cause casting McDowell as the villain is purely inspired casting, and
it's such a shame he has to go to waste.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
Director: P.J. Hogan
Writer: Ronald Bass
Starring: Julia Roberts, Dermot Mulroney, Cameron Diaz, Rupert Everett, 
M. Emmet Walsh, Paul Giamatti
With "Batman and Robin" opening the same weekend of this, you'd think 
this "Julia Roberts comeback for good film" wouldn't stand a chance.  
Wrong.  When people go see it and see it sucks unbelievably much, 
they'll race to see this comic gem.  That's what it is.  And I'm not 
saying that 'cause I saw both of them the same weekend...I saw this one 
first, man.
Julia's big ice-breaker into the world of mega-celebrity-hood was 
"Pretty Woman" which was cool at first but kinda lost its glamour and 
just became a good old three-star film that you can recite.  This one 
may not be recitable, but it's far better.
Julia plays restaurant food critic, Julianne Potter, a highly neurotic, 
insecure girl who has a nervous breakdown when she realizes that pact 
she made with her male best friend, Michael (Dermot Mulroney), to get 
married at 28 if they aren't already, might come up, for her 28th is 
soon and she just got a message from him saying he NEEDS to talk to her. 
 But it's worse than that - he's getting married in 4 days (why he 
didn't tell her...).  She falls off the bed and decides to go down there 
and sabotage the marriage and marry Michael since she now realizes she's 
been in love with him all along.
But her target of sabotage is tough - she's little Miss Perfect with 
sympathy, a "Kimmy" Wallace (the wonderful Cameron Diaz), who is madly 
in love with Michael, despite the fact he loves the following: action 
movies, karaoke bars, etc.  Every time she tries to make Michael hate 
Kimmy, he ends up loving her more.  She drags them to a karaoke bar and 
forces Kimmy (who claims to not be able to carry a tune) to sing.  She 
sucks embarrassingly but soon gets into it and Michael and her make out 
there in front of Julianne.
The funniest section of the film is when Julianne calls her new best 
friend, her gay editor, George (the oscar-nomination worthy Rupert 
Everett), to help her out.  She tries to make Michael jealous by saying 
he's her fiance, but George gets her back by playing it up 
embarrassingly for her, but later adds to the depth of the film towards 
the end.
The films is great because it's an evil comedy and it knows it.  It asks 
us to question whether or not we should root for Julianne by making 
Kimmy a sympathetic person.  She's apt to cry and when she does, we hope 
Julianne doesn't do anything further to destroy their union.  But Julia 
is so likable that this becomes a huge conflict.  It's resolved nicely, 
I think, in an anti-Hollywood way.  This film gleefully toys with us by 
walking right up to the hokey Hollywood line, then making a U-Turn.  
All the performances are magnificent.  The four leads are all great in 
their own way and it's tough to say who runs away with the film.  It's 
definitely not Dermot, who's great and all, but not as much as the 
others.  But is it Cameron Diaz, who's perfect in making her perfect yet 
with flaws and sympathy?  Is it Rupert Everett, who's so funny and such 
a good scene-stealer AND makes the "gay best friend" so much NOT like 
the typical "gay best friend?"  Or is it the top-billed Julia Roberts, 
who makes neuroticism seem fashionable?  
I don't know.  Really I don't.  It may as well be a three-way tie.  But 
the film as a whole works great.  The direction by Aussie director P.J. 
Harvey ("Muriel's Wedding") is wonderfully clever and even adds some 
good old Aussie campiness - i.e. the opening credits and the Dionne 
Warwick sing-along at a lunch scene (led by Rupert).  
Overall, this is the thinking man's romantic comedy and a contender for 
the best of that genre for the decade, along with "Four Weddings and a 
Funeral" and "Sleepless in Seatle."  So if you saw "Batman and Robin" or 
don't even want to (it's worth a viewing at least, even if it bites), go 
see this fantastically wonderful film.

Title
Review for Psycho (1960)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writer: Joseph Stefano (based on the novel by Robert Bloch)
Starring: Anthony Perkins, Janet Leigh, Vera Miles, John Gavin, Martin
Balsam, John McIntire, Simon Oakland, Patricia Hitchcock, Virginia Gregg
I've seen "Psycho" about three times in my short lifetime, and I'm actually
surprised how well it holds up even now.  It's sad that many suspense films
are so silly that you can't take them seriously, when at the same time,
older films like this are almost as silly yet you can take them seriously. 
I'm not even sure how Hitchcock did it.  Here's a flick where the
protagonist of the film is killed off at the half-way point, and the
supporting characters are left trying to find out what happens only to
discover that one of the other main characters did it in drag.  Looking at
it like this, it seems so moronic that I can't believe I enjoy almost every
minute of it.  But that's the power of film, I guess.
"Psycho" is not the best film Alfred Hitchcock (who for my money is the
greatest director who ever walked the face of this god forsaken planet)
ever made, yet it's thought to be so by the general public.  I think
"Psycho" is definitely absolutely on Hitch's "Very Best" list, which
includes such amazing films as "The 39 Steps," "Strangers on a Train,"
"Rear Window," and "Vertigo" (just to name a few).  But it's just not his
best.  He's been better.  But yeah, it's his most popular.  Why is this?
It seems the answer to this is the infamous shower sequence, which is
absolutely positively one of the 10 best-directed sequences I have ever
seen on celluloid - there's no room for debate on this one.  Hitch's
editing, timing, everything has never been better on a scene, and just
everything about it wreaks of greatness.  But for me, at least, it's not
why this film is just amazing.  It's my favorite scene in the film, and
yes, when I re-watched it on my birthday (the cool anniversary widescreen
edition was one of my few birthday presents this year), I was blown
away...and I rewatched it to see the editing and number of cuts, not just
to see a glimpse of the supposed Janet Leigh nipple I've heard so much
about.  Honestly.
What makes this film so amazing for me is one thing: Anthony Perkins.  I
know that it's commonly said that Robert Walker's performance in "Strangers
on a Train" is the best piece of acting in a Hithcock film - I mean, Nick
Clooney has publically said that a couple times on AMC.  But while his
performance was brilliant in just the brilliance of it all, Perkins
performance is brilliant because it gives us some sympathy...scratch that,
a LOT of sympathy for the main subject of this film: Norman Bates.
First, let me give a quick run-down of the plot: secretary Marion Crane
(Leigh), a bit of a tired-of-hiding woman (she's carrying on a little
affair with the dashing Sam Loomis, played by the dashing John Gavin) who
steals 40 grand from her employer when he entrusts her with the task of
putting it in the bank.  She starts on a paranoiac trek with the stolen
money, and eventually winds up at a little middle-of-nowhere place, the
Bates Motel.  Too bad she didn't see the sequels first.
There, she befriends the lonely clerk, Norman Bates (Perkins), who lives in
a giant, brooding house above the 12 rooms of the motel with his mother,
whom we never see in these first scenes, but who's presence is made known
in a couple scenes where she yells at Norman frantically.  When Marion goes
to take a shower that night, a woman sneaks in behind her, and stabs her
fatally a bunch of times, and then leaves her to quickly die.
The second half of the film (you didn't think it was all just the shower
scene, did ya?  seems that way sometimes) deals with Sam and Marion's
sister, Lila (Vera Miles), trying to discover what has happened to her.  We
also get to meet a private investigator (Martin Balsam), hired by the men
who's money was stolen by Marion, who tries to do some snooping around
every motel and hotel in a million mile radius, but, unfortunately meets at
a short, and untimely end.  In this half, we also discover the BIG twist,
which Hitchcock tried to keep secret back in '60, but asswholes like myself
and the people who made the sequels have spoiled for those of you who have
never seen it (shame on us!).
The film was an escape for Hitch, who's previous film was the
amazing-as-hell "North By Northwest" (my favorite Hitch, and the single
best "chase" movie I've ever seen).  "Psycho" is grittier, less glamorous,
and features no name actors (for the time).  This probably gave Hitch an
excuse to do some wildly experimental stuff with his directorial tactics,
like giving us more gory death scenes, killing off the protagonist, using
inner-voice dialogue weirdly (Marion imagines what her friends and
co-workers will say when they discover what she's done), and also giving us
a killer the likes of which had never been seen, and has rarely been copied
since.
This is the thing that makes the movie.  Sure, the entire film is an
amazing display of great suspense tactics.  I'm just freaked out during the
whole beginning, where Marion tries to escape cleanly, but can't stop
giving herself away to everyone she comes in contact with.  Okay, I'm
freaked out during the whole thing.  Directing-wise, it's a masterpiece.
But these things would leave the viewer with a flat experience if it
weren't for the way Hitch, his screenwriter Joseph Stefano, and his actor
playing the role, Perkins, show Norman Bates off.  He's the killer of this
film.  He's schizophrenic, divided between Norman and his mother.  It's his
portrayal of the Norman part, which dominates most of his screentime, which
is so great.  Norman is not a homicidal maniac.  Nor is he a transvestite. 
He's a mild-mannered, sensitive, and despereately lonely person, reaching
out for any signs of life he can reach, but keeps getting trapped by his
other ego.  Who knows?  If he wasn't schizoid, he and Marion may have hit
it off.  But his other ego, afraid he'll lose him to another person, has
Marion killed off quickly and in a grizly state.
It's an amazing thing watching Perkins do his schitck with the role.  He
inhabits him with so much sympathy and so much to like that when you find
out he's really the killer, it's devastating.  I mean, he's such a great
person!  Sure, sometimes he goes a tad off kilter, most notably when
talking about his passion: stuffing birds.  But Perkins cleverly plays him,
showing off more to like but hiding some bits of darkness within.  And this
set of levels get dangerously out of whack as the film progresses.
It's this that makes "Psycho" such a great film.  It's this that separates
it from any other film about serial killers/homicidal nutcases.  I have
never seen a film before or since its release that has been so sad when its
killer is revealed.  Sure, it almost spoils the entire film by giving us a
denouement featuring almost nothing but psych-talk (ugh), but just
fast-forward through that scene if you've already seen it, and watch that
final scene with Norman in the chair with the blanket, with a voice over by
his mother's ego (voice by an uncredited Virginia Gregg).  The film quickly
redeems itself from a final scene where those in the audience that didn't
catch it the first time that Norman is crazy can have it fed to them on a
spoon (I wouldn't be shocked at all if he didn't have some sort of fit with
the distributors).
Never mind the shower scene.  Or the big twist.  Or even the paranoid
beginning.  That's all bullshit (they're amazing on their own, but an
entire great film they do not make on their own).  The reason this film is
so amazing, why I think it's one of Hitch's "Very Best," is because of
Norman Bates, and how he's portrayed.  He makes the whole thing real.  He's
the real reason this is an amazing film, not because for two minutes, you
get to see a perfectly filmed murder sequence.  Although that scene's good
for other reasons.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Out-of-Towners, The (1970)
Director: Arhur Hiller
Writer: Neil Simon
Starring: Jack Lemmon, Sandy Dennis, Billy Dee Williams, Carlos
Montalban, Anne Meara, Ron Carey
Films where everything possible goes wrong for the protagonists have to
be carefully constructed, because it can either be really, really funny;
moody; or just plain redundant.  "The Out-of-Towners" luckily lands in
the first spot, since it never stops being funny, especially with a
great script by Neil Simon and two Oscar-winners in the leads (Lemmon
for "Mister Roberts" and "Save the Tiger;" Dennis for "Who's Afraid of
Virginia Woolf?").
Lemmon and Dennis are a slightly neurotic suburban couple with a family,
a stationwagon, and him with a typical desk job.  He, however, has had a
chance to branch out, with an interview for a substantially
better-paying job in the heart of Manhattan, which is a big step for a
suburban family.  Lemmon is so ecstatic that he has planned everything
by hour.  He's built everything up so much that it's bound to falter.
Things go nicely until they're up in the plane and find out the plane
can't land because there has been a sudden transit strike.  Then the
plane is directed to Cincinatti, throwing the two off, and having them
run all over Cincinatti looking for a train.  This is only the beginning
of their problems.  By film's end, they will be robbed, rained on,
witness a robbery, have to spend a night in Central Park, robbed again,
be chased across a plain in Central Park by a cop on horseback, become
near deaf for an hour, and anything else imaginable.  The ending is
predictable, yet somehow satisfying.
The thing that elevates this is the acting and the script.  There are
almost hundreds of speaking parts, since they go all over the place, and
a couple cameos from people who would be somewhat noteworthy (the most
being Lando himself, Billy Dee Williams, as a lost-and-found clerk,
followed by Ricardo Montalban's brother, Carlos, who would star in Woody
Allen's "Bananas").  And every step is just as hilarious if not more
hilarious then the other.  I frequently found myself laughing
hysterically.
The acting is fantastic.  I mean, Lemmon and Dennis, how could either of
them not be fantastic?  Dennis takes what would just be a throwaway part
turned into a whiny part, and makes her likeable.  And Lemmon, king of
making whiners seem tolerable, is near perfect.
This isn't a great film, although it does show the underbelly of
Manhattan (which, if you think about it, IS Manhattan), but if you
really want to laugh hysterically at a film that never stops being
funny, I reccomend you check this one out.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Specialist, The (1994)
Director: Luis Llosa
Writer: Alexandra Solos (based on the novel by John Shirley)
Starring: Sylvester Stallone, Sharon Stone, James Woods, Rod Steiger,
Eric Roberts
Sylvester Stallone has made some crap films in his lifetime, but this
has got to be one of the worst.  A totally dull story that thinks it can
use various explosions to make it interesting, "The Specialist" is about
as exciting as an episode of "Dragnet," and about as well acted.  Even
some attempts at film noir mood are destroyed by a sappy script, stupid
and unlikable characters, and just plain nothingness.  Who knew a big
explosion could be so boring and anti-climactic?  Unless you saw "Blown
Away"...
"The Specliast" of the title is none other than action star Sylvester
Stallone (in comeback #19, I think), who plays a quiet, hermit-like
bomber who was once a bomb expert with the army or something, but who
suffered a change of heart when he and his assistant (James Woods, who
shows us exactly what over-the-top is, other than another bad Sly film)
accidentally killed some innocent people during a job.  His credo is
killing bad people, not innocents.  And that's why he makes big bombs.
So anyway, into his life steps the seductive Sharon Stone, who is
basically the girlfriend/moll of the stupid son (Eric Roberts) of a
cuban/Miami kingpin (Rod Steiger, in an indecipherable accent, which is
sometimes cuban, sometimes Brando, sometimes Scottish, etc).  Turns out
Sharon is actually using her boyfriend so she can kill him, since he
killed her parents when she was young.  So she calls Sly, leaves
messages with him, sends him e-mail, etc, about planting a bomb to kill
Roberts, which Sly listens to obsessively, and while he works out
naked.  Yea.
Also into his life, though again, comes Woods, who has been tipped off
by Stone to catch Sly.  Using the cops, he tries to set up traps, none
which really work, so when Sly calls him, he goes ballisitic on his ass
over the phone, getting so worked up by saying his must-be-improvised
speeches that he seems to pop the vein in his head wide open.  These are
the most exciting scenes in the film, and Woods becomes the only ounce
of entertainment in the film.
The film tries to offer us a moody film noir, except with explosions,
but comes up completely snake-eyes.  It's just a pretend film noir,
making it a big waste of time.  And for action buffs, the action scenes
are pretty lame, with some really unrealistic-looking special effects (a
penthouse being blown off of a hotel looks like a piece of cardboard
falling into a tub).  Then there's the much-discussed sex scene between
Sly and Stone, which are about as mispaired a couple as Rachel and Ross
on "Friends."  Their sex scene is more nauseating then sexy, because it
shows us more of Sly than Stone.  Now let's guess who WE'D rather see
naked, okay?  Stone's small but perky breasts, which we've seen more
times than Harvey Keitel's dick, or Stallone's veiny ass, which isn't
usually shown for a very good reason?  I know I can't really judge it as
a flaw of the film, but come on.
The worst flaw of the film is this: it's boring.  I mean, I was on
caffeine when watching it, but my friend fell asleep only to be woken up
by James Woods ranting.  But a good movie does not James Woods going
nuts make.  If you're in for some fun action, rent Sly's earlier
"Demolition Man," which sucks too, but in a much more entertaining
fashion.  Skip this dull film, unless you want to see Woods, or make fun
of Steiger's accent, or see Stone's breasts again.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Ransom (1996)
Director: Ron Howard
Writers: Alexander Ignon and Richard Price
Starring: Mel Gibson, Rene Russo, Gary Sinise, Delroy Lindo, Lili 
Taylor, Donnie Wahlberg, Liev Schreiber, Brawley Nolte, Dan Hedaya
If I ever become rich, I will never have kids.  Simple as that.  You 
know you're probably gonna piss some schmuck off who will somehow 
vindicate his actions by giving you "a lesson," which will probably 
involve kidnapping someone, namely your kid, for a hefty sum.  That's 
what "Ransom" depicts.  It's a smart thriller because it has the balls 
to give us a flawed protagonist who we somehow doubt liking but 
nevertheless care about what happens to him because, well, it's Mel 
Gibson and his freaking kids been kidnapped by a group of schmucks.  
However, it never really becomes too smart, because that's when the 
audience starts hating it.
Gibson plays Tom Mullen, a multi-millionaire who owns the fourth biggest 
airline in the country.  He's rich, he's powerful, and he has a family, 
including his wife, Kate (Rene Russo), and his beloved son, Sean 
(Brawley Nolte).  One day at some kind of flying machine festival, Sean 
is kidnapped by two greasy haired psychos (Liev Schreiber and - get this 
- Donnie Wahlberg, I guess trying to earn some extra bucks following 
that whole "New Kids" spiel - or just a way to follow in the footsteps 
of his brother).  They can't find him and they soon get a high-tech 
e-mail showing his son and a ransom for 2 million bucks.
Tom has no trouble getting the cash but as he researches some cases he 
got from the FBI, who he's called in (led by the schweppervescent and 
gouteed Delroy Lindo), he begins to doubt that he'll ever see his son 
again.  After some botched drop-off attempts and some philosophical 
bashings from the kidnappers (cleverly led by a cop named Jimmy Shaker, 
played by Gary Sinise), he gives up his hope of truly getting him back 
and goes on the air to proclaim that he's switching the tables around, 
putting a 2 million dollar bounty on the kidnappers' heads unless they 
give the kid back.
A lesser film would have perished at this (it is pretty crazy), but the 
film turns into a psychological analysis, showing the kidnappers arguing 
over what to do and Kate and Tom worrying about his decision in their 
own ways.  The ending is kind of stupid but nonetheless satisfying since 
the film has depicted a psychological collapse of three sort of decent 
people.
The best part of the film is the character Tom and his portrayer, Mel 
Gibson, who has a tough part to play, since we learn he has made a very 
selfish and totally amoral business decision that has caused him to 
worry intensely.  Tom starts out as a man plagued with ghosts in his 
head that come erupting out in emotions.  Mel Gibson, one of the better 
of the well-paid actors in Hollywood, does it totally believably and 
makes him a complex individual.  His best scenes are when he's sitting 
in a car, thinking about what he's doing.  Also, his acting when he 
walks out to the balcony with suicidal thoughts going through his head 
is priceless.  His performance is so good that he got a well-deserved 
Golden Globe nomination.  An Oscar nomination would be going too far, 
but still, Mel rocks in this flick and he's the anchor for the whole 
film.
Rene is mostly weepy, but it's obviously understandable.  Gary is creepy 
and does a great job at it.  Delroy rocks, as he always has and will.  
Lili Taylor is good and all, but she's wasted in a crap part.  Remember, 
she was absolutely amazing in "I Shot Andy Warhol."  She's great in 
this, but you kinda feel cheated.
"Ransom" is tautly directed by Ron Howard, who's a very good director.  
It's far from his best film, but he nicely shows us the psychological 
collapse of a flawed entrepeneur.  And he wonderfully gives us the 
tenseness of having a person's kid being kidnapped by a bunch of greedy 
schmucks.  I reccomend this as a good film, but not a great one, 
unfortunately.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
Writer/Director: Robert Duvall
Starring: Robert Duvall, Farrah Fawcett, Miranda Richardson, Billy Bob
Thornton, Rick Dial, Todd Allen, John Beasley, June Carter Cash, Walt
Goggins
So...Robert Duvall's labor of love has finally come out.  It's a film he's
been trying to make almost all of his life, and only until the whole Indy
spiel has become trendy now has he been able to get his funds together to
make it.  Is it a great film?  Sure.  It has one of the most intriguing
protagonists in cinema this year, and features a toss-up for the single
best performance of the year (tied with Ian Holm's brilliant acting in "The
Sweet Hereafter").  It has a very good message, one that isn't pummelled
into the brain but is reflected on slowly as the film opens up.  Is it
brilliant though?  Well...close but no cigar.
"The Apostle" of the story is a Texan man named Sonny (Duvall), a man who
seems to be like one of those people you see in airports or on the
religious channel on cable who preach the gospel like they wrote it and
swear they love God more than anything in the world, and also try to get us
to follow in their "holy" footsteps.  Sonny swears he talks to God every
night, and has the power to heal and all that stuff.  The thing is he
really can.  Elmer Gantry, he's not.
Unfortunately, Sonny is not perfect.  After all, he's not God.  He
sometimes drinks too much, has rigid relations with his also religious wife
(Farrah Fawcett - !!), and yeah, has a temper.  After discovering that his
wife has been carrying on an affair and wishes to leave him, kicking him
out of the church they founded, he goes a bit crazy, and in a fit of rage,
picks up a bat and beats the lover in public.  Not wishing to upset his
mother (June Carter Cash) and not wanting any legal interference, he drives
off, buries his car in the water, tosses his wallet away, and decides to
start anew.
With his past currently out of his way, he renames himself "The Apostle
E.F.," blessing himself in a river one day, and heading over to a Louisiana
Community.  There, with the help from an old minister (John Beasley), he
begins to rebuild their old church, now decrepit and dying, getting two odd
jobs to support himself, and preaching wildly at church and over the radio
waves of a station owned by a man played by Rick Dial, the same actor who
played the auto shop in Duvall's friend Billy Bob Thornton's "Sling Blade."
 And his church becomes more and more populated as the film goes on, and he
reaches more and more people.
Duvall's story is one about a man who's not a perfect man, but can
certainly do some very good things for people, most notably bringing people
together with belief in God.  This is not a pro-religion film, or a satire
on the way people can be brought together by faith alone, but a story that
shows that the better things a man does should outweigh the worse parts. 
In the end, do we really think of Sonny as a rage-filled man, who violently
beat a man with a baseball bat?  Or do we think of him as a man who brought
together a community by showing love for Christ?
But why isn't it perfect or even very brilliant?  The big problem with the
film seems to be that the supporting cast and anyone else other than Sonny
is horribly underwritten.  A romance between him and a secretary working at
the radio station (Miranda Richardson, in a convincing southern accent)
feels horribly edited, while a two scene ordeal between Sonny and a bigot
(Billy Bob Thornton) who wants to destroy the church because he "don't want
to pray with any niggas" is too short to really make any kind of emotional
feel.  While Sonny is fully realized, no one else is, giving it a feeling
of small incompletion.
In terms of more superficial problems, the film is incredibly slow-moving,
setting up everything at tortoise-like pace, but never actually registering
as "boring."  The film unfolds very nicely, getting to its message by the
finale instead of repeating the same thing over and over again.  It's not
one of the year's best films, but definitely one of the year's better
films.
But what makes it all worthwhile is the absolutely perfect-in-every-way
performance by Duvall, who makes Sonny into a likable, three-dimensional
human being, and is completely convincing the entire time.  Duvall's one of
the greatest actors working today, and this film is not really the
culmination of over three decades in the biz, but his acting is.  Of the
actors nominated for Best Actor at the Oscars this year, he totally
deserves it.  For the entire year, though, it's a toss-up between he and
Ian Holm (as I said), though I feel that Duvall would edge ahead of him
just slightly.  It's inspiring to see an actor like Duvall always giving
great performances; this is just his best.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Jude (1996)
Director: Michael Winterbottom
Writer: Hossein Amini (based on the novel "Jude the Obscure" by Thomas
Hardy)
Starring: Christopher Eccleston, Kate Winslet, Liam Cunningham, Rachel
Griffiths, June Whittfield, Ross Curvin Turnball, James Daley
No, I did not read the novel by Thomas Hardy, "Jude the Obscure," his
final novel (final because this film created such an outrage that he
never wrote again - see: I did do some research on it) about a man who
is plagued with bad luck throughout his entire life.  But, after
watching the movie, I can imagine how incredibly depressing it is. 
"Jude" is a satirical film from start to finish about society's way of
spitting out and chewing up those unwanted in its system, but what's
remarkable is how timeless this film is.
The film takes place in the late 19th century (or early 20th - wasn't
really sure), but its story could even be retold today in modern form,
although it'd be kinda different (a given).  It tells the story of Jude
(Christopher Eccleston - the psychotic accountant from "Shallow Grave")
- a simple, dim-witted young man with big dreams.  In its bleak,
foreboding opening, shot in grainy black and white, he gets a lesson
from Phillotson (Liam Cunningham), his teacher: as they stand upon a
mountain, looking upon a city in the distance, he says all you have to
do is work hard and you can have anything in the world.
After marrying and divorcing an immature woman named Arabella (Rachel
Griffiths) because they frolicked in the hay (literally) but did not
ultimately share anything in common, he moves away to a town with a
giant university, with a chance to learn more, and get ahead in life. 
Taking a welding job, he works hard while studying constantly for his
college bars, reciting latin over and over again, and training himself. 
But when he sends his application for the school in, he is bluntly told
to just remain a worker.
Another reason for going to this town was because someone in his family
lives there: Sue (Kate Winslet), his cousin and a very intelligent but
kinda mischevious young woman who wants to be a school teacher.  She and
Jude click eventually and become very endearing friends, so much that
when she spends the night at his flat after running from her apprentice
teacher job (for none other than Phillotson at the local school), there
are rumors that she and Jude did some nasty business (nudge nudge).
Several twists turn in the storyline, and eventually Jude and Sue do do
some nasty business (an interesting scene, to say the least...), and are
soon born into a controversial non-wedlock, as she eventually gives
birth to their baby, and Jude inherits his son from Arabella, who turns
up again after awhile.  Because they aren't married, and because they're
cousins, they run into problems with every place they go to, carrying
around two children everywhere, and only staying in lodges for a very
brief period of time, then moving on.  If you didn't think this was
harsh enough, wait till you see what happens later on...
The sad truth is that Jude is one of the miserable people who can never
get any luck in this world.  He will never gain any true happiness, and
any happiness that happens to him will be fleeting, and will probably
bring more horrible instances to his life.  Part of it is his fault -
he's too optimistic, and too gullible.  But society has a way of taking
these people, and hurting them until their death.  The ending of "Jude"
is bleak because it has to be (although I hear the ending of the novel
is even worse - guess I'll have to read it now).
"Jude" offers a satirical view on society's cruelties, but shows no way
of curing this, and thank heavens it doesn't.  There's no way to
relinquish the selfishness of society, and any solution would be too
small to cure such a mass problem.  Satire has always been one of the
few ways of changing certain people's minds, and that's what "Jude" is. 
Sure, it's one hell of a downer, but it needs to be.
The film also posesses two fantastic performances from its two leads,
and some good supporting work along with it.  Christopher Eccleston
(slightly resembling Richard Edson with his new look and dumb
expression) plays Jude wonderfully, sometimes bringing a big dumb smile
to his face, and making him kind of child-like at other times.  Kate
Winslet, in a pre-"Titanic" performance, is brilliant, nailing every
psyche of her character, and creating someone who's troubled but very
seductive with her personality.  Kate may be the best actress in her age
group (if you don't believe me, see "Titanic," Branagh's "Hamlet,"
"Sense and Sensibility," and "Heavenly Creatures," the latter one being
my favorite performance of hers).
In the supporting roles, Liam Cunningham is a wonderfully flawed
teacher, exposing all his bad parts, but ultimately being a pretty good
person; and Rachel Griffiths is wonderfully immature as Jude's wife,
whom he never divorces.
"Jude" moves at a very slow pace, and keeps taunting its viewers with
chances of happiness for its protagonists, which would drive some people
nuts.  But those who appreciate good social commentary with their films,
no matter how slow or downright depressing they are (this one is both)
will appreciate "Jude," though I doubt anyone truly enjoys it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for High Art (1998)
Director: Stephen Norrington
Writer: David S. Goyer
Starring: Wesley Snipes, Stephen Dorff, N'Bushe Wright, Kris Kristoferson,
Donal Logue, Udo Kier, Arly Jover, Traci Lords, Kevin Patrick Walls
"Blade" is not only the most recent attempt at commercializing on an old
school comic book action hero, but also the newest film that lives or dies
with how damn cool it looks and feels to watch.  And luckily enough,
"Blade" is a triumph of visual brilliance, a great piece of flashy, moody
pulp, and a film of mostly style and very little substance.  It's a more
grizzly "Batman"; a significantly better "Spawn"; and a less philosophical
"Dark City."  In other words: bitching as hell.
For those of you who don't know who Blade is (read: me before seeing the
movie), he's the latest vampire slayer with a twist: he's a hybrid of human
and vampire as a result of his mother being bit by a vampire minutes before
giving birth to him.  He's grown up with all of the strengths that a
vampire has, such as invulnerability and the like, but very few of their
weaknesses: he can walk comfortably during daylight hours, but he still has
to take a serum consisting of blood to ease his nerves.
Blade's fortress of solitude is a giant warehouse in New York City, and his
mentor/sidekick/bud is a grizzled old man with a nasty limp named Whistler
(Kris Kristoferson, tres grizzled), who has waged a personal war against
the vampires that have been in existence for centuries without a whole lot
of knowledge and uses Blade, whom he found as a kid in the streets, as his
chief weapon.  Speaking of weapons, Whistler is the one who makes them, all
silver products (the only thing that kill vampires), including one nifty
boomerang with sharp edges that when thrown, chops the heads off of a whole
bunch of vampires then returns safely into the hands of Blade.
The plot, as it were, concerns Blade and Whistler's ever-going fight
killing all the vampires in the world, and it picks one group who live in
New York City as the object de scorn for this particular introductory
installment.  As we are told, the entire world as we know it is just a
facade for the vampires who rule the night and feast on us measly humans
like cattle.  In the opening sequence (which cannot be missed - you may as
well not show up at all if you walk in late), one poor guy is led to a
midnight rave where the scene soon turns into a kafkaesque nightmare that
is saved by the presence of Blade, who proceeds to chop up anyone he can,
in a scene so over the top that it could leave anyone feeling sadistically
giddy.
This is basically the entirety of "Blade": he finds vampires, and chops
them up.  A little story is introduced: Blade has to square off against one
of the big-heads of the vampires, Deacon Frost (Stephen Dorff, still stuck
in the three-day beard, greasy-hair days of yesteryear - oh those were the
days, my friend), who's trying to usurp the power from the other vampire
heads, such as the big big cheese, Dragonetti (the great Udo Kier), so he
can fulfill some prophecy of sorts (does it really matter?).
In the meantime, Blade hooks up with a doctor chick, Karen (N'Bushe Wright,
from "Dead Presidents"), who is half-bitten by one vampire early in the
flick and is slowly turning into one herself.  Saved by Blade, she begins
to help him and Whistler in their odyssey, although the only reason she's
there is as a sorta romance interest and blatant window dressing (sad,
because she was actually very good in "Presidents").
The big plus side to this film is that it's very well-directed.  Stephen
Norrington gives it a bleak, cool, and half-funny/half-serious feel that
turns it into just one big blast to watch.  The action sequences are
well-choreographed, and have the intensity and humorously violent feel that
a comic book film needs to have.  When the vampires are killed, they
instantly disentigrate, and sometimes when killed differently, even inflate
and blow up (a tactic blatantly stolen from John Carpenter's "Big Trouble
in Little China").
And the superhero is gleefully serious.  Played with an Eastwood-ian
inaffectiveness by Wesley Snipes (who's also credited with "Fight
Choreographer"), Blade comes off as a man who's deeply tortured, but keeps
all his pain deep down, and has a nice costume piece: dark sunglasses,
which not only make him look cooler, but also give him that nice touch of
hidden torture.  All the great superheroes are the ones who have inner
pains, and Blade is far from the exception.
It's not a great film.  It has very little substance, and the substance it
does introduce (like the idea of Blade's refusal to open up to anyone) is
dropped after a little bit of being played around with.  And the film seems
to loose some steam in its second half, when things become all to
predictable and a little redundant, even though it's still extremely
watchable.
No matter.  The final sequence, although a little puzzling (what the hell
happened with those 12 head vampires?  And is that REALLY the vision of
apocalypse?), is nevertheless totally kickass and amazing.  A final
tete-a-tete between Blade and Deacon is riveting, original, and filled with
fits of humor and shocks, all which leave the film off with a nice taste
that makes up for any little problems the film had before.
Unfortunately, this film will not be remembered for its story.  It falls
into the trap of oh so many films that try to launch franchises (most
recently "The Mask of Zorro") and comes off as more as an introduction to
cooler pastures that may or not be in the near future than ana actual great
film.  But even if there's not a "Blade 2" or "Still Blading" or whatever
they may call it, we can always remember this as another in the line of
films that are brilliant in their visual design and sensual intensity.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Die xue shuang xiong (1989)
Writer/Director: John Woo
Starring: Chow Yun-Fat, Danny Lee, Sally Yeh, Chu Kong
What is it about action director John Woo which makes him more
critically acclaimed than any other action director in the world?  Why
do critics actually like the guy if all he does is action films?  And
how come he's only made one American film that's on par with his other
ones?  Well, put simply, John Woo just knows how to make an action
sequence.
John Woo is different from other action directors because his action
sequences are beautifully staged, viscerally shot, and filled with lots
of graphic violence, people being brutally murdered in slow motion (like
Peckinpah), and a original ways to creat an action sequence.  His
stories, seen as being corny over in the States, but are well-plotted,
featuring spaghetti western-like melodrama, filled with characterization
and opposition, and told with great style that is not matched by any
other action director in the world.
"The Killer," which is around the middle of his career, is the best film
by him I've seen.  Not only an intensely crafted action film, but also a
little character study centering on an unlikely target, "The Killer"
moves at a quick pace, and is motivated by the characters, not the
plot.  Thus, the film twists in weird ways in respect to the action
genre.
The killer in "The Killer" is Jeff (played by Chow Yun-Fat), an unusual
hitman in that he has a kind of sense of alienation and compassion for
others.  He sees his work as a job, but never likes to hurt the
innocent.  In the first scene, he sits in a quaint church, awaiting his
boss/pal to show up with his orders for his next job.  Then he goes to a
restaurant where his target is, pulls out two guns, and takes everyone
out in a brilliantly choreographed scene of mayhem and carnage.  But
towards the end of the bloodbath, he accidentally blinds a singer from
the restuarant (Sally Yeh) while shooting at one of the bad guys. 
Instead of shrugging it off and walking off cooly, Jeff damn near cries,
wraps a bandage around her eyes, and helps her out before taking off.
Turns out the singer isn't totally blind, but needs an operation to
restore her sight, but can't really pay for it, I suppose.  In steps
Jeff, who has been obsessed with the fact that he's wounded her,
probably for life.  He decides he wants out of the business, but wants
to do one last job to finance her operation.  So, off he goes on a
typical, easy job, which requires him to put on a fake moustache, get on
a speed boat, and shoot a well-known figure in public.  No problem
there.  But then he's set up by the guys who hired him, and he finds
himself alienated, being followed by both his employers and the cops,
but still selflessly obsessed with getting his money and helping the
singer.
This is a pretty unusual concept for a tense action film, and it's
handled wonderfully.  The relationship between the singer and Jeff is
handled nicely, never really giving into a lot of romance or anything
cliched like that.  And there's a lot of opposition between Jeff and the
main cop (Danny Lee) who's obsessed with taking him in (or out), but
finds himself identifying with him, thus creating a complex opposition
with him, instead of some cliched one.
But besides the inner depth of the film, there is a great sense of
action craftsmanship in this film, making not only Woo's best, but one
of the greatest action films of all time.  I'm talking top 5 or 10
here.  It's a frenetic, intense, visceral, and adrenaline-rushing film,
filled with dizzying action sequences that thrill the viewer, leaving
them giddy.  Woo, reportedly, abhors violence, and his is cartoonish,
and, in retrospect, exhausting.  Every action seuqence is a ballet of
bloodbath, with characters being shot to a grisly death in slow motion,
then going back to the regular frenetic speed of the scene.
"The Killer" represents the right way to create an action film - level
it with depth, give us characters we care about, then pour on the
action.  This shows a true filmmaker at the height of his craft, and
luckily he has never really come down from that high pinnacle, except
for his first two American outings.  If you've seen "Face/Off," you know
that when you're talking about action films, John Woo is, as Howie Long
called Travolta in "Broken Arrow, "the man."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
Director: Alex Proyas
Writers: Alex Proyas, Lem Dobbs, and  David S. Goyer (based on a story by
Alex Proyas)
Starring: Rufus Sewell, Keifer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, William Hurt,
Richard O'Brien, Ian Richardson, Melissa George
"Dark City" is a film that Kafka probably would have enjoyed.  It's a film
that presents a nightmare world, where everything is controlled by a group
of supernatural creatures who have strange, mystic abilities beyond the
control of humans.  It's a film where one man stands alone, apart from
everything else, and with no prior memory of how he got there, but
possessing the will to find out what has happened and why.  And it's a film
where all of the strangeness and generally creepiness is backed up with a
higher thinking concerning humanity and their role in determining their
individuality.  Yeah, Kafka would really have dug this.
"Dark City" concerns, well, a city in perpetual darkness.  As the film
opens, we meet a man (Rufus Sewell) who awakens in a bath tub, naked, and
not having any memory of how he got there.  After stumbling around a bit
for clues, he finds a suitcase with clothes and a postcard in it, a broken
syringe on the floor, and a murdered woman next to a bed.  He soon
discovers his name is John Murdoch, and we follow him as he searches out
his identity, how and why he came to wake up in the bath tub, and whether
or not he killed that woman.
The film sometimes switches to different perspectives, and we meet other
characters involved in John's life.  We meet his estranged night club
singer wife, Emma (the lucious and lustful Jennifer Connelly), who has been
looking for him since he has apparently disappeared from her life for
awhile; Dr. Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland), a crippled doctor who somehow
knows John was in the room when he woke up; and a police investigator
(William Hurt) who is on the search for John, as he believes he has
murdered several prostitutes in the past couple weeks.
I will not reveal many of John's discoveries throughout the film, as it's
the source of many of the film's fun and inventiveness, but I will say that
he stumbles upon an alien race living beneath the surface, called The
Strangers.  They are a huge group of men, all donning long black robes, all
having shaved white heads, and possessing the ability to stop time and the
ability to "tune," which is a psychic power that allows them to change
things in the city, mostly when everyone's asleep.  Since John also has the
ability to "tune," he becomes the object of their obsession, and is soon
being stalked by all of them in order to be killed.
"Dark City" was directed by Alex Proyas, who you may remember as the
director of the cult classic pic "The Crow" (not the second one; only the
first one), which was a classic revenge story told magnificently, with lots
of emotion and a style that gave it a very comic book feel (it was also the
film where Brandon Lee, son of Bruce, was killed on the set, which sent
Proyas into a pit of depression for years until he decided to make this
film as his sophomore effort).  However, "Dark City" is nothing like "The
Crow."  It's not a comic book film, and it doesn't have many big action set
pieces.  Instead, it is a film portraying a human sadness, and creating a
strange, kafkaesque mood throuhgout.  Proyas has expanded his abilities on
"Dark City," and has created a film that is much more ambiguous and full of
more thought.
It's not an action pic, but is instead a film of ideas and theories...just
the kind of weird films I like.  Proyas' view on humanity is that we rely
too much on a form of deity to control our minds and that we should break
out from that and become individuals, gods of our own realms.  The
Strangers are the gods in this film, and Proyas has an interesting and
intelligent take on them.  They are not merely out to screw up creation,
but to observe them with the intent of trying to understand their souls,
the things that make them tick.  In Christianity, we (meaning those of us
who were raised as Christians, that is...even if we later rebelled against
it) are brought up to believe that God created us, I guess, out of boredom
or the need to create.  The Strangers in this film have created humans to
try and understand the thing that they do not have: individuality.
It is the goal of John, then, to try and overcome their power, since he was
born with a genetic defect that gave him the ability to "tune" like they do
(this is never really explained very well...but really, what reason would
be sufficient?), and can therefore do battle with them once he understands
exactly what he's doing.  The film moves along as he and we learn
information along the way, and by the finale, when we have discovered
everything there is to learn, we have the grande finale, a sequence which
may be a tad cheap and nihilistic, but is at least satisfying, and brings
about an intelligent conclusion about our state in the grand scheme of
things.
Maybe I'm overanalyzing this film though.  Maybe it's just supposed to be a
cool bit of neo-Kafka, featuring a proposterous idea about a bunch of
people called The Strangers, and a completely amazing production design.  I
will say that as eye candy, this bleak film is jaw dropping.  The sets are
astoundingly cool-looking, the cinematography is just amazing, with lots of
control over shadows and light (much like "The Crow"), and special effects
which may seem a tad cheesy at times, but look damn cool.  Compared to "The
Crow," this film, which combines all kinds of old architecture, is better
looking.  But we already knew that from the commercials anyway (the
previews were cool as hell, weren't they?).
However, as a whole, this film does what it set out to do: creating a
bizarre and intriguing look at man's role in his (or her) fate, with a
message to become master of his (or her) domain (if you'll pardon the
disgusting imagery).  Sure, it may not be the most brilliant film, and may
possess a couple flaws which cripple it from becoming an instant classic
(it's not going to ever be a "Metropolis"), but at least it amazes for what
it is.
The acting in this film is surprisingly good.  Rufus Sewell, a
Shakespearean and period piece actor (known for the British films
"Carrington," "Cold Comfort Farm," Branagh's "Hamlet" - he was Fortinbras -
and the recently released "Dangerous Beauty"), brings his great acting
abilities to his role, which could have been a throwaway performance by a
lesser actor, but instead is a very sympathetic performance.  Because of
Sewell, it's easy to like John Murdoch, and not just because he's the lead.
In supporting roles, Kiefer Sutherland is pretty awesome as the enslaved
Dr. Schreber, forced into helping The Strangers, but hiding a will to rebel
against them.  He speaks as if he's always out-of-breath, pausing between
words in sentences to take a breath (it's surprisingly enough not
annoying).  Jennifer Connelly once again gets a pretty thin role, showing
off more of her beauty than her acting abilities.  She rarely gets a role
that allows her to combine both (see her in "Mulholland Falls" for an
exception to this), but at least she's cool in this (not to mention...wow).
 William Hurt brings some drollness to his role, which is underwritten a
bit, and reminds us why we liked him back in the 80s, even if not enough
(this is probably a better performance than his in the upcoming "Lost in
Space," though).  And as one of the head Strangers, ex-Rocky Horror Picture
Show man, Richard O'Brien (remember Riff Raff?) gives another wacky
performance, albeit not as memorable as Riff Raff (but how could it be?).
I have to say that despite a crappy theatre with the sound blaring out too
much (it was a sneak preview at my college's crap theatre - I wasn't
expecting quality), I very much enjoyed "Dark City," actually more than I
did "The Crow."  Although it doesn't unfold as neatly as it should (I would
have liked it to have actually opened up on John in the tub, instead of
giving us some background information - wouldn't that have been cool?),
it's still a wild ride that is never boring or dull, and never insults the
intelligence.  And that, my friend(s), makes all the difference.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Do the Right Thing (1989)
Writer/Director: Spike Lee
Starring: Spike Lee, Danny Aiello, Ossie Davis, Ruby Dee, John Turturro,
Richard Edson, Giancarlo Esposito, Rosie Perez, Bill Nunn, Samuel L.
Jackson, Frank Vincent, Miguel Sandoval, Rick Aiello, John Savage,
Martin Lawrence
It's kind of weird watching 1989's "Do the Right Thing" in 1997, cheifly
because it still holds up today.  Racism and bigotry seem to rule this
country, and this is what the film seems to say.  But what's amazing
about this film, other than the fact that it does it so well, is that it
is not preachy for a single second.
"Do the Right Thing" takes place in Brooklyn on the hottest day of the
year.  We are presented to a tiny microcosm of life, featuring all sorts
of different races and cultures.  Most are black, like the protagonist
Mookie (writer/director Spike Lee), the militant hothead Buggin' Out
(Giancarlo Esposito), the Goliath-like Radio Raheem (Bill Nunn), the
slightly senile old "Da Mayor" (Ossie Davis), and the witch-like Mother
Sister (Ruby Dee).
But into this giant melting pot, we also get some korean store owners, a
couple whites here and there, the white racist cops (Miguel Sandoval and
Rick Aiello), some hispanics (like Mookie's girlfriend Tina, played by
none other than Rosie Perez, in her film debut), and of course, the
italian pizzeria owners.
The whole center of the place seems to be the pizzeria, "Sal's Famous,"
headed by, well, Sal (Danny Aiello), and also by his two sons, Pino and
Vito (John Turturro and Richard Edson, respectively), the former being a
racist who is constantly bitching about moving to the italiant
neighborhoods, and explaining that black people like Eddie Murphy are
"more than black."  Also working there as a delivery boy is Mookie.
Observing the whole film is the 12-hour radio guy, Mister Senor Love
Daddy (Samuel L. Jackson, cast as "Sam Jackson), who is constantly
making comments, including a long speech on thanking basically every
single black celebrity (although I don't remember hearing Rick James'
name being mentioned).
The film plays like a pot of boiling water, eventually bursting and
spilling over for a shocking and brilliant climax, and only being
cleaned up a bit in the ending.  For the first hour or so, we get the
daily lives kind of thing, which is nothing short of fascinating and
completely entertaining.  It seems that in one way or another, everyone
is a bit of a bigot or racist.  Even the innocent white guy who
accidentally makes bike skid marks on Buggin' Out's new Jordans ruins
his innocence by saying that they shouldn't beat him up because he was
born in Brooklyn.
The ending, as I said is brilliant, but also seems to be a precursor for
the whole Rodney King riots.  Not that it incited it in anyway, but just
seemed to prophesize what would happen since America has never really
been comfortable with its giant melting pot of cultures.  What's
remarkable is that it doesn't take sides at this event, where a lesser
film would have.
"Do the Right Thing" acts as an observer of life, and presents it in the
most responsible way.  There's almost no way to remedy this huge
problem, and the film presents no real way of curing it, other than that
"we should all just get along" (they don't say it in this film, by the
way).  Even in 1997, it's the most accurate display of racism in
America.
This was the first Spike Lee film I saw (I know, I know...), and it was
absolutely amazing.  Lee has an amazing knack for dialogue, and has the
same kind of giddy use with the camera that people like Quentin
Tarantino and Martin Scorsese have.  He wonderfully balances a huge
ensemble cast, with some standout performances from himself, Danny
Aiello, Ossie Davis, John Turturro, and Giancarlo Esposito (as well as
cameos from John Savage and Frank Vincent), and presents a world that is
never boring.
Also, look for Martin Lawrence in an early role as one of the many
inhabitants of the little mircrocosm.
"Do the Right Thing" is a wonderfully engaging film, filled with
brilliant satire, and a strong observation about a tumor in America
which has been here since it was created.  It's one of the best films of
the 80s, as well as one of the most important.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Four Rooms (1995)
When respecting a director, you must also respect the fact that they are 
not perfect.  Woody Allen has made a couple less-than good films, and 
he's my favorite.  Even Martin Scorsese hasn't had a perfect track 
record.  Kevin Smith, after a smashing debut with the classic "Clerks" 
stooped as low to sell-out and make the dreadful "Mallrats."  I mean, so 
far the only director who's made several films, none of which have been 
bad is Richard Linklater ("Slacker," "Dazed and Confused," "Before 
Sunrise," and "SubUrbia"...all which were great).  
Now, I ADORE Quentin Tarantino.  His first two films were classic films, 
the second one being one of the greatest films of all time.  But 1995 
just wasn't that good of a year for him.  He made way too many TV 
appearances.  He mispronounced Jackie Chan's name on the MTV Movie 
Awards.  And he made this film.  (He was also awarded an Oscar, so I 
guess that would be a grand exception).  Robert Rodriguez is also a 
great director; not a brilliant one, but a cool one.  I've never seen an 
Alexandre Rockwell or Allison Anders film, so I can't comment on them.  
But in this crap ensemble director's film, all four give pitiful 
efforts.  Pitiful for any director, too.
Now in all fairness, ensemble director pieces never really work out.  
I've never seen all of "New York Stories," but have heard the first two 
films, by Scorsese and Francis Ford Coppola are crap (I saw Woody's one, 
which was hilarious but not totally up to par).  But I will rate each 
film individually and then report back to you on the overal average 
score of the film.
EXPOSITION: A simple one - a bellhop, Ted (the totally overdone Tim 
Roth, who's a god and all, but not in this one, though he has a couple 
good moments) is working on New Year's Eve for his first shift (!!!) in 
an old fancy hotel.  He's the only one there (again: !!!) and he only 
has a couple rooms (yet again: !!!).  The old bellhop (the seemingly 
immortal Marc Lawrence - who hated Pulp Fiction actually) hands over his 
cap to Ted and he goes to his job happily.  As the night goes on, he 
becomes increasingly annoyed and hostile.  Yea.
(The short films are presented in order, btw):
THE MISSING INGREDIENT
Writer/Director: Allison Anders
Starring: Sammi Davis, Amanda DeCadenet, Valeria Golino, Madonna, Ione 
Skye, Lili Taylor, Alicia Witt
This one starts it off horribly with no plot, no intrigue, and crap 
dialogue.  The situation is so terrible that it's physically painful to 
watch.  The plot has something to do with a coven of witches needing 
sperm to bring back a godess who is (GASP!) stuck inside some object in 
their hotel room.  The witch that was supposed to bring it (Ione Skye) 
calls up Ted and asks him if she can perform Fellatio on him to get it. 
 Yeah, that's what I said.  Stupid plot, inane characters who aren't 
interesting at all, etc, etc, etc.  The only good thing about this is it 
has a good cast which, in turn, it wastes pitifully.  Not even actually 
funny for a second.
THE WRONG MAN 
Writer/Director: Alexandre Rockwell
Starring: David Proval, Jennifer Beals and Laurence Bender 
Another bad little film with another stupid sex thing going on.  Ted 
stumbles into the wrong room or something and gets in the middle of a 
couple (David Proval and Jennifer Beals in her attempt at "coming back") 
who are playing sex games.  Ted tries to escape and we cheer him on so 
it will end soon.  But at least this has a bit of comedy in it, just not 
that much.  And David Proval has never overacted as much.  And it's 
"Pulp Fiction" producer Laurence Bender who gets to puke from a window. 
 A masterpiece compared to the first one, but still...
THE MISBEHAVERS
Writer/Director: Robert Rodriguez
Starring: Antonio Banderes, Tamlyn Tomita, Lana McKissack, Danny 
Verduzco, Salma Hayek
Would a Robert Rodriguez film be the same without Salma Hayek's navel?  
Nope.  Luckily she's on the TV dancing so we get to see her.  
Surprisingly enough, when I read the screenplay (about a year before 
actually seeing it), this one seemed to have the most potential.  It was 
fast-paced, funny, and well, funny.  But when I watched it, it seemed 
anti-climactic and only seemed to gain any momentum towards the end when 
everything happened at once.  Antonio overacts nicely and the two kids 
(Lana and Danny) are funny.  But, as I said, it moves slowly and in that 
way, it's more painful than funny.  But the ending was stupid and funny 
at the same time.  Oh!  The plot: Antonio is a supposed gangster 
(assumed, really) who leaves his two troubling kids home while he and 
his wife (Tomita) go out to get drunk at a New Year's Party.  Antonio 
hires Ted for a couple bucks to watch his kids all night long, but 
things go wrong...it was okay.
THE MAN FROM HOLLYWOOD
Writer/Director: Quentin Tarantino
Starring: Quentin Tarantino, Bruce Willis, Paul Calderon and Jennifer 
Beals (again)
Ironically, this one could be considered the best for a bad reason: it 
best represents what Quentin has done with this film.  He plays Chester, 
a spoiled brat actor or something who has just had a huge box-office hit 
on his hands and is living it up by playing an anti-climactic game from 
a Hitchcock TV episode starring Steve McQueen and Peter Lorre where they 
gamble to see if one of them can get light from his lighter ten times in 
a row.  They're drunk and need sober but nervous Ted to hold the cleaver 
and bring it down if the lighter doesn't light.  They also pay him a lot 
of cash.  This is so much exactly what this little film is about that 
it's campy.  Tim Roth was probably payed a lot of money to do this 
stupid part in this stupid film made by a bunch of people who are high 
on themselves 'cause they've had hits, major or minor.  It took Quentin 
to realize that.  But the thing is, it doesn't seem like he realizes 
that.  If he did, I'd give this a good 3 stars.  But this sucked.  It 
was anti-climactic and the dialogue wasn't very good.  He starts off 
with a very long steadicam shot then goes to flashes.  That makes no 
sense.  It's cool for a while, then he makes it uneven.  It's long and 
it's just not very good.  Hopefully Quentin never repeats what he did 
with this one.
CONCLUSION: What's the moral here?  If you've made celebrated films, 
don't do an ensemble piece.  They should have re-watched "New York 
Stories" and then stopped in their tracks.  None of these have any point 
to them and they're embarrassing to not only the writer/directors, but 
to the actors 'cause they're working with crap.  But I will forgive 
everyone involved and I especially look forward to Quentin's next 
directing job (even though he and Rodriguez jumped back to the top 
immeadiately with the cool "From Dusk Till Dawn," which I found 
exhilerating).  I love Quentin and I suppose it's good he made "The Man 
from Hollywood" because it makes him seem more realistic and not some 
"God of Cinema."  I seem to respect directors if they aren't "Gods" and 
are actually human beings who make mistakes.  "The Man from Hollywood" 
is his big mistake and let's hope he doesn't return her continuously.

Title
Review for Julius Caesar (1953)
Director: Joseph L. Mankiewicz
Adapter: Joseph L. Mankiewicz (from the play by William Shakespeare)
Starring: James Mason, Marlon Brando, John Gielgud, Louis Calhern, Edmond
O'Brien, Greer Garson, Deborah Kerr, Douglass Watson, Richard Hale, Alan
Napier, John Hardy, Jack Raine, Lumsden Hare, Paul Guilfoyle
I've finally come to the conclusion that the aspect of a Shakespeare
adaptation that makes or breaks it is the quality of the acting, and
everything else in the film, the direction, what it leaves out of the text,
the time period, yada yada yada, are all secondary.  If you've ever seen
the 1970 production of "Julius Caesar," you'll know that it looks good and
everything, but the acting by Charlton Heston, Jason Robards, and John
Gielgud is rather weak, and the film is ultimately not a success.  Even a
film like Baz Lehrmann's "Romeo + Juliet" is only marginally successful
because the sets and direction are great, and some of the supporting actors
are magnificent, but frankly, the two leads have no clue what they're
saying (Claire basically does a vapid redux of her character on "My
So-Called Life").
That's why this adaptation of "Julius Caesar" is so goddam good!  You have
Marlon Brando in his fourth screen performance, back in his prime
(sandwiched between performances in "Viva Zapata!" and "On the Waterfront,"
the latter for which he won an Oscar), playing the big scene-stealer in the
play, Mark Antony.  You have James Mason, an extraordinary and very
underrated actor, who had the guts to play the lead in Kubrick's "Lolita"
and did it to perfection, playing the tragic protagonsit, Brutus.  You have
John Gielgud (again), firing up the screen as my personal favorite
character in the play, Cassius.  And in small supporting roles, you have
people like "The Wild Bunch"'s Edmond O'Brien, "The King and I"'s Deborah
Kerr, and the villain from "Duck Soup," Louis Calhern, playing the
eponomously-titled character.  Just amazing.
The play itself is actually not one of Shakespeare's better ones.  The
climax pretty much comes around the middle-to-end of Act III, and
everything else almost seems to feel like an afterthought.  Mark Antony
hardly has any part in the play, save for Act III when he stuns everyone
with a brilliantly given speech that turns the entire tide of the play
around...and then disappears again, only to show up intermittently.  But in
all reality, Shakespeare at his most mediocre is still brilliant.
The play deals with the inner workings of the conspiracy concerning the
assasination of Julius Caesar (Calhern) by several of the senators working
for him, but is told from the perspective of Caesar's most trusted friend,
Brutus (Mason), who in the beginning, is gradually convinced by Cassius
(Gielgud), one of the conspirators, to help them kill him.  After giving in
and helping them murder Caesar in a brutal scene, he wins over the public
with a big speech, only to have Mark Antony (Brando), the sole supporter of
the Republic, turn things right around and convince everyone to hunt down
the conspirators and kill them.
Although whomever plays Antony often gets top bill (as Brando did), the
play's heart and soul is in Brutus, the man who is too easily folds and
convinces himself that what he's doing is good.  The play is an inner
battle for Brutus, and the film masterfully embraces that.  The best moment
in the film for me is not Antony's speech but rather the assasination
scene.  Often a gory scene (the one in the '70 version lasted, oh I dunno,
for about two minutes), the camera actually pulls away from the murder once
it has started, and shows a close-up on Brutus, who stands shocked by it,
still trying to figure out if he wants to join in.  It's just one of the
many examples of the way this film is superior to most Shakespeare films.
The acting is still the real highlight though, and this is one of the
best-acted Shakespeare screen adaptations.  Of course, it only helps that
the three leads are all method actors (I think), and that they are all
trained in the acting style that means acting with full emotional force. 
Marlon Brando got an Oscar nomination for his performance, and his acting
in his few scenes is just incredible.  His funeral speech is probably the
most stirring and jaw-droppingly awesome acted scene in any Shakespeare
film, and he does it so well that it's easy to believe that the Roman
citizens would change their minds so easily.  Meanwhile John Gielgud is
amazing as Cassius.  He actually turns the scene where he tries to convince
Brutus to join up with the other Senators into a seduction scene, playing
not only on Brutus's insecurities, but also, well, his latent
homosexuality.
And James Mason...well, he portrays perhaps the most sympathetic Brutus I
have ever seen anywhere.  I remember Jason Robards was merely "boring" as
Brutus; Mason breathes actual human life into the character, and creates
someone we can all identify with.  His final scenes are probably his best,
though, where he has to finally fess up to the fact that he made a terrible
mistake, and has to face the destruction it has caused, including the
suicide of his wife, Portia (Deborah Kerr).  Mason's performance gives us a
reason to care after Brando's speech midway through the film, because we
still want to see him handle his psychological battles.  While Brando's is
scene stealing and Gielgud's is masterful, Mason's is emotional.
I've probably said way too much about the acting; everything else about
this film is great as well.  The sets are wonderful, the black and white
cinematography gives it a sometimes eerie and conspiring feel, and most of
all, the direction by Hollywood great Joseph L. Mankiewicz.  With his
almost gritty direction and weird camera angles, he brings the play alive,
which is no shock because he's one of the best directors of films with lots
of great dialogue (see "All About Eve" and "Sleuth," two of the best
Hollywood films of all time and both directed by Mankiewicz).  He has a
certain knack for allowing dialogue to take precedence while still managing
to keep things moving.  If anything, his "Julius Caesar" is wonderfully
paced.
The best Shakespeare films are ones that are filled with life, like the
films by Branagh and Olivier, who were also able to give their Shakespeare
films a lot of depth as well.  And the very best ones were acted by actors
who connected with the audience, and gave them a real reason to care what
happens to a bunch of people speaking in poetic verses.  "Julius Caesar"
the play may not be one of Shakespeare's best, but weirdly enough, "Julius
Caesar" the 1953 film is one of the best film versions of his plays.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
Director/Co-author: Luc Besson
Starring: Bruce Willis, Milla Jovovich, Gary Oldman, Ian Holm, Chris Tucker, 
Luke Perry, Tiny   Lister Jr., Tricky, John Neville, Brion James
I remember when a movie called STARGATE came out a couple years ago.  It 
looked so interesting and so damn cool.  Then I saw it...dull as a lecture on 
the pros and cons of photosynthesis.  'Course it went on to make a lot of 
money while the director's second feature became the most overly popular 
flick of last year (that was, in case you've been shacking up with J.D. 
Salinger, INDEPEDENCE DAY...another nice idea turned pretty stupid albeit 
much better than STARGATE).
I've heard Luc Besson's THE FIFTH ELEMENT being compared to STARGATE.  My big 
question is: "Like, in what ways, man?"  THE FIFTH ELEMENT is a sigh of 
relief from those hokey sci-fi films of olden days that should be shown on 
MST3K like THIS ISLAND EARTH and THE AMAZING COLLOSSAL MAN.  
While the plot isn't totally amazing (I know, we were all expecting satire 
here a la blade runner with a bit of Kafka tossed in just to differ the two), 
it's more interesting than anything else out, so why are we all bitching?  I 
refuse to totally divulge the plot since it's been nicely bottled up by M. 
Besson so when one sees it, they're shocked, which is what SHOULD happen 
anyway: the world is going to be destroyed and a mysteriously woman with 
bizarre hair and a fluent other language (I'm giving Milla Jovovich a medal 
for speaking it so convincingly) is the only hope.  She lands in the cab of a 
bitter ex-army guy, Korben Dallas (a very likable Bruce Willis) and the fun 
begins. 
THE FIFTH ELEMENT starts off slowly but then never sags as it accelerates to 
what felt like 130 mph.  The film just takes off from the first slow frame 
and by the end, you're going "Wow!"  Not only is the film very wild, it looks 
like the inside of someone's head...allow me to translate what that meant: 
reportingly, M. Besson tried to put one of his stories from his youth onto 
celluloid and just had enough money to do that.  I sympathize with him, 
because I've had bizzare futuristic visions in my head too and I can picture 
what it probably was like (too many plot holes, I can guess).  The future 
isn't really grim or anything, it's just very technical, and he satrizes this 
with several "nice touches."  For one thing, everything's compact and 
semi-convenient.  A comical, Chaplin-esque scene takes place in his small, 
claustrophobic apartment where he hides people in several different places 
(i.e. the shower which moves up and down with a freezing closet and a bed 
that slides underneath a cabinet).  And one of the best "nice touches" 
includes the cigarettes with a filter that takes up a good 9/10 of the actual 
cigarrette.  
The film is a treat for the eyes and the story is a hoot to watch as it 
unfolds before our eyes with a touch of Kafka in it.  The sight of a 
metropolis with flying cars buzzing by at high speeds is, well, orgasmic.  
This really could have sucked with a less-competent director.  I can see 
Roland Emmerich making this into a disjumbled mess with hokey humor (my least 
fave kind of humor).  But Luc Besson gives it a great sense of humor (with 
many great jokes and fine comical performances) and handles it properly: 
unseriously.  If it had been serious, it would have sucked because the plot 
isn't made to be handled that way.
As far as the acting, it works with the good sense of humor.  Bruce Willis is 
likable but not great.  He gave his character a great feel, but it's no John 
McClane, James Cole or Butch Coolidge (but, hey!  He only gets the last two 
roles ever couple years!)  Milla Jovovich has been, well, okay in her past 
movies (like DAZED AND CONFUSED, KUFFS, CHAPLIN) but here, she's great.  I'm 
not a big fan of her but she was definitely a good scene stealer.  Gary 
Oldman is my personal fave over-actor and here, he has made a wonderful 
character to impersonate: a wildly eccentric capitalist with a hick accent 
which puts Jerry Lee Lewis's to shame.  The only real kind of annoyance was 
the usually great Chris Tucker, who plays a D.J. on speed, crack and many 
other kinds of drugs (I assume).  His character dresses worse than Dennis 
Rodman and speaks faster than the Micro-Machine man.  His first scene goes on 
too long (but gets a good laugh when Bruce shudders at the sound of his name 
a couple scenes later) but once the opera's over (get the opera for an 
original plot twist) and the bombs are flying, he's great.  And how can I 
forget Mr. Ian Holm (or, as I sometimes refer to him as "Mr. 
Most-Underrated-Actor-in-Modern-Times Holm"), who's comedy comes from his 
acting, not his hyperactivity (which he doesn't posess).  His facial 
expressions are priceless and he should get some kind of medal, just for 
being a great actor no matter what...including being held at gunpoint by a 
dog-looking alien.
And how can I even forget the wild, original costumes by Jean-Paul Gautier?  
They're breathtaking and if they don't win an oscar, I'll hire those dog-like 
aliens to bomb the Oscar ceremony (just kidding in case anyone takes me 
seriously).
Overall, this is a must-see film: a child-like film with a wild imagination. 
It's definitely not for everyone, but it's at least original and a fun ride.
P.S. Luke Perry gets ousted in the first 5 minutes.

Title
Review for My Own Private Idaho (1991)
Writer/Director: Gus Van Sant
Starring: River Phoenix, Keanu Reeves, William Richert, James Russo, Rodney
Harvey, Chiara Caselli, Michael Parker, Jessie Thomas, Flea, Grace
Zubriskie, Tom Troupe, Udo Kier
I can't get that scene out of my mind.  That one where River Phoenix (god
rest his soul) is standing on that road in the middle or nowhere,
supposedly in Idaho, looking around and seeing no signs of life or hope on
either direction.  He does this a bit more, then suddenly drops his bags,
and falls asleep.  Ever since I saw this film a couple days ago in one of
my film classes (conveniently scheduled a mere three days after one of Van
Sant's later films, a bit of selling out called "Good Will Hunting," won a
couple of undeserved Oscars), I haven't been able to get it out of my mind.
"My Own Private Idaho" has been said to be an adaptation of Shakespeare's
"King Henry IV Parts 1 and 2 (I think, or maybe just one of them).  I've
never read the play, but I have heard of it and read King Henry V, and I
know that it's about King Henry V before he took his father's place as a
king, and sold his friends out since he had to grow up.  So as far as I
know, this is a pretty straight adaptation of the play.
But it goes deeper than that.  The main characters of King Henry IV are
Prince Hal, later King Henry V, who is the character Scott (Keanu Reeves -
surprisingly...no, shockingly effective) in this film; and Falstaff, the
jolly poor man, who is the character Bob (William Richert) in this film. 
Yet our protagonist is a character named Mike (Phoenix - maybe his best
performance), who is a narcaleptic (don't worry: the first shot is that of
its definition in the dictionary).
What the film is trying to do is give us a nice drifting feel, designed to
understand what it was like for Prince Hal to feel in King Henry IV, as he
was wandering around.  The film has no real plot, and often jumps around
here and there at a moment's noice.  We only know what occurs thanks to
some conveniently placed occasional title cards, which never tell us how
they arrived there, and it doesn't care either.  At one point, we can be in
a diner in Portland, and then suddenly, a title card saying "Idaho" pops
up, and we're on a road in the middle of nowhere.
The center of this film is Mike, who as I've said is a narcoleptic, who
falls asleep whenever he gets overstressed.  Mike never has to deal with
anything trivial in his life because everytime he gets to the height of his
problem, he collapses.  And when asleep, he has to rely on the kindness or
unkindness of strangers.  There's a scene where he collapses, and some of
his friends help him to get a ride somewhere, and mention to the other,
"this must be hard on his business."
Mike and Scott are hustlers, but at least Scott is heir to a fortune. 
Scott's father (James Russo), a mayor, has watched his beloved son become a
hustler, and it's only a matter of town before Scott gives in, and settles
down.  Grows up.  Matures.  For Mike, there is none of this.  He has to
live life as it comes to him, haunted by his affliction.  He's in direct
contrast to Scott, and this is why their friendship is so powerful.  Both
of them are looking for something to cling onto, but for Mike, it's a
harder bout.  Scott can and does find some kind of love, and a reason to
accept his father's wealth.  If Mike could stay the hell awake, he could
find something too, like his lost mother, whom he tries to locate
on-and-off again throughout the film.
A film like this is not just about substance, but style as well.  If played
straight, this would have had depth, but been an awful cinematic
experience.  Gus Van Sant's direction gives us a film which is surreal as
hell, reminiscent of "Midnight Cowboy" and a David Lynch film (of course,
Van Sant actually gives the film substance, so you have to give him more
credit).  It's comedy doesn't come out of the surrealism, but out of the
humans inhibiting it.  The film has a great sense of humor, and Van Sant
presents the film as having great comic timing.  One scene I liked
inparticular was a scene where a bloated customer is giving Mike a blow
job, and as Mike comes, it cuts to a shot of a wooden cabin falling from
the sky and crashing on the ground.  
Various customers of theirs are extremely funny in that kind of off-kilter
way, like a man who just really likes his apartment clean (I'm still
laughing from this one), and a re-appearing character named Hans (Udo Kier,
who is known to mainstream audiences as that rich guy in "Ace Ventura" part
one), who at one point puts on a song that killed me the same way the
karaoke scene in "Blue Velvet" did.
I've heard many dissection on this film.  Some say it's just Shakepeare,
Van Sant-style.  Others say it's just crap (ugh).  My film teacher
introduced a take that said it was a condemnation of homsexuality.  First
off, Van Sant is openly gay.  You do the math.  But I can see where they're
coming.  The film shows that the hustlers do either sex, it doesn't matter,
and at one point, Mike announces his love for Scott (they even pretend to
have sex at one point - long story).  And in the end, it kinda seems that
homosexuality is shown as something that is pubescent, and is forgotten
once the human being matures into an "adult."  This would be alright...if
the characters were gay.
Scott and Mike, despite a couple scene of homosexuality, are not gay
people.  They're: a) in it for the money and/or desperation; and b) just
looking for someone to love, who will support them.  If it's a guy, then
fine.  This is not a film about homosexuality.  Why is it every time a
character in a film is gay, it's said to be a "gay movie?"  Yes, there's
homosexuality in this movie, but it's just there.  So what?
What "My Own Private Idaho" did for me was give 101 minutes of pure
driftiness.  There are countless scenes of people hanging around in diners,
smoking cigarettes, drinking coffee, and talking about whatever, as they
wait for something, anything to happen.  The film jumps around in locale
repeatedly, jolting us around every time we end up somewhere different, but
have no idea how we got there (somehow Mike and Scott get to Italy).  It's
a film of pure mood, designed to get a reaction from the audience.  What
reaction?  Well, mine was that you have to grow up sometime, mature, and
take responsibility for yourself.  It's a way of looking at the character
Prince Hal from King Henry IV, and understanding what it was like for him
during the whole time, and then contrast the two experiences.
There are times when it seems it would be so great to be Mike.  To just go
to sleep anytime times get extremely rough, and wake up and something new
is waiting for you.  Sure, people may steal from you, but who knows?  You
may make friends.  And they may be gone the next time you wake up.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Caligula (1980)
Director: Tinto Brass (with "additional scenes" by Bob Guccione and
Giancarlo Lui)
Writers: (well, no real writer, persay, but it's "adapted from an
original screenplay by Gore Vidal," and features "additonal dialogue" by
Bob Guccione and Giancarlo Lui)
Starring: Malcolm McDowell, Teresa Ann Savoy, Helen Mirren, John
Steiner, Guido Mannari, Giancarlo Badesi, Bruno Brive, Lori Wagner,
Anneka DiLorenzo, Donata Placido, Peter O'Toole, John Gielgud
My friend here in film school just made a two minute-long film for one
of his classes that includes a staged anal rape scene, done by two guys
and shot on the shadow of the incident, with a banana being used as the
instrument of penetration.  As sick as this all is, watching it is one
of the most admittingly hysterical moments I've ever witnessed.  Sure,
it may be in bad taste, but what the hell is bad taste other than
something that may be offensive to some but is riotously amusing to the
rest?
Then there's "Caligula."  This film features incest, necrophilia,
beastuality, anal rape, homosexual felatio of both sexes, elaborate and
lengthy orgies, a greased-up fist forced up a man's rear, wine poured
down a man who's had his urinary tracts tied off, a penis chopped off
and fed to hungry dogs, etc, etc, etc.  This could very well be a
respectable film, and if could have been had the following not occurred:
a) the events were graphically shot in clear view; b) the tone was not
that of trying to shock comically but to, well, show "historical
accuracy;" c) the film was a 20 million dollar production with lavish
sets, a rather impressive cast, and a whopping 2 1/2 hour running time.
Produced and funded by none other than Bob Guccione, owner of Penthouse
Magazine, "Caligula" comes across as the most hysterical dramatic
picture since "Plan 9 From Outer Space" because underneath there's a
sense that everything this film is doing is not only accurate and
justified, but also brilliantly entertaining.  After all, it's not
really the fact that this film features the aforementioned disgusting
moments, but that it actually believes in them as dramatic weaponry.  No
film should be discarded because its content, because film is never
about what it's about, it's about how it's about (as the old cliche
goes).  Those who bash this film for content are glancing over the
biggest and most obvious problem with "Caligula," and that's that it's
nothing but overdramaticized bullshit from start to finish, without a
second of credibility in its mammoth running time.
"Caligula" allegedly tells the true story of the evil Roman Emporer of
the same name, a man who was so insanely decadent that his assasination
came as a blessing...or so I guess, even though almost every single
Roman Emporer was assasinated as well and for much the same reasons.
The film opens on the wrong note, of course, with a quote from Mark
appearing before any image graces the screen, using the over-used
passage "What shall it profit a man if he should gain the whole world an
dlose his own soul," depite the fact that the opening scene of the film
is of the emporer before he was an emporer, fucking around with his own
sister in a field (I suppose if one has to lose their soul, one has to
have a soul in the first place).
The plot is so incomprehensibly done that all I or anyone else can make
out of it is that Caligula (disastrously played by the great Malcom
McDowell, a performance that does the opposite that his performance in
"A Clockwork Orange" did) is next in line for the throne but can't wait
for the current Emporer, Tiberius (Peter O' Toole - ditto, only for his
performance in "Lawrence of Arabia"), his grandfather, to die...so he
kills him and ascends to the throne.  Then he abuses his position,
marries a woman (Helen Mirren, who retains her dignity as an actor by
not exactly acting) so he doesn't just have to sleep with his sister (a
dreadful Teresa Ann Savoy, there to be pretty, naked, and willing to hop
in the sack with Mac or anyone he asks her to hop in with), abuses his
position a little more, a little more, and a little more, and then, I
believe, invades England, then is killed off.
The filler, instead of recounting his life, is supposed to be, as
Guccione claims, the ultimate portrait of decadent Pagan Rome, complete
with orgies, vicious deaths, and lots of nudity.  But instead of being
the historical accurate film it really really wants to be, it instead
becomes Guccione's twisted masturbatory image of what it could be like.
Oh, isn't it great that they just loved having sex?  And that they
killed people so disgustingly?  And wouldn't it be great if I could make
a couple bucks by selling this shit off as accuracy even though it's so
blatantly real bad porn that I've completely convinced myself that it's
not.  I mean, why not just show a Roman orgy when I can spend a good ten
minutes examining every single facet that makes it up.
And it's not just that it's disgusting or vile or whatever adjective you
want to use to describe this film - it's that in a film where the entire
feel it's going for isn't felt, it's also the sloppiest expensive movie
of all time.  The sets are lavish, but so blatantly innacurate that I
wonder if no historian wanting to have his name on this film explains
this.  But that doesn't matter since the cinematography is so dark that
you wonder if a light meter was used at all, making this not only dark
and ugly, but just plain dark.  The camera operation is also the worst
I've ever seen in my entire life.  Not only does this film hold the
record for the most unnecessary zooms in one single shot ever, but often
the camera will lose its subjects and pan around till they find them,
then have them out of focus.  The editing is so sloppy that some scenes
are absolutely impossible to follow.  There is no writer to speak of
(what the hell does it mean that it's "adapted from an original
screenplay by Gore Vidal?"), but nevertheless, the dialogue is shit, so
laughably bad that I can't in good faith believe that anyone with an IQ
over 5 could say them with a straight face (my favorite being the line
when Caligula inquires the doctor about the health of the dying
Tiberius: "He could go at any moment, but with care, he could last a
year or so.")  The music in this film is mostly Prokofiev and
Khachaturian (they use his gorgeous "Adagio of Spartacus and Phrygia,"
ad nauseum), used in an attempt to give the film some emotion, but
instead feels as if it was shipped in from elsewhere.  The orgy scenes
(and one infamous lesbo scene between Penthouse Pets Lori Wagner and
Aneeka DiLorenzo) are the result of reshoots by Guccione himself, which
are so obviously removed from everything else in this film that it only
adds to the embrassment (every five seconds or so, the film cuts to
random nudity, as if it was afraid its audience would forget this film
is rated "X").  John Gielgud represents the only voice of sanity,
walking around in his brief role as if he was constantly the mantra,
"I'm going to kill my agent, I'm going to kill my agent..."
And so on and so on, for over 2 1/2 hours, making "Caligula" about as
exciting and enriching as a three hour college lecture class and twice
as deliriously annoying.  Guccione, in his pursuit of historical
accuracy has instead made a film that is such a painstaking, arduous
task to watch in its entirety that I doubt anyone can sit through an
hour of it without irreversible psychological damage.  Throughout the
entire film, the presence of Guccione is easily felt, as if he were
standing there at the edge of the screen, pretentiously looking down
upon us saying "Look what I can get away with!  And if you don't like
this, then you're a prig, and worse than that, you know nothing about
history!"  Uh huh.
There's a clear difference between historical accuracy and doing
something that's artistically good.  A film which showed Roman decadence
as something that was perhaps liberating for some but could not last -
that would probably make for a good film.  But using historical accuracy
as a licence to get away with any kind of
disgusting-for-disgustingness'-sake acts is total, total bullshit, and
all I can say is that Guccione and the makers of this film have lost any
kind of touch with either entertainment or eroticism, and have developed
a pathetic and sadistic taste for both, judging from this film.
There's a film that came out in 1989 called "The Cook, the Thief, His
Wife, and Her Lover," a magnifcent film by legendary cult director Peter
Greenaway (also starring Helen Mirren), which deals with graphic sex,
heartstopping violence and gore, and even a little cannibalism for good
measure.  That film not only never patronized its viewers, but also
handled them in a way that was shocking, yes, but also, in a bizarre
way, entertaining and totally involving.  There were real characters
there in a real situation, and best of all passion and just the right
amount of restraint as not to get off on the fact that it's going to be
offensive to many.  That film achieved everything it wanted to do, and
has since retained a status as one of those cult films that is not only
popular but actualy good.  And it's everything "Caligula" might have
been but, alas, wasn't.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Suspiria (1977)
Director: Dario Argento
Writers: Dario Argento and Daria Nicolodi
Starring: Jessica Harper, Stefania Casini, Alida Valli, Miguel Bosé,
Barbara Magnolfi, Flavio Bucci, Barbara Magnolfi, Sussana Javicoli, Eva
Axén, Joan Bennett, Rudolf Schündler, Udo Kier
I've seen "Suspiria" thrice in my life and during the most recent
viewing, I noticed there's a story there.  This could easily be my main
point to be made against it, but "Suspiria" is so damn-well made that it
is practically forgivable.  In fact, one actually wonders if the point
of the film is to diss all of the so-called "qualities" of story and
characterization in favor of a film that is undeniably and totally about
style and very little substance.  It's as if the film has dropped all
concept of storytelling just so it can create pure atmosphere.  This
isn't always the most admirable trait, but for this film, it just
really, really works.
"Suspiria" was made in 1977 and seems to be the response by Italian
horror director Dario Argento to contemporary American horror films like
"Rosemary's Baby," "The Exorcist," and "The Omen," three films that
dealt more with ideas of horror than actual horror experiences.  Those
three films were extremely successful, but all forgot that part of
making a horror film is shocking and scaring the audience with scenes
and events that are terrifying.  As a response, Argento probably
couldn't have made a better film.
As I said, there's a story here, but it's almost arbitrary (and
rightfully so).  Something about an American dancer named Suzy Bannion
(Jessica Harper) who comes to Austria to go to an elite Ballet school,
but discovers that the school holds a dark, ancient secret.  What it is
has to do with is a coven of witches, I think, but to be honest, it
really doesn't matter.  The second-to-last thing "Suspiria" is about is
story.  The last thing is characterization.
The reason for anyone to watch this film is because it is absolutely and
utterly terrifying.  Argento, always the better director than writer,
has crafted a film here that leans almost totally on the former aspect,
and is thus part criticism of then-modern American horror films, but
more of an excercise in terror than anything else.  From the first
moments, when the credits begin and the music by the Goth-band Goblin
explodes onto the soundtrack, Argento creates an atmosphere of sheer
nervousness.  Then the redundant but nerve-wrecking signature tune from
the score starts up, like a child's tune played over and over again,
getting more unnerrving every time it's played, and the films really
opens.
The first 15 minutes deal with introducing Suzy, who's head-strong but
shy in a way that's likable, and showing us her situation.  She arrives
at the airport.  She tries to get a taxi.  She gets it and arrives there
only to see a woman run out, screaming something that goes practically
unheard by Suzy, then runs off into the woods.  Suzy tries to get into
the school, but they won't let her, so she gets back in her taxi and
drives off.  Then the girl who ran out is viciously murdered while
resting a at a friends'.  This is all done in a straight segment of pure
chills, during a stormy night, with low, ominous lighting, and with the
score playing thunderously throughout.
These first 15 minutes are so good at setting up the mood, tone, and
general feel of the film that it almost doesn't live up to it.  But we
see more anyway, as Suzy finally does get into the school, meets some
friends (notably one who's been there long enough that she's become a
bit paranoid), and Suzy begins to feel there's something evil going on
in the school.  People are being murdered or disappearing mysteriously.
And Suzy begins to pluckishly explore until she finds out everything she
needs to know.
It'd all be rather corny and laughable if played straight, but Argento
saves it by the way he crafts it.  His sets are baroque and
nightmarish.  His cinemtography is gorgeous, especially in widescreen
where you can see the vastness of what has been shot.  The colors are
freakish and beautiful, and his lighting could not be better.  In short,
this is one of the best looking films of all time, right up there with
such classics as Peter Greenaway's "The Cook, the Thief, His Wife, and
Her Lover" and Terry Gilliam's "Brazil."  I'm a supreme advocate of
Black and White photography above color photography, but seeing a film
like this almost makes me change my mind.
One could argue that this is all rather fake, and it is - that's the
point.  With "Suspiria," Argento has tried to remove all realism and
create a totally artificial reality, in an effort to create a world that
is so different from everything that exists now that it's creepy.
"Suspiria" is a masterpiece of set design, cinematography, lighting, and
musical scoring, each overwrought to the point that it's not at all
real.  This is a world that exists in a twisted dimension.  With this in
place, Argento plays on real fears we have, like not being able to
negotiate our way out of a deadly situation, being alone in the dark
with the unknown, and finding out so much that what we know can kill us.
He illustrates that with several incredible set pieces which feature
sequences that are so drawn-out for terror that Hitchcock would have an
orgasm.  One scene in particular, including a man in a deserted square,
is long and redundant and even anticlimactic, but when watching it is
engrossing, hypnotic, and gradually frightening.  These aren't cheap
thrills Argento is obsessed with, but rather the experience of really
being scared that he nails the way no other director has since "Psycho."
Matched with this is the shock value, where he really pushes the
envelope.  One scene features a woman who is attacked, stabbed
repeatedly, then tossed out a glass tile and hung.  Another features a
woman who tumbles into a pit of barbed wire then slashed in the throat
by an unseen assailant.  And most disgustingly, thousands upon thousands
upon thousands of maggotts are discovered in one scene to be seemingly
everywhere (and with a laughable reason).
Who's the killer?  What's the dark secret?  These aren't totally
revealed, only hinted at.  And it's superfluous to answer those
questions, since the entire point of making this film is being scared of
what's out there but not able to be seen.  But if there are any negative
points to be made, it's that the film never really feels totally
complete by the end.  By the finale, we've learned very little, and
that's all fine, but there still needs to be more.  It ends as if it
just ran out of ideas, and even if it does deliver what it needed to, it
doesn't really feel like it should be over.  Add a bit of distaste for
dragging towards the middle, and you have a valid reason why this isn't
the four-star film it very well could have been.
Nevertheless, "Suspiria" remains one of the most frightening films to
ever be made, mostly because it has a director who isn't afraid to
really overdramaticize his subject.  What Argento has created here is an
experience which grabs the audience from their seats, sucks them into
the experience, and takes their breath away just by the way it looks and
feels, as if it realizes that a film does not have to be about story and
characters but rather about creating an experience.  Further proof that
this is a valid concept is by watching one of the films this is usually
compared to, "Psycho."  Is "Psycho" really about a guy who kills people
dressed as his dead mom or is it about those long drawn-out sequences
where we're glued to the screen by the way it pushes the envelope?  If
there's a difference between "Suspiria" and "Psycho," it's that "Psycho"
does have a great story behind it, one that we can follow when there's
not frightening shit going on.  But nevertheless, "Suspiria" delivers
just by the way it has been conceived, and well enough that even I, ol'
jaded I, was pretty freaked out, not even though I didn't know what was
going on, but rather because.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Solyaris (1972)
Director: Andrei Tarkovsky
Writers: Friederich Gorenstein and Andrei Tarkovsky (based on the novel by
Stainislaw Lem)
Starring: Donatas Banionis, Natalya Bondarchuk, Jüri Järvet, Anatoli
Solonitsyn, Nikolai Grinko, Sos Sarkissian, Vladislav Dvorjetzki
Andrei Tarkovsky's "Solaris" was advertised as "Russia's answer to '2001'"
when it first came out in 1972, bringing many people to believe that this
was the film that held the answers to the film, that expanded and made
sense out of it.  This is completely untrue once you see the film, although
one could see that the two films have many things in common: they're both,
what some people call, "cinematic poems;" both deal with space and alien
intelligence in more reserved and complex fashions; and both are leisurely
paced with long periods of silence and little going on in terms of action.
But this is where the films' similarities end.  After all, "2001" dealt
with the dehumanization of man; "Solaris" takes the opposite view, showing
the humanity of man.  Instead of dealing with the way technology has
crippled evolution, and turned us into inhuman droids, "Solaris" takes on
an independent from "2001" theme: the way that memories haunt us, and the
way that human contact is only a form of perception.  The film doesn't try
to be a "Russian '2001'"; it tries to be a completely different film.
"Solaris," based on a science fiction novel by Stainislaw Lem, deals with
what would probably be a trite episode of "Star Trek" (pick a version): a
space station hovers over a planet called Solaris that is filled completely
with an ocean.  It is believed that the ocean is the brain of the planet,
and that the ocean is basically the alien lifeform.  But some people who
have come back from the station claim that they saw visions that
materialized and haunted them, and all but three scientists remain there
when the story begins.
In the film's opening scene, we are introduced to Kris Kelvin (Donatas
Banionis), a psychologist/cosmonaut who has been chosen to go to the space
station to discover what has happened and make a decision to either
continue working at Solaris or leave (which means they may destroy the
planet).  After a 40 minute introduction to Kris, the plot, and to his
family, including his dying father (Nikolai Grinko), Kris gives a
heart-felt goodbye, and he's off to the station.
Upon arriving there, he discovers that his one friend who worked there,
Gibarian (Sos Sarkissian), has committed suicide, and has left him a
bizarre video message that sort of explain his actions.  He also finds the
other two scientists - Snauth and Sartorious (Jüri Järvet and Anatoli
Solonitsyn, respectively) - acting really weird and reclusive.  Soon
enough, Kris sees weird images, such as his wife from years ago, Khari
(Natalya Bondarchuk), who committed suicide years ago, who then
materializes and tries to live life with him like it was before.
Of course, she's not the real Khari as much as it is a materialization
thereof.  The fake Khari is unable to recall any memories that the real
Khari had, and merely looks just like her and perhaps even acts a bit like
her.  However, she is only able to live when she is in his presence, or
else she dies or commits suicide, only to come back to life shortly
afterwards.  She soon becomes Kris' second chance, and he soon begins to
think of her as an entirely different person than the real Khari, given a
chance to love again.
The film deeply explores these themes, and actually goes beyond the realm
of being merely a cool sci-fi flick, becoming an existential exploration of
humanity and the ways that memories can be frightening and painful, but
also can be soothing and warming.  Watching Kris lie with his dead wife's
fake "guest" all day while the other scientists complain that he isn't
doing anything is one of the saddest and unnerving things in cinema because
after all, don't we have a point in our lives we wish we could re-live so
that we could take as much advantage of it?  It's the fact that this film
evokes universal deep emotions and does it without insulting our
intelligence that makes this a truly haunting experience.
Tarkovsky has been called a "cinematic poet" by so many critics that I
won't even try and be original by saying that he is.  But I will say that
he is definitely one of the best directors of mise-en-scene and shot
development that I have ever seen, up there with Kubrick, Welles, Ophuls,
and Bergman.  Shots aren't there to just show the story but are crafted to
evoke deep feelings, and give a sense of hypnotic mysticism.  The opening
shot of the reeds flowing in the water is a gorgeously simple shot, and
it's the simplicity that really makes the shots the most effective.  In
fact, everything else has a very minimalistic yet extremely deep feel to
them, noted as early on in the simple opening credits with Bach's "F Minor
Choral Prelude" playing somberly in the background, giving the film its
unique feel.
Tarkovsky also tells his story at a very leisurely pace, much like, say,
Kurbick.  I imagine that the story by Lem is perhaps 100 pages, if that,
but Tarkovsky turns it into a 167-minute film, filled with long shots,
extremely long scenes of very little going on, and various other techniques
to make everything last longer than a typical director would allow.  Yet
all of these never result in boredom, and the entire film has a hypnotic
feel to it.  You know the kind of long scenes where very little happens,
and the actors speak in long, hushed tones, and you just sit there, staring
at it, afraid to breathe, waiting for the director to screw up and ruin the
experience?  These kinds of shots, filled with all sorts of complex
layering that requires complete audience attention, seem to be Tarkovsky's
forte.
While the science fiction and special effects take a back-seat to the
themes and ideas postulated by the film, this film nevertheless is really
cool to look at.  The space station itself is a pretty atmospheric locale,
and the white background of Kris's chambers creates a cool-looking and
almost lonely feeling for the disturbed character.  We never see much of
the technology though (it works here), and we only get glimpses of the
planet they're on, seeing that everything is a gorgeously wavy ocean.  The
cinematogaphy is absolutely gorgeous, perfectly accenting Tarkovsky's
complex shots, and making this just one of the better-looking films in film
history.
The final shot of "Solaris" is one of the most haunting final shots in film
history, bringing the film's themes and ideas to a dramatic and poignant
close, and also allowing some very heart-felt emotion to pour in.  It's the
fact that we can all (probably, I hope) identify with Kris's connection to
the past that makes "Solaris" a real experience, not only in the cinematic
sense of the word, but also in the emotional one.  We all have done
something that we regretted afterwards, and there's at least one moment we
wish we could live over again with the knowledge we have today.  That's
what "Solaris" is about.  I'm not knocking other sci-fi films that deal
with general fear and horror (like the "Alien" series), but because
"Solaris" dives deep into the questions of humanity, and puts that focus in
the forefront, it is, along with "2001," the best science fiction film ever
made.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Per un pugno di dollari (1964)
Director: Sergio Leone
Writers: Sergio Leone and Peter Fernandez
Starring: Clint Eastwood, Gian Maria Volonte
Ever see either "Back to the Future II" or "III?"  Well, there was this
once scene in the second one where Biff in his hot tub with a bunch of
scantily-clad chicks watch this film's finale where Eastwood walks into
town where all the bad guys want to kill him, and he keeps being shot by
the leader, yet keeps getting up.  He then reveals an iron plate under
his mexican rug and proceeds to shoot all of them in a total of three
seconds.  It was also parodied in the third one, where Michael J. Fox
outsmarts Biff's grandfather (or is it great-grandfather) by using this
exact technique.  Leone's film is a classic film, as it was the
trendsetter for producing the anti-western: where the good guy isn't
necessarily "good," and the bad guys aren't always "bad," but they're
what Hitchcock called "greys."  Combined with Leone's amoral outlook on
the west, where most people were just greedy schmucks, this is one
bitching classic.
Basically a remake of Kurosawa's "Yojimbo" (which I haven't seen yet,
but I imagine is awesome as hell), "Fistful of Dollars" doesn't
necessarily limit itself to being just a "remake," but has a style all
its own, or rather that of director Sergio Leone's.  The first in a
trilogy that also featured "For a Few Dollars More" and "The Good, the
Bad, and the Ugly," this one introduces us to the eclectic and
mysterious character, The Man With No Name (Clint Eastwood), called that
because, well, we never find out his name.  Here we find Eastwood
looking his absolutely coolest: the three-day beard, the cigarette in
his mouth, the cool-ass cowboy hat, the mexican rug draped over his
body, the squinting eyes, and the hushed voice.  Also what seems to be
the fastest gun in the west, which pops out suddenly, firing with one
hand, and hitting the hammer with the other, for maximum speed.
He drops in on an anonomys village somewhere west ruled by two bands of
outlaws.  Emerging as a kind of fallen angel, not really sure whether he
wants the goodness of heaven or the luxuries of hell, he starts not only
playing for both teams of outlaws, but also starts helping the more
innocent people in town, like a family who's mother has been kidnapped
by the leader of the one band as his "chick" who Eastwood decides to
rescue and deliver her to her family once again, even if it might mean
being found out by his employers.
Eastwood comes into town on a mule, which is greeted with bullets by
some of the more asswholish bandits.  He parks it, walks over to them,
and tells them that his mule doesn't like people laughing at him and
wants an apology for the shooting.  The bandits laugh again, and
Eastwood looks up and tells them he doesn't appreciate the laughter.  He
then pulls his gun out, fires several times, and kills all of them
before they can even touch their guns.  The sheriff approaches him about
it, and Eastwood just shrugs off his warning by telling him to just get
the stiffs in the ground.  This is just one of many classic scenes,
amazingly directed by Leone, and acted well by Eastwood.
Eastwood hangs out in the local inn, befriends the owner, and begins
working both sides of the city, just for money.  They're having a big
war, which he doesn't care about, and eventually he gets rich and begins
taking down both sides of the bandits, and hopefully restoring it to a
good town.  The finale, which I talked about, involves Eastwood and one
side of the town, run by Ramon (Gian Maria Volonte).  
The amazing soundtrack by Ennio Morricone meshes well with the cool ass
direction by Leone, who, like Peckinpah and Woo, knows how to
orchestrate an action sequence, getting the maximum effect by the
audience, and even tossing in a satirical message.  And Eastwood doesn't
really need to act - his persona is perfect for the role.  But the Man
With No Name is no acting feat, although name one other person who could
have done it as effectively.
"Fistful of Dollars" is a classic of cinema, and is somtimes underrated
when people refer to westerns.  It is an anti-western: a film that
refuses to abide by the good John Wayne type overcoming the villains and
getting the girl.  Eastwood doesn't get the girl, but he takes off at
the end with a bag full of money.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Peacemaker, The (1997)
Director: Mimi Leder
Writer: Michael Schiffer
Starring: George Clooney, Nicole Kidman, Michael Iures, Armin
Mueller-Stahl, Michael Boatman
Big budget action pics are usually just passed off as "crap," and I
agree that most of them are.  I mean, I don't know about you but I
cringe everytime someone like Seagal or Van Damme puts one out on the
market precisely in that time when there's nothing else good so it will
make it look like the movie-of-the-weekend by comparison.  But in this
surprisingly interesting fall movie season, when there are good films
like "The Game" and "L.A. Confidential" out, as well as a bear movie
written by David Mamet, the obligatory monthly action pic ("The
Peacemaker") actually delivers.  Yes, it's full of cliches, devoid of
characterization or emotion, filled with scenes that have been stolen
from other actions pics that were stolen from other action pics.  And
yes, it ends with the big cliche of the ticking timebomb (yawn).  But
fuck it, it's fun.
"The Peacemaker" combines the usual action pic with touches of Bond and
Clancy to produce a story about two government peoples' search for
stolen nuclear weapons that were missing when a train carrying them
crashed in Russia, setting one of them off (cool scene, by the way). 
Called to duty are: a government chick (no clue what her position is)
played by Nicole Kidman (with brown hair and one of her attempts at an
American accent); and a military colonel or something played by George
Clooney.  The sight of these two on screen for the first time of course
makes us realize how important the marketing was instead of the plot
because they look great together.
But as the story kind of twists and turns, we find out that the boys who
stole the nuclear weapons are being screwed over themselves by three
Bosnian brothers, the unofficial leader of them being a UN diplomat
(Michael Iures) who wants to take one of them to New York and ignite the
UN building in protest of their lack of support for the killings in
Bosnia.  Yeah.  Interesting idea, but we all know how serious this
should be treated.  But at leas they're up to date on current events.
Kidman and Clooney, boasting a kind of retro Hepburn/Tracy relationship,
starting out with her asking for a man who will follow her orders only
to be ordered around by the rule-breaking Clooney for the remainder of
the film, and ending with a potential bit of dating (glad they didn't
have them fool around in between action sequences or something).  The
two of them journey around the world throughout the film, travelling to
Vienna, Russia, etc - getting involved in surprisingly well-executed
action sequences.
Mimi Leder, who has directed "China Beach" and "ER" episodes, makes a
fun-filled first film.  She doesn't waste time, and the film moves
quickly, prohibiting the need to check your watch every couple seconds. 
And her action sequences look excellent and contain a lot of humor.  The
screenplay by Michael Schiffer is nothing special, but it does provide a
lot of funny lines here and there.
And the acting is good too.  George Clooney has made four films in a
year and a half, and he has definitely proved that he's a commanding
presence in front of the Hollywood camera.  In fact, he seems to be so
comfortable nowadays that it almost seems that he's flirting with the
lense.  He has a great sense of humor with his acting, and looks cool as
hell during the action sequences.  He's certainly becoming an
accomplished Hollywood actor.  Don't know if that's a good thing or not,
but nevertheless, it's true.
Kidman gets the fuzzy end of the lollipop, but nevertheless does a good
job.  She shows a tough woman who seems to be striving very hard in some
scenes (so much that her shirt sticks to her body).  And there's those
lovely shots of her in the swimming pool, of course.  Anyway, Kidman's
better than this, but I suppose it's fun to do a crap role like this
every once in a while.
Also, Armin Mueller-Stahl acts in a big budget film for the second time
in one month (the other was "The Game"), and, as he was before, is kind
of wasted seeing that he's a very good actor.  Also look for "Spin
City"'s Michael Boatman in a little part that could have gone to any
actor.
Oh.  And Michael Iures as the lead terrorist is actually very good.  He
looks like a kind of Middle Eastern Jeremy Irons, and has this great
look on his face that shows that he truly has lived in Bosnia.  He looks
absolutely ragged, and I actually felt a bit of sympathy for the guy,
even if he wanted to blow up New York.
Dreamworks first film is not a great film, but it delivers what I
thought it would: present a good, dumb, action pic that's fun to watch. 
And it is.  It's got cliche after cliche, lacks any depth, and has more
plot holes than a Seagal flick (okay, maybe I'm exaggerating here).  But
who cares - it was fun, and I'm gonna go ahead and give it a
non-pretentious thumb up.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
Writers/Directors: Harry Elfont and Deborah Kaplan
Starring: Ethan Embry, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Peter Facinelli, Lauren
Ambrose, Charlie Korsmo, Seth Green, Michelle Brookhurst, Erik Palladino,
Melissa Joan Hart, Breckin Meyer, Donald Adeosun Faison, Jerry O'Connell,
Jenna Elfman
The most interesting part of "Can't Hardly Wait" just happens to be not
only the most human, but for many of us, the one part that many of us can
easily relate to.  That is the character of Denise (Lauren Ambrose), the
film's sole sarcastic member who mocks everything that goes on in the film,
and at one point sits down on a couch and looks totally bored.  The film
wisely holds over this moment, nicely showing her alienation in the midst
of a large high school party...almost too nicely.  For some members of the
audience (read: me), this is basically a mirror of what's going on with
them watching this film.  We sit there wondering why we've even bothered to
see a film about a long high school party we probably never felt the desire
to go to in the first place.
I would actually highly recommend this film if it satirized all of this. 
After all, this film is filled with a bunch of pathetic stereotypes much of
which I went to high school with.  Everyone's here: the Jock, the
Homecoming Queen, the Nerd (and his dominions of Trekkies and X-Philes),
the Alienated Wannabe Writer, the School Spirit Girl, the Pothead(s), the
Wigger, etc, etc, etc, and weirdly enough this film shows them as
superficial, lame, and basically as a bunch of losers.  Except for Denise,
who rolls her eyes at everything, and easily becomes the most likable
character even before she speaks (her yearbook entry, something which is
done for each main character, quotes Oscar Wilde - definite pointers
there).
Unfortunately, the writers and directors take several major misteps on the
way to making this into an admirable and even likable film.  The film, as I
said, portrays most of its characters as superficial and just totally
ignorant to everything.  However, instead of sticking with this, perhaps
even going a bit further with it, they let this lie, and actually make
these characters into our heroes.  We follow several of them, all a bunch
of moronic stereotypes with only a shread of humanity and realism, and
tries to tell boring and overly melodramatic tales about them as if we
actually cared and/or identified with them.  And if we did, we certainly
don't want to revisit that state of being.
Here's a quick low-down: it's graduation, and we follow a bunch of seniors
on the last night, otherwise known as the "American Grafitti" or, to a
lesser extent, the "Dazed and Confused" cliche.  The formal just followed
them as they drove aimlessly; the latter did a little bit of that and
featured a big outdoor keg party.  "Can't Hardly Wait" just opts for a big
indoor keg party, and a little bit of aimless driving, albeit of the
I'm-whining-because-I-can't-get-a-girl-I-want brand.  We follow many people
around, but mostly we trail Preston (Ethan Embry, of "That Thing You Do!"),
the Alienated Writer, who's been pining over the Homcoming Queen, Amanda
(the totally overrated Jennifer Love Hewitt), for the entirety of High
School because he thinks they shared a moment their freshman year over a
freaking Pop Tart.  Now that she's broken up with her football player
boyfriend, Mike (Peter Facinelli), he decides to go to the party with a
note he's written declaring his "love" for her in the hopes he'll build up
the guts to give it to her...even though he's leaving for a multi-week
intensive writing program hosted by none other than Kurt Vonnegut (okay:
the ingenius Vonnegut or some icky Noxema spokesperson?).
Since that plot is incredibly lame and a track record of what goes on with
it wouldn't be able to carry a commercial let alone a feature film, and
because it's a party, there are some more main characters, such as: William
(Charlie Korsmo, finally surfacing after "Dick Tracy"), the Nerd (and his
dominions) who has come up with a ridiculous plan to publically sabotage
Mike, who's humiliated him for years, but gets too caught up in drinking to
do it; Kenny (Seth Green), the Wigger, who has decided that this party will
be where he will finally get laid (uh huh); and Denise, the only
exceptional character, who unfortunately gets stuck in a bathroom (don't
ask) with Kenny where the two characters let down their characters and are
allowed to follow the laws of plot cliches from point A to point B with
nary a bit of characterization involved after awhile.  Ugh.
The main comparison this film is getting to another film is actually not
"American Grafitti" or "Dazed and Confused," two films that embraced and
ultimately made humans out of many of its high schoolers (not to mention
were extremely entertaining), but to John Hughes films of the 80s, most
notably "Sixteen Candles."  The big difference in the two is that that film
managed to not only embrace but even satirize its main characters, and did
so equally and in an entertaining fashion.  This film forgets to satirize
its characters, and ultimately tells a story about a bunch of uninteresting
stereotypes...and then says that it's all okay.  We can't take this film
seriously, nor can we take this as fun, so really what good is it?
But I will tell you some things I did like: I liked the direction, except
for a couple too-over-the-top features, like way-too-glossy jump cuts (it's
like an oxymoron) and other obscurities.  Generally, though, Elfont and
Kaplan do have graceful camera movement, and even manage to capture an
Altman-esque feel to their film from time to time (a thing with a note,
though, is too hokey to really be admirable).  I actually did like Seth
Green, for once in about a decade (when he played a very young Woody Allen
in "Radio Days") - his desintegration of his Wigger character was almost
believable...almost.  And, of course, Lauren Ambrose is wonderful as
Denise, the one character we could have used some more of, even though it
would have changed the entirety of the film.
However, the character of Denise really doesn't work with the film, when
really thought about.  She's far too witty and realized (at least for the
first half) to belong in this film, and whenever she appears, she
automatically gives everything a delightfully satirical tone.  She's not
just The Cynic or The Intellectual; she's just a very interesting character
who provides entertainment even if it further damages other already damaged
characters.  She may ruin the film more, but at least when she's on screen
we can sit up and think to ourselves "Well, at least we'll be entertained."
A couple other things that just don't work: Mike's character, who suffers
an epiphany throughout the film but in the end acts as though he has
forgotten everything: too much the sacrificial lamb for the film in
general; the aimless, bitchy driving by Preston to try and get over his
inability to shack up with Amanda - give me a break; and perhaps the one
thing that just doesn't work at all: Jenna Eflman's uncredited cameo as an
angel - just didn't work, but nice try.
Basically the worst thing about this film, the real reason I'm giving this
such a low rating, is because it refuses to give us any fully realized
characters and then insists we follow around complete stereotypes from
other movies doing things that are inane and unlike anything we'd do.  We
don't feel for these characters because for most of us, we aren't
stereotypes going through the motions to worn subplots.  The acid test for
high school movies is: does it at all capture the feel of what it's
portraying?  The answer for this film is no.  Nice try, though.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Sĺsom i en spegel (1961)
Writer/Director: Ingmar Bergman
Starring: Harriet Andersson, Gunnar Björnstrand, Max von Sydow, Lars
Passgĺrd
Bergman opens "Through a Glass Darkly" not only with a quote from Second
Corinthians, from which the title comes, but also has a dedication title,
made out to his then wife.  The two are separated from one another, but as
the film goes on, and begins to explore concepts brought on by the Bible
quote, as well as ideas about family and love, the ideas these two subtexts
bring up begin to merge into one singular idea, and instead of both trying
to work as two separate ideas in the film, they intertwine with one
another.  But of course, that's one of Bergman's fortes.
"Through a Glass Darkly" is actually a combination of many things that
normally don't fit together except here: it's a debate on God and love, and
an intense dysfunctional family drama; it concerns itself with a small
quantity of people secluded on an island, like many Bergman films, but then
makes them family members, also like many Bergman films; and it tosses in
several parallel action shots where one consists of lots of editing, and
the other features just one long take, throwing off the rhythm of the film.
 It's almost a wonder that it works at all.
But for all of this, "Through a Glass Darkly" is another very trite film
from Bergman, running about 91 minutes, and featuring only a couple very
long sequences, and features almost total dialogue and monologues, causing
it to be able to cover so much ground and so many concepts that it almost
seems overloaded.  The film deals with a family of four who take a
"vacation" on a secluded island: there's the father, David (Gunnar
Björnstrand), a writer who has distanced himself from his family; the son,
Minus (Lars Passgĺrd), a wannabe playright who resents his father,
sometimes openly; the daugher, Karin (Hariett Andersson), who has just
gotten out of a mental institution, and is on the cusp of a relapse; and
her devoted husband, Martin (Max Von Sydow...yes, the guy from "The
Exorcist"), who tries to be the buffer of the bunch.
Bergman effortlessly defines each of their characters in the first 10
minutes so that the rest of the film can take off from the exposition, and
into its rising action.  One thing that bugs me about many film is the
exposition, and how films try to blatantly give us all our information in
sometimes clumsy ways.  Bergman avoids all of that, expertly writing the
screenplay so that all of the information is given to us subtlely,
sometimes just through idle conversation.  This also gives us the right
amount of distance from the characters, as they aren't communicating with
us at all, and shows how distanced they all are from one another, whether
they like it or not.
About half way through, Bergman introduces a really bizarre plot twist:
Karin begins to hear voices from the wall in one of the upstairs rooms
telling her that it's God.  Is she having a relapse?  is it really God?  We
don't know (for awhile).  But it begins to speed up her relapse, and the
result brings out one of Bergman's favorite themes: families being brought
together by something horrible that makes them re-evaluate their
relationships.
What was Bergman trying to point out with all of this?  He brings us two
things that usually don't work together - a family drama about a lack of
communication and love, and a story of a woman who thinks she sees God -
but Bergman actually manages to pull them both together, like I said.  He
explores the existence of God as something you have to merely have faith in
but can never have any proof of by exploring the family's lack of stability
and love.  Their lack of stability is on a parallel with the lack of
stability in knowing if God exists or not.
As good as it is, it does run into a couple minor problems.  The film is
probably too short, running at a tawdry 91 minutes, resulting in a bit of a
lack of family drama that the film needs a little more of.  Luckily Bergman
is able to make up substantially for this by leaving a lot unsaid through
dialogue, and much done through action and scene set-ups, but he isn't able
to make up totally for this slight inconsistency.  The film is also very
uneven, spending a small amount of time on the exposition, but then getting
a little sloppy with the amount of time he spends on each section of the
film.  And the final scene explains a little too much - maybe some dialogue
editing would have been good in this scene.  The entire film could have
used a whole other draft, just to even out some of the little clinks in the
storyline.
However, you really have to appreciate how much this film pulls off as it
is.  Any film that can explore lack of faith in God's existence through a
tense family drama is worthy of high praise, and the film has a great
play-like feel, abandoning a lot of character action and instead focusing
on studying its characters' feelings and pains while still exploring such
an existential theme.  And it wisely never picks one character to single
out as the "protagonist," appropriately distancing us from the characters
who are distanced from one another, and allowing us to empathize more with
the situation than the characters.  Sure, it could use a rewrite, but that
would only make it slighly better than it already is.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Everything You Always Wanted to Know About Sex (1972)
Director: Woody Allen
Writer: Woody Allen (from the book by David Reuben)
Starring: Woody Allen, Louise Lasser, Lynn Redgrave, Gene Wilder, Tony
Randall, Burt Reynolds, John Carridine, Regis Philbin, Lou Jacobi
Many people know about the popular book, "Everything You Always Wanted
to Know About Sex (But Were Afraid to Ask)," which was a
straight-forward sex book (obviously), and this is the basis for the
film.  However, this is not some striaght-forward outline of the book
(just picture Woody demonstrating sodomy on some chick like Louise
Lasser or Diane Keaton - sorry for the imagery).  Instead, this is a
collection of short films, very, very, very loosely based on some of the
chapters from the book, each taking a concept from a specific chapter,
and going totally crazy with it.
I will rate each of the little films individually and make some kind of
average for the whole film.  So here we go:
1. "Do Aphrodisiacs Work?" - In this hysterically comical film that gets
funnier by the second, Woody plays a really bad court jester who becomes
obsessed with his queen (Lynn Redgrave), and gets an aphrodisiac so he
can get to know her a little better (nudge nudge).  Things get
complicated, some things don't go as planned (although some do), and we
get a hilarious finale.  Woody's one-liners are perfect here (especially
in the intentionally bad joke-laden beginning, and the spoof of "Hamlet"
- "T.B. or not T.B, that is the conjestion..."), and he's at his
funniest acting, which is not a shock.  The little film moves quickly,
and is paced near perfectly.  So...
2. "What is Sodomy?" - This could have been a one-joke premise, but
thanks to the writing, it only gets funnier.  But it's just not as good
as the first one.  This one stars Gene Wilder (doing some of his manic
funniest as the film goes on) as a family doctor who falls in love with
a sheep.  Hence, sodomy (use your randy imagination).  The film includes
such little jokes as asking for grass at a hotel ("No, real grass"), the
sheep wearing garters, and the brilliantly done ending where Gene weeps
for his long-lost love by drinking Woolite.
3. "Why Do Some Women Have Trouble Reaching Orgasm?" - Done all in
Italian with sub-titles, this one is about a swinger (Woody) who marries
a beautiful woman (Louise Lasser, from "Mary Hartman, Mary Hartman" and
his "Bananas"), but finds that she can never achieve an orgasm with
him...until he finds out she has a fetish for public sex.  It's
deifinitely not the funniest film, and doesn't end the perfect way, but
sure knows how to be clever, and, well, it's hilarious.  And the Italian
works.
4. "Are Transvestites Homosexuals?" - Not involving Woody again, this
one centers around a middle-aged couple who go over to their future
in-laws for supper, but the husband of the visiting family (Lou Jacobi)
goes upstairs to the foreign bedroom to indulge in his big fetish:
transvestitism.  But while parading around in women's clothes, he's
almost caught, and has to flee the house, cover up his moustache, talk
in high falsetto, and try to figure out how to get back inside without
being noticed.  It's one of the funniest things I've ever seen, and only
gets funnier as it moves on with good pacing.
5. "What are Sex Perverts?" - Funny skit is probably the only
disappointing one here, even though it's funny.  The film, shot on
purposely bad film, shows an episode of a very liberal game show (in
black and white, no less) called "What's Your Perversion?," feautring
guests who come on and are asked questons by a panel (including Regis
Philbin - not even kidding) who try to come up with the guest's fetish.
It never really goes anywhere, but is still hilarious.
6. "Are the Findings of Doctors and Clinics Who Do Sexual Research and
Experiments Accurate?" (almost longer than the title) - Uneven but
undeniably hysterical little vignette about a sex scholar (guess who?
okay, it's Woody) who goes to the mansion of a famous sexual doctor
(John Carridine) with a journalist to interview him on his various and
contreversial sexual explorations.  Turns out the guy's a mad scientist
who's doing such bizarre things as pumping a woman full of silicone, and
doing the old cliche of switching brains.  Also, he has an Igorian
servent who's hunchbacked only because the doctor gave him a prolonged
orgasm (through an experiment).  But this film switches identity, and
when the doctor's house is burned down by the scholar and the journalist
(long story), what emerges and wreaks havoc on the countryside
is...(eerie music) a gigantic breast.  How they catch it is classic.  So
is the sketch.
7. "What Happens During Ejaculation?" - The hands-down most brilliant
and funniest sketch, ending it on a great note, this little film deals
with the inner-workings of the brain during sex.  Inside all the
specific body parts are little people, working their asses off to help
create sex.  In the brain is "Mission Control," with Tony Randal as the
cheif and Burt Reynolds as a switchboard man (with the classic Reynolds
line "Proceed with erection; all systems go."), and as a sperm is (big
shock) Woody, as the most insecure of them all ("What if he's
masturbating?  I'll end up on the wall!")  It only gets funnier and
funnier and funniet, and is paced beautifully, with little problems
jumping in at just the right time (a saboteur of the mission turns out
to be a little inner priest).  With great acting, great writing, and,
well, some cool sets and special effects (for a 70s comedy), we get a
perfect way to end the movie, and one of Woody's funniest pieces of
work.
So, "Everything You Always Wanted to Know About Sex (But Were Afraid to
Ask)" is a hilarious movie, made just for the twisted neurotic fans of
Mr. Allen AND people who love great sketch comedy that isn't afraid to
insult and outrage.  Yes, it has its peaks and valleys, but overall,
it's a fantastic piece of comedy, and a great film to watch.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Peacemaker, The (1997)
Director: Mimi Leder
Writer: Michael Schiffer
Starring: George Clooney, Nicole Kidman, Michael Iures, Armin
Mueller-Stahl, Michael Boatman
Big budget action pics are usually just passed off as "crap," and I
agree that most of them are.  I mean, I don't know about you but I
cringe everytime someone like Seagal or Van Damme puts one out on the
market precisely in that time when there's nothing else good so it will
make it look like the movie-of-the-weekend by comparison.  But in this
surprisingly interesting fall movie season, when there are good films
like "The Game" and "L.A. Confidential" out, as well as a bear movie
written by David Mamet, the obligatory monthly action pic ("The
Peacemaker") actually delivers.  Yes, it's full of cliches, devoid of
characterization or emotion, filled with scenes that have been stolen
from other actions pics that were stolen from other action pics.  And
yes, it ends with the big cliche of the ticking timebomb (yawn).  But
fuck it, it's fun.
"The Peacemaker" combines the usual action pic with touches of Bond and
Clancy to produce a story about two government peoples' search for
stolen nuclear weapons that were missing when a train carrying them
crashed in Russia, setting one of them off (cool scene, by the way).
Called to duty are: a government chick (no clue what her position is)
played by Nicole Kidman (with brown hair and one of her attempts at an
American accent); and a military colonel or something played by George
Clooney.  The sight of these two on screen for the first time of course
makes us realize how important the marketing was instead of the plot
because they look great together.
But as the story kind of twists and turns, we find out that the boys who
stole the nuclear weapons are being screwed over themselves by three
Bosnian brothers, the unofficial leader of them being a UN diplomat
(Michael Iures) who wants to take one of them to New York and ignite the
UN building in protest of their lack of support for the killings in
Bosnia.  Yeah.  Interesting idea, but we all know how serious this
should be treated.  But at leas they're up to date on current events.
Kidman and Clooney, boasting a kind of retro Hepburn/Tracy relationship,
starting out with her asking for a man who will follow her orders only
to be ordered around by the rule-breaking Clooney for the remainder of
the film, and ending with a potential bit of dating (glad they didn't
have them fool around in between action sequences or something).  The
two of them journey around the world throughout the film, travelling to
Vienna, Russia, etc - getting involved in surprisingly well-executed
action sequences.
Mimi Leder, who has directed "China Beach" and "ER" episodes, makes a
fun-filled first film.  She doesn't waste time, and the film moves
quickly, prohibiting the need to check your watch every couple seconds.
And her action sequences look excellent and contain a lot of humor.  The
screenplay by Michael Schiffer is nothing special, but it does provide a
lot of funny lines here and there.
And the acting is good too.  George Clooney has made four films in a
year and a half, and he has definitely proved that he's a commanding
presence in front of the Hollywood camera.  In fact, he seems to be so
comfortable nowadays that it almost seems that he's flirting with the
lense.  He has a great sense of humor with his acting, and looks cool as
hell during the action sequences.  He's certainly becoming an
accomplished Hollywood actor.  Don't know if that's a good thing or not,
but nevertheless, it's true.
Kidman gets the fuzzy end of the lollipop, but nevertheless does a good
job.  She shows a tough woman who seems to be striving very hard in some
scenes (so much that her shirt sticks to her body).  And there's those
lovely shots of her in the swimming pool, of course.  Anyway, Kidman's
better than this, but I suppose it's fun to do a crap role like this
every once in a while.
Also, Armin Mueller-Stahl acts in a big budget film for the second time
in one month (the other was "The Game"), and, as he was before, is kind
of wasted seeing that he's a very good actor.  Also look for "Spin
City"'s Michael Boatman in a little part that could have gone to any
actor.
Oh.  And Michael Iures as the lead terrorist is actually very good.  He
looks like a kind of Middle Eastern Jeremy Irons, and has this great
look on his face that shows that he truly has lived in Bosnia.  He looks
absolutely ragged, and I actually felt a bit of sympathy for the guy,
even if he wanted to blow up New York.
Dreamworks first film is not a great film, but it delivers what I
thought it would: present a good, dumb, action pic that's fun to watch.
And it is.  It's got cliche after cliche, lacks any depth, and has more
plot holes than a Seagal flick (okay, maybe I'm exaggerating here).  But
who cares - it was fun, and I'm gonna go ahead and give it a
non-pretentious thumb up.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Jesus Christ Superstar (1973)
Director: Norman Jewison
Writer: Melvyn Bragg, Norman Jewison, Tim Rice, and Andrew Lloyd Webber
Starring: Ted Neely, Carl Anderson, Yvonne Elliman, Josh Mostel
Anyone who's ever heard Andrew Lloyd Webber's rock opera, "Jesus Christ
Superstar," is familiar with its liberal approach to the gospel.  It's
not just some dumbing down way of presenting the story of the death of
Jesus to the hippies in the 60s, but also a new look at it.  With cool,
hummable music, a new perspective (told mostly from that of Judas), and
a satirical look at not only Judas's outlook on Jesus, but of his
followers, who turned on him after he was arrested for merely preaching
the word of God.  The film is also a liberal version of the telling,
combining gospel fashions with that of camp 70s clothes, and machine
guns, hard helmets, tanks, and airplanes, creating a film that is camp
AND satirical.  It's also a really cool flick.
The film chronicles the death of Jesus from before Palm Sunday to his
crucifixion.  It starts off with the actors getting ready during the
overture (extended just for the film), then the film takes off with
Judas (Carl Anderson, who apparently started some controversy since he
was black - yes, that's real bad, guys) singing about how he thinks
Jesus is not really the Messiah, but has great ideas, and has become to
obsessed with power.  He tries to warn him about his ever-increasing
popularity, and some of his alleged hypocrisy, seeing that he's in love
with the whore Mary Magdelene (Yvonne Elliman, who would go on to sing a
cool tune for "Saturday Night Fever"), and how he uses valuable lotion
for himself.  But Jesus explains in calm and logical terms that everyone
is good in his sight, even whores, and that there will always be poor
people and we should just take advantage of what we have.
Of course, Judas is right about his increasing populairty, as a bunch of
leather-clad pharises led by the Barry White-voiced Caiaphas and his pal
Annas, the high priests of the bunch, get together and talk about
getting rid of him, even as he is riding into town and having palms
thrown at him.  And Judas is still pissed off at him, especially when he
goes into a temple and starts throwing stuff around, claiming that
they're blaspheming his house of worship by gambling in it.  So Judas
inevitably is conned by the pharises to help them find and arrest Jesus.
And the inevitable of that happens, Judas gives Jesus away with a kiss,
and he is taken off.  Almost immeadiately, his 12 apostles flee,
claiming not to know him, and all his other followers turn against him
in the big trial, telling Pontious Pilate, who in this way is given a
sympathetic perspective as he has no choice but to crucify him, even
after he tells them "this man has done no wrong," which he hadn't.  We
almost wonder if Jesus died to save our sins or was he just betrayed by
us.  And, of course, was he really the Messiah?
I'm an agnostic, but was a Christian for years.  I believe that Jesus
was a person, but with all these people coming out and saying their
prophets (i.e. David Koresh), I have had trouble thinking about it.  Was
Jesus really the Messiah, or just some crazy Israelian?  Or was he just
one nice guy?  Ted Neely's performance opens up some new levels to the
"Was Jesus the Messiah?" question.  He brings a human level to the
character.  Andrew Lloyd Webber and Norman Jewison don't know if Jesus
was the Messiah, and leave this question open, since there can be no
real proof on either side of the argument.  I mean, for all I know, I'm
the second coming of Jesus.  Probably not.
The acting's very good, especially from Neely and Carl Anderson as
Judas.  Anderson has a big problem, since Judas is always seen as the
villain of the bible, betraying Jesus and all.  But this film reveals
him to be a tragic hero, like some sort of Brutus.  He's a good guy who
believes in the beliefs of Jesus (though he questions his divinity), and
the film (and opera) nicely show his descension into being a paid baddie
for the jerk system.  I mean, Judas had no choice but to hang himself at
the end (sorry if I'm spoiling the storyline).
This film opens a lot of biblical questions which are not really
standard, and also takes a very original approach, much like the rock
opera.  Even if you're not a Christian, you should dig this flick.  For
it's unique style, approach, and the overall coolness of it all, I give
this a high reccomendation.  But I warn you, get ready to laugh at some
of the costumes, especially Herod's (Josh Mostel, from "City Slickers"
fame), who sports funky glasses and a pair of boxers.  If only all
biblical films could be this groovy...
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Eraserhead (1977)
Writer/Director: David Lynch
Starring: Jack Nance, Charlotte Stewart, Allen Joseph, Jeanne Bates,
Judith Anna Roberts, Laurel Near
I'm not the most intelligent person on the face of the earth, or
anywhere near to it, I admit.  Maybe that accounts for why when I don't
understand a movie, I don't immeadiately jump to the conclusion that
IT'S the one confused, or that it's just crap.  Or maybe I'm just a nice
guy or something.
But, anyway, David Lynch's first film, "Eraserhead," is a film combined
of scenes that individually make almost no sense the first billion
times.  And even entire parts of it (the whole spiel about the baby)
make almost no real sense, and may never.  But as a whole, this film
gives off mood, and perhaps even a message, which may be totally
different for each person.  While "Lost Highway" was ambiguous in that
annoying way, "Eraserhead" is ambiguous in that magnificent way.
Don't ask me what this film is really about.  There is no one sentence
that could describe this film.  As much as I can understand, it deals
with a very depressed man named Henry Spencer (played by the recently
deceased Jack Nance), who lives in what seems to be a post-apocalyptic
future of sorts.  During the tenure of the film, he's on vacation from
his stupid job (which we never see him do), and finds out that a woman
(Charlotte Stewart) he once (or several times) boinked has given birth
to a...something.  And it's his.  This is only the first 30 minutes of
the film.
Soon Henry is married to this girl, living in his crappy and
claustrophobic apartment with this...thing, which is like a monster
baby.  Shaped like a tiny dinosaur or something, and wrapped in a tight
cloth, it looks absolutely hideous, yet makes authentic baby sounds. 
After awhile, his new wife has left him with the baby, and we start to
see Henry go gradually insane, although we start to suspect that from
the first time we see him.
Henry Spencer is one of the most interesting of film characters.  Kind
of in between of sincere and bizarre, he almost willfully accepts taking
care of the baby when its mother up and leaves it, for no other reason
than it's making a lot of annoying noise (which it is).  And he is
equipped with hair that seems to stretch towards the sky, hinting that
he is reaching for heaven, and also that he might be in some kind of
personalized hell.
As I said, this film is highly ambiguous.  That is an understatement. 
Of all the films I've ever seen, this film is one of the top five (if
not the most) ambiguous films ever made.  Of course, the other four are
probably Lynch films too.  This flick gives us numerous unsettling
images, scenes, and characters, which we are to figure out on our own. 
Lynch is not up for spoon-feeding us what he thinks are his takes on
everything.  Watching this film is like negotiated viewing: he gives us
only partial information, and we are to make our own assumptions or
explanations for it.  This makes "Eraserhead" one of the more
interesting of films to watch.
So what is my take on it?  Well, I've only viewed it once, but what I
got out of it was that the film is about the inability to escape from
reality, which can be hellish or heavenly - it's all how you view
things.  Henry says he is on "vacation," but this seems to be a metaphor
for dreaming, explaining some of the more weird aspects of the film
(i.e. the baby), as well as why his fantasies are in this flick (like
his bizarrely erotic love scene with the sex-pot across the hall as they
fool around in a tub that seems to suck them in).  There is also a bit
about a girl inside a radiator who sings about heaven, but is in a
radiator, which seems to be hell.  At the end, he has grasped the girl
in the radiator, and has a big smile on his face, as he seems to be
enjoying life.  Or maybe I looked way too much into it.
Although I'm not a huge fan of Lynch (I didn't like "Blue Velvet,"
"Dune," and "The Lost Highway," and only saw a bit at the end of "The
Elephant Man," which I liked), I will agree that he is one of the most
intereseting directors.  And I actually loved "Eraserhead."  Granted,
it's not one of my all-time favorite movies, like "The Graduate" or
"Annie Hall," but it's a fantastically interesting film, which offers so
much to look into, and decipher for yourself.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Permanent Midnight (1998)
Director: David Veloz
Writer: David Veloz (based on the autobiography by Jerry Stahl)
Starring: Ben Stiller, Maria Bello, Elizabeth Hurley, Owen Wilson, Fred
Willard, Peter Greene, Janeane Garafolo, Cheryl Ladd, Connie Nielsen, Andy
Dick, Jerry Stahl
Being inside someone's mind for about an hour and a half can really fuck
you up, especially if you're in the mind of Jerry Stahl.  Stahl was the
writer of such TV shows as "Moonlighting," and "Thirtysomething," and most
brilliantly"Alf," but more significantly, he was a drug addict making five
grand a week then blowing six grand on drugs.  His bestselling
autobiography, if anything like the book, has got to be one of the most
depressing, alienating book of the 90s, and that's counting Rush Limbaugh's
"See, I Told You So."
Watching "Permanent Midnight" is like watching a giant shapeless blurb on
the screen, framed by a section that tries to make sense of it but just
joins in the shapelessness.  We see Stahl's life from the beginning of his
career to his rapid descent into obscurity then back up again, and half the
time we have no idea where we are.  This would be a major complaint if this
film weren't about a drug dealer who's life was just like this.  His drug
taking was not so much out of pleasure as it was out of just trying to get
the pain of addiction to stop.
Stahl, as played by Ben Stiller, is a selfish, shameless man who just
happens to have a knack for being witty at the right time, but with an acid
edge that makes him funny and a bit of an asswhole at the same time.  Why
he started drug taking, we never find out.  When we first meet him, he's
already hooked onto drugs and takes it just because he physically needs it.
 The first image in the film is of him injecting heroin into his veins in a
public restroom, and we see nothing but pain in his eyes.  He's not
enjoying this ride.  Neither was I.
The framing device of the story is his flashbacks to his life as he tells
an ex-heroin addict named Kitty (Maria Bello, from "ER") in a smarmy motel
room, far from the pleasures of L.A.  As they have sex, and just lay around
talking, he talks of his move out to L.A. where his friend hooks him up
with a neat gig: for a quick payment of 20,000 bucks, he can marry a
British television producer named Sandra (Elizabeth Hurley) so she can get
a green card, and she will give him a writing job on a sitcom called "Mr.
Chompers" (er, "Alf").
He does it, and this allows him to feed his addiction more and more until
everything becomes a big blur.  He shows up late to meetings, arrives high,
and manages to write a script in about a half hour (this explains a lot
about the quality of those shows, eh?).  He injects his own life into his
scripts (his mother commits suicide, and he uses it in his show as a joke),
then ignores them as he does more drugs and has sex with various people. 
He befriends a dangerous dealer (Peter Greene), who is out in the parking
lot outside of the drug clinic where Stahl gets help at.
All of this, including the framing device, comes at you in a blunt,
straightforward manner, something which is totally respectful - hey, not
every film has to be neatly organized and sweetly delivered in a nice
little package - but after awhile, this becomes tedious.  Stiller's
performance is two-edged: he has no problem with showing the true
grittiness of Stahl's persona and lifestyle, but at the same time, he comes
off as a stupid asswhole who has no boundaries and no problem with wasting
other people's time (notably that of a potential agent, played with
hilarious control by Stiller-friend Janeane Garafolo).  It's hard to really
like a guy like this, and it's even harder to sit for an hour and a half
and really care what happens to him.
Overall, I respected this film because it doesn't bullshit anyone about
drugs.  This isn't "Trainspotting," which glorified then trashed drug-use. 
But that film at least gave a reason for people to do it in the first
place.  This one forgets about all that, and just assumes that because the
man is played by Ben "Mr. 1998" Stiller that it'll be easy to really give a
shit happens to him.  Wrong.  I really like Stiller, especially this year
(if you don't think he's a good director, at least after "Your Friends and
Neighbors" you can say he's a brilliant actor), but there needs to be
something else going on that gives me a reason to plow ahead with a film so
murky and overtly depressing.
"Permanent Midnight" is one of those films that will be admired for its
grit, but will never become enjoyable, even with some really nice moments
that either horrify or humor.  There's a really nasty scene where Stahl
tries to inject a syringe into the vein in his neck, and there's also a
really hilarious scene where he tries to come up with some ideas for a new
TV show he's working on, all while being totally high.  These moments, and
the greatness of the acting by pretty much everyone involved, make this
worth watching and plowing through.  But I really doubt I'll ever try to
plow through it again.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Peter's Friends (1992)
Director: Kenneth Branagh
Writers: Rita Rudner and Martin Bregman
Starring: Kenneth Branagh, Emma Thompson, Stephen Fry, Alphonsia
Emmanuel, Hugh Laurie, Imelda Staunton, Rita Rudner, Tony Slattery,
Phyllida Law, Alex Lowe, Richard Briers
The reunion film is not an original idea in any way, shape, or form. 
It's been done throughout film history over and over again, and has
become one of the many sub-genres, like the prep school sub-genre, the
angst-filled teen sub-genre, and the slasher sub-genre.  What makes
"Peter's Friends" so remarkable is not how it doesn't follow the rules
of this sub-genre, but how it follows it so well, and creates characters
that I wouldn't mind hanging with.
What are the rules of the reunion sub-genre?  Well....
1.You need a group of friends, most of them married or at least dating,
and sometimes even married or dating eachother.
3. They are not to have spoken together much since they split apart.
4. The reunion has to come in intervals divisible by 10.
5.They all have to be slightly to highly neurotic.
6. The reunion has to bring them together, seperate them with little
crises, then bring them back 
together because, after all, they're friends.
7. There has to be some sex or at least some making out either between
the friends or with other people that are there or were invited.
8. Eightly, they're all unhappy or marginally so.
9. There's some sort of sexual tension amongst some of them that's built
up over the years.
10. The friends are all wildly successful in the world of entertainment
and the arts, sometimes internationally so.
11. The film is filled with nostalgic radio hits from the time when they
were friends, sometimes causing them to get together in dance/song.
Since it follows these rules so closely, it will probably be (and has
been) coined off as just a "British 'Big Chill.'"  And in some ways it
is.  Both follow the rules, as I said, and both feature lots of
bitching, big confessionals, and broken relationships.  But while "The
Big Chill" was, at least to me, a tad too whiny and unsatisfying,
"Peter's Friends" hits its mark, making this film funny, dramatic, and
poignant.
The friends of Peter's were all in the same theatre group back in '82,
performig wildly outrageous British acts for people far too stuck up to
enjoy them (the opening scene has them all dancing in tux tops and
tutus).  After Peter's (Stephen Fry)  wealthy father (Richard Briers,
hardly on screen enough to register, but oh well) dies, leaving a giant
mansion to him, he has to decide whether or not to keep it.  Not sure
what to do with it immeadiately, he decides to throw a giant reunion
party, inviting back all his old chums.
Of course, all or most of his chums follow the tenth rule.  Andrew
(Kenneth Branagh, also directing here) is an actor who's unhappily
married to a TV star, Carol (co-writer Rita Rudner).  Maggie (Emma
Thompson) is a successfuly publisher of self-help books, but looks like
she needs them more than her customers, as she is lonely and unhappy. 
Roger and Mary (Hugh Laurie and Imelda Staunton, who were also married
in "Sense and Sensibility") are married, and are the most successful
creators of jingles in the UK, but have suffered a tragedy as one of
their newly born twins has recently died.  And Sarah (Alphonsia
Emmanuel) is as promiscuous as ever, having a new boyfriend as of two
weeks named Brian (Tony Slattery) who's married and wants a divorce
because of her, giving her doubts.
The film features lots of inner-friend jokes, and even some old theatre
anecdotes (which I at least find a lot of fun in, as I've done lots of
theatre myself).  And there are big confessions, brawls between the
friends, and by the end, almost everyone is unhappy, even though some
have resolved their problems long before the end (which I kinda dug). 
The final twist would seem forced an anti-climactic, but for some
reason, I felt the same way the rest of the friends did.  Maybe it's
because the people in this film are so likable that I just wanted to
join their clique.
That's really what makes "Peter's Friends" so lovable: the way you just
want to hang with a group of friends who can be so dysfuntional
sometimes, but when someone's in crisis, can come together wonderfully
for one another.  It's when you have a giant crisis like this and people
want to selflessly help you out instead of subtely pushing you away that
makes you realize you have true friends, and these people are true
friends.
Not to mention Kenneth Branagh is able to make the film seem nostalgic
for the 80s (a decade I grew up in, unfortunately) without taking us
outside of the 90s.  There are some 80s classics and anti-classics like
Tears for Fears "Everybody Wants to Rule the World," but unfortunately
no stupid/fun 80s songs (I think if I ever did an 80s reunion film, I'd
put some crap Go Gos song on, or at least some good old "Come on
Eileen"), but this is the British 80s we're talking about.  Oh well. 
But anyway, the direction is pretty good, although nothing amazing. 
Branagh's forte is really making Shakespeare fresh and magical, but at
least he's very good with making a less ambiguous film like this.
The writing is good from Rita Rudner and Martin Bregman, with lots of
good one-liners, and even some really bad but good puns (to mock the
fact that Andrew lives in L.A., Peter, while cutting some logs, asks him
is he has wood in L.A., and Andrew says, "No, but we have Hollywood" -
punishment like that).  The actors, as in most speaking movies, are
better than their material, though, with some stand-out performances to
the six friends, as well as the outsiders like Slattery, Rudner, and
Phyllida Law as the old housekeeper of the Peter's mansion.  A little
note should be made about Hugh Laurie's performance, as he looks like he
took some massive doses of prozac before doing this - I mean, I've never
seen him actually act this dramatically.
"Peter's Friends" is a really enjoyable film which makes people like me
pine for some sort of future reunion, although I don't know what kind
I'll have (like most people, I don't look forward to my high school
reunion).  Because of the way these friends are still able to maintain
the same amount of care they have for one another and after such a long
period of seperation, I just look forward to the day when I can have
friends like that.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Wilde (1997)
Director: Brian Gilbert
Writer: Julian Mitchell (based on the book by Richard Ellmann)
Starring: Stephen Fry, Jude Law, Michael Sheen, Jennifer Ehle, Tom
Wilkinson, Vanessa Redgrave, Gemma Jones, Judy Parfitt, Zoë Wanamaker, Ioan
Gruffudd, Matthew Mills
I think that the greatness of a person can be judged in how much of a
bullshit artist they are, the least being more commendable.  In that
respect, playwright/philosopher/world's most famous bisexual Oscar Wilde is
definitely one of history's most commendable presences, right up there with
Thomas More as people who stayed completely true to who they were, no
matter what the consequences...and of course, there were consequences. 
This is just one of two things that the biopic on his life, "Wilde" is
trying to say, the other being that no matter what the time period, a man
like Oscar Wilde cannot exist on the world for a wide variety of reasons.
The film chronicles the latter years of his life, starting in 1882 during
his one year trip to America, and then showing him in the prime of his
life, when he wrote his only novel, "The Picture of Dorian Gray," and
numerous plays, such as "Lady Windermere's Fan" and "The Importance of
Being Earnest."  But unlike most authors and playwrights, Wilde was as
dynamic and witty as the plays he wrote.  As played to total perfection by
Stephen Fry, a big fan of Wilde's work, Oscar is probably the most charming
man to ever walk the earth, as well as the greatest conversationalist, at
least of his time.  He can charm anyone, even the most ignorant brutes, and
has the ability to shoot out intelligent, aphoritic one-liners on cue, such
as "It's appalling what people do in front of works of art," and "Alcohol,
taken in large quantities, can bring about all the effects of drunkeness"
(I'm paraphrasing here).
What some encyclopedias and various history books leave out, though, is
that Oscar was one of the very first widely known open homosexuals.  The
film shows what may be his fictitious epiphany when a visitor to his house,
Robbie Ross (Michael Sheen), seduces Oscar once his wife, Constance
(Jennifer Ehle), is asleep, and ends up carrying on a short-lived affair
with him.  After a couple other suitors, Oscar falls deeply in love with
Lord Alfred "Bosie" Douglas (Jude Law, the bitter, scene-stealing cripple
from "Gattaca"), an incredibly selfish, sometimes ill-tempered young man
who captures Oscar's heart because: a) he thinks he's so beautiful that
he's a work of art, and Oscar is obsessed with beauty in art; and b)
because he generally feels bad for what a hard life he's had so far.
The film plays two ways: as a literal lifeline of Oscar's life, showing his
plays being written, and depicting his tragic downfall; and as every biopic
should be told, as a parable for our own lives.  Every great biopic finds
some way of connecting the people they glamorize to our own lives, and the
film views Oscar as the thing we all should be, and the thing we can never
be.  His life, at least the better part of it, is a wonderful dream, where
we discover who we really are, and instead of doing things we never want to
do, we be what we think we are.  Oscar discovered who he was in the middle
of his life, and from that point on, decided to live life to the fullest.
But the film depicts the reason why this is a fantasy-like fallacy, showing
Oscar as one of the world's great selfish people.  Characters pop up from
time to time, are given a lot of attention, and then disappear for long
amounts of time, reappearing for a brief scene of two, then disappearing
again.  Characters like his patient wife, who has had two kids with him,
and wishes him to come home, hardly sees him, and the movie sometimes seems
to forget her.  The same goes for Robbie Ross, who, despite knowing that he
was merely the man who opened up Oscar to homosexuality, remains totally
loyal to him, and tries to help in the later years of his life.
Despite a few shortcomings, "Wilde" is a magnificently film, filled with a
sometimes sensual feeling, and filled with the same way of looking at
history as "A Man for All Seasons" did.  The sets and costumes are
beautifully lavish, the cinematography is utterly gorgeous, and even the
numerous gay love scenes are tastefully handled, never seeming a bit like
pornography.  And we see a wonderful, loving portrait of Oscar Wilde, who's
own time was not kind to him, but who's seen that history has seen him as
almost a martyr for true self identity.  Yes, you can easily point out that
the way he lived was selfish, and that his downfall was not really Bosie's
fault but really his, but you can't deny that you wish that you could
discover yourself like Oscar did, and have the courage to act on it.  This
is why Oscar Wilde is viewed so favorly in history, and why someone lke
Bosie, who was a homosexual more out of revenge against his tyrannical
father (Tom Wilkinson from "The Full Monty") and society as well, is viewed
as merely "at one time the object of Oscar Wilde's affections."
One more final note, actually more of a redundant note, in all actuality,
should be made towards Stephen Fry, who plays Oscar Wilde (I can't believe
that I almost forgot to praise him more).  Fry's performance is probably
the most natural and dead-on performance I have seen in a very long time,
and I'm starting the campaign now to get him nominated for an Oscar. 
Folks, you will probably not see a better performance this year by an
actor, because, for all intensive purposes, Stephen Fry IS Oscar Wilde, and
every time I read Wilde's literature or hear one of his hilarious
aphorisms, I will hear the voice of Fry.  That is all.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
Director: Wes Craven
Writer: Kevin Williamson
Starring: Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox, David Arquette, Jamie Kennedy,
Jerry O'Connell, Liev Schreiber, Duane Martin, Sarah Michelle Gellar,
Tim Olyphant, Elise Neal, Laurie Metcalf, Jada Pinkett, Omar Epps, Lewis
Arquette, David Warner, Rebecca Gayheart, Heather Graham, Tori Spelling,
Luke Wilson
"Scream 2" is kind of an oxymoron in itself: it's a film which looked
good because it mocked sequels, but was also a sequel.  Talk about
hypocrisy.  Now, the first one also had a similar fallacy: believing
that horror movies suck, but hell, it's a horror movie, but it worked
awesomely, and brought back the slasher genre in a cool, hip 90s kinda
way, without getting all alternatively whiny or anything.  "Scream 2"
wishes it were as cool as the original.
"Scream 2" picks up two years after the first one ended, where a killer
(or killers) killed a bunch of teens, but was ultimately stopped.  The
chief survivors of the first film - protagonist Sydney (Neve Campbell),
obsessive journalist Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox, now with admittingly
kinda attractive streaks in her hair), boyish yet lovable Deputy Dewey
(David Arquette, with a punctured nerve from the original, causing him
to limp and hold one arm out like he was Bob Dole), and dorky film geek
guy (not me) Randy (Jamie Kennedy, looking almost too cool with a
goatee) - well, they're all back.  And someone else is too.
Like the first one, we get an elaborate, satirical, and pretty bitching
opening sequence involving two collegiate lovers (Jada Pinkett and Omar
Epps) who attend a preview screening of the movie that was made from the
book that Gale wrote on the first one, "Stab," and are subsequently
murdered individually by a killer dressed in the mask from the first
one, which they're handing out at the door as Rocky Horror-esque
promotional advertisements.  Sure, it's cool as hell, but it's neither
as tense or clever as the first one, and didn't really have my adrenalin
pushing or anything.  Bad omen?
We then get two more hours of sometimes fun/sometimes not whodunit,
sorta/sorta not in the tradition of the first one.  There are some more
characters introduced, as it is two years later, and it's in college
where Randy and Sydney attend (did they do that on purpose...or is Randy
turning into Syd's own Hinkley?).  There's Syd's preppy fratboy
boyfriend, Derek (Jerry O'Connell, remember Joe from "Joe's
Apartment"...and that fat ass from "Stand By Me?"), two more film
students for fun (Tim Olyphant and Sarah Michelle Gellar), Syd's roomate
Hallie (Elsie Neal), an annoying journalist named Debbie Salt (Laurie
Metcalf, the sister from "Roseanne"), a freaked-out cameraman for Gale
who hasn't read her book yet (Duane Martin), among others.
Also back from the first is the man who we saw once or twice, and only
on TV in the first one: Cotton Weary (played by indie fave Liev
Schreiber).  This time, he actually has a whole bunch of lines, as he's
trying to get exposure so people will stop being afraid of him, and get
on with his life (there's a direct cause-and-effect if I ever saw one). 
Anyway, Liev rocks, giving possibly the best performance in the film.
The killings, obviously a result of a copycat, are pretty fun, even if
they are more elaborate.  Of course, Randy does a redo of his "How To
Survive a Horror Film" speech, modifying it slightly for sequels, and
one of is more blood and more elaborateness in general.  I respect that,
but one of the reasons the first one worked was the structure.  The film
was tightly scripted by Kevin Williamson, making it more satirical and
more fun.  It was a guessing game from start to finish.  This time,
there's some guessing, but most of the time I wasn't even caring. 
Probably because the big sequences were too distracting.
Yes, they're great, and I was having fun with a lot of them.  But they
don't really work well with the plot for some reason.  Take for example
a sequence that is brilliantly done but ultimately hurts the structure a
bit: Syd, a drama major, is playing, of all roles, Cassandra, and during
a rehearsal (with full special effects - this is obviously a utopian
college, I mean, the dorm rooms are gigantic), she starts hallucinating
that all the people with masks on are tying to kill her.  With a
brilliant score by Danny Elfman (who sadly only does this one scene),
it's scary, and with cool camerawork, it's effective.  But it's
distracting.  What does it have to do with the plot?  Nothing.  As do
most of them.
I do respect a lot of this film, though.  As I said, the film has some
great sequences (my favorite was the scene in the car - have to see
it...).  And there are some clever ways it makes characters look
suspicious, although not as well.  There are some genuine shocks, some
more character development (the whole Gale/Dewey thing, though never
really explained, is dealt with some more...and god help me if I wanted
them to get together), and some clever lines.
My big problem with reviewing this is the film comes back a lot towards
the end.  Although totally proposterous as to why it takes place where
it does, the ending is great, albeit extremely corny.  But, as a friend
said, how could it NOT be corny.  At least it plays it up for laughs,
and even tosses in some delicious satire.  Including some clever
afterthoughts, playing up the fact that it was contrived (it actually
made me happy), the ending is the most satisfying part of this.  I did
leave with a smile on my face, then I reflected on the film as a whole.
It's pretty much a mess.  With spots that shine here and there, the film
is very much a hills-and-valleys experience.  Sure, I liked the whole
take on sororities (with one of the lead sorority girls played by
Rebecca "I'm the Noxema Girl!" Gayheart), I dug the acting ('cept Laurie
Metcalf's), and even liked the set pieces, but could never really get
into them for some reason.  The original had me at the edge of my seat,
not because of the suspense, but the way it was done, but for some
reason I was left kinda cold by it all.  None of it really excited
me...even the cool ending...or the "I Think I Love You" singing by
Jerry.
Maybe the problem is that it wants to be so much.  It wants to be a
satire on media.  It wants to be a parody AND satire on sequels.  It
wants to clever, hip...I mean, it ends with a Collective Soul tune.  It
wants to have movie allusions (I spotted only a few, though, notably a
"Shining" reference), and it wants it all to be crammed into over two
hours.  The original was simple, yet it worked wonderfully.  I'm not
saying it's not great because it's no "Scream 1;" it wouldn't hold up
well on it's own anyway.  But of course, it's a sequel, damn proud of
it, and it never even works well when held up to the first one.
A special note should be made to the cool movie-within-a-movie, "Stab." 
It's one of the more inspired parts of the film, as it is overly corny,
and filled with heavy media attention.  At the premiere, the companies
send promotional costumes and glowing knives, adding to the cool
satire.  And the funniest part is it stars Heather Graham as Drew,
"Bottle Rocket"'s Luke Wilson as Skeet, and Tori Spelling as Neve (it is
also mentioned that David Schwimmer plays Dewey).  Too bad it isn't
really dealt with in any deeper fashion, as it could have added to the
overall greatness of the film.
"Scream 2" is not a major disappointment; a mere minor one.  It needs
tighter scripting, that's all.  I did laugh, I did jump a couple times,
and I even smiled a lot of the time.  But the overall feeling, once
reflecting on it, is a tad unsatisfied.  Oh well.  We always have
"Scream 3" - already in the making!
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Looking for Mr. Goodbar (1977)
Director: Richard Brooks
Writer: Richard Brooks (based on the novel by Judith Rossner)
Starring: Diane Keaton, Tuesday Weld, William Atherton, Richard Kiley,
Richard Gere, Alan Feinstein, Priscilla Pointer, LeVar Burton, Richard
Bright, Tom Berenger
It's obvious what Richard Brooks' intentions were for making "Looking for
Mr. Goodbar": he not only wanted to show how leading two lives ultimately
results in tragedy, but he also wanted to make a very unsubtle statement
against nightclubbing and sleeping with lots of men, an infamous pasttime
of the late 70s right up until the explosion of the AIDs virus. 
Unfortunately as a tale of two lives, it's too ridiculous, and as a
condemnation of promiscuous life styles, it's too preachy and ends all too
conveniently.
The film's real strength is in how it creates a certain kind of world from
a certain kind of perspective.  The entire structure and everything that
goes on is customized so that it fits that of the film's protagonist,
Theresa Dunn (Diane Keaton, the same year she won an Oscar for "Annie
Hall"), a young woman who by day is a first grade teacher of deaf kids, and
by night is out in the bars, picking up men, taking them back to her flat,
and having her way with them.
It's a proposterous situation because the two parts are just too different
from one another to be taken seriously, which is part of why we can't
totally be swayed by its message, at least in this way.  But what the film
lacks in literal substance it somewhat makes up in the way in which it's
presented.  "Looking for Mr. Goodbar" is an incredibly frustrating film to
watch because it is told entirely from her perspective, and as such we
often see some of her dreams and wishes.  Take for example the beginning
when we are introduced to her in the classroom learning about how to teach
young kids: she imagines everyone in class leaves and that she ends up
making out with her teacher (Alan Feinstein), but then we see that it was a
daydream, but in the next scene she is actually making love with her
teacher in his apartment after class.  What is real and what isn't, this
film often asks, and we can only answer a little bit later on.
What "Looking for Mr. Goodbar" feels like to the audience is being Theresa
watching herself and everything she feels and thinks, and then making a
critique about what was done.  In the beginning, Theresa lives at home and
feels suffocated by everyone around her, especially her ultra-Catholic
tyrant of a father, played with gusto by Richard Kiley.  As such, these
scenes feel claustrophobic and difficult to watch, and when the scene
shifts away from the house and her family, one feels like taking a breath
of fresh air, just like Theresa probably does.
Once moving out of her family's house, she moves into an apartment building
with her sister, Katherine (a glowing Tuesday Weld, who received an Oscar
nomination for her role), where she begins to bring various men home.  Over
the course of the film, there are only about five men we see her with, but
they constantly reappear, so much that we can barely keep recollection of
them, as Theresa no doubt does.  There's James (William Atherton), the
clean-cut all-around good guy who her father likes, but who does have a
darker side to him like all people.  Then there's Tony Lapanto (a pre-fame
Richard Gere), an overly-confident schmuck who decides to show up inside
her apartment whenever he decides he wants to boink her...or do a bizarre
ritual dance.
And of course, there's her job, which she gradually begins to ignore as the
film goes on.  Although being consumed with it when she first gets her job
towards the beginning, the more sex she has and drugs she takes, the less
interested in it she becomes, and it's obvious that a balancing act between
the two will not be had.
Every now and then we see her aforementioned sister, Katherine, who is
always at the opposite end of the poles than Theresa.  In the beginning,
she's partaking in drugs and group sex while Theresa keeps to her school
studies, but by the end, Katherine has cleaned herself up and started anew,
while Theresa has redefined herself as a druggie and sex addict.
The ending is, yes, a shock, but it's also cheap and ends only so that the
message of the film can be completed.  Though I must say that it is a much
imitated scene, having been stolen by films like "Twin Peaks: Fire Walk
With Me" and "The Doom Generation," though neither are as good as this is.
Still, "Looking for Mr. Goodbar" leaves the viewer wanted a little bit
more, perhaps because it promises to have more depth on the topics of
promiscuity and leading a double life.  Instead it come off all too
fable-like, and often intends to shock us more than it intends to say
something very meaningful.  But with a great performance from Diane Keaton
(who acts very human...and bares a lot more of herself than she normally
has, and she was even in the original cast of "Hair"), this film comes off
as one of those deeply flawed classics that you don't necessarily enjoy or
even like, but you never forget.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Julius Caesar (1970)
Director: Stuart Burge
Adapter: Robert Furnival
Starring: Jason Robards, Charlton Heston, John Gielgud, Richard
Chamberlain, Robert Vaughn
"Julius Caesar" is not one of Shakespeare's best works, but it's still
an awesome piece of playwritedom.  The story takes an original approach
to it, showing it from the perspective of one of the major accomplices
in the assasination of the great Roman leader - Brutus, who is seen as a
tragic anti-hero, who is too easily influenced by some of his peers. 
Yes, a part of him agrees with his friend's Cassius's ideas that he is
too power-hungry, but Caesa is his friend and not a bad guy at all.  In
one scene, we see Caesar as being totally selfless (someone hands him
something about himself, and he puts it on the bottom of the pile,
chosing to deal with the problems of other people before his own - this
has a cruel irony since it talks about the conspiracy to kill him).  And
in the end, Brutus commits suicide, seeing that he has no way out,
having made a tragic mistake in taking part in the assasination.
This is all in this big star adaptation of the play.  But all the film
has to do is do the text word for word, which all Shakespeare films do,
'cause, well, it's Shakespeare.  So what the filmmaker has to do is make
it original and fresh (much like Olivier, Zefferelli, or Branagh) and
have great actors (like Olvier or Branagh, not Zefferelli).  This
certainly has the cast.  Two time Oscar winner (though not at this
point) Jason Robards is the protagonist, Brutus.  Charlton Heston is
Marcus Antony.  Ubergod John Gielgud is Caesar.  And Richard Chamberlain
has a cameo as one of the Roman senators (or something, I forget).  Too
bad they all don't live up to the bard's text, proving that the names of
all these great actors doesn't mean that they're ALWAYS great.
Robards is absolutely wooden in his role.  He shows about two facial
expressions the whole film.  Yes, the guy's supposed to be in deep
thought, but Robards just looks like he's looking at the cue cards the
whole time.  Robards is, in fact, a great actor, and he was even back in
the early days (check out Leone's "Once Upon a Time in the West").  But
he breathes no life into his character, and just doesn't live up to his
potential as a fantastic actor, one of the best working.
Charlton Heston.  Charlton is revered as one of the greats, and he is. 
He's a good actor, just not as good as some people make him out to be. 
I mean, the guy can be powerful, like in "Ben Hur" (or his cool speech
he makes in Branagh's "Hamlet").  He can also be miserably hokey (i.e.
"Soylent Green is made of PEOPLE!!!" or, need I say "EARTHQUAKE!!!!"). 
Here, he's in hokey mode.  Again, the guy CAN act, and he doesn't do a
bad job with the "Friends, Romans, Countrymen, lend me your ears"
speech.  And granted, he does have to live up to Marlon Brando's Oscar
nominated performance in the '55 version of it.  But he's just not up to
this role at this point in his life.
John Gielgud...or, as I have been calling him lately "Coolest Old Man
with a Goatee"...is pretty good as Caesar for awhile.  I mean, if
someone asked ME who to cast as the big cheese of Rome at the time, I'd
pick Gielgud.  But there's one part that kills me.  And it's the most
essential part of the role of Caesar.  The line "Es tu Brute?" is
supposed to be said in shock.  Brutus is like his best friend, and he
turns to him after he stabs him, and asks his best friend why he has
killed him along with the other jerks.  It's the most powerful part of
the entire play, and Gielgud just says it like he's thinks he's some
great Mr. Theatre.  He says it in two parts and neither of them
concludes with a question mark or has any kind of feeling in it.  Which
is basically what this film is lacking in: feeling.
Richard Chamberlain is in this for about two seconds.  He's good.
This film is not bad at all.  I watched it in 10th grade English and it
showed the play well.  But it goes nowhere with it.  It's also a more
liberal adaptation in one sense (other than casting Heston): the
stabbing scene is very gory.  In the play, you get the idea that they
all stab him simultaneoulsy.  In this one, they take turns at stabbing
him, and it goes on FOREVER.  By the end, Gielgud is so drenched in karo
syrup that I'm surprised he could even say "Es tu Brute?"
While this is a pretty good film version of the play, straightforward
and fitting for classroom use, it's nothing very special.  If you really
want to see a great version of this, rent the one with Brando in it
(he's thin in it, by the way).  But in the meantime, this will do.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
Director: Martin Scorsese
Writer: Melissa Mathison
Starring: Tenzin Thutob Tsarong, Gyurume Tethong, Tulku Jamyang Kunga
Tenzin, Tenzin Yeshi Paichang, Tencho Gyalpo, Tsewang Migyur Khangsar,
Geshi Yeshi Gyatso, Sonam Phuntsok, Gyatso Lukhang, Robert Lin
The Dalai Lama is one of the most poignant and eclectic characters of all
time, being the compassoinate Buddha in human form.  He's a man who is all
wise, very forgiving, and much against violence.  The emphasis of
Scorsese's new biopic on him (indeed, his most positive biopic of a person
- look at how he looked at Jake LaMotta in "Raging Bull") is to try and
understand the man as who he is by examining how he was chosen to be
Kundun, the other name for the Dalai Lama, from the time when he was a
child.
In his presentation, Kundun is seen as being chosen by fate to become this
great man who is born again and again and again throughout the centuries,
so that when one dies, another one is born.  At the age of 2 (played by
Tenzin Yeshi Paichang), he was found by a wandering group of religious men
who discover who he is by placing several items that belonged to the
previous Dalai Lama and several more that didn't, and seeing which ones the
boy picks.  He picks the right ones, and the boy is named the 14th Dalai
Lama.
Scorsese's view of how this happens shows a boy growing up with a heavy
burden.  Again and again, he is told by his followers that he will "soon
have great responsibilities," and in one scene, shown a cryptic letter the
13th Dalai Lama wrote before he died and asked to decipher it, as he
apparently wrote it in his previous life.  Scorsese's portrayal of the
Dalai Lama sounds faintly like the way he presented the flawed Jesus in
"The Last Temptation of Christ," but instead of a man who is believed to be
perfection, Kundun is perfection.
The film has no real plot, as it takes us into the world of Kundun, showing
us how he became the Dalai Lama, and how he is learning to be him every
day.  Four actors play Kundun in several parts of his life (Tenzin Thutob
Tsarong at his oldest), and in each of them, they show a degree of
ignorance to what they are that decreases throughout the years.  As a young
boy, he is asked a big question, to which he replies "But I'm just a boy." 
By the film's end, he has become the Dalai Lama, a wise man who has had to
make a decision that has alienated himself from his country who needs him.
While the first half is plotless and merely allows us to be an ehtnographer
to what is going on, the second half gains a bit of a plot as the threat of
China trying to retake Tibet (his country, if you didn't already know) and
command its religious, peaceful inhabitants becomes more and more ominous. 
Kundun even journeys to China to meet with their leader, Mao Zedong (played
by lookalike Robert Lin), but to no avail.  The sad ending shows Kundun
leaving his country disguised as a regular soldier, and has never returned.
While "Kundun" is a marvelous history lesson that will probably be shown by
high school teachers once it comes to video, it's also a hypnotic descent
into a world many people don't know about.  I know almost nothing about
Tibet and Buddhism, and the film shows us an unadulterated, authentic look
at the culture and beauty of the country and its religion.  By the film's
end, we see their necessity for religion, and how their beliefs don't allow
them to do any mortal harm to anyone else.
This is also a work of Tibetan and relgious propaganda, never really
getting deep into China's side.  They are shown as being communist
atheists, killing and polluting other peaceful cultures, and trying to
silence the spread of Buddhism (Chairman Mao tells Kundun that "religion is
poison" at one point).  The film never shows the Chinese side, and
therefore seems a bit narrow in its scope of the Tibetan Freedom
controversy.  Alas, this is not the point of the film, as it is really
trying to understand the enigma known as the Dalai Lama.
But even this is not done as perfectly as it should.  The big problem is
that Scorsese and the film's writer Melissa Mathison have too much respect
for Kundun, and are therefore unable to present him in an unbiased light. 
But the film still presents him wonderfully, shown as a man who is perfect,
but gained that throughout the years, not being born that way.  The young
Kundun is not a perfect being, but gains this through experience.  But at
the end, Kundun is still a mystery, which is probably for the better.  To
believe that any man can be perfect takes a leap of faith anyway, and this
film knows that.
Among other things, "Kundun" is the best looking film in a long time. 
Roger Deakins' cinematography (he also did "Fargo," but was snubbed) is
perhaps the most gorgeous since "Lawrence of Arabia," and the entire film
is a hypnotic palate of gorgeous, memorable images and sequences.  Philip
Glass's music is enigmatic, accentuating the already amazing feel of the
film.  A cult favorite who's done certain films as the beautiful
"Koyannisquati," the man may finally get the Oscar he really deserves.  A
large colored mosaic made of dirt is one of the many beautiful things that
abound in this movie, as well as the skilled camerawork and direction by
Scorsese.
What's left over is a deeper knowledge of the Dalai Lama and a film that is
hypnotically engaging.  There is really nothing better than a film that can
transport its viewers to another world and even enlighten them.  While it's
not the greatest film and has its share of flaws, its nonetheless another
amazing film from Scorsese that looks at things in another light that many
other directors wouldn't even dare touch.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Evita (1996)
Director: Alan Parker
Writers: Alan Parker and Oliver Stone (based on the musical by Andrew Lloyd
Webber and Tim Rice)
Starring: Madonna, Antonio Banderas, Jonathan Pryce, Jimmy Nail, Andrea
Corr
Andrew Lloyd Webber's musicals, preferably his early work with lyricist Tim
Rice, present a musical which is totally unlike any musical before its
time.  Webber and Rice do not subscribe to the gaity of such musicals as
"Oklahoma!," or the slapstickness of shows like "A Funny Thing Happened on
the Way to the Forum."  They instead tackle hot issues from our past, and
view them differently, and pack them together with redundant, catchy music,
as well as thoughtful lyrics.  
Like "Jesus Christ Superstar," which examined the rise and fall of Jesus in
his last days from a fame perspective (in the cool tune "Superstar," a dead
Judas comes back from the dead to ask Jesus why he didn't spread his
message wider), "Evita" takes an inventive stance on its topic, this time
being the famed wife of Argentinian dictator, Juan Perón, Eva, who slept
her way to the top and became famous chiefly because she got attention,
much like the woman playing her: Madonna (although I think Madonna did rise
to the top for her musical talent, among other things).
"Evita" deals with the rise and fall of Eva Perón, a woman who captured the
heart of the nation after marrying Juan (Jonathan Pryce), then died at the
young age of 33, creating an international stir of mourning not unlike that
of Princess Di (the two do share a bit in common, although it wasn't like
Di slept to "the top").  Webber and Rice sure chose bizarre topics for
their musicals, but they always have a point for doing it.  Here, they wish
to expose her for what she is, but still show that despite all of her many
drawbacks, her lying, and covering up for her fascist husband, but show
that she was still a good woman with fairly good intentions, and her death
was very sad.
It's also a musical, with almost no words not unsung.  The film plays like
a rock opera, much like their "Jesus Christ Superstar," with many giant
musical sequences just like the old musicals, even if they do possess very
intelligent lyrics, which create not only an intellectually enlightening
experience, but also a very entertaining one.  After all, this is a
musical, and Webber's musicals never undermine this.  They are a balance of
energy and intellectual depth, walking on a fine line between the both, and
never stumbling on either side.
This is why the beginning of "Evita" is kind of a let-down.  Okay, it IS a
let-down.  I'm not saying the opening moments are bad, because they're
pretty good.  But what comes after is a lifeless, un-entertaining, and
totally unrewarding sequence where she cons a singer (Jimmy Nail) into
taking Eva to Buenos Aires after a one-night stand.  In the musical, it's a
fun, energetic sequence, culiminating in the show stopper, "Buenos Aires,"
which is also lifeless.  Then a punch is pulled as we see Eva being screwed
over by the singer, instead of her leaving him, where she ends up singing
the sad tune, "Another Suitcase In Another Hall," which was meant for a
later character, screwed over by Eva.  The portrayal of Eva in the
beginning is too soft, seeming like Parker and Oliver Stone, who adapted it
for the screen, are afraid to present her for what she is, even while it's
being narrated by a hater of Eva's, the omnipotent(Antonio Banderas), who
presents her in a negative light. For a while, it looks like Alan Parker
can't pull it off.
However, the film pulls itself together in a flash, and after that song is
over, and the giddily nihilistic song "Goodbye and Thank You," where we see
Eva go through a long line of lovers who help her ascend, is magnificent,
darkly comical, and just gleeful.  From this point on, the film is
hypnotic, satisfying, and satirical.  No more punches are thrown, and the
basic outline of the original musical are in tact.  We see Eva woo and
marry Juan, get him out of jail, rise to stardom, falter a bit, come back,
and then gradually die of cancer (I think it was because of cancer).
More importantly, many of the themes from the musical carry on with this,
as well as some filling-in-the-gaps reconnassaince work.  Juan, who is
pretty underwritten in the musical, is given some extra scenes, and exposed
as what he was for Eva: an accessory.  A muted scene where he tries to
visit her respective room but is shunned allows us to learn more about
Juan, and understand his sadness more than we did before.
>From the "Goodbye and Thank You" number on, the film shows Eva trying to
cover up for the horrible government by doing cheap and petty things which
wooed a nation, and saved a government, even while it left the nation's
people downtrodden.  But despite this, the nation still loved Eva, and when
she slipped into death, the world mourned her because she was a star. 
That's when our narrator, Ché, comes out to show that she wasn't the great
woman she really was, and expose her fame.  Describing this character is
difficult, mainly because he has no real realistic background (he's said to
be based on the revolutionary Ché Guevera, but the two probably could have
never met, like they do in the film), but he serves as a perspective on
Eva, but even his perspective can't help us from feeling bad when Eva dies
a pathetic death.
Alan Parker, no stranger to bizarre musicals (he's done "Fame," "The
Committments," "Bugsy Malone," and "Pink Floyd The Wall" - the latter which
is absolutely brilliant), nails the film, exposing everything for what it
is.  We cry for Evita at the end because we feel we should, by the way it
is presented.  His direction is manipulative for a reason: to show the
mourning for what it is.  And there is energy throughout, with lots of
bright colors, and scenes which are cinematically entertaning, as well as
enriching and deep, such as the balcony scene where she sings "Don't Cry
For Me, Argentina," and her death sequence, which is poignant becuase of
how sad it is.
Madonna's Golden Globe Winning performance is much like the movie: starts
kinda downhill then goes up quickly, remaning there for the rest of the
film.  At the beginning, she looks like she's too busy concentrating on her
singing to act, but she eventually gets it right, though never really
getting the presence of, say, Patti LuPone (who did the role in its
American Premiere back in the late 70s).  Her death, though, is brilliant. 
Her singing could be better though.  I know she took lessons to improve her
range and all, but it still sounds like she's trying to hard.  She sounds
way too soft in several places where she should be comanding (like...Patti
LuPone - I heard her sing on an old "Evita" CD, and you could just feel her
stage presence without even seeing her).  But it's generally very good,
although not up to the brilliance the role really requires.
Antonio Banderas, who is almost like a guilty pleasure these days (I'm one
of the few people who thinks he rocks), is extremely comanding in his
performance, presenting a lovable narrator.  His singing is very good,
though nothing compared to the original, Mandy Patinkin.  He does have a
pretty good singing voice, and a great range.  And Jonathan Pryce is pretty
awesome, although very brief at times, in his role as Juan, seeming to put
on a poker face for his melancholy facade.
Although it gets off to a rocky start ("rocky"'s polite for what it really
is), it soon picks up and becomes a wonderully poignant musical.  Like the
other musical released in '96 (Woody Allen's "Everyone Says I Love You"),
it's a reminder that the Hollywood musical may be dead, but it can come
back every now and then for a brief performance.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Fantasia (1940)
Directors: James Algar, Samuel Armstrong, Ford Beebe, Norman Ferguson,
Jim Handley, T. Hee, Wilfred Jackson, Hamilton Luske, Bill Roberts, and
Ben Sharpsteen
Writers: (look at this list of Directors.  The list for writers is 10
times longer, and I'm not going to write them all out for obvious
reasons, sorry)
Starring: Leopold Stokowski and the Philadelphia Orchestra, Walt Disney
(voice)
Disney films are famous (or infamous) for their Utopian presentation of
the world through most of their movies.  They present a
bright-as-the-sun angle to the world, filled with a bit of melodrama,
and always ending with happily, even if that means altering the story of
their source.  They promise a world that's always quenched of
evil-doers, and ends with a little song and a bunch of smiles.  And
that's what's so cool about "Fantasia."
"Fantasia" presents a wide oeuvre of short little animated films by
Disney, all silent, and all set to pieces of classical music, and not
always the bright, cheery, sun-shiny promises of perfection that Disney
"masterpieces" are known for.  The music is done by the famous
Philadelphia Orchestra, who are conducted by the even-more-famous
Leopold Stokowski, who show up between pieces, sometimes actually doing
other stuff than playing (one time Leo shakes hands with Mickey Mouse). 
But this isn't really the great part (seems too PBS-y to me).  The
cartoons are fascinating little vignettes, all unique, and each one
interesting and hypnotic.  Well, most of them are.
"Fantasia" starts off kind of on a down-note with a rather boring
cartoon for Bach's "Tocatta and Fugue in D minor" (the music made famous
in the original version of "Phantom of the Opera").  Nothing much
happens in it, and it lasts a good 10 minutes.  Yes, it goes by faster
than it probably usually would, but it's still not up to par with the
other ones.
But in the second little film, "Fantasia" takes off and never really
comes down.  The second film does a little adaptation of Tchaikovsky's
"Nutcracker Suite," but with the brilliant idea of not having to do
anything with the Nutcracker, but rather on mother nature.  With the six
different movements they chose from the suite, we get a lot of little
fairies running around, mushrooms and flowers dancing, a goldfish
dancing like an arabian wife, and even a bunch of little flowers
spinning on the water.  Although having nothing to do with the suite, it
makes up for that lacking by making each of the parts of the little
vignette unique, humorful, and fascinating.
The third one seems like it's just the oligatory use of Mickey Mouse's
fame.  But what results is a classic story set to the music of Paul
Dukas's "The Sorcerer Apprentice," and dealing with exactly that.  In
it, Mickey is, well, a sorcerer's apprentice, who takes the sorcerer's
hat and begins playing around with magic when the guy leaves for a bit. 
He ends up creating one broom to carry water for him (which is his job),
but accidentally turns it into thousands of brooms, all carrying water,
and then there's a bit of a mishap.  It's wonderfully done, with a great
silent job by Mickey (seriosuly, he's much better without that annoying
voice of his).
The best of the vignettes takes place following the Mickey one.  Set to
Stravinsky's "Rite of the Spring," it deals with the beginning of earth,
and up to the death of the dinosaurs and the reconstruction of earth
following.  Each of Stravinsky's long piece is set perfectly, sometimes
erupting with violence, and then shifting to a more serene setting.  In
it, we get to see many different dinosaurs, the great scene where the
Tyranosaurus Rex shows up out of nowhere and wreaks havoc, and the sad
demise of the dinosaurs in a proposed idea by Disney that there was just
a lot of heat and all vegetation died (which doesn't explain why the
T-Rex wasn't just eating everyone else till there was no one else
left).  But anyway, this is the best part of the film despite this
little trip-up in the dinosaur-death-propoganda.
There's a bit of a break between these two little Acts (the film's 2
hours long, there had to be a little intermission), and we get to see a
little pointless thing about a sound wave which makes, you guessed it,
sound.  Not great or anything, but the film picks up again.
The fifth little film is set to Beethoven's "Pastoral Symphony," which
ends up dealing with ancient and mythological Greece in three movements
from the Symphony.  There's a bit about unicorns, another one about
centaurs falling in love with the help of little cupids, and one about a
big party that is crashed by Zeus, who was in one of his PMS/lightning
throwing moods at the time.  It's great to see it and all, and it gets
most of the mythology right (a biggie after seeing what they did to
Greece in "Hercules"...oh, I mean "Jercules" - besides, it has better
music).
The sixth film is a really, really silly litle vignette about elephants
and alligators (great pairing there), which is set to the very familiar
"Dance of the Hours" by Amilcare Ponchielli (you'll recognize it when
you hear it).  There's a lot elephants pretending they're ballet
students, and there's a lot of weird stuff with alligators, and it
really doesn't mean anything, but who cares: it's fun.
The seventh and final one, and the second best one, deals with the
procession from dark to light, from death to hell to heaven, and from
night to morning.  In other words, it shows the devil fooling around,
then showing everyone he screwed with going to heaven.  The first part
is set to the ominous piece "Night on Bald Mountain" by Modest
Mussorgsky, which deals with him looking fantastic, and emerging from
the top of a mountain, then preying upon all the souls in a little
town.  This fantastic little bit is then interrupted by chimes and a lot
of light from above, where the souls march into heaven set to Franz
Schubert's beautiful "Ave Maria."  And thus ends the film.
"Fantasia" bombed when it opened, and I suppose believably.  It's not
the typical Disney fare.  There's no real point to it, other than to
include a lot of great little animated films set to awesome music.  And
that's what makes it one of Disney's best, if not it's best
cinematically.  There doens't always have to be a great happy ending.  I
mean, even in the "Sorcerer's Apprentice," it ends with Mickey getting
kicked in the ass.  And at the end of "The Rite of the Spring," all the
dinosaurs die miserably.  And the artistry is better than usual Disney. 
I don't know why, but the visuals look even more beautiful than they
usually do.
This film proves that you can find escapist Disney, meaning you don't
always get the Disney formula of happy characters, bad villains, and a
bright ending, filled with hokey and hummable tunes, and, well, having a
coherent storyline which goes from point A to point B.  I usually don't
like Disney films because of this (and well the pious fact that they
insist on every film being a "masterpiece," when only an elite few of
them are even better than "good"), but "Fantasia" breaks all the rules,
suceeds, and even entertains.  So, anyway, it's just far superior than
most of the Dinsey flicks.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Doom Generation, The (1995)
Writer/Director: Gregg Araki
Starring: Rose McGowan, James Duval, Jonathan Schaech, Dustin Ngoyen,
Margaret Cho, Skinny Puppy, Christopher Knight, Nicky Katt, Perry Farrell,
Amanda Bearse, Parker Posey, Heidi Fleiss
The above is dialogue from this film, taken almost completely in context,
and not jazzed up a bit to make it more inept than it is.  It is spoken
between two of the protagonists somewhere in the film, and basically serves
as a perfect example of what this film is about, especially if you realize
that this exchange is meant to be taken seriously.  Mr. Gregg
"I'm-having-a-mid-life-crisis" Araki, the writer and director of this film,
wants to show how important teenagers are, and wants to show how they feel
in such a horrible, horrible world.  And how does he show it?  By really
cheap surrealism, and moronic exchanges like this.
Oh, and it gets better.  A similar bit of dialogue is said in the middle
of, oh I dunno, the fiftieth sex scene in this film (I'm not counting the
several masturbation scenes).  In it, one of the protagonists is humping
away on top of another, and he says to her something along the lines of "Do
you ever wonder what life is all about?"  Sorry, man: foreplay takes place
BEFORE the act of coitus.  Of course, what do you expect: the film was
written and directed by a guy who can't even spell his first name right
(yes, I know it's a cheap joke, but it had to be done).
"The Doom Generation" is advertised as a road trip movie about people who
go around killing others who attack them, and also as another "Teen Angst"
film (one of the slogans is "Teen is a Four-Letter Word" - hardy har har). 
It's a film about two angsty teens - Amy Blue (Rose MacGowan, who would
later play the buxom Tatum in "Scream") and Jordon White (James Duval, who
would go on to play Randy Quaid's son in "Independence Day") - who pick up
an angsty homicidal maniac, Xavier Red (Jonathan Schaech, who would go on
to play the angsty lead guitarist in "That Thing You Do!" - and by the way,
do you get the symbolism?  Red, white, and blue?  Huh?  Huh?), and go on a
road trip where three things happen, in no order: 1) they have sex; 2) they
run into weird people; 3) they kill them.
The film is basically a remix of a bunch of other far superior films. 
Gregg Araki obviously has seen such films as "Easy Rider," "Natural Born
Killers," and "Kalifornia," and tries to borrow elements from all these
films and make something which is like a pop culture reference guide.  But
what he forgets is these films either represented something that this film
does not, or that they dug deep into their subjects and brought something
out of them to make them deeper.  "The Doom Generation" doesn't want to do
this; it just wants to show everything in a surreal manner for the sole
reason that Araki does not want to deal with them on any kind of real
level.  He wants to show everything in a weird manner, and forgets what the
scenes are supposed to be about.
Here's one scene, an earlier scene in the film: Amy and Jordan go into a
Quick-E Mart type place to get food and other stuff.  Amy is smoking, and
the clerk, an Asian man mind you (I love how racist this film is, I really
do), tells her to put it out.  She tells him to fuck off or something to
that note.  He points a shotgun at her, and she puts it out reluctantly. 
Jordan makes two hot dogs, and takes them to the counter.  The cash
register rings up "6.66" (oh, and this symbolism doesn't stop here). 
Jordan checks for his wallet but it's really in the car.  He asks Amy for
it, but she left her wallet in the car as well.  The clerk brings out his
shotgun again and asks for the money.  They say they don't have it.  He
gets ready to kill them, but then Xavier, who they ditched in the middle of
nowhere a scene before, pops out of nowhere, fights with the clerk, and
ends with him blowing the clerk's head clean off (clean wound, mind you). 
The head is shown flying through the air, and lands in a fryer, where it
begins to scream.
I don't really object to this kind of sick violence, but this scene is in
the film for one reason and one reason only: to gross you out.  Araki
thinks that if he takes everything to the extreme, he'll make some kind of
art.  Wrong.  It takes a kind of resistance to make gore art.  When George
Romero made "Dawn of the Dead," a very gory flick even for today, he had
control over everything and still was able to make everything sick.  Same
goes for Peter Jackson's disgustingly gory "Dead Alive," which features a
30 minute long fest of blood, guts, dismemberments, flesh chewing, and
other assorted stuff, all ending with a guy with a lawn mower strapped to
his body, taking out all sorts of zombies.  It was sick, but it was also
satirical, and controled.
A scene like this has no purpose in the film, and it sticks out from
everything else that happens.  Here's a couple other scenes: Jordan and Amy
have sex in a bath tub and Xavier watches, masturbates, and then licks the
semen from his hand; Xavier and Amy have sex and Jordan watches from the
window, masturbates, and falls backwards; a man attacks the trio, and is
stabbed in the crotch by a giant sword (put there just so this could
happen); a fast food employee stalks the trio, and his arm is shot off by
Xavier; and various other annoyances.
Also, look for about a million camoes from a wide assortment of people, who
probably didn't really know what they were getting into when they signed up
to do it (just like Peter O'Toole, Helen Mirren, Malcolm MacDowell, and
John Gielgud probably didn't when they signed to be in "Caligula").  People
such as indie actors Parker Posey and Nicky Katt, alternative rock stars
Skinny Puppy and Perry Farrel, Hollywood Madam Heidi Fleiss, Christopher
"Peter Brady" McKnight, Amanda Bearse, and Margaret Cho all grace the
screen for a matter of seconds, then disappear so that we can return to the
annoying main plot line.  Why are they here?  So that we can all point to
them and say "Hey, look it's (fill in the blank)!  Wow!"  Gimme a break.
The film's meaning is pretty easy to detect: that, you know, teens are so
precious, and the world is such a horrible place, that when the two
entities collide, there's a giant explosion of horrific violence. 
Otherwise defined as "teen angst," or the belief that being a teenager is a
horrible thing and that the world is too bad for you.  Look, I'm 19 years
old.  I went through a very brief teen angst thing which curiously lasted
about as long as my taste in Nirvana did.  I've since moved on to "I don't
really know what to do with my life" phase, but the teen angst phase is
something which is so annoyingly sophomoric and ignorant that any film that
thinks they're dealing with it on any kind of serious level is just beating
the wrong horse.
Part of being a teen is experimenting, and testing the waters.  It's not
whining about how awful parents are, and purposely feeling dispondent. 
This is what the characters in this film do, and the film wants to show how
they're these great people who are being punished by the world because
they're teenagers, and how they try to defend themselves but can't totally
overcome them.  It's not their fault they kill people; it's the world's! 
What they really need is a reality check.  The world IS a bad place, and
teenagers can be easily harmed because they are experimenting.  But part of
it is taking everything that happens to you and learning from it.  The film
thinks that teenagers are basically doomed, and there's nothing they can do
about it.  Hence the title.
Not only does it have bad fallacy, but it can't even express this in an
intelligent and coherent manner.  Everything's overly surreal, and all we
get are scenes of graphic violence and graphic sex.  How does Xavier
licking semen off his hand express teen angst?  How does a talking
decapitated head show that teens are dispondent because the world makes
them this way?  And why does the film constantly go back to the teen angst
issue of the film?  If Araki had any kind of competence in writing or
direction, he'd show them for what they really are.  And if he didn't want
the satirical approach, he'd show the real problems with the world.
And if you still don't think that "The Doom Generation" is incompetent on
every single possible level it could be, take the acting.  Rose MacGowan is
HORRIBLE.  Yes, she proved herself talented in "Scream," but she's so bad
in "The Doom Generation" that if I had not seen her in "Scream," I would
have christened her one of the worst actresses working in films today.  Her
entire performance is one-note (bitchy), and the one scene where she cries
over a dead animal is so forced that it's laughable.
Equally bad is Jonathan Schaech, who wants to be the slacker serial killer:
someone who doesn't have any remorse because emotions cause some kind of
strain.  His performance is annoying as hell, and granted, he was better in
"That Thing You Do!"
And then there's James Duval.  Let's just say he makes Keanu Reeves look
like Brando.  He has the same kind of slacker stuttering, only much much
much worse, and every line he says is so bad that I have now deemed him
"Least Talented Actor in the World."  I have seen lots of bad actors, but
James Duval has got to be the worst.  Or at least somewhere up there.
Here's another example of a bad scene, if you're still not convinced: the
film opens up in a club where they're playing Nine Inch Nail's most banal
song, "Heresy" (example of the lines: "God is Dead/and no one cares/if
there is a hell/I'll see you there"), and as the song plays, and red strobe
lights show the patrons dancing, the film pans over to Amy, just standing
there, looking dispondent.  The film closes in on her, she looks right at
the camera and says "Fuck."  No explanation of this should be necessary.
And finally, a note to Gregg: grow up.  Really.  Move out of your parent's
basement, read something other than Salinger, and get a day job.  And don't
quit it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Nosferatu, eine Symphonie des Grauens (1922)
Director: F.W. Murnau
Writers: Henrik Galeen (based on the novel "Dracula" by Bram Stoker)
Starring: Max Shreck, Gustav von Wangenheim, Greta Schröder, Ruth
Landshoff, John Gottowt, Alexander Granach
F.W. Murnau's "Nosferatu" was the first adaptation of Bram Stoker's
"Dracula," and that's probably to its advantage.  Hollywood destroyed
Stoker's atmospheric novel, turning the Count into a suave lady's man, and
the entire franchise into a joke.  By the time Mel Brook's finally got
around to parodying it, he discovered that all the jokes that could have
been used were already stale.
It's almost ironic that this was also the same film that was almost
destroyed completely by Stoker's widow, who ordered the film to be changed
because its was an unauthorized adaptation of the novel, because this film
is probably the one that is the most faithful, not so much in story, but in
the way the film is presented.  Count Dracula (renamed to Count Orlok) is
not cool like Bela Lugosi or Frank Langella, and not just plain weirdly
suave like Gary Oldman, but is instead a hideous creature, with large ears,
ginormous claws, and a rat face.
Played by Max Shreck, Orlok is a creature of the night, lurking in shadows,
scaring people just by looking at them, and slowly decomposing.  There's a
scene where he slowly attacks a woman, and we only see what he's doing by
the shadows across the victim's face.  Compare this with any of the attack
scenes and any other of the Dracula films and you see why "Nosferatu" is
just the best.
The film, as I said, is based on the Stoker novel, but because of Stoker's
widow, a couple things have been changed, primarily the names.  But the
basic story is still there.  In it, young real estate agent Thomas Hutter
(Gustav von Wangenheim) is instructed by his boss, Knock (Alexander
Granach), to go see a man named Orlok who is interested in buying a home
near him.  Hutter goes, leaving behind his fiance, Ellen (Greta Schröder),
and after meeting with Orlok and spending the night, he awakens with some
bite marks on his neck.
Soon, Hutter pieces everything together, and once Orlok has taken off over
the seas with a bunch of coffins filled with earth, he tries to race him
back home via a carriage.  Meanwhile, Ellen is having some weird
connections with Orlok, and we discover that she is the means to either
give Orlok new life or to destroy him.  The film is not so much concerned
with their romance, as the Coppola version was, because there is no
necessity in showing Orlok trying to seduce Ellen.  It's more like a gritty
version of the famous tale, concerned more with atmosphere than story.
There are several sequences which stick out in the mind, most notably the
frightening sequence of Orlok on the ship, which is something which is
usually overlooked in the Dracula films.  Here, we have a long bout where
sailors are dying by the numbers, and we have a scene where one brave
member goes down, opens the coffins, finds a bunch of rats, and Orlok rises
from the coffin, completely stiff, and scares the hell out of the man. 
It's a bit that was used in the Coppola version as well, only this is more
scarier, probably because Orlok is a whole lot freakier looking than the
Gary Oldman version, even if Oldman had that stupid wig on.
The other scene is where Orlok stalks Ellen, which takes place towards the
end of the film, which is one of the most atmospheric sequences I have ever
seen.  The entire film is not so much scary as it is chilling to watch. 
The visuals are incredible, the special effects are suprisingly competent
for 1922 (there's a great scene where Orlok dissolves which is flawless,
even by today's standards), and the lighting is incredible.  I remember
saying that the lighting for Robert Wiene's "The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari"
was atmospheric because of the lack of technology when it was made.  The
same goes for here, but they also use some great use of shadows in several
sequences.  I already talked about the scene where Orlok attempts to attack
a victim and we only see his shadow, but there's another scene where Orlok
is coming up the stairs and the lighting on it is absolutely perfect.
"Nosferatu" has recently been re-released to mass audiences by Arrow Video
Inc. in a package called "Nosferatu: The First Vampire."  The film contains
the film, but has been digitally remastered, and redone just like Fritz
Lang's "Metropolis" was back in the 80s when Girgio Moroder added extra
scene, tinted the film, and tossed on a soundtrack of such people as Pat
Benatar and Adam Ant.  That was packaged to appeal to the 80s crowds; this
has been packaged to appeal to the Goth crowd.
On the tape is a trite introduction by David Carradine (the Carradine from
"Kung Fu" - I know, there's so many of them), some tinting (half of it is,
and half of it is just in standard black and white), and a soundtrack by
alternative group Type-O Negative.  I never saw the Moroder "Metropolis,"
but I imagine this is what it is like.  All the extra stuff is trying to
enhance the experiene and open it up to modern day audiences, but all it
does is stand seperate from the film itself.
In fact, I discovered that this isn't even the entire film.  In 1995, there
was a re-release of the film which added roughly another 30 minutes to the
film, which I imagine filled in some of the gaps left in by the original
cut, which I think this is.  I bet there are such things as: more
explanation of Knock, who suddenly becomes the equivalent of Remfield, the
crazed servant of Dracula who is confined to a mental institution; some
explanation of Ellen's connection to Orlok; and more with Professor Bolwer,
the equivalent of Professor Van Helsing, who is shown in one scene
discussing vampires with some students, is talked about later, and then
forgotten.
In fact, most of the additions don't really do anything for the film.  The
introduction by David Carradine gives us a couple bits of trivia then
praises the movie.  That's it.  I would have liked to have learned more
about it, maybe a short documentary on it.  And the score by Type-O
Negative doesn't give it much mood that isn't already there, and in some of
the lyrics, spells out exactly what is going on annoyingly.  And just to
pander to the Goth crowd a little bit more, the title cards are written in
a Goth-like font, although most old title cards are incredibly incompetent
in being legible or understandable, so you have to at least give them
credit for retyping them so nicely.
Yet I have to really recommend this re-issue, primarily because it seems to
be the only way anyone can access this film, which is one of the most
haunting, atmospheric films I've ever seen.  It takes its topic seriously,
and doesn't submit itself to any campy trends, which would lower the film's
quality.  Like Carradine says in the beginning, it HAS stood the test of
time, and for that reason, "Nosferatu" is worth seeing at any cost.  So
what I recommend you do is buy or rent this, watch the introduction, then
mute your television, turn the color down so it's all in black and white,
and just sit there and watch the entire thing.  You'll thank me later.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Man Who Knew Too Little, The (1997)
Director: Jon Amiel
Writers: Robert Farrar and Howard Franklin (based on the novel "Watch That
Man" by Robert Farrar)
Starring: Bill Murray, Joanne Whalley, Peter Gallagher, Alfred Molina,
Richard Wilson, Geraldine James, John Standing, Anna Chancellor, Nicholas
Woodeson, Simon Chandler
Weeks before Bill Murray's new vehicle, "The Man Who Knew Too Little,"
opened, we the television viewing public were forced to see commercial
after commercial after commercial of Bill Murray claiming that this movie
was so funny that if anyone thought otherwise and was able to track him
down, he'd pay him money back.  I'd like to trash this, saying I'd love to
track him down just for the whopping 75 cents I paid to see this at my
college's crap movie theater, but the truth is, yes, I did laugh.  A bit. 
While it's nowhere near a good film, this is entertaining enough for me not
to crucify it and the commercial Bill was so full of himself to make.
Contrary to the title (which is, admittingly, a very good, funny title),
"The Man Who Knew Too Little" is not a spoof on the old Hitchcock classic
twice made (both by him), which featured a family's pursuit for their
kidnapped daughter by thugs who are planning to assasinate a public
official.  This is a film about a kind of slow-witted guy, Wallace Ritchie
(Murray), who accidentally gets involved in international intrigue via a
giant misunderstanding, and never finds out the truth.
Wallace's brother, James (Peter Gallagher), lives in London and is shocked
by his unannounced arrival at his house, and the night he gets in, James is
holding a major business dinner, and doesn't want Wallace to muck it up. 
So...he gets Wallace tickets for a weird kind of live theatre called "The
Theatre of the Living Arts," who set up the paritcipant in a complex
situation involving international intrigue and all that good Bond-ian
stuff, all starring actors, of course.
But when Wallace picks up the phone he's told to by the actors, he instead
gets a call from a real group of baddies, and subsequently gets himself
into a giant international incident.  The film's script is delicately
written so that everything is able to be understood in two ways, so Wallace
never finds out that it's real, and the bad guys never find out that he's
not.
Along the way, Wallace runs into a seductress trapped in the incident, but
needing a way out - Lori (Joanne Whalley - formally Joanne Whalley-Kilmer,
but not as of around the time "Batman Forver" came out) - who soon starts
to fall in love with Wallace.  Also involved are some Russian assasins
(they always have some part in internation incident films), headed by
Boris, played by Alfred Molina, a chameleon-esque actor who's starred in
dozens of popular films, but never looking or sounding the same (last seen
as the "Sister Christian"-loving dope drug dealer guy in "Boogie Nights").
While the film is pretty nicely written (for a Bill Murray vehicle anyway),
it does drag on a bit as it never changes its tune.  I kinda respect that
everything can be taken both ways, but maybe a change somewhere in the
storyline might result in a film which is funnier and less redundant. 
Sure, it's funny for awhile, and the film does have some comical set pieces
(I actually dug the window ledge scene a bit), but they get tiresome.
The ending, featuring Wallace somehow accidentally involved in a Russian
Cossack dance troupe, is funny, but afterwards feels forced.  The set-ups
for not letting anyone know Wallace is not a spy get especially clumsy, and
several things feel forced.  And the credit sequence, featuring Murray
doing a long rant of comedy, is so annoying that I high-tailed it out of
there before it blackened up (but since the credits were already up, I
don't think that really constitutes as "walking out").
I will say that Murray is really funny, and his character is likable, but
this is not the best character Murray has ever played.  Murray playing a
droll, intelligent goof is what he does best, as is what he did in
"Ghostbusters" and "Groundhog Day" (although he was also a jerk at the
beginning of the latter...but a likable jerk).  He's a brilliant comic at
his best, but any less and he either seems just likable or annoying.  His
performance here is merely likable, but at least it's competent.
But I will say that the direction is surprisingly good (I'm going out on a
limb here).  Jon Amiel actually works very well with the camera, and
creates a film which feels like the faux-spy film it should feel like.  The
dark lighting creates a great mood to the film, and at several instances in
the film, I was actually into it.
But unfortunately, "The Man Who Knew Too Little" is not good enough to
garner a positive rating (at least from me).  The gimmick runs very thin as
it goes on (luckily enough this was only a 93 minute film), and by the end,
I just didn't really care or laugh enough for me walk out with a smile on
my face.  But still, it's not a bad film, and therefore, gets a "not bad"
rating out of me.  Better luck next time, eh Bill?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Belly of an Architect, The (1987)
Writer/Director: Peter Greenaway
Starring: Brian Dennehy, Chloe Webb, Lambert Wilson, Sergio Fantoni, Vanni
Corbellini, Alfredo Varelli, Geoffrey Copleston, Francesco Carnelutti,
Stefano Gragnani
"The Belly of an Architect" is an interesting example of a film that
applies metaphors to everything it presents.  It's not so much concerned
with telling a story or introducing characters as it is introducing one
kind of a character, and trying to bring him down to what he really is. 
Films like these are challenges for the audience because they have to pay
attention to every little thing that happens, remember lines that may come
into context later on as they take on different meanings, and then later on
try to figure out the themes its trying to present.  In other words, it's a
fun film for those who enjoy a film that's a puzzle.
The architect (and belly) being referred to in the title is Stourley
Kracklite (the ever-likable Brian Dennehy), a man who arrives in Rome from
Chicago with his much-younger wife, Louisa (Chloe Webb, the Nancy from "Sid
and..."), to head an exhibition of the work of an older favorite architect
of Kracklite's, Etienne-Louis Boulee.  Arriving in the city, he is greeted
with lots of warmth from the people working with him, and seems to be doing
exactly what he wants to do with all the freedom he can have.
However, he soon begins to suffer some pains in his lower chest, and his
life begins to tumble down in front of him.  He learns that Boulee himself
suffered pains much like his, and pretty soon is convinced that his wife is
trying to poison him, since that is what happened to the Roman Emporer
Augustus, whom he sculptured once.  As he becomes more and more obsessed
with what he thinks is a stomach tumor (a doctor confirms it's just a case
of bad gas...and egotism), his wife feels more and more distanced, and
finds herself succumbing to the flirting of one of Kracklite's collegues,
Caspasian (Lambert Wilson).
The film was directed by Peter Greenaway, one of the most controversial and
overall intriguing directors working today (he's directed such films as the
NC-17 "The Cook, the Thief, His Wife, and Her Lover," "Prospero's Books,"
and "The Pillow Book").  Greenaway's a director much more interested in
themes and creating certain sensual moods than really really telling a
story, and here he blows us away with some truly gorgeous shots of Rome and
its many sculptures (photographed beautifully by his usual D.P, Sacha
Vierny), and overwhelms us with some truly cinematic moments, most notably
a scene where Kracklite discovers a colleague of his has been secretly
taking photographs of him when he didn't think he was being photographed,
and a scene where he watches his wife sleep witih Caspasian.
Of course, there's the themes that Greenaway is aiming at, like the way
that artists are often too influenced and consumed by what came before,
shown in the way that many of the things that happen to Kracklite were
things that happened to Boulee.  But he also shows the other side of this,
exploring how sometimes artists TRY and be like other artists, shown in
some of the ways that Kracklite actually takes steps to make sure that what
happens to him is what happened to others before him.  The way that these
two play with one another is obviously the thing that Greenaway is playing
with here, and after awhile, we're not sure if it's one or the other or
both that is coming into play in this film.
And we get to see another one of Greenaway's odd fascinations, things that
he brings into perspective and concentrates on that no one else really
finds interesting but him...until, of course, they see his movies.  In
"Prosero's Books," it was those damn books; in "The Pillow Book," it was
the fetish of writing calligraphy on bare flesh; in "The Belly of an
Architect," it's, well, the belly.  We see Kracklite come up with a really
big fascination with his belly, which he thinks is being eaten away from
the inside by a nasty tumor, a fascination that makes him go as far as
xeroxing pictures of the bellies of various statues in Rome, and then, um,
hold them up to his own belly.  Seeing his room adorned with pictures of
stomachs is one of the weirdest, oddest images I've seen in my short
lifespan.
Of course, there are a bunch of problems which pull this down from what it
really wants to be.  One of the things Greenaway is best at is bringing
about his themes without actually mentioning them, leaving everything up to
the imagination.  This film blatantly tells us everything we need to know,
having the characters actually dicuss the themes.  This makes everything
seem much more bland than it actually is, and since there's nothing really
fascinating to watch after the themes have been stated, the film seems to
really, really drag.
It also doesn't help that this film is way too fable-like - everything
anyone does is so that Greenaway can bring out his themes.  This makes
everything seem so less poetic, especially that ending, which instead of
being disturbing or somber merely comes off as being contrived.  I have no
problem with fables, but when they come off like this, it undermines
everything a whole lot than it really should have.
But there's really more to reccomend than to dislike here, even if the film
comes off as way too pretentious for its own good.  The one thing that
really makes it worth viewing is the performance of Brian Dennehy as
Kracklite, who brings so much life to his role as well as so much humanity
that you can't help but feel bad for him as he takes a nasty descent into
madness.  The film is actually a lot like a one-man show: everyone is
merely there as a supporting role for him, and almost every scene features
Dennehy either talking with people, or by himself, sometimes even writing
bizarre letters to the long-dead Boulee, confessing his deepest thoughts. 
Dennehy's such a good actor and makes everything seems so real that he
gives the only real human feel to the film, and makes it seem a lot better
than it really is.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Dead Presidents (1995)
Directors: Allen and Albert Hughes
Writer: Michael Henry Brown (based on a story by Allen and Albert Hughes
and Michael Henry Brown)
Starring: Lorenz Tate, Keith David, Chris Tucker, N'Bushe Wright, Freddy
Rodriguez, Bokeem Woodbine, Rose Jackson
"Dead Presidents" is a film that yearns for greatness, to be taken as an
enigmatic condemnation of American warfare the way a film like Hal Ashby's
"Coming Home" or Michael Cinimo's "The Deer Hunter" is.  It has an epic
kind of feel to it, a big budget, young stars playing people who are
haunted by a war they didn't really have to fight, and people who are
systematically beaten down by the system.  It features lots of heartache, a
downer of an ending, and even some nasty bloodshed.  But in the end, it
just feels like they forgot to add something in there, but it still comes
out as a pretty good film nonetheless.  It's just not going to be "The Deer
Hunter."
"Dead Presidents" tells the story of Anthony (Lorenz Tate), a young man
growing up in Brooklyn in the late 60s, and is presented in three parts: a
coming of age section, a Vietnam and its impact section, and a big heist
section.  The film starts off wonderfully, and for the first half hour
shows us the younger life of the character, setting up his character,
establishing some supporting roles, including Kirby (Keith David), his big
father figure and owner of the local small-time booking agency to which
Anthony works for; Skip (Chris Tucker), a motorcycle-mouthed pal of
Anthony; and Juanita (Rose Jackson), who dates and sleeps with him.
But Anthony yearns for different things than college, and soon enlists in
the army and is soon sent to 'Nam, where he fights for years upon years
(with Skip in his platoon, of course).  When he finally goes home, he meets
his son from he and Juanita's one night of bliss before he went off to war,
and soon has to marry her and get a job.  But times are tough, and soon
Anthony's life is falling apart.  Desperate for cash, he gets together a
group to do a heist on an armored truck, including Kirby, an old war pal
turned preacher, and Juanita's sister, Delilah (N'Bushe Wright), now a
radical against the government.  Of course, this is only brings him more
problems.
The chief problem the film has is the lack of details about everything,
especially surrounding the heist, which is a fantastically executed,
visceral experience that feels cheap once you realize that these characters
have no real reason for being there in the first place.  What's Delilah
doing there anyway?  What motivation does she have for picking up two
revolvers and capping a cop?  At least Anthony and Skip have had war
experience, where they were forced to kill men they barely knew in cold
blood.  But still, why is Anthony doing a big heist anyway?  The film's
exclusion of these details in this part, and in basically all parts, makes
it feel like there's something missing.
What the film does well, though, is paint an intriguing portrait of people
who were coaxed into a war, then spit out by the government, then screwed
over again by the same people.  This kind of thing undoubtedly happened
many times, just not in this extreme way.  But the film seems too blatant
about making this point in its final scenes where a distraught Anthony
screams about how the government screwed him over.  Maybe an exclusion of
this shouting would have been more effective.  I mean, who wants some film
talking down to us anyway?
And the film starts off well, but goes slightly down hill as it goes on. 
The Vietnam section is very good, very authentic, but maybe a tad
nihilistic (what about that scene where that man steps on a land mine?) and
slightly cliched.  I've seen tons of war movies, and something has to be
slightly different other than more graphic violence to distinguish it from
the others.  And the drama that ensues between Anthony and Juanita never
feels very realistic - we never know much about their relationship, and the
fewd over getting a job feels forced and cliched.
But the Hughes Brothers can direct a scene or sequence.  They have an
almost Scorsese-like hypnotism to some of them, and fill the film with an
amazing soundtrack of late 60s/early 70s soul and funk that undertone the
film with energy and mood.  And they can really create sequences that seem
very lifelike, filled with lots of human humor, like a scene where Anthony
and Juanita are in bed and he discovers she's been stuffing her bra.  Or a
scene where Kirby gets into a fight with a man, and the man pulls off his
prosthetic leg.  And a final scene where cops seem to be coming from
everywhere is breathtaking and frightening.  If anything, "Dead Presidents"
is a film about moments.
In the end, "Dead Presidents" is a failed attempt, but not an awful movie
in any respects.  I loved how truthful it was in its early scenes, and the
fact that it didn't take an easy route by preaching about how the
government persecutes African Americans.  This is, after all, a film about
how the government screwed over everyone in the war, regardless to race,
color, or creed.  It's not that it's very flawed, but that it doesn't feel
like it's really finished.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
Directors: Robert Farrelly and Peter Farrelly
Writers: Ed Decter, John J. Strauss, Robert Farrelly, and Peter Farrelly
Starring: Ben Stiller, Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Lee Evans, Chris Elliott,
Lin Shaye, Jeffrey Tambor, Keith David, Markie Post, Harland Williams III,
Richard Jenkins, Helena Christensen, Brett Favre
There's many a disgusting moment in "There's Something About Mary" that it
would be really easy for this film to just be one long toilet joke
film...and that's not totally a bad thing, not if the jokes are actually
funny.  The ones in this film are.  I know that Roger Ebert is the one who
always always always uses the Mel Brooks quote in defense of his film "The
Producers," that his film "rises below vulgarity," but I'm going to steal
that from him and apply it to this film.  This film also rises below
vulgarity, but it takes it a step further as well.
"There's Something About Mary" is a lot like the Farrelly Brothers'
previous two films, "Dumb and Dumber" and "Kingpin," two hilarious films
that proved to even the biggest snob that fart jokes, bodily fluids, and
other forms of toilet humor could be turned into almost an art form.  But
unlike "Dumb and Dumber" and like "Kingpin," this film has a good plot and
characters that we actually care about and maybe in a way identify with. 
The most important thing about making comedy is likable characters, and
this film has that.
But this film's actually deeper than that.  The film deals with the
13-year-long obsession of a young, neurotic man, Ted (Ben Stiller), for a
woman who would be his high school sweetheart, Mary (a glowing Cameron
Diaz) if he had gone to the prom with her...which he didn't because of a
little, um, problem (you've seen it in the trailers - it's even funnier in
the actual film).  Out of desperation to find her because he figures he's
in love with her ("Crushes don't last 13 years, do they?" he asks his
friend, played by Chris Elliott, in his funniest performance in
years...yes, even funnier than he was in "Cabin Boy" *snort*), he hires an
off-kilter detective, Pat Healy (Matt Dillon, also glowing), to track her
down for him.
Pat does find her, and from this point on, the plot becomes completely
convoluted and jumps everywhere.  We meet numerous supporting characters,
like a British architect friend of Mary's (Lee Evans, from "Mouse Hunt"),
who has a little secret (not to mention crutches), and Mary's live-in
roomate (or something), who's been tanning for so long she has passed
George Hamilton on the skin pigmentation chart.  And there's a little dog
that you've seen tons of in the commercials as well, who is also even
funnier in the movie.  I won't tell you how they all fit in to the story
since one of the true joys is trying to follow what's going on, and being
surprised when things happen.
The Farrelly's have a great sense of humor that is somewhere between very
low-brow and scathingly satirical, kinda like Monty Python only even more
disgusting.  They make fun of whomever they want, and aren't afraid to tell
the most disgusting of jokes.  The fact that this is their first film to
get an "R" rating helps because it gives them a liscence to do practically
anything, which for the crowd this film is trying to attract, helps
enormously.  This film is crude, I will admit it, but I admit it with a big
fat grin on my face.  Why do I highly recommend a film where Cameron Diaz
uses a substance I was afraid to mention to my parents for fear of
miscommunication about my "experience" as hair gel?
The answer is two-fold.  One reason is because I laughed my ass off so hard
that I was actually convulsing and hitting the chair in front of me.  I
haven't done that in real long time.  The second and probably not as
important reason is because this film is remarkably intelligent and totally
honest about an intriguing topic, the topic of obsession.  The Farrelly
Brothers have taken a human weakness we all suffer from and have skewered
it into a film that is both funny and brutally frank, not only about its
sense of toilet humor, but also about what it deals with.  Although this
film lives in a surreal world where everyone's a characateur of a certain
weird stereotype laced with acid, and basically anything can and will
happen, we nevertheless can identify with some of the characters in this
film because they're mirrors of us.  Ben Stiller's character is probably
the most human character the Farrelly's have ever dreamed up, and we can
all in some form feel for his obsession because we've all been there at
some point, no matter how badly.  This is a film that has the humanity to
recognize that not only is obsession not love but mere selfish behavior and
that it makes people become more and more pathetic, but it can also lead us
to a greater understanding of ourselves and perhaps even make our
intentions more worthy of someone's affections.
It's often really weird when a film that is this funny also has humanity
and honesty to it.  I'm really shocked at this not only because of that
factor, but also because the humor in this film is actually raised to a
whole other level of thinking.  We laugh at this film not only because of
the outrageous jokes that we are told (most of which I will not divulge),
but also because we can see ourselves in this film, and what is more
therapeutic than to look at ourselves being parodied on the screen, and
laugh right at it?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Elmer Gantry (1960)
Director: Richard Brooks
Writer: Richard Brooks (based on the novel by Sinclair Lewis)
Starring: Burt Lancaster, Jean Simmons, Arthur Kennedy, Shirley Jones,
Dean Jagger, Patti Page, Edward Andrews
It's truly queer when life imitates art, especially when the art has
pretty much predicted what happen.  Back in the 80s, televangelist Jimmy
Swaggart committed adultery, and suffered a giant public embarassment,
only to return to light with the public apology that he himself had
sinned greatly.  This, among other things, is what "Elmer Gantry"
attacks, as well as the public's lack of integrity or individualism, and
in a totally un-preachy and entertaining manner.
The Elmer Gantry of the title (played with intense brauvada by the late,
the great Burt Lancaster) is a boozer, a womanizer, a liar, a seducer,
an all-around sewer rat...and a preacher.  One night in a bar, drunk out
of his mind, he finds that he can seduce people into leaning towards a
noteworthy cause just by preaching like Al Sharpton.  He soon finds
himself attracted to the word of evangelism when he wanders into a big
church meeting set up to gain money for the evangelist Sister Sharon
Falconer (Jean Simmons), and eventually becomes one of their big
preachers, packing in the crowds, and helping the church business become
more of a business than a religion.
If this sounds familiar, you're not alone.  When I read the back of the
box, I was instantly thinking of the anti-classic Steve Martin flick,
"Leap of Faith," which became too sappy and preachy for its own good,
weighing down the satirical edge.  But "Elmer Gantry" is a smarter film
than that.  The film exposes a man who is trying to be a god to the
simple folk for what he is: a flaming hypocrite.  After all, the man is
really in the biz just to make a lot of money, not to help people.
After awhile, his fame has become so big, that his past come back to
haunt him.  An old girlfriend/prostitute of his, Lulu Bains (played by
Mrs. Partridge herself, Shirley Jones, although years before she was
Mrs. Partridge), shows up to blackmail him, exposing him as the
hypocrite that he really is.  But the twist this film pulls is that our
protagonist may or may not have actually changed for the better.
When we first meet Elmer, we know he must have had a religious
background due to a phonecall to his mother, who seems to badger him
about church.  When he starts speaking, we know that he doesn't really
believe what he's saying, and that he's just trying to make a buck out
of it.  But as the film goes on, and as he gets better aquainted with
Sharon, we see him become less of the rambunctious, hyperkinetic liar he
once was, and more of the selfless man he could be.  But, like everyone
else around him, we wonder if it's just an act.
But when he goes to see Lulu again, we know that he's in limbo between
good and evil, with the good winning.  When they expose him as a
hypocrite, he has changed for the better, and was actually innocent of
the crimes he was convicted of.  The film, instead, seems to satirize
the blackmailer over the victim.  Like the woman Jimmy Swaggart slept
with, or, in more recent news, Anita Hill or Paula Jones, she has chosen
to wait until the man is in power, and to get some cheap revenge on him.
But the overall point of this film is that no one is a god, not even
those who claim God talks to them.  Elmer, who eventually becomes a
believer in what he preaches, is still human, as he still lusts over
women, although not like he used to.  And since the bible says that we
should not just lest we be judged and to basically forgive people, we
should forgive the people who preach the word of the lord just like they
were actual people.  And the same should go for any kind of leaders, not
just those in the church business.
"Elmer Gantry" was a big hit at the Oscars, despite the controversy
(knowing what it was like back then, it's easy to see how this would be
controversial, although I can see it being controversial even today). 
It won three Oscars: for Burt Lancaster, Shirley Jones, and Richard
Brooks for his script.  The acting from everyone in the film is amazing,
especially from Jones, Simmons, and some great scene stealing from
Arthur Kennedy, who plays journalist Jim Lefferts - an agnostic who
covers Sharon and Elmer, taking a negative stance on what they do.
But Burt Lancaster walks away from the film, more than earning the Oscar
he won.  I've not seen many Lancaster films (the only other one to my
recollection was 1957's "Sweet Smell of Success), but as the last time I
saw him he played a very quiet, distanced character, it was unbelievable
to see him playing such a flamboyant role.  With his wild enthusiasm, a
giant grin plastered on his face, and coaxing words for any situation,
he seduces not only the characters in the film, but the audience into
loving him, despite the fact that he's not a very good person.  Because
of Lancaster's deft performance, we like Elmer, and can therefore feel
what we need to feel in the latter part of the film.
I've not heard much about "Elmer Gantry" as of late, but I can say that
it's truly an American Movie Classic, and proof that Hollywood can take
big gambles too.  With a strong message, excellent satire, and even some
heart, "Elmer Gantry" is an excellent film, and even a tad underrated.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
Director: Joe Dante
Writers: Ted Eliott, Zak Penn, Adam Rifkin, Terry Rossio, and Gavin Scott
Starring: Gregory Smith, Kirsten Dunst, Jay Mohr, David Cross, Kevin Dunn,
Ann Magnuson, Paul Hartman, Wendy Schaal, Denis Leary, and Dick
Miller...with voices by Tommy Lee Jones, Frank Langella, Ernest Borgnine,
George Kennedy, Jim Brown, Bruce Dern, Clint Walker, Harry Shearer,
Christopher Guest, Michael McKean, Sarah Michelle Gellar, and Christina
Ricci
"Small Soldiers" is probably the first film to actually satirize the entity
known as kiddie violence, at least on a major scale, and therefore it kind
of grabs our attention when it skewers the way we are sometimes fed
different kinds of propaganda via cartoons and various other kinds of child
entertainment just because it's the first to really hit it hard.  Luckily
enough, this isn't a "message movie," and it's not naive enough to totally
blame characters like G.I. Joe, the epitomy of right-wing,
moral-yet-immoral, John Wayne-esque propaganda; it's really just an
extremely entertaining film with an outrageously wonderful premise with an
eerie, unsettling edge that at once freaks you out and leaves you in
stitches.
No shock that this is from Joe Dante, the hilarious wizard who directed one
of the all-time great kiddie horror films, "Gremlins," a hilarious film
that is all the more hilarious the older you get...and, to a slightly
lesser extent, "Gremlins 2: The New Batch," which skewered Ted Turner-esque
media all while wreaking totally hilarious havoc.  He takes the same kind
of approach to his story that he did with the latter one: this is a film
that almost gets off on mocking military "intelligence" by telling the
story of a bunch of gung ho soldier toys with a microchip that allows them
to act like real army guys, including attacking humans.  Only they're
smaller.
The story behind it deals with a huge company owned by the deliciously
inhuman CEO Gil Mars (Denis Leary), who orders his two toy division heads,
Larry Benson and Irwin Wayfair (Jay Mohr and David Cross, the latter who's
half of HBO's "Mr. Show"), to create a line of action figures who can
really act and talk like all they do in all the commercial ads that make
toys look incredibly exciting.  By getting a special army microchip off the
web, they are able to make their toys respond like human beings, and gives
them each set standards.  There's the Commando Elites, a group of
overly-patriotic soldiers led by the Patton-esque Chip Hazard (voiced
brilliantly by Tommy Lee Jones), and featuring the supporting voices of
cast members of "The Dirty Dozen," as well as Bruce Dern, tossed in for
good measure; and then there's the wimpy monster Gargonites, led by the
stoic Archer (voiced by a now-British Frank Langella), and featuring the
voice talents of...well, the three chief members of "Spinal Tap" (Harry
Shearer, Christopher Guest, and Michael McKean, just for the record). 
These two are at war with one another, though the odds are totally in favor
of the soldiers.
Cut to a little town somewhere where a young kid named Alan (Gregory Smith,
from "Krippendorf's Tribe") is running his dad's collapsing old-school toy
shop while he's away on a business trip, and who mistakenly steals a box of
these toys from the friendly truck driver (Dante regular, Dick Miller) to
sell quickly so that the store makes some money for a change.  Soon enough,
the toys have escaped, ruined the store, and are about to wreak havoc on
Alan, his almost-girlfriend Christy (a glowing Kirsten Dunst), and the
homes of their parents (played by Kevin Dunn, Ann Magnuson, Wendy Schaal,
and the late Phil Hartman in his last performance) as they war against
eachother.
The obvious reason to see this film is for its wonderful sense of humor,
which, for the most part, is how the film is played out.  Instead of an
un-subtle attempt at really trying to overturn cartoon violence and its
affect on youth (which would have made for an annoying right-wing
crapfest), "Small Soldiers" decides to use that as a way of mocking
patriotism and basically the whole military as a concept.  The Commando
Elites are all portrayed as being the bloodthirsty villains of the film,
who attack anyone who merely stands up for the Gargonites, who are all in
hiding for fear of defeat.  And the film never wastes a moment at really
just digging deep and making fun of war movies.  We have two really
hilarious standouts, other than the obvious parody of "The Dirty Dozen," a
film that actually mocked military intelligence as well.  Those are a
hilariously inspired scene that is straight from "Patton," complete with
the theme music, a giant jig-saw American Flag consuming the background,
and even lines lifted directly from the opening speech in the film; and a
laugh-inducing parody of the chopper scene from "Apocalypse Now," complete
with the Wagner music and "I love the smell of polyurethane in the
morning."
Dante has always loved to parody other movies, but he also parodies
sociological things as well, like America's obsession with war (hands-down
funniest line, said by Phil Hartman: "I think World War II was my favorite
war"...at least I laughed, no one else did), and even some post-"'burbs"
satirization of suburbia, complete with the on-going battle between the
beauty of nature and the beauty of a 12-foot satellite dish sitting in your
lawn and the horror of having a tree block its reception.  When this film
sticks to parody and satirizing, it's one of the most entertaining
experiences in a real long time.
However, when the film shifts to the melodrama of Alan's parents not
understanding him, or even the required love story of the film between Alan
and a way-more-mature Christy (I'm sorry: he looks like he's 12, and she
looks like she's 17 - doesn't work).  It's not that this truly a bad thing
and the film is never unwatchable, but these scenes serve as distractions. 
It'd be nice if the script or the actors, especially the by-the-books
Gregory Smith as the lead, had as much umph in their delivery as Kirsten
Dunst does (she's just lovable), these scenes wouldn't be so hard to intake
after the high satire of the idea of toy soldiers attacking real people
with nail guns and flame throwers.
It just doesn't help that the Gargonites aren't really that interesting
either, save for a couple of moments when the rest of them are finally
allowed to do their schtick.  It's here where the film only makes attempts
at deepening itself with questions of humanity in these characters, and the
obvious depth it brings to the military plot (the heroic soliders are pure
evil while the ugly monsters are pure good), but other than that, there's a
little to much started that isn't finished by the end.  It's like some of
this film is played straight, yet the rest of it is played totally for
laughs.
It's the second part that really works.  The comedy of the two toy creators
scrambling around to avoid a lawsuit.  Phil Hartman trying to get the most
out of his satellite dish.  The numerous incarnations of toys coming alive
(the whole barbie subplot, featuring voices by Sarah Michelle Gellar and
Christina Ricci, is definitely a howler).  Anything featuring the soldier
toys.  And la grande finale, an exciting, vicious battle between the two
families and legions of toys armed with deadly weapons that may be too much
for younger children, but would pretty much be fine for older children
(hey, it's PG-13 for a reason, okay?).  These are the things that really
work for this film, and luckily enough these great parts greatly outweigh
the more mediocre parts of the film.  What we have here is a return to form
for Dante, who has been kinda slumming it since the 80s, but is now back
again making kiddie films for the older crowd who can still take their
older children and probably laugh and have a better time than they will.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Hudsucker Proxy, The (1994)
Director: Joel Coen
Writers: Joel and Ethan Coen
Starring: Tim Robbins, Paul Newman, Jennifer Jason Leigh, Charles
Durning, John Mahoney, Bruce Campbell, Peter Gallagher, Steve Buscemi,
Anna Nicole Smith
"The Hudsucker Proxy" is basically the only film from the Coens that was
nearly critically and commercially admonished.  Costing about 30 million
bucks or so to make, and making about...1, as well as being trashed by a
lot of critics for having "style but no substance," it was therefore
dubbed "a failure."  But don't be fooled by all this; "The Hudsucker
Proxy" is one of the funniest and warmest comedies to come around.
Playing as a kind of parody of the Frank Capra films of the 30s and 40s,
as well as a semi-satire of 40s industrialism, and general blue-collar
working, "The Hudsucker Proxy" presents a surreal vision of the world of
the past, filled with the wacky, off-beat humor of the Coen brothers,
which seeps into all of their films, even if they're not comedies
(except "Blood Simple," which plays it straight).  What's great is that
this film never looses its humor.
Taking place, I suppose, in the 40s, it deals with a kind of dim-witted
yet hopeful young man (Tim Robbins) who comes to the big city to get a
good job, but finds he has to settle with a crap mail room job for a
company called "Hudsucker Enterprises" (the company in "Raising Arizona"
too).  Ironically, the day he's hired, the president of the company
(Charles Durning) mysteriously and joyously leaps from the top story to
his ultimate squish.
Since this means that the stocks will go out to the general public as of
the new year (some company technicality...), the heads of the company,
ruled by the cigar-smoking Mussburger (Paul Newman), decide to find a
total dupe to replace Durning, who will drive the stocks way down, so
they can buy them cheap.  And guess who has to deliver a "blue letter"
to Mussburger on that day?
Before you can say "cliche," Robbins is being fitted for a nice suit,
and his hair is being plastered down.  Enter the Rosalind
Russel-inspired Amy Archer (Jennifer Jason Leigh), a feisty reporter who
bets her pullitzer that it's a sham and goes undercover to find
everything out.  Soon she's posing as his adorable secretary, and finds
she's falling in love with him, and he with her.
The company thinks they've scored gold with chosing Robbins for the job,
especially when he comes up with his idea for the company's new gimmick:
a drawing with a circle which he carries along with him in his shoe
("You know: for the kids," he says when he introduces it anyone).  The
company goes along with it because they don't know what the hell it is,
but there's a sad (for them) irony in it, especially when you see what
it is he's actually invented.
The film is one of the most frequently funny films of the 90s, going for
various academic gags throughout the course of the film.  They seem to
be going for the humor they did in their amazing "Raising Arizona,"
which is one of the funniest flicks I've ever seen.  Of course, with the
big budget, it means they can improve on the sets and overall production
of their film.  The mail room is actually reminiscent of any set in
"Brazil," with its negative outlook in beaurocratic jobs, which the film
satires frequently.  We get giant sets, a cast of seemingly thousands,
and some just-plain-cool shots, and even some special effects.  The
suicide jump by Durning, and a later one by another character, is the
best I've ever seen in a film.  I think.
If there's a downside to the film, it's that it's just not as cool as
their other films.  Sure, I think it's a fantastic comedy, featuring
many great jokes and even some satire.  But it doesn't have the great
heart of the earlier Coen brother films.  But to me, it's okay, because
this film is one of the few films to be non-stop funny for its full
time.
With Tim Robbins' giddy performance, Paul Newman's deliciously cold
acting, and Jennifer Jason Leigh's awesome Rosalind impersonation, we
get a parody of the screwball comedy and the films of Capra, as well as
a satire of companies and beurocracy which is definitely one of the most
enjoyable films I've seen in the past couple years.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Notti di Cabiria, Le (1957)
Director: Federico Fellini
Writers: Federico Fellini, Ennio Flaiano, Pier Paolo Pasolini, and Tullio
Pinelli
Starring: Giulietta Masina, François Périer, Franca Marzi, Amedeo Nazzari,
Dorian Gray, Aldo Silvani, Mario Passante, Pina Gualandri, Polidor
I didn't even know "Nights of Cabiria" was a movie until before this summer
when it was announced it would be rereleased in theaters.  I was even more
surprised to discover it's a Fellini film, a director I'm in the process of
discovering as I try to see all the films that have influenced some of my
favorite contemporary directors.  But there's more: it won the Oscar in
1957 for Best Foreign Film, being one of the four Fellini films to do that
(the others: "La Strada," "8 1/2," and "Amarcord"), and it inspired the
semi-popular musical, "Sweet Charity."
There's got to be a reason this is so unknown in modern day society,
especially since the other three films on that list are relatively
well-known, and others that didn't win Oscars are more well-known.  I'm not
sure why, but I will say after seeing it, it's a real shame, not because of
the other reasons why it should be known, but because of the most ironic
reason a film should be cherished by modern-day societies: it's perhaps
Fellini's most accessible film.  I took two people to see this film with
me, both who weren't too aquainted with his work, and they both came out
loving it.
Whether taken as a religious allegory or a satire or whatever else you can
dissect it as, "Nights of Cabiria" is first a touching funny/sad story. 
It's like Chaplin if he were more bleak and used less slapstick.  In fact,
it's public knowledge that Giulietta Masina, the star of the film (and
Fellini's wife), based her Cabiria performance on the Little Tramp. 
Cabiria is an aging prostitute in Rome, and she uses her toughness to ward
off police raids, talk down to some of the other more aggressive
prostitutes, and make sure that her clients don't jerk her around.
But at the same time, Cabiria is weak, and she's not just looking for some
quick cash.  She wants to be loved, and her job leads her to many potential
clients or lovers.  In fact, the film finds her in a month-long
relationship as the film begins, only to lose it all suddenly and have to
go back to her profession.  In this retrospect, Cabiria is sympathetic
because she has perpetual bad luck, but Masina doesn't just make her a
character of pity.  She makes her lovable.  With an umbrella in her hand
almost all the time, and with her Bambi-like face, Cabiria is almost
impossible not to like, and Masina makes her into a unique character: her
bursts of anger at certain parts in the movie come out of a fear of
emotional pain.
Fellini's strong point was capturing reality and making it hypnotic.  In
many of his films, especially his masterpiece, "La Dolce Vita," sequences
go on for long periods of time, giving the film an episodic but
nevertheless capitivating feel.  In Cabiria there are many sequences of
varying ranges, but they never become boring because Fellini always makes
them interesting, and filled with human emotion.  When Cabiria is picked up
by a movie star (Amedeo Nazzari), we see her bragging to all her friends
while in his car, only to see her dumped by him because his girlfriend
returns to apologise for a fight they had earlier.
We see all of this from the point of view of Cabiria, who's a witness to
several of the same things that are shown from a different perspective in
"La Dolce Vita" (which was from the point of view of a gossip collumist). 
She witnesses some of the decadence of Roman society as he always showed,
but the strongest scenes are the ones where Cabiria is shit upon, which
make for the most poignant and emotional moments since Chaplin films.  In
the film's best scene, she's put under a spell by a sadistic hypnotist in
front of a giant audience, where she confesses some of her deepest desires,
only to receive jeers from the audience when she awakens.
A love story occurs late in the film, but the film actually moves in a
giant circle, and the final scenes are filled with tension and sadness. 
Fellini demonstrates that he was one of the best directors in the history
of cinema because he knew how to make his audience feel what his characters
were feeling, and was able to do that without manipulation or cheap stunts.
 In these final scenes, we're right there with Cabiria because we care
about her, and we ultimately want to see her come out okay.  Fellini knew
that the key to making a great film was creating characters who were
likable and could make some connection with his audience.  Cabiria may be
his greatest creation.  She's like all of us.  She has ups and downs
throughout the film.  She wonders about faith and ponders the same
unfaithful questions we often ponder.  And most of all, she shows that we
need to be survivalists if we're going to make it at all in this crazy
world.
But if Cabiria's his greatest creation, it's mostly due to the performance
by Giulietta Masina.  She wasn't just the director's wife, the way that
Lindsay Crouse and Rebecca Pidgeon are the wives of writer/director David
Mamet.  She was an extremely talented actress who appeared in several of
his films, such as "Juliet of the Spirits," and she's shown that she's not
just an adorable creature (and she is), but that she's also a brilliant
actress.  With her Cabiria character, she absolutely eats up the screen. 
She's never boring, she never overacts, and she's always lovable, even when
she's hostile and even pathetic.  And with that final shot with the tears
in her eyes and a smile that can't help but be on her face despite what has
happened to her, we can't help but feel a sad happiness along with her.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
Director: Richard Donner
Writer: Brian Helgeland
Starring: Mel Gibson, Julia Roberts, Patrick Stewart, Cylk Cozart
"Conspiracy Theory" is basically two films - one which is totally 
brilliant and fun to watch; the other, with the same characters from the 
first one, a typical Hollywood thriller where the two co-ed leads fall 
in "love" and there is peace in Hollywoodland.  "Conspiracy Theory" 
starts off like a indie film with a big budget and A-List stars, then 
tweaks off into cliche-land and turns into a confused (not confusing) 
thriller.  And I'm stuck here with a giant dilemna because I enjoyed it 
all.  Ugh.
The thing that's great about this film is the lead character - Jerry 
Fletcher (Mel Gibson) - a total paranoiac who is very off-kilter.  He's 
a New York cab driver in the tradition of Travis Bickle who rants and 
raves to all his passengers about his totally paranoid theories (i.e. 
the Vietnam War was fought over a bet that Arisotle Onassis lost to 
Walter Mondale; and Oliver Stone is a government-hired filmmaker who 
tells lies, because if he was right, he'd be dead by now) and is totally 
obsessed with a Justice department woman, Alice (Julia Roberts).  The 
first half hour serves as a character introduction, as we see his 
totally bizarre apartment which has locks on everything (even the 
tapioca pudding) and is rigged to ignite if ever penetrated by "them" 
(or "they").
He annoys Alice constantly by going to her office and telling her strane 
conspiracy theories out of his "Conspiracy Theory" newsletter, which has 
a total of 5 subscribers.  But it soon turns out that he may be right 
because he is soon caught and tortured in a "1984" and "A Clockwork 
Orange"-esque scene, done by a government psychiatrist, Dr. Jonas 
(Patrick Stewart, resembling Laurence Olivier in "Marathon Man").  What 
I think should have developed is a paranoid character study to see if 
its really all cerebral, kind of what some people have said with 
"Hamlet": it might just all be in his head.  What happens is good, just 
not as great as that idea would have been.
Anyway, what results...the film continues to be really good for a while, 
but as it gets into the third act of the film, it begins to sag, become 
confused (again, not confusing), and just fall apart.  In this lovely 
act, you'll see some not-so-clever plot twists, a couple pretty good 
action sequences (nothing special), and of course, the "obligatory" love 
interest betwixt Mr. Gibson and Miss Roberts grow.  The latter, of 
course, is only there because the schmucks behind this film said 
something along the lines of "Hey, we have Mel and Julia - the audience 
will WANT them to fall in love."  What they have at the beginning and 
what develops into the second act is what works with the rest of the 
film.  Time to not pander to audiences and just do what works for the 
film, which is what it is, ok, shmuckboys?
"Conspiracy Theory" kind of turned me off in the last act.  Too many 
chases, too little interest, and what seemed to be a rather loss of 
identity to what it was in the first two acts.  The whole Dr. Jonas 
thing starts off as a rather ingenius idea, but then gradually 
detoriates into just some loner cliched villain.  Alice, who was kinda 
shallow and all, yet somehow interesting and intriguing, turns into just 
some biting-lip chick who will do anything for her man.  And, of course, 
that love thing.  The ending doesn't really work really, because the 
filmmakers are just pandering to their perception of the stupid american 
public.
However, the first two acts are so good and set up such an interesting 
premise and fascinating characters (okay, two of them, really) that the 
third act doesn't even matter.  Yes, it doesn't work, but it's still 
very entertaining.  The Jerry Fletcher character is so intriguing, so 
carefully constructed, that it's a pity to learn about his origin 
(doesn't work again).  He rants and rambles about all sorts of hilarious 
conspiracy theories (most which make a whole lot of sense, especially 
one about the Grateful Dead), and is so unbelievably funny that it makes 
it one hell of a ride just watching this guy go through his daily moves. 
 The film is at its high pinacle when he's just hanging around his 
apartment or driving in his taxi.  It's also so hilariously written and 
executed, so that even if it's not totally suspenseful, at least you'll 
get a ton of good laughs out of it.  Personally, I was laughing 
consistently throughout the film (most of them really in the first act).
The third act brings it down so much that it's not the brilliant film it 
really should be.  I would have loved to seen a film where everything's 
anti-government, proving he may be right yet having us question him.  
But there's no doubt for us that Jerry was tortured by the government, 
thus causing us to just sit back and watch it on auto-pilot.  But the 
film has so much else going on, that it somehow works out being fun and 
entertaining, despite its numerous faults.  
Anyway, the bottom line is Mel Gibson should get an Oscar nomination for 
his brilliant portrayal of this complex character (his second most 
complex, behind Hamlet, of course), and this film really could have been 
a masterpiece.  But hell, someone could always make it again and make it 
right.  For now, this will do nicely.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Dream Lover (1994)
Writer/Director: Nicholas Kazan
Starring: James Spader, Madchen Amick, Fredric Lehne, Larry Miller, Bess
Armstrong, Kathleen York, Michael Milhoan, Clyde Kusatu, Erik Avari
"Dream Lover" is that kind of bizarre, non-conformist erotic thriller. 
The trailers hint at just a film filled with sex, and a bit of Hitchcock
tossed in for good measure.  But "Dream Lover" is far more complex than
that, and is surprisingly enough a good film, even if its previews come
off as stupid and randy (which isn't always a bad thing).
"Dream Lover" deals with Ray (James Spader), who has just divorced his
wife (Kathleen York), and has re-entered the wonderful world of dating. 
After going to his rich friend's (Larry Miller) party, he spills wine on
an attractive woman (Madchen Amick, who was on "Twin Peaks"), who freaks
out and humiliates him.  A week later, they run into eachother at the
supermarket, laugh over the accident, and soon go out to dinner
together.  The next day, Ray can't find her, but eventually tracks her,
and they begin having some wild sex.  After what has to be a huge
elipsis, they're married, and soon have a kid.  Everything's great for
Ray.
But gradually, things begin unraveling.  Ray finds out that her real
name, and that she has parents who he has never even heard of.  She
seems to have this whole other past which she claims to have left behind
when she moved to the city, but curiosity gets to Ray.  And as he
unpieces parts of her hidden life, his mental state gets worse and
worse.  Soon he's obsessed with finding where she is on Wednesday
afternoons when she disappears, and mysteriously has a matchbook from a
hotel in her purse.
The ending, I think, is cool, but does wrap things up way too nicely. 
But it's a great time watching Ray's sanity unravel, and the writing and
directing lets things unravel nicely and gradually.  The plot twists are
plotted nicely, allowing the film to move smoothly.  And the writing
lets us guess a lot over the mysterious Madchen Amick character.  And
while this may be found in the "suspense" section, there is no violence,
action sequences, or big scenes of stabbing/shooting/whatever else; just
good character assasination.
Also, the whole sex bit does not overcome the storyline, like it did for
"Basic Instinct."  I personally saw the "rated" version, but there's
apparently an unrated "sexier" version, but I'm sure it's not TOO
overbearing.  Although even in the "rated" version, you get to see the
lovely Madchen Amick in all her glory and splendor.
There's a bit of surrealism with the direction too.  The film is
intercut with fantasies Ray has at being at a bizarre carnival where the
cheif clown mocks Ray and his luck with women.  And there's even a fat
woman on a stage presenting Ray's dream lover of the title, whomever it
may actually be.  It's an interesting little thing to do, especially for
a film promoted as an "erotic thriller."
The acting is also very good.  James Spader, who's actually a cool actor
(even if he sometimes mumbles), plays Ray wonderfully, making him
interesting and likable.  Madchen Amick as the mysterious wife/dream
lover gives us a totally interesting character, making her sexy,
seductive, and even likable in that sick kind of way.  It's cool to see
a femme fatale in an erotic thriller who can actually act.  And Larry
Miller is, as usual, pretty funny, although him playing a playboy is
more questionable casting than interesting.
"Dream Lover" was a shock for me in how intelligent it was.  Sure, there
was some big taudry sex, and we had to see James Spader's butt and all,
but the plotting is wonderful, and the film becomes a good old
Hitchcockian mind twister, in the good sense.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Dolce vita, La (1960)
Director: Federico Fellini
Writers: Federico Fellini, Ennio Flaiano, Tullio Pinelli, and Brunello
Rondi
Starring: Marcello Mastroianni, Anita Ekberg, Anouk Aimée, Yvonne
Furneaux, Alain Cuny, Annibale Ninichi, Magali Noël, Walter Santesso,
Alain Dijon, Lex Barker, Nadia Gray, Polidor, Riccardo Garrone, Valeria
Ciangottini, Nico Otzak
I've heard "La Dolce Vita" analyzed every way I think possible by now.
As a deep religious metaphor.  As an acidic satire on the media.  As a
portrait of '60s Roman aristocratic nightlife.  And it's pretty much all
of these things, and not just one of them.  It's episodic structure
easily makes it seem like it can have many meanings, and any one of
these would pretty much work, but while it is episodic in structure,
it's held together by one character, and told through his eyes.  And
it's through his eyes that we get the real reason to watch this film,
and the real reason why I consider it to be one of the greatest films of
all time.
His name is Marcello Rubini, and he's played by the great Marcello
Mastroianni as an extremely cool young man living in Rome and working as
an infamous gossip journalist.  He drives a convertible, wears black
sunglasses, is almost always wearing a suit, and knows everyone in town,
in either a good or bad light.  When we first see him, he's riding in a
helicopter around Rome, following another helicopter that's carrying a
statue of Christ to the Pope.  But instead of following it more, he and
the guys he's with stop for a second to hover around a high-rise
building where a couple of women are sunbathing in an attempt to hit on
them and maybe get their phone numbers.
This is how "La Dolce Vita" starts, a film directed by Federico Fellini
at his own personal directing peak.  Following years of simple but
totally involving neo-realistic films like "La Strada" and "Nights of
Cabiria," he decided to culminate all those old great melodramas into
this film, utilizing all his old themes (like that of the ocean and that
of the dawn after the night), but really to make his first film that was
truly complex.  Though his previous films had been ambiguous to a point,
"La Dolce Vita" is so open that numerous interpretations (many already
mentioned) are possible in the explanation of why this movie was made.
He's also been able to extend his filmmaking abitlites to make a film
that is at turns hilarious, sad, wild, cathartic, and awe-inspiring, all
without ever destroying the depth of the film.
But Fellini was too good a director to limit his films to mere exercises
in themes and satire, and all his films, even his more surreal ones, are
rooted in emotionally involving protagonists.  Marcello, the protagonist
in this film, is a little too old to be at the crossroads of his life,
but he has nevertheless reached a point in his life where he's still
idealistic and is about to make a change that will affect the rest of
his life.  In the first scene, we see him between heaven and earth,
deciding between following the Christ statue or the girls sunbathing,
and throughout the film, Fellini uses similar imagery, of climbing and
rising, of shallowness and being fulfilled, to dramatize Marcello's
deeply personal connundrum.
The film introduces us to "the sweet life" (to what the title
translates) that being the shallow inhabitants of Roman society,
especially after dark.  The streets are teeming with aristocrats,
models, showgirls, second-rate movie stars, homosexuals, nymphomaniacs,
and others, all shown in a light that's neither positive nor negative.
Fellini's approach wisely never judges them for who or what they are,
and the result is they are a seductive group of people.  He paints the
nightlife as the most alluring entitiy in the entire world, worth giving
everything up for just to have a night along with them.  This is why
it's so seductive to Marcello, who throughout most of the movie plays as
a somtimes observer, sometimes partaker.
"La Dolce Vita" unfolds brilliantly.  As we get a portrait of "the sweet
life" of Rome as a group of people who are forever partying, and perhaps
leaving the world doomed to always be in a state of shallow fun, he
makes it also deeply personal.  Marcello's life slowly unfolds before
us, so we learn everything about him.  He's not the greatest person in
the world: he annoys celebrities with gossip stories (one of the
photographers who follows him around is named Paparazzo, the name that
coined the infamous term Paparazzi), he's easily seduced by a social
beauty named Maddalena (Anouk Aimée) and joins her in the basement of a
prostitute's house for some un-seen and assumed sex, and then we
discover that he has a fiance at home (Yvonne Furneaux) who's so hung up
over Marcello and so tired of his actions that she's suicidal.
The film's sequences (about seven of them, with another 7 shorter
sequences between them) build a portrait not only of the world of Rome,
but also of Marcello.  Each sequence opens his life up more to us, and
we see his relationships with people, the way he conducts his job, and
his desires which he somtimes wears on his sleeve.  In the film's best
sequence, a hot American movie star named Sylvia (the tres buxom Anita
Ekberg) arrives in town for a movie shoot and interviews, and Marcello
makes it his duty to meet her and potentially sweep her off his feet.
He makes her aquaintance, dances with her, and proclaims that she's the
supreme female of the species.  He then follows her as she runs away
from her crowd of followers and film personelle, chases her through the
streets of Rome as she walks around with a cat on her head, and
eventually follows her into the middle of the famous giant fountain that
stands in Rome.  But as close to her as he gets, he never gets close
enough.
In other sequences, he covers a potential sighting of the Virgin Mary by
two lying children, goes to a party at the castle of some rich
nobilities, and in one of the film's most cathartic sequences, hangs
with his father (Annibale Ninichi), taking him to nightclubs and
introducing him to a showgirl who's very interested in him, but
unfortunately he gets sick before anything can really happen.  There are
more, but we get into the groove of what the structure of these chief
sequences are after awhile: an evening of empty but seductive fun
followed by a morning of regrets.  However, each sequence is unique and
fascinating, and everything rolls into one by the end, not only
completing the portrait of Marcello as a tragic figure in cinema as a
result of his own deep insecurities and pursuit of happiness in the
wrong places.
As this is all going on, the film balances two subplots, one dealing
with the aforementioned finace, who obesses over him so much that it's a
shame he didn't get rid of her earlier; and the other dealing with a man
named Steiner (Alain Cuny), a man whom Marcello idolizes as the man who
has everything: a lovely wife, perfect children, a high-rise apartment,
lots of friends - everything Marcello, an almost nomad of the night-life
scene, doesn't have.  But it all turns out to be a web of lies and
deceit, perhaps destroying all idealism Marcello will ever have.
"La Dolce Vita" was released in 1960, and when it hit, it was the
subject of controversy by almost every major group, not just by those
groups concerned with decency in art because of its frank depiction of
sexual situations and the luridness of the Roman crowd (there are
several "orgies," and they're pretty risqué for back then, but really,
Fellini shoots all of them without succumbing to being offensive for
offense sake), but also by the Catholic church for its portrait of
religious symbols in a negative light (while, ironically, other Catholic
priests preached of its goodness - he apparently takes part in all seven
of the seven deadly sins, and ends up sad for it, I suppose is the
religious take).  Nevertheless, "La Dolce Vita" became a huge hit for
the year, the fifth biggest of 1960, grossing what would today be about
80 million dollars, creating trends in fashion, including that of
Marcello's sunglasses and convertible, and made stars out of Mastroianni
and Ekberg, the latter who caused some teenage boys to sneak into the
theatres, just to grab some peaks at her massive breasts, which are
almost pouring out of her dress from time to time.
But the real reason "La Dolce Vita" works so well is because it's
unversal.  Fellini didn't limit himself to merely showing Roman culture,
and instead showed every kind of culture that acts this way.  Without
even realizing it, I've easily become sucked into such cultures my
entire life: a world of instant, empty highs, only to wake up in the
morning, having to deal with what I've taken part of the night before.
What I was looking for was happiness, just as Marcello was, and both of
us were looking in the wrong places.  But "La Dolce Vita" isn't merely a
warning film, showing us the consequences of living day-to-day with such
a life style; it transcends all that to become a deep human drama, one
where we are sucked into the world of the protagonist, and see what we
see by where we are in life.  I saw one thing in this film; someone else
may see something else.
Fellini directs the way he did when he still made his older films - with
a visual flair that is simplistic yet hypnotic.  His camera movements
are incredibly deft, and his handling of sequences, making them each run
about 20 minutes long, filled with not much more than lots of
conversations and the occasional event (i.e. a striptease populates the
middle of the final orgy scene), and if that sounds painful (and to
some, it is), you haven't experienced it.  Fellini films easily suck
viewers into their worlds, and most of the time, we just feel like we're
there and are probably have too good a time with these
attractive/unattractive people that we don't even mind that as far as
plot, very little has happened.
Fellini managed to make everything seem fresh but not cheap.  The
characters, for example, are always interesting without being totally
weird, as they are with some of Fellini's other films, and there are
moments that are so cinematic and incredible that it's hard to count
them all on one hand.  Of who's seen it, who can ever forget: the chase
up St. Peter's Dome, the dance scene involving Sylvia and another
overbearing actor friend of hers (featuring a rock dance sequence that
has got to be one of the most involving scenes ever put on celluloid),
the comments by Sylvia's droll and drunk fiance (Lex Barker), the
grandfather of the "Madonna children" asking for a drink from the
paparazi for a snapshot, the talk with the girl at the cafe, Marcello's
distanced talk with his father at dawn, the discussoin scene with
Maddalena at the castle party, the third and devastating scene involving
Steiner, the most unerotic striptease in film history, and that final
scene on the beach which radiates so ambiguously and so beautifully what
the final meaning is.
Yet there's something else about this film that really makes it great.
I can't even describe it.  Maybe it's the free form direction, the
characters, the storyline, or even the music by Nino Rota (which
switches between poppy, jazzy, or saddening, but always fitting the mood
perfectly).  Maybe it's the way that the film has a perpetually fresh
look, like it hasn't aged a bit and in fact, looks ahead of even this
time.  Maybe it's the way Fellini makes quick, non-judgmental, and
brilliant observations on life that come from experience and told in
such a way that they seem just like life.  Or maybe it's all of these
combined with the way that this film shows us that "The Sweet Life"
doesn't really exist, and the pursuit of it will only make us sadder,
though curiously rewarded.  The world this film depicts is not entirely
good for you, and you know it.  But you can't help but want to be a part
of it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Rich and Strange (1932)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: Alfred Hitchcock, Alma Reville, and Val Valentine (based on the
novel by Dale Collins)
Starring: Henry Kendall, Joan Barry, Percy Marmont, Betty Amann, Elsie
Randolph
What I love about these box sets of films you've never heard of by actors
and directors that are on sale for really cheap prices is that you can
discover little gems that are relatively impossible to find.  A friend of
mine recently purchased a 10-film boxed set of old Hitchcock films, old in
that they're from his '30s era when he still worked in England.  "Rich and
Strange" was one of the films, and what's surprising is that it's not a
suspense film, which was what most of Hitch's film were, yet it's still a
really good film in its own respect.  There's no espionnage, no kafkaesque
vision of a man innocently believed to be guilty; just a small, light
satire on the lives of the noveau riche, done with lots of energy and
style.  And no fierce birds or transvestite schizophrenics.
The beginning of "Rich and Strange" (I've never heard of it before either)
is actually one of the best openings of a Hitchcock film I've ever seen. 
It's kind of like a pre-Terry Gilliam view of the working class as zombies,
all except one character - Fred Hill (Henry Kendall) - who's the only one
of the large group of employees who has trouble with his umbrella when they
all go outside into the rain.  It's a fantastically orchestrated sequence
which I imagine Gilliam saw when he was a child, and this set his sense of
humor from that point on (just a theory...).
When Fred gets home to his wife, Emily (Joan Barry), the two are surprised
with a letter from a relative who's dying and has decided to give them a
ton of money to do whatever they want before he dies (he figures he might
as well do it now, maybe so they like him better or something).  So the two
hop a boat, and decide to cruise around the world, following a brief stop
in Paris.  On their cruise, the two become distanced from one another due
to a couple cicumstances (Fred gets massively seasick), and each of them
venture into little affairs: she with a rich Commander (Percy Marmont); he
with a supposed Princess (Betty Amann).
One thing that's amazing about his early films is how trite they are.  On
average, they last about 80 minutes or so, yet cover a surprising amount of
material, including some great set pieces.  "Rich and Strange" is not so
vast as his other early films, but rather tells a leisurely fun story in a
short amount of time.  There's no real suspense here, save a bit at the end
when the cruise boat is almost sunk by raging waters.  Instead of suspense,
Hitchcock gives us a more lighthearted story, told in an energetic manner,
and with lots of humor.
Throughout the film, title cards pop up to comment or tell us something
about the story.  Maybe Hitchcock was trying to humor us, mocking the old
days of silent film when title cards had to explain everything.  Whatever
it does, the use of title cards do create some chuckles along the length of
the film, and give it a humorous undertone.
But despite its comic tone, it also has a satirical edge in respect to
those who have quickly become wealthy without doing anything but be related
to someone with a certain amount of wealth.  The characters in this film
yearn for wealth in the beginning, but as the film goes on, find that
wealth does not automatically mean happiness.  Without becoming preachy,
Hitchcock addresses this minor problem pretty well.
The only drawback is a film which does kind of run out of steam towards the
end, showing that Hitchcock doesn't always have to direct suspense, but
it's definitely what he does best.  Still, the direction in this film is
extremely good, and the script and acting creates a film which is silly and
fun to watch.  Who needs a film with international intrigue and spies every
time anyway?  "Rich and Strange" is definitely not one of Hitch's best
films, but it is definitely worth a viewing or two.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Devil's Own, The (1997)
Director: Alan J. Pakula
Writers: David Aaron Cohen,Vincent Patrick, and Kevin Jarre
Starring: Harrison Ford, Brad Pitt, Magaret Colin, Reuben Blades, Treat 
Williams
For months before its release, we all heard about feuding betwixt the 
leads on the set, and how the budget skyrocketed to a reported 90 
million bucks.  First off, I have absolutely no clue what the spent 90 
million bucks on.  The leads would cost roughly 35 million or so, then 
maybe 15 for the rest of the film, bringing it to roughly 50 million, 
which is about what it grossed at the box office anyway.  But where did 
the other 40 million go?
Secondly, what idiot thought this depressing and suspenseless film would 
gross over 90 million?  Just because Harrison Ford and Brad Pitt were in 
it doesn't guarantee a huge box office draw.  I could have told you 
that, and I'm not even a film student yet.  In "Seven," we were drawn 
into the complex and creepy-ass storyline that flowed nicely and was 
depressing in that kind of good way.  And "12 Monkeys" was so complex 
that you couldn't help but be intrigued.  "The Devils' Own" is 
not a bad film, but it's so messy that it almost is.
Now, the big news on the set was that the two leads were fighting over 
who had the biggest part.  Now it seems that neither one and the film 
seems totally screwed up with who really is the big protagonist.  Of 
course, I'll go with Ford because he's not as complex and is rather easy 
to figure out, so we obviously associate with him.  But Frankie the 
Angel (Pitt) is a complex man who is a killer by nature because he saw 
his father killed at a very young age.  He has never really been able to 
deal with it, and has no problem with popping a cap in someone's ass.  
But there are times when it's basically a role of the die where the 
scene's center is at.
The story tells how Frankie escapes to America after a big IRA thing 
goes bad, leaving some of his pals dead and another one going to America 
with him.  Frankie has a bunch of stolen money with him, and is sent to 
live with a near-retired cop (Ford), and his nice family (mom played by 
ID4's Margaret Colin, who has no real part but is just there).  Frankie 
seems like a nice guy, and he is.  He gets along great with the family, 
and Ford pretty much loves the guy.
But little does he know about his violent past and the fact that he and 
his bud are dealing with some baddies in New York (led by Treat 
Williams, who is still aiming at that big comeback).  The baddies 
eventually cause some harm to Ford's family (or near harm, anyway), and 
Ford finds himself on a personal mission to bring Frankie in, who is 
being persued by the American police, some Irish police, and the New 
York baddies.  But the ending is anti-climactic and depressing, ending 
on the note (that is pushed in our face by Pitt) that "this isn't an 
American story; it's an Irish one."
The whole film is mis-led.  It has no clue what the point of it is.  Is 
it to just end on a down-note?  Is it to present an interesting 
comparison between two interesting characters?  Is it to just cash in on 
the double bill of Ford and Pitt?  It seems to be all of these, and 
because of this, it just fails.  The Ford/Pitt characters are 
interesting, but who is the story about?  It can't be both, it just 
doesn't work out.  We care about both, although they both do things that 
aren't with their characters.  And the ending is just confused.
But the film is not bereft of goodness.  In fact, there are several good 
things that almost save the flick.  The acting is very good, especially 
by the two leads.  Ford is, and will probably always be, awesome.  Pitt 
steals the acting show, but not with his "authentic" accent, which is 
occasionally Irish, but sometimes not very comprehendable (one time he 
says "They killed my dad in front of us" and it sounds a lot like he 
said "They killed me dad fungus.")
But in the end, the film is bogged down by its confused problems, like 
pacing and concentration of the film.  It almost has ADD which regard to 
what it's about.  Give this flick some ridlin and it would probably be a 
masterpiece.  The film is not bad because it shouldn't have been given 
that huge of a budget, but really because it seems the two stars had a 
bit of egotisticism they couldn't deal with and screwed up what could 
have potentially been a really great flick.
P.S. What in the hell does the title have to do with?  Anyone got a clue 
out there?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Sleeper (1973)
Director: Woody Allen
Writers: Woody Allen and Marshall Brickman
Starring: Woody Allen, Diane Keaton, John Beck, Brian Avery, Douglas 
Rain
One of the many things Woody Allen is good at is making comedies funny 
the entire way through without loosing steam.  His cure for it is 
locomotion: he always keeps the story moving and is always introducing 
various jokes, whether they be academic witticisms, bathroom humor, sly 
witty remakrs, sight gags, what have you.  He also expresses all his 
hostile beliefs in his comedies, but not in a dramatic way.  Most of his 
comedies have some sort of inner meaning to them which make them 
hilarious and thought-provoking at the same time.  With the exception of 
"Annie Hall," no other of his comedies has ever come close to providing 
a message while still being hilariously funny.
"Sleeper" is his version of "1984" or "Brave New World," presented as a 
slapstick comedy a la Chaplin or any of the other silent slapstick 
films.  To make it pretty authentic, Woody gives us a soundtrack done by 
the Preservation Hall Jazz Band, swing music that perfectly makes the 
situations seem comical as they are all done silently.  The rest of the 
time, we get Woody's famous dialogue with quick wit and 
pseudo-intellectual one-liners ("This is a picture of Norman Mailer.  He 
dedicated his ego to the Harvard Medical School for study...").
The plot centers around Miles Monroe (Woody), a neurotic (is there any 
other kind of Woody-given character?) health food store owner who likes 
to play clairinet in a local jazz band ("I've always felt you had to be 
black to play jazz.  I'm only a malatto.  Yeah, my mother was white, and 
my father was black...and vice versa.").  The film opens in 2173 in a 
utopian society where the government "is worse than California," as 
Woody puts it.  A group of scientists thaw out Miles who has been frozen 
for the past 200 years after going to the hospital for an ulcer 
operation (but something went wrong...).  He gets the fish-out-of-water 
treatment when he is awakened as he tries to adjust to that long sleep. 
 Soceity is worlds away from what it was before.  For one thing, tobacco 
is revered as a healthy product, as well as deep fat and hot fudge, etc. 
 When the scientists ask him to help them with data from the 20th 
century that they don't understand, he gives them joke answers.  For 
example, they show him a tape of "The Wide World of Sports" and say 
their theory on it was it was used as a form of government torture.  
Miles says, "Yes, that's exactly what it was."
But Miles soon learns the scientists had ulterior motives for thawing 
him out: they are part of the rebels who want to overthrow "the Great 
Leader."  His job is to find the Underground in the "western district" 
since he has no data compiled in him.  Before he can really say no, the 
"Security Police" come by and erase their minds for treason.  Meanwhile, 
Miles escapes in a series of comical bits and ends up disguising himself 
as one of their android butlers.  He is dropped by the house of a vapid 
poetess, Luna Schlosser (Diane Keaton, in their first pairing in a 
Woody-directed film - "Play it Again, Sam" was NOT directed by him, 
contrary to popular opinion).  She is duped by his amazing disguise and 
gets him ready for a party, which gets him wound up in a fight with 
giant pudding.  
Soon, he has Luna involved in the rebellion as he forces her to take him 
to the Underground.  They eventually fall in love, are parted, switch 
motives, and then get together to stop "Aries Day," a top-secret 
government experiment, which has them posing as doctors to steal the 
nose of the Great Leader who was blown up in an assasination attempt and 
is only a nose now.  The climax has them in love again, and rejoicing as 
they have saved the day.
First off, Woody and Diane make a perfect team.  They have such 
chemistry that it's reminiscent of great comedy teams Laurel and Hardy 
and Abbot and Costello.  And Woody's dialogue is right on, with great 
banter and hilarious one-liners.  He also tackles some serious topics, 
some which he has already tried out.  His rebellious nature against an 
unfair government is reminiscent of "Bananas" and would come again in 
"Love and Death."  But his cloning satire is fresh and more effective 
than any other cloning films I've ever seen.  The people who cloned 
"Daisy" should have watched this film first.  And he also does some 
"Clockwork Orange" recconaissance work as the government reprograms 
Miles when he is caught.  He also spoofs several films.  For one thing, 
the film is very reminiscent of Chaplin's "Modern Times."  But it also 
spoofs "2001" (for the voice of the computer in one scene, they use the 
voice of Douglas Rain, who provided the errie voice of HAL) and "A 
Streetcar Named Desire" (with Woody as Vivien Leigh and Diane doing a 
mean Brando impersonation).  
"Sleeper" works so well as a satire because it takes the other route 
when presenting it: it goes for slapstick laughs, mixing the message in 
nicely and still being hilarious the whole time.  Even a non-Woody fan 
would appreciate this one.  Slapstick is pretty much the universal form 
of laughter, and he does it brilliantly.  He also gives us hilarious 
lines, and some comical romantic melodrama: Luna runs into the 
Underground and meets the leader, Erno (John Beck), who teaches her 
marxism and romances her, causing jealousy to rise in Miles ("He's got 
capped teeth, you know?  He's got capped gums!")  The characterization 
is also on here, as it wasn't really in his previous comedies.  Miles is 
insecure and it gets in his way many times.  He is a big chicken when it 
comes to being the helper for the rebellion and when a big man comes 
into his romantic ways, he just can't help but try to do everything in 
his power to show he's a better man.  And Luna is very easily-led and 
switches partners with ease.  She also easily goes from loving her 
utopian way of life to believing in the teachings of Karl Marx.  
The use of sight gags and futuristic occurences also adds to the humor. 
 For one thing, sex has been handled so it's quick, efficient and 
doesn't cause any diseases or pregnancies.  Seems like "Demolition Man" 
ripped this movie off a bit.  Instead, they have things called 
"Orgasmatrons," machines that do the sex for you with your clothes on in 
a matter of seconds.  Miles makes fun of it later on, saying, "What do 
you do if it breaks?  Switch to manual?"  And as far as drugs, they have 
"The Orb," a large metal ball that gives off drugs when you touch it.  
And when in the woods, Miles goes to get food and finds a large plant 
where they make large food products, including celery, bananas and even 
a giant chicken.
This is also the first time Woody could construct a narrative and move 
his jokes easier.  The main flaw in "Bananas" was it was way too 
episodic.  "Sleeper" is episodic, but it at least moves to its new 
places easier and more smoothly.  And the jokes are actually funnier 
than any of his other films and the satire more poignant.  This is 
basically one of the most universally great Woody Allen comedies.
"Sleeper" is probably Woody's funniest film.  For that, I will say it 
deserves to be placed around the top of his oeuvre, with his other 
masterpieces "Annie Hall," "Manhattan, "Hannah and Her Sisters" and 
"Crimes and Misdemeanors."  "Sleeper" is my fave Woody Allen film, and 
undoubtedly a great work of comic art.

Title
Review for 39 Steps, The (1935)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: Charles Bennet and Ian Hay (based on the novel by John Buchan)
Starring: Robert Donat, Madeleine Carol, Godfrey Tearle, Lucie Mannheim,
Peggy Ashcroft, John Laurie, Helen Haye, Frank Cellier, Wylie Watson,
Gus MacNaughton, Jerry Verno, Peggy Simpson
What makes Alfred Hitchcock so great?  Why is a director who made almost
nothing but suspense films considered to be one of the best if not the
best director of all time?  To me, the man was great because in almost
all of his films, he was able to tackle the individual subjects in an
almost flawless manner.  With each of his films, he breathed fresh life
and individual nuances into them, creating memorable sequences and
satisfying wholes.  He can tackle interesting topics like in
"Notorious," create a ton of depth you wouldn't see in other suspense
thrillers like in "Vertigo," and even make simple films that just stick
in your mind as classics.  "The Thirty-Nine Steps," one of his best
films, belongs in the latter.
"The Thirty-Nine Steps" deals with a much-used subject in his films: an
innocent man trying to prove his, well, innocence.  Richard Hannay
(Robert Donat), a Canadian visiting England, meets a woman named
Annabella (Lucie Mannheim) in a hall one night, and takes her home after
a mass exodus from the place due to some gunshots.  There, she tells him
that she was being followed by two secret agents looking to kill her
over a formula, but Richard does not believe her.  I mean, why should
he?  But that night, she stumbles into his bedroom with a knife lodged
in her back.
Richard was told by her to go to a place in Scotland to give the formula
to a Professor (Godfrey Tearle) there, but has already been accused of
the murder before the morning.  He begins running around the UK, trying
to stay away from the police and the secret agents, and eventually meets
up with a woman, Pamela (Madeleine Carol), who he soon finds himself
handcuffed to, setting the standard for future
two-people-handcuffed-together movies.  And soon they have to work
together to prove his innocence and show who the real bad guy is.
It sounds like a typical chase movie, and it originally was intended to
be that way.  But Hitchcock, with brilliant direction, turns it into a
classic.  The screenplay is filled to the brim with humor, supplying the
actors with great dialogue, and even some great zingers here and there
(example: "Are you married?"  "Yes, but don't rub it in.").  Every scene
is handled for the highest reaction from the audience, and filled with
originality.  In one clever scene, Richard tries to coax a milkman to
give him his outfit so he can hide from the two killer secret agents,
but since he doesn't believe him, he makes up some story about a jealous
lover, and the guy gives in.
The film moves at a fast pace, mostly being filled with sequences which
tie into the next.  One of the most brilliant tie-ins in cinema history
is in here, as the maid of the hotel finds the body of Annabella, and
her scream dissolves into the hissing of a train whistle.  There are
some chase sequences here and there, but they're never boring, and never
cliched.  Even the scene where Richard and Pamela run handcuffed
together is handled nicely.
And, of course, there's a great final shot.  Among other things,
Hitchcock is a master of creating memorable final shots, like the ones
in "Notorious" and "Vertigo," which add a new surprise to the film, and
even some depth.  Although not being a surprise, it is very good, and
set the standard for later Hitchcock films.
And the acting is great.  Robert Donat is amazing in the lead, adding a
lot of humor, and delivering his lines wonderfully.  But most
importantly, he creates a character who is sympathetic, which is one of
the best things about Hitchcock films: characters we care about. 
Madeliene Carol, who joins up in the film late on, has great chemitry
with Donat, and creates a woman who isn't very weak, but then again, not
too strong either.
But why is this film one of his best?  Well, "The Thirty-Nine Steps" is
one of the ultimate examples of what's so great about Hitchcock.  A
great story, interesting and likable characters, lots of great suspense,
memorable sequences, great twits, cool camera tricks, attractive stars,
a satisfying ending, and a great script are just some of the many things
that are great about this movie.  In fact, "The Thirty-Nine Steps" is
pretty much the epitome about what's so amazing about Alfred Hitchcock.
Although being a hard film to find in your video store, it is more than
well worth the viewing.  Of all the cheap thrillers we get today, with
twists that are moronic and forced, it's almost cleansing to see a film
like this which doesn't insult your intelligence, and leaves you with a
grin on your face.  And that's what's so timeless about the films of
Aldred Hitchcock.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Touch of Evil (1958)
Director: Orson Welles
Writers: Paul Monash and Orson Welles (based on the novel by Whit
Masterson)
Starring: Charlton Heston, Janet Leigh, Orson Welles, Joseph Calleia,
Akim Tamiroff, Mort Mills, Joanna Cook Moore, Ray Collins, Marleine
Dietrich, Keenan Wynn, Zsa Zsa Gabor, Joseph Cotten
Orson Welle's "Touch of Evil" and "Citizen Kane" are worlds apart as
films.  One's a hard-boiled old-school piece of pulp; the other is an
ingenius portrayal of a seriously flawed man and the deconstruction of
his myth.  Both are celebrated, but "Kane" has been dubbed the Greatest
Film of All Time by many critics (not believing I can rank any film as
the "Greatest," I refer to it as "possibly..."), while "Touch of Evil"'s
just celebrated.  One would almost feel inclined to diss it a bit, since
it is NOT "Kane," but if you, like me, are a believer in the critiquing
rule that a director's films are all measured on their own merits, you
won't.
Orson directed, co-wrote, and starred in this black and white, moody
little piece of pulp as an obligation to a studio (who first had him
co-starring, but then forced him to write and direct it against his
will), but, as John Travolta said in "Get Shorty" (where he watched it
for a scene), sometimes you do your best work when you have a gun
against your head.  It's another one of those films, like "Chinatown"
and "The Maltese Falcon," where all the elements of film storytelling
come into perfect or near-perfect balance with one another, creating a
satisfying and even rewarding film.  I mean, this is not JUST a piece of
pulp: it has some serious dramatic undertones to it that many pulp films
don't posess.
"Touch of Evil" takes place around the American/Mexican border and
centers around a mexican detective, Ramon Miguel "Mike" Vargas (get
this: Charlton Heston - yeah, HE looks mexican), who becomes involved in
the murder of a border town mayor who was blown up almost on the border
due to a bomb placed on his car in Mexico.  Vargas is merely an
"observer" to the detective work done by the area's celebritated
detective, Hank Quinlan (Orson - at his most obese), a beastly man with
a gimpy leg which he says gives him intuition, which he uses to solve
crimes.  When questioned how he thinks he solved the murder right away,
he says his leg told him.
Also in the story is Mike's new wife, an american gal named Susan (Janet
Leigh, three years before "Psycho"), a buxom but fiercely strong woman
who gets involved with a border town kinda mafia king, "Uncle Joe"
Grandi (Akim Tamiroff), who wants to screw over Mike due to some past
instances.  Although her opening scenes show a very strong will on her
part, she later becomes more essential to the film as an innocent
victim, and pawn in the screwing over of Mike.
Soon into the investigation, Mike discovers that Quinlan has set up a
boy to take the fall for the murder by planting evidence.  Knowing for
sure that he did it, Mike becomes enraged with Hank, and soon starts
spreading bad gossip as well as doing some little investigating of his
own, discovering that Hank, a major celebrity in the area, has been
planting evidence for his entire career.  Soon a desperate Hank joins up
with the weazel-like Grandi in setting up a scandal involving Susan and
some weed (which had to be kinda risque for the time).
What makes this film so great though?  Is it the story?  The plot is
very neat, with very little plot holes, and even some good old
characterization.  But, as the old saying goes, it's not what you tell
but how.  Welles has really created a wonderful little pot-boiler here,
setting up atmosphere, deepening the characters, touching on themes,
and, of course, doing some really nifty camerawork that's still
astounding.
A lot of this film takes place at night, and the cinematography deftly
captures the seedy world of a border town which thrives at night. 
Scenes are shot showing gorgeously ominous shadows lurking eveywhere,
and the darkness even conceals some parts of the town.  One of the best
scenes in the movie involves a murder shot in a room where a light
flashes up and down, creating tension throughout.  Even if the story
wasn't good, the film would still be great to look at.
The characters are very well-drawn, and surprisingly effectively
portrayed by the actors who play them.  While Mike, who is out to seek
the truth, but finds he has to do both while saving his wife, is the
lead character, he is not who the film is about (FYI, Charlton Heston
gives one of his best performances in this film - I was shocked to see
how good he was, as he is usually kinda hokey).  Hank is the target of
the film, as he is a fallen man who took the wrong course in life, has
lived happily with it, and has now found himself taking the plunge.  The
film shows his past life in the form of a woman he once knew (played in
a "guest appearance" by Marlene Dietrich), who symbolically mocks his
weight ("You shoulda laid off those candy bars").  Perhaps he was
tempted by the devil or at least by evil, and, as all evil deeds end up,
is finally learning the price of his choice.  In the film's final
moments, we see him contemplating his choice, but thinking about far too
late in his life to turn back.
The film not only touches on this, but on police corruption, and the
search for truth.  Throughout the latter part of the film, Hank's giddy
old buddy Pete (Joseph Calleia) tries to swade Mike from his exposing
Hank for what he is as he will destroy him as a man.  The film touches
on the question between truth or living with a lie, but says that in all
cases, truth must be told eventually, or all else that comes after will
be plagued.
And what would a Welles film be without cool camera tricks.  "Citizen
Kane" was one of the first films to use innovative camera tricks in such
large capacity which helps the storytelling, and "Touch of Evil" is no
different.  Every shot is brilliantly laid-out, and filled with all the
right atmosphere.  In fact, the opening shot is one of the top ten
greatest openings I've ever seen: a 3 1/2 minute long un-broken
steadicam shot which is one of the first of its kind (the latest
incarnations of this were in Altman's "The Player," and Anderson's
"Boogie Nights").  With a brilliant, pulsating, highly percussive scorse
by the great Henry Mancini, this film is not just brilliantly written
and acted, but brilliantly directed.
"Touch of Evil" may not be a "Citizen Kane" (it's deconstruction of Hank
is hardly up to the brilliance of the deconstruction of Charles Foster
Kane), but it's one of the best examples of film pulp/film noir of all
time, and an example of how directors CAN make brilliance under intense
studio pressure (in fact, in "Ed Wood," Welles - played by uncannily
Vincent D'Onofrio - bitches about how he has to make a film starring
Charlton Heston as a mexican).  "Touch of Evil" may not be a "Kane," but
on its own, it's still a work of a genius filmcraftsman.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Lost Highway (1997)
Director: David Lynch
Writers: David Lynch and Barry Gifford
Starring: Bill Pullman, Patricia Arquette, Bathalzar Getty, Robert
Loggia, Robert Blake, Gary Busey, Richard Pryor, Giovanni Ribissi, Henry
Rollins, Marilyn Manson, Jack Nance
David Lynch is one of the more...interesting directors.  He's made a
career out of baffling people with his films that to call bizarre is
merely an understatement.  But in most of his great films, there's some
kind of underlying theme or message.  Take "Eraserhead" - a film that on
the surface makes about as much sense as William S. Borroughs' "Naked
Lunch."  But one can see a satirical vein inside, popping out.  But his
newest film, meant to be his comeback after "Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With
Me," not to mention the whole "Twin Peaks" spiel (which i kind of
liked), is, to paraphrase Shakespeare, a film of sound and fury,
signifying noting.
Get this for a premise: a saxophonist (Bill Pullman) and his brunette
wife (Patricia Arquette) live in a spacious condo of sorts in, I think,
L.A. or somewhere.  They mysteriously begin receiving packages with
tapes in them that show their house, first from the outside, then from
the inside, showing them sleeping.  They freak, call the cops, and then
one night, get a tape that only Bill watches, and sees Arquette brutally
murdered.  Of course, he did it, but he has no recolection of actually
killing her...or any kind of motive.
He's sent to jail, and begins getting massive headaches all of a
sudden.  One day, one of the guards look in and see he has mutated into
a whole other person!  Instead of the moody saxophonist, he's now a punk
90s teenager (Bathalzar Getty).  They let him out, 'cause they really
can't hold him since he's a whole other person, and he goes back to his
life, but things have kind of changed for the more bizarre.
Not only does his one female friend begin taking off her shirt for him,
but back at his mechanic job (run by Richard Pryor, who seems to so sick
that it almost brought a tear to my eye), he meets the moll (Arquette
again, this time as a blond) of a short-tempered mafia guy (Robert
Loggia).  They obviously begin spending nights at cheap motels, but
Loggia obviously and eventually finds out.  Then I got lost as far as
plotting, as they have sex in the middle of the road, he turns back into
Bill Pullman, there's a porn starring Marilyn Manson.  Oi.
First off, I believe that not all films are supposed to be taken as
literally as others.  I'm very apt to letting plot details slide, like
in the case of a John Woo film.  It brings the film experience down, and
it makes me feel anal.  And when watching David Lynch films, I try not
to be hypercritical about the plot, since he usually has some kind of
theme, as I said.
"Lost Highway" has not theme.  It's about nothing.  It's just a weird
film with a neat gimmick of switching the protagonists, not like Woo's
"Face/Off," where the two who switched had a rivalry going on, but that
the two have never even met eachother and have no link whatsoever.  What
is this supposed to mean?  Why did these two switch?  And then there's
the Arquette thing.  Why are there two of her?  Is it the same person? 
These are questions I don't think Lynch even knows.  But the thing is, I
would excuse these and give this a good rating if, and only if, it meant
someting.  If it was out to prove something satirical, or give some sort
of message to the audience, I would forgo this the same way I forgo the
fact that in the end of "A Clockwork Orange," there are just too many
coincidences.  That was a fable though.  This is just a David Lynch
film.
Then there's the one scene that baffled me so much that my head hurt -
the one where Robert Blake (from "In Cold Blood") walks into the room at
the party with his face painted white, his ears sticking out, and
dressed in some weird garb, walks up to Pullman, and tells him he's at
his house at the same time he's talking to him at the party.  Pullman
obviously doesn't believe him, so Blake gives him a cell phone and tells
him to dial up his number.  He does, and Blake picks up on the other
end, even though he's standing in front of him.  Now this is ingenious. 
I mean, I heard about this scene months before it came out, and I was
telling everybody about it.  But what does it mean?  Is he some sort of
God who can control time or something?  Did he kill Arquette?  And why
did Pullman and Getty switch places?  And where did Pullman go when they
switched?
Also, Lynch seems to be recylcing ideas from his older films.  The
Loggia character is just an older version of the Dennis Hopper character
in "Blue Velvet."  The scene where Arquette is forced to strip at
gunpoint is faintly reminiscent of the scene in "Blue Velvet" where
Isabella Rossellini was dropped off by the mob guys totally naked and in
suburbia (my nightmare).  The god-like ability for Blake to be two
places at once..."DUNE!"  And Arquette being a brunette, then a blond -
well, that's a rip off of Hitchcock's "Vertigo."  I sure hope this guy
hasn't run out of ideas.
I like Lynch, mainly because he's intellectual stimulating.  But what I
hate about this film is it's SO SLOW MOVING.  It moves about an inch per
hour, mainly attributed to the incredibly long pauses between the
characters' lines.  They speak in hushed tones, and then go ahead and
take seconds to respond.  "Are you going to read?" (insert 14 seconds
here) "Yes." (insert 16 seconds here) "Read.  Ha.  Read."  The actors
don't really act much in the first half, mainly because their lines are
mechanical.  Pullman and Arquette can act and all, but you wouldn't know
it here.
But to be postitive about this film, I think it's not as bad as it
seems.  Yes, it makes absolutely no sense.  No, it doesn't have any kind
of purpose for being.  However.  It's fascinating to watch.  With the
neat gimmick of it not having any kind of purpose, Lynch grasps the
audience in his claw, garnering their attention span for the whole
time.  Yes, it's frequently boring, but never dull (it makes sense to
me).  And there are some classic scenes.  For one, the Blake party/phone
call scene is too cool for words.  And there's this great plug for not
tailgating, done with Robert Loggia.  And, I mean, you get to see Gary
Busey subdued!
There's not much more I can say about this film.  It's totally void of
any meaning, but it's one hell of a watch.
P.S. Look for "Eraserhead" himself, Jack Nance, in his final role as a
kinda senile mechanic.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Strangers on a Train (1951)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: Raymond Chandler, Whitfield Cook, and Cenzi Ormonde (based on
the novel by Patricia Highsmith)
Starring: Farley Granger, Robert Walker, Ruth Roman, Leo G. Carroll,
Patricia Hitchcock, Marion Lorne, Howard St. John, Jonathan Hale, Robert
Gist, Laura Elliot
What's amazing about "Strangers on a Train" is not just how absolutely
thrilling it is after all these years, but also how deeply reflective it
is on humanity.  Here's a film which is a classic of the suspense genre,
one that has been copied, parodied, and rehashed ever since its initial
release.  But it's depiction of the murderous and agressive qualities in
man is what makes it even better, what makes it not only a popular film
commercially, but also critically.  Of all the films Hithcock made, this
is one of his absolute masterpieces.
Guy Haines (Farley Granger), a semi-famous and respectable tennis player
and his relationship with the off-kilter rich boy, Bruno Antony (Robert
Walker, who slightly resembled a young Robert Vaughn), is what the
film's focus is on.  Both are passengers on a train one day, and over
the course of a lunch, both open up to the two people they hate the
most: for Guy, it's his present wife, Miriam (Laura Elliot), whom he
wants to divorce so he can marry the daughter of a senator, Anne Morton
(Ruth Roman), but unfortunately she won't let him; for Bruno, it's his
fascist-like father (Jonathan Hale), who treats him horribly.  Bruno
comes up with an unthinkable plan for each to murder the other's object
of hatred because they have no other connection than a coincidental
meeting on a train, but Guy laughs it off, thinking of it as a joke.  A
couple nights later, Bruno stalks Miriam and her friends at a carnival,
and when no one is around, strangled Miriam to death.
Upon learning of this, Guy's initial reaction is to turn Bruno in, but
he has ran into a wall: he has no proof, and he's the chief suspect in
the murder.  In fact, the police have mapped out a way he could have
murdered her and still gotten back home when he did.  Meanwhile, Bruno
still wants Guy to murder his father, and when he refuses, he begins
slowly entering his life, stalking not only him, but his future family,
including the Miriam-looking sister of Anne, Barbara (Patricia Hitchcock
- yes, there's a relation; she's his daughter).
The finale of the film, which clocks in around 25 minutes, is one of the
most carefully constructed, intelligently and deftly tailored finales of
a film I've ever seen, ending in an outrageously visceral ending
involving an out-of-control merry-go-round, which is even more tense
when one discovers that the stunt involving the old man did not involve
any kind of special effects (it's probably the most dangerous stunt of
all time).  The ending is a perfect finish, with an afterthought
containing some extra suspense.
First off, the film is jam-packed with brilliant sequences, cool shots,
and various other suspense sequences that made Hitchcock famous.  The
first one is the beginning, which has no action or anything, but the
dialogue (co-written by none other than Raymond Chandler) is brilliant. 
In the scene, the two discuss the respective people who piss them off
the most, and then Bruno tries to get him to "switch murders."
Two other sequences include a party held by Anne's father (Leo G.
Carroll) where Bruno shows up and ends up in a discussion over how to
murder someone and not have to expound a lot of energy (winding up in a
demonstration how one strangles another); and a scene where Guy journeys
over to Bruno's mansion to kill his father.  Bruno's house is gigantic
and eerily gothic, and the cinematography in this sequence is some of
the creepiest I've ever seen.
But the best sequence, other than the finale, is the one where Bruno
stalks and murders Miriam.  Lasting about 10 minutes or so, it's a
masterpiece in montage, as Bruno has to make sure he follows her but has
to strangle her when none of her friends are around.  Unfortunately,
Bruno is hardly subtle about it, giving himself an eery presence with
his head held down and a hat darkening most of his face (as well as
those eyes he gives).  By the time he finally strangles Miriam to death
(effectively mirrored through her fallen glasses), it's not
anticlimactic but silently frightening.
One of the chief powers of this film lies in the character of Bruno,
who's one of the creepiest and most insane villains to ever grace any
screen.  Instead of being just a cold-hearted bastard, he almost seems
like a harmless little boy, with a gentle presence, resulting in
something which becomes a tad unerving.  Bruno is completely oblivious
to his lack of sanity, most notable in a scene after he kills Miriam
where he approaches and talks to Guy, who is, obviously, appalled at
what he did, but he acts like he did nothing wrong.  He also adds a
touch of homoeroticism, as he seems to attempt to seduce Guy in several
scenes.  Robert Walker's performance is one of the greatest in a
Hitchcock film, if not the best (an observation attributed to AMC host
Nick Clooney).  Unfortunately, Walker died shortly following this film
of "reaction to sedatives."  Too bad; he was just perfect in this film.
The power of this film, though, is its presentation of human beings as
having a murderous and violent nature.  A lot of the characters in this
film, most notably Guy, the one woman at the party, and, of course,
Bruno, who all present different stages of this ailment.  In one scene,
Guy fumes after a heated discussion with his wife that he wishes he
could strangle her, although we know he would never do it.  The woman
giggles along with Bruno in the party scene, but shows an active
interest in the world of murder, but again, she would never do it.  But
Bruno, who seems to have no morals, has no problem with it, and the
chief problem would be getting away with it (or having to do a lot of
work).  The truth is we humans have an interest in murder in general; it
just piques our interest.  Which is probably why Hollywood makes so many
films about them.
But above all, "Strangers on a Train" is a brilliant piece of suspense. 
Hitchcock is at his best with this film, giving us interesting
characters who we care about, a set-up which is fascinating, and
sequences which are intense.  The story, which has been copied many
times (most recently in DeVito's "Throw Momma From the Train"), is not
only a fascinating idea, but an intriguing reflection of our society. 
It's also one of Hitchcock's very best.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
Director: Curtis Hanson
Writers: Brian Hegeland and Curtis Hanson (based on the novel by James
Ellroy)
Starring: Kevin Spacey, Russell Crowe, Guy Pearce, Kim Bassinger, James
Cromwell, Danny DeVito, David Straithairn, Graham Beckel, Ron Rifkin,
Matt McCoy, Paul Guilfoyle, Amber Smith, Darrell Sandeen, Brenda Bakke
I was thinking after I saw "L.A. Confidential," and I couldn't come up
with a single thing wrong with it.  And I couldn't think of one scene
where I wasn't totally engrossed, a character who wasn't at least a bit
interesting (save the really small parts), and a performance which
didn't hit the nail on the head.  "L.A. Confidential," which has been
getting some pretty just awards from critic circles as of late, is
definitely one of the most engrossing films of the year, and also one of
the best.
"L.A. Confidential" has a very complex plot, which somehow never feels
overwhelming.  The film follows three detectives in the LAPD back in the
50s: the wild fame-hungering Jack Vincennes (Kevin Spacey), the
hot-tempered Bud White (the awesome Russell Crowe), and the by-the-rules
newcomer Ed Exley (Guy Pearce).  The film paints a negative yet positive
view on the LAPD, as being totally corrupt, with lots of politics,
hypocrisy, but with people who really want justice to be done, even if
they have to bend the truth a little.
The plot is set in motion following a little bit of police brutality on
Christmas Eve, when a bunch of cops, drunk on the spiked egg nog, beat
some mexicans up.  Exley, the nightwatchman for the night, testifies,
and is immeadiately made a lieutenant detective, much to the dismay of
everyone on the force.  Afterwards, Bud's ex-partner, Dick Stensland
(Graham Beckel), who was fired as a result, is found dead with a bunch
of others in a coffee shop.
The three detectives, working apart for most of the film, begin to
uncover lots of twists, as well as hidden secrets of L.A. life.  They
run into a wealthy man named Pierce Patchett (David Straithairn), who
runs a little side job, pimping for high-class hookers who look like
celebrities.  One of them turns out to be a woman named Lynn Bracken
(Kim Bassinger - I know, a shock), who looks like Veronica Lake, and who
soon begins fooling around with Bud.
The film unearths even more smut, as a result of the slimy Syd Hudgeons
(Danny DeVito), who runs a little gossip page called "Hush Hush," which
gets off on making people look bad.  The magazine gets a lot of tip-offs
from Vincennes (who also has a hysterical side job of being the
technical advisor for a "Dragnet"-esque show called "Badge of Honor,"
starring none other than Matt McCoy), as well as tipping off for
Vincennes. 
>From this point on, the story is intricate, fun to watch, and filled
with depth.  The incident uncovers a lot of police corruption, leading
all the way to the top.  I loved the way the film was very responsible
about this, and showed the corruption being as a result of a lack of
justice in the world.  After all, justice is almost impossible to
inforce, and sometimes one needs to bend the truth a bit.
I also loved how every single scene in "L.A. Confidential" is
intricately planned out for the maximum effect.  For the entirety of the
film, I kept waiting for a scene to slip up, to go the wrong way.  The
plot never falters, even after twist upon twist upon twist upon twist,
etc.  And the characterization is always deep, and never false.  Curtis
Hanson (who has directed the horrible "The Hand That Rocks the Cradle,"
as well as the tepid "The River Wild") has created a wonderful film
here, filled with moody atmosphere, as well as a gorgeous backdrop.  I
mean, this is Hollywood.  In the 50s.
The acting is also amazing.  Kevin Spacey, of course, is amazing, as
usual.  But what's cool is how he shares the screen with two non-stars. 
Russell Crowe, who is an accomplished Aussie actor, who has been in a
couple American pics ("Virtuosity" and "The Quick and the Dead"), is
absolutely awesome in his role.  He has charisma, style, and even
depth.  Of course, if you've seen him in anything else, this isn't even
remotely a big shock.  And Guy Pearce is pretty incredible, looking very
stern yet kind of ignorant as to the ways of the LAPD.  And if you've
seen him as the ecstatic, overzealous, drag queen in "The Adventures of
the Priscilla, Queen of the Desert" (yes, he's also an Aussie), it's
even more incredible of a performance.  Interesting side note: all three
of the leads have played a gay man in a movie at least once.
And in the supporting region, DeVito and Bassinger are pretty awesome in
their respective roles.  DeVito has that kind of sliminess that only he
can make lovable, and he does it brilliantly here.  And Bassinger, who
is near the end of my list of actresses who would shock me with a great
performance, shocked me with a great performance.  Who knew Mrs. Baldwin
could act, what after that "Real McCoy" movie?
"L.A. Confidential" is definitely one of the best films of the year; a
masterpiece from start to finish.  There wasn't a moment where I wasn't
amazed, bowled over by its greatness.  This film just shows that one can
still do noir and make it non-Tarantino-esque.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for C'era una volta il West (1969)
Director: Sergio Leone
Writers: Segio Donati and Mickey Knox (from a story by Sergio Leone,
Bernardo Bertolucci, and Dario Argento)
Starring: Claudia Cardinale, Henry Fonda, Charles Bronson, Jason
Robards, Keenan Wynn
Following the international sucess of such spag westerns as "Fistful of
Dollars," "For a Few Dollars More," and "The Good, the Bad, and the
Ugly" (all starring Clint Eastwood), Italian director Sergio Leone made
a rather Hollywood film in what would seem to be a typical Hollywood
western.  I mean, it stars Henry Fonda.  But, being the cool-ass guy
that he was, he went and made a brilliant anti-Western Hollywood style,
most notably shown in his at first questionable casting of Fonda
as...the villain.
"Once Upon a Time in the West" has pretty much nothing to do with the
previous "Man With No Name Trilogy," except that it takes place in the
west and has a man with no name, this time playing a harmonica and
played by Charles Bronson instead of Eastwood.  Also, the lead character
in this film is not the man with the harmonica, but rather a woman
(Claudia Cardinale, who was in Fellini's "8 1/2" and the first and last
"Pink Panther" movies), although she's a whore who was giving up her
profession for a nice little marriage to a farmer in the west.
The film starts off with one of Leone's classic drawn-out scenes,
involving a 10 minute wait while the credits appear in interesting forms
and a group of killers wait for their victim to arrive on a train.  It's
Bronson who easily gets rid of his killers.  Cut to the farmer in the
west who's preparing a feast for his family and his new wife, who his
son is going to pick up at the train station.  But Fonda, a crook
working for a train entrepeneur, comes in with his bandits and kills the
whole family, save the little boy, who Fonda personally shoots (I can't
believe Henry would kill a kid).
The wife (Cardinale) arrives with no one to pick her up, discovers her
family is dead, and one by one runs into Bronson, Fonda, and eventually
a very hairy escaped con played by Jason Robards.  What will occur is a
kind of war between these three over her property, even though Robards
and Bronson form a partnership sometime into the film, while Fonda needs
to help his boss get rid of Cardinale so he can build train tracks
through her property (doesn't this sound a bit like the premise of
"Blazing Saddles?")
As in all of Leone's films, the plot twists over and over again, and
there are original gunfights (one involving bandits hidden all over a
town, all aiming for one guy, while another shooter decides to help the
lone target.  This film is fueled by hidden pasts, and
characterization.  We never know who Bronson really is until the end, in
a dazzling duel between he and Fonda.  And we also get the classic
drawn-out plot, sometimes not having any dialogue.
The acting is actually very good.  Cardinale, who's a good actress but
who's looks sometimes seemed to overpower her performance (i.e. "8
1/2"), gives a strong performance in a role that would usually be weak. 
Yes, she was a whore, but she's gotten past that point and finds herself
all alone at one point in the film.  Fonda, who had NEVER played a bad
guy in a film before, is surprisingly awesome in the villain role.  He's
creepy as hell in some scenes, especially where he shoots the kid (and
where he nearly has sex with Cardinale, but for other reasons - he's
like 50 or so in this).  And Bronson and Robards are awesome, as they
always are (okay, I think Bronson rocks).
"Once Upon a Time in the West" is a classic which has been kind of
underrated (I never even knew it existed until I started disecting the
career of Leone).  Evn so, it's still not as cool as Leone's previous
films, but is an all-around better film than all of them except "The
Good, the Bad, and the Ugly."  And, of course, it's a kick-ass flick.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Trollflöjten (1975)
Director: Ingmar Bergman
Writer: Ingmar Bergman (based on the opera by Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart and
the libretto by Emanuel Schikaneder)
Starring: Josef Köstlinger, Irma Urrila, Ulrik Cold, Birgit Nordin, Hĺkan
Hagegĺrd, Elisabeth Erikson, Ragnar Ulfung, Erik Säden, Britt-Marie Aruhn,
Kirsten Vaupel, Birgitta Smiding
Adapting a very playful opera doesn't seem like it wouldn't be something a
director like Ingmar Bergman would do, let alone be able to pull off. 
Bergman's fascinated with death, philosophy, and numerous other topics, and
his films are often creepy yet brilliant pontifications on these topics. 
Mozart's "The Magic Flute" is a light-hearted fantasy about love, not
really getting very deep at all, and appealing to anyone who just wants to
hear a fun story be told with beautiful music.  I'm not sure what initially
piqued Bergman's interest in this project.
"The Magic Flute" is, basically, a filmed opera, albeit a very staged one. 
I've never seen an opera film before, but from what I hear, they're either:
a) lavish films that set everything realistically, or b) those PBS offering
where they just tape the opera being done in an auditorium in front of an
audience.  But Bergman wants to do both of these simultaneously, and the
result is a film which looks staged, but has some really wacky special
effects that a staged opera wouldn't have.
Mozart wrote "The Magic Flute" for a vaudevillian theatre, and the story is
a silly one dealing with monsters, gods, and a couple people who are just
looking for love.  The story plays as a traditional fairy tale adults tell
their children before they go to bed (or at least used to in olden days
they did), and this is reflected in the way it is presented and told. 
Bergman doesn't shoot over everyone's heads and make this a darker opera
with lots of Kirkugaad or something; he merely tells it the way it was
supposed to be told.
As I said, the story's just silly, filled with lots of the traditional
cliches: there's the square-jawed hero, Tamino (Josef Köstlinger), who, in
the beginning, slays a dragon, and wins the respect of a trio of women
(Britt-Marie Aruhn, Kirsten Vaupel, and Birgitta Smiding), who are mightily
impressed by him and recommend him to the Queen of the Night (Birgit
Nordin), who enlists him to rescue her daughter, the beautiful Pamina (Irma
Urrila), from her alleged evil father, Sarastro (Ulrik Cold), who has taken
Pamina from her.
We are also introduced to the comic relief of the story, a bird-watcher
named Papageno (Hĺkan Hagegĺrd) who's only wish is to find some woman to be
his wife.  However, he eventually befriends Tamino, and is soon helping him
on his quest to locate Pamina, and also discovers that there is actually a
woman who would like to be his wife.  While his character isn't entirely
necessary to the plot, he does give the film a great kind of humor that
Tamino doesn't (Papageno is more of the humorous kind, who you rather laugh
at when he begins to feel suicidal then feel bad for, primarily because you
know he won't be able to go through with it).
The second half of the film deals with Tamino and Papageno in the lair of
Sarastro, who is an obese, scary-looking individual, and followed around by
an ominous group of priests.  He seems threatening and for awhile it seems
like he's the big villain, but he soon turns out to be a kind and gentle
human being, whilst the Queen of the Night turns out to be the villain. 
Ulrik Cold portrays Sarastro splendidly, exhibiting a very gentle side
which is easy to like.
Oh, and there's the magic flute, of course: a gift given to Tamino that
when played can tame any creature.  It comes in handy now and then,
rendering any fierce creature to be kind and playful.
As I said, the story's pure fluff, and luckily Bergman plays it that way. 
But that's not all he does with it.  Opera, like ballet and plays, has to
be able to live in the moment.  There's something cheap about seeing people
seeing entire operas on film like its reality, even though with musicals
its completely different (not even sure why, but I can take "An American in
Paris" seriously, but not this).  Bergman gives the entire film a sense of
immeadiacy by dividing the film into its Acts, including the Overture, and
always cutting to people in the audience, particularly a little girl who
watches with delight, smiles at the right times, and seems serious in the
more melodramatic areas.
We also get to see some behind-the-scenes work, which is all staged, like:
the guy playing Papageno almost missing his first entrance, and people
sitting in silent concentration during the intermission instead of fooling
around.  The entire opera takes place on a stage, and we see it constantly,
but Bergman takes us into the opera like the audience doesn't, showing us
more elaborate sets, and framing each shot perfectly so that we get to see
exactly what Bergman wants us to see.  One scene works perfectly: Tamino is
given a labor by Sarastro that he must do, which entails him not talking to
anyone; Pamina walks in to talk to him, and he tries desperately not to
talk to her, but she has no clue what he's doing.  Bergman cuts to both
their facial expressions one by one, getting both emotions on their own,
and giving the sense that they're seperated.
He also adds lots of other fun stuff, like sub-titles that the actors hold
for the audience (in sweedish, of course), and blatant sets and special
effects (look at the strings on the flute when it hovers over the
characters in one scene).  But he also shows us things we'd never see as
the audience, like the inside of a hellish cave where two characters have
to go in when for one of their labors to Sarastro.  And he always cuts to
the audience, letting us know that this is all happening before us (my
favorite is the overture where he shows numerous people's faces, which are
probably the same faces we have when watching this).
But Bergman still goes farther.  He concentrates on the story and the
acting, as well as the music.  Every performer has a magnificent voice that
perfectly highlights Mozart's brilliant score, but they also have the
acting ability to make it all seem real, particularly Hĺkan Hagegĺrd, who
plays the joyous Papageno.  Operas stars usually don't worry themselves
much with the acting, but instead think chiefly about the singing, which is
a very important part.  But Bergman knows that acting is equally important,
and he balances the two nicely.
Even the more plastic elements work well.  This film is stunning to look
at, with wonderful sets, interesting costumes, and yet another work of
gorgeous cinematography by Bergman fave, Sven Nykvist.  The entire feel of
the film is not dreary-looking or uneasy, but playful and magical.  This
gives the film the tone it should have, and even gives it the feel that its
taking place on a stage and not a sound studio.
But what "The Magic Flute" really does is capture the entire feel of the
story.  We feel happy when characters finally get what they want, we laugh
at Papageno's antics, we feel sad when characters are going through
something emotionally trivial, and we feel bowled over by some of the more
suspenseful parts of the story.  We also get the music perfectly done for
us.  This is a film where every single aspect of what opera should be comes
together.  I'm not really a fan of opera, yet "The Magic Flute" was
something I couldn't take my eyes off of.  And it's even more suprising
because it was directed by someone like Bergman, who went out on a limb,
and did something he never did before.  The amazing parts is how well this
holds up to his other works, even if its not as philosophical or didactic.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Holllywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Ran (1985)
Director: Akira Kurosawa
Writers: Masato Ide, Hideo Oguni, and Akira Kurosawa (based on the play
"King Lear" by William Shakespeare)
Starring: Tatsuya Nakadai, Akira Terao, Jinpachi Nezu, Daisuke Ryu, Mieko
Harada, Yoshiko Miyazaki, Masayuki Yui, Peter
"Ran" opens peacefully, with numerous static shots of gorgeous green hills,
but at the same time there are shots of soldiers waiting for god knows what
and forboding music that starts and stops, creating an eerie, unsettling
atmosphere.  It's still almost tough to believe that by the end, almost all
of the chief characters will die horrific deaths, and thousands of
innocents will be mercilessly slaughtered.
"Ran" is loosely based on "King Lear," the great Shakespeare play about
that point in your life when you look back at everything you've done and
hope to be able to rely on all of it as a backbone for rest and relaxation
in the last years of one's life.  When King Lear looked back, though, he
saw that everything was not well.  In fact, he discovered his justful
arrogance let loose to ignorance, and that all of the horrible things he
had done in his life and all of those things that were the opposite of what
he believed all came to haunt him simulataneously.
Looking at this story, which has been told countless times, it hardly seems
like it needed to be told again, not the least in the form of a classic
samurai melodrama as directed by Japan's greatest director, the
recently-late Akira Kurosawa, who had directed such masterpieces as "The
Seven Samurai" and "Rashomon," amongst numerous others.  But then again,
Kurosawa's films were never mere "samurai melodramas," not even his most
popcorn-y films as "The Hidden Fortress."
Kurosawa directed "Ran" at the age of 75, nearly blind, relying on others
to help him conceive his shots, and allowing for an effortless R rating
with the most graphic, gory violence he had ever done, not even in "The
Seven Samurai."  His reason for directing this was, most likely, out of
fear that he was in fact Lear himself, as is the fear of anyone who has
ever read or seen the play performed before.  With decades of films that
were almost consecutively praised by critics and audiences alike as
masterpieces, perhaps he was fearing that his numerous accomplishments
would give way to haughty arrogance, and that perhaps there were things
going on behind his back that he didn't know.
The story itself deals with an aging Japanese Lord, Hidetora (Tatsuya
Nakadai), who decides at the point in his life when he feels that he has
achieved everything he has wanted to achieve, and that everything is fair
in his land, to finally retire.  He decides to divide his land into three,
shelved out to his three sons, Taro, Jiro, and Saburo (Akira Terao,
Jinpachi Nezu, and Daisuke Ryu, respectively), with the most prominent
lands given in order of age.  In one scene, he decides to demonstrate the
fallacy that this will all work out well by showing them that one arrow can
easily be broken, but when three are together, it is much more difficult to
break.
Sadly, though, Saburo disagrees with his father, and will have no part in
it.  Hidetora, without hardly a pause, banishes his son, as well as anyone
who stands up for him.  But when he tries living with each of his two sons
he still holds in high adoration, he discovers that they have different
plans, and they soon drive him away one by one.  Without any sons to fall
back on, he retires with his army and numerous concubines to Saburo's old
deserted castle, where a ghastly battle occurs over his possession between
his army and the armies of Taro and Jiro, both who now only think of him as
someone in the way and not even as their father.
Joined only by the faithful comic relief, Kyoami, the Fool (played by
Peter...just Peter), and an old assistant, Tango (Masayuki Yui), Hidetora
ends up wandering around the landscape, slowly but surely growing madder
and madder.  But as he loses his sanity, things continue to get worse
around him.  A plot develops after Taro is killed in battle between his
widow, Lady Kaede (Mieko Harada), and Jiro, who begins to control the
weakest brother, and an old wound opens when Hidetora stumbles upon an old
foe who's eyes he poked out when he was a kid.
The entire story has been told many many times before, but it really needs
someone who understands what this story entails.  There are many a
contradiction in the telling of the story, such as the optimism of a good
life's led bringing about a pessimism of everything to come.  Kurosawa has
no doubtedly had these thoughts, knowing the chronicle of his life, and he
ends up telling "Ran" with an understanding of these paradoxes, as well as
with some major opposites.  There are two major battle sequences in this
film, for example, and the way they're handled directly contradict the way
the other scenes are handled.
His battle scenes are gory, gratuitous, unevenly paced, and merciless. 
Most importantly, very little is accomplished in them.  But most of the
film is filled with chamber-like scenes of people talking, but very much
happens.  Take for example a scene where Lady Kaede confronts Jiro about
her husband's death, and during the course of the scene, threatens his
life, seduces him, and totally usurps any power he ever had.  As such, it
takes great patience to watch "Ran," since everything is told at a
leisurely pace, disappointing anyone who thought that "Ran" was just "King
Lear, only with samurais and gore."
But the reason "Ran" really works is because it's a great story that is
told exceptionally well.  Kurosawa's style really works becuase it allows
us to look at the drama of the story.  The reason we should be motivated to
sit through all 160 minutes without a break should not be because every
hour and 10 minutes, there's a really nifty battle scene.  It's because it
transcends all that and really tells the story.  A film is never more
boring when it's filled with shallow characters taking the easy way out of
very dilemna they're charged with.  "Ran" gives its characters numerous
connundrums, and by the end, everything has been dealt with so badly that
it becomes exactly what the title translates to: Chaos.
Watching "Ran," it's easy to see why Kurosawa is so heavily received
commercially and critically: he doesn't bullshit his audience with a style
that ultimately overcomes the story, and he always worries about the way
his characters are handled.  Visually, the design is incredible.  The film
is beautifully shot, and the color scheme in this film is brilliant. 
During the battle scenes, each army is fitted with a certain color, and
when they clash together, it's one of the most breathtaking images ever to
grace the screen.  His story-telling is wonderful: he paces the film slowly
so that all the elements effortlessly come out, and never feel forced. 
Watching Hidetora's life crumble around upon him is simply stunning, and it
could have easily been ruined by direction that was quick and jolting.
I've seen "Ran" twice, once by myself, and another time in a small college
theatre with a crowd who was less enthused than I was about the way the
film was made.  "Ran" holds up for multiple viewings because of the passion
that it is told with.  We can sense the pain Kurosawa has when he tells the
story of Hidetora, so much that he shoots most of everything from a safe
distance, maybe hinting that he hopes we never have to arrive at a point
like Hidetora's, or Lear's.  But when watching this, when we see how he
deftly controls his characters and his scenes, and how everything is told
with the right amount of looseness and structure, then I guess that at this
point, Kurosawa ironically had very little to worry about.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Casino (1995)
Director: Martin Scorsese
Writers: Nicholas Pileggi and Martin Scorsese (based on the book
"Casino: Love and Honor in Las Vegas by Nicholas Pileggi)
Starring: Robert DeNiro, Sharon Stone, Joe Pesci, Frank Vincent, James
Woods, Don Rickles, Alan King, Kevin Pollak, L.Q. Jones, Dick Smothers,
John Bloom, Pasquale Cajano, Catherine Scorsese, Melissa Prophet, Bill
Allison, Frankie Avalon, Steve Allen, Jerry Vale
Martin Scorsese has a knack for making a film fascinating from start to
finish, while still presenting an interesting and brilliant take on
something that's familiar and cliched.  "After Hours" was a brilliant
everything-bad-that-could-happen-happens film, "Cape Fear" was a
fantastic stalker thriller, and "The Age of Innocence" put an ingenius
twist on the costume drama, stripping it down to its bone.  "Casino" is
your brilliant Vegas flick, stripping that down to the bone, and
exposing what makes its so alluring.
On first glance, this film resembles Scorsese's "Goodfellas."  We have
some of the same actors in the leads, a female who causes a rift, lots
of swearing and graphic violence, a narration undertoned with a great
soundtrack of oldies and rock tunes, a rise and fall structure, and a
cameo from Marty's mom, Catherine (but she's in most of his films
anyway).  But this is purely superficial, and on closer examination,
it's nothing like it.
While "Goodfellas" showed that the allure of the mafia was that you
could basically get away with anything anytime you wanted, "Casino"
shows that the allure of Vegas is because of the mafia.  When you go
there (though I've never been there), you get the feeling that you're
living life on the edge, playing against the rules, and if you're caught
cheating, you could easily be killed.  Of course, it's not like that
anymore, but "Casino" takes us back in time to the glory days of Vegas,
when it was still run by the mafia.
It does this by telling us a little melodrama, which is something we've
heard before, but is given a magnificent backdrop that it can affect. 
Our protagonist is Sam Rothstein (Robert DeNiro), a bone fide gambler
who knows everything about it.  He is chosen by the mafiasos who run
Vegas from far away to run one of their biggest casinos: The Tangiers. 
For the first hour or so, we get an in-depth introduction to this world,
which tells us all the inside material, and just engulfs us into it so
we can feel the right way when it begins to collapse piece by piece. 
One of the best things about Scorsese is his attention to every single
detail about the worlds he creates.  I have a feeling if this guy ever
did a documentary, it'd make millions.
But two people enter Sam's life, and begin to tear apart the foundation
of Vegas: Sam's old tempermental bud, Nicky Santoro (Joe Pesci), not far
from his Tommy character in "Goodfellas;" and Ginger McKenna (Sharon
Stone), a con artist/hooker who seduces Sam without much strain, but
begins to selfishly tear it apart due to some of her weaknesses.  Even
though she ends up marrying Sam early in the film, she still has a sick
devotion to her old pimp/friend, Lester Diamond (James Woods, at his
sleaziest), who begins to spark some nerves in Sam.
While this plot is, yes, cliche-ridden, it is nevertheless fascinating,
and works flawlessly with the backdrop.  The mafia, after all, can get
too greedy and selfish for their own good, and can self-destruct due to
just one person's slip up or stupidity.  Over the course of the three
hour film, this is what happens, but the film makes us care for the
characters and for what we have been shown as Vegas that it becomes
devastating when it crumbles at the end.
This is the magic of Scorsese: to make a film which is so real that if
anything happens to it, it has almost the same impact on the audience as
it does to the characters on the screen.  The film is never boring, and
is never a film where you continually check your watch for the time. 
Scorsese is a master at seducing his audience into watching his world
unfold, and even the first hour where very little action happens, it's
probably the best time you'll have at the movies for a long time.
Every scene is carefully plotted out, and every shot is framed
perfectly.  As many people have once said, "You haven't seen 'Casino'
till you've seen the Widescreen Version," and that's true.  If you see
his cropped pan-and-scan version, you're missing out on half the movie. 
You miss a lot of the great swooping camera work that Scorsese is famous
for, and that's one of the best things about watching Scorsese.  No
other director has utlized the camera so well as he has.
The soundtrack, while not as great as the one for "Goodfellas," is
nevertheless amazing, and enhances every scene it is used in.  I
particularly love his usage of vintage Stones songs, with whom he has an
obvious affection for.  But this time, he actually goes so far as to use
Devo's remake of "Satisfaction," which plays throughout the ending (a
note should be made that he also uses their signature hit, "Whip It"). 
My favorite scene in the movie, where two cheaters are caught and dealt
with appropriately, is enhanced to perfect heights with a great Rod
Stewart song (not sure of the name), which is accentuates every beat of
the scene.  Scorsese would also make a great music video director
(though he did do Michael Jackson's "Bad").
The acting, as always, is amazing.  DeNiro plays a more reserved
character this time, seeming to be in perpetual deep thought, but always
looking tough.  Pesci is predictably awesome, even if his character is
very reminiscent of the one in "Goodfellas," and even if he has trouble
with nailing his accent (it's Bostonian, then Long Islandian, then
Kentuckian...).  And Sharon Stone, whom I thought would suck when
compared to these two leads, is actually awesome.  She hits the right
note of her character, making her seductive and lovable, yet still
possessing all her flaws.  Her decent into madness is also very well
done.
In the supporting cast, we have Don Rickles acting surprisingly reserved
and controlled in the role of the manager of the Tangiers, Alan King
also acting very reserved and controlled in the role of one of the chief
of staff of the Tangiers, and Kevin Pollak...whew...also acting very
reserved and controlled in the role of another chief of staff at the
Tangiers.  So Scorsese does have good control over his comedians in
serious roles (not to mention, Dick Smothers is a hypocritical senator,
and Joe Bob Briggs himself - as John Bloom: his real name? - plays a
stupid hick working as the slot machine manager because his uncle is a
town commissioner).  And James Woods goes pretty wild with his role.  No
shock there.
Special note should be made to Frank Vincent, who has been in Scorsese's
"Raging Bull" and "Goodfellas" in smaller roles, and in both of them,
was beaten up horrifically by Pesci's respective characters.  In this
one, he finally gets a bigger part, and also his revenge on Pesci...
Scorsese is the real king of the movie though.  Like Tarantino, Woody
Allen, and Kubrick, he attracts crowds just because of his name in the
directing slot.  His films are, for the most part, incredible
masterpieces which astound and complex people for as long as they live
after they've seen them.  "Casino" has some flaws, but it is one of the
most fascinating films he's ever made.  While taking an interesting
stance on the allure of Vegas, he also creates a film which is
engrossing from start to finish, and not many directors can hold their
audiences in their grip like he can.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Jackal, The (1997)
Director: Michael Caton-Jones
Writer: Chuck Pfarrer (based on the screenplay "The Day of the Jackal" by
Kenneth Ross," which was in turn based on the novel by Frederick Forsyth)
Starring: Bruce Willis, Richard Gere, Sidney Poitier, Diane Venora,
Mathilda May, J.K. Simmons, Richard Lineback, John Cunningham, Jack Black,
Tess Harper
About an hour or so into "The Jackal," a character wandered around as
people were being shot at in a big suspense sequence, and one of the
audience members in the theatre I saw it in shouted out "I hope she gets
killed now!"  At that point it hit me: I didn't care for any of the
characters being played by actors I didn't really like.  When the sole
reason you care about a character being played by Sidney Poitier in a
suspense film is because he's being played by Sidney Poitier, you know
something's rotten in the state of Denmark.
Every year, a couple films like this are released.  You know: the cheap,
action packed international espionnage film, featuring a semi-promising
premise, some big-name actors (usually Bruce Willis), and the hopes that
some audience members will forget the Cold War ended several years ago. 
This was the third one of '97, following the very lackluster "The Saint,"
which featured an amoral costume changing Bond wannabe; and the
surprisingly fun "The Peacemaker," featuring Clooney and Kidman trying to
stop an almost untraceable villain.  "The Jackal" tries to mix both
elements.  And you thought "The Saint" was bad.
"The Jackal" is loosely (VERY loosely, I hope) based on the 1973 Fred
Zimmerman classic that I've yet to see, "The Day of the Jackal," which
featured (apparently) a suave hitman called The Jackal, played by Edward
Fox, trying to assasinate Charles DeGaule.  Well, welcome to the 90s, where
a sorta suave hitman, also called The Jackal (Bruce Willis), trying to kill
the head of the FBI...or is he?  
After being hired by a Russian mob lord as a bit of vengeance for the
murder of his brother (killed in the opening scenes), the Jackal romps all
over the Northen Hemisphere, from Helsinki to Virginia, setting up an
elaborate scheme wherein he'll be able to assasinate this person and still
get away to live in seclusion.  And like The Saint, The Jackal changes his
look over and over and over again to elude people.
The agent working on the case, Cater Preston (Sidney Poitier - yes, that
Sidney Poitier), working with a Russian agent, Valentina Koslova (Diane
Venora - Lady Capulet from "Romeo + Juliet"), gives up early on and meets
with an ex-IRA man, Declan Mulqueen (Richard Gere, putting up some tight
competition between himself and Brad Pitt for worst fake Irish accent of
'97) who's in a Massachusetts jail, but who has apparently seen The Jackal,
who has been eluding the law forever.  Soon, he's out working with the two
untrusting agents, and trying to help them catch him.
There are numerous problems with the film, and which one is the biggest one
is pretty impossible to put a finger on.  The film is supposed to be a big
suspense thriller, but save a couple moments, the film never achieves
suspense, or even a sense of intrigue.  Sure, the big assasination attempt
is a bit cool looking and even slightly tense, but every other scene in the
film is too short and too dull to register.  The film never picks up enough
to become a thrilling experience, or even an entertaining one.  It doesn't
help that the plot is designed to be complex, but falls into so many
problems, like plot holes and unbelievable circumstances.
The script of "The Jackal" is a complete mess, mostly because it can't
decide what it wants to focus on.  Is this a film about a man trying to
find redemption by catching a nasty killer?  Is it a film about a nasty,
amoral hitman who's in everything for the money?  Or is it a combination of
both?  "The Jackal" aims for the latter, but never focuses in on either
character.  The connection between the two feels completely edited, so much
that in a scene when The Jackal turns around and notices Declan, you wonder
how he recognized him so fast.  The worst part is the little past they try
to give Declan, most notably his relationship with an old girlfriend,
Isabella (Mathilda May), given so little screen time that you almost forget
her character exists until she pops up every now and then.
The supporting characters are worse.  Sidney Poitier is given a completely
unplayable role, that of a man who is just stern sometimes, and other times
more giving and likable.  What is Poitier doing here?  He's one of the best
living actors!  Does he really need to waste his time doing drivel like
this?  Diane Venora's Russian character is almost as bad, with a cigarette
perpetually in her mouth, and a plastered on expressionless facade.  It's
not that anyone's bad here; it's that they have nothing to do.
The plot is a joke, feeling like it was pasted together by someone in
post-production who dropped each scene on the floor and pasted them
together quickly so it could be released on time.  The Jackal himself is
not even much of an international villain.  There are several times where
he's in a tight situation and makes things worse for himself, the only
explanation being that the filmmakers wanted to toss in a cheap thrill. 
Take a scene where he's being followed by some agents into a parking
garage: he quickly sprays his car another color, and adds a solvent that if
touched kills the person who touched it.  Doesn't killing someone ATTRACT
more attention than it does DISTRACT?  And does he think dying his hair
bottle blond makes him fit in in a public place?  Geez!
Is there anything good here?  Well...a couple things.  I did like Willis's
icy expressions; he may not have been real suave or anything, but some of
his looks are worth a chuckle.  Richard Gere has a couple of good moments,
making his character as likable as he possibly could have.  And a couple
sequences are kicky in that kind of proposterous, completely inane but fun
kinda way, most notably: a sequence where he tests out a new gun on an
annoying gun builder (Jack Black); and a bit where he seduces a gay
Washington man, which has its share of a couple good jokes, most particular
a kiss by Willis.  But none of these elevate the film any higher than it
could go; they're just little distractions along the way to amuse us mildly
then toss us back into the world of dullness and stupidity that is "The
Jackal."
Director Michael Caton-Jones (who directed the far superior "Rob Roy") has
made a film that is made very couple months, one that is unentertaining,
unintriguing, and pretty much cold, but will nevertheless make money
because, hey, the trailers do make it look like it may be fun in that kind
of retro-Clancy kinda way.  Every now and then, the filmmakers get it right
("Clear and Present Danger," which was enormous fun in that smart kinda
way), but "The Jackal" is an example of when they go completely wrong.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Pecker (1998)
Writer/Director: John Waters
Starring: Edward Furlong, Christina Ricci, Lili Taylor, Mary Kay Place,
Mark Joy, Brendan Sexton III, Jean Schertler, Martha Plimpton, Lauren
Hulsey, Patty Hearst, Bess Armstrong, Greg Gorman
If you look at the statue of Benjamin Franklin that stands above all the
buildings in Philadelphia from a certain perspective, it seems as if he has
a giant erect penis.  Looking at things from a different perspective and
discovering humor in them is one of the things that make life tolerable,
and the lead character in this film, nicknamed Pecker for his bizarre
eating habits (yeah, right), sees this, a habit which is introduced in one
of the film's first images, that of a statue of George Washington looked at
from a different perspective that makes is eerily similar to the Franklin
statue in Philadelphia.  Is there a connection between all the stautes of
these Revolutionary Era heroes?
Played by Edward Furlong, Pecker is a cheerful teenage photographer living
in Baltimore who takes pictures so much that whenever he needs Kodak film,
he sets up an elaborate shoplifting scam from the local grocery store. 
Using a small camera he got from his mom's Thrift store, he takes pictures
of anything even remotely interesting, and has become a bit of a celebrity
around town because of it.
Of course, it helps that he has pretty interesting subjects.  His
girlfriend, Shelly (Christina Ricci, who has officially become "la reine
d'art house"), is a laundromat-nazi who occasionally pulls down the zipper
on her blouse so Pecker can take a pic of her cleavage.  His younger
sister, Chrissy (Lauren Hulsey), is a notorious sugar fiend.  His older
sister, Tina (Martha Plimpton), works at a gay strip bar named the "Fudge
Palace."  His father (Mark Joy) works at a bar which is losing business
because a lesbian tittie bar has opened across the street from him, causing
him to bitch about how it's against the law to show beaver whilst serving
liquor.  His best friend, Matt (Brendan Sexton III, from "Welcome to the
Dollhouse"), is a masterful thief.  His grandma (Jean Schertler) has a
statue of the Virgin Mary that talks...with grandma pulling a switch on its
back that moves its lips and doesn't seem to realize she's doing
ventriloquist work for the voice.  And there's his mom (Mary Kay Place),
who happily works at the Thrift Store and boasts she can dress anyone
nicely for a mere quarter.
When Pecker shows a free art show at his work, a New York art dealer, Rorey
(Lili Taylor), shows up and immeadiately loves his work, and gets him a
show up in New York.  The critics and art freaks love his work, dubbing him
"a more humane Diane Arbus."  Pecker has become a little Andy Warhol: a
young artist who's discovered from a small home town.  But Warhol stayed in
New York, while Pecker finds he has to decide what he wants to do.  His art
ends up doing more harm to his family than good, but on the other hand,
he'll be the toast of the New York art world and will be set for life.
"Pecker"'s the latest from John Waters, the hilarious man with a paper-thin
moustache, and known for his ghastly disgusting films, the most notorious
being "Pink Flamingoes," the film that shocked the world over 25 years ago
with images such as a woman eating shit and a song and dance done by a pair
of testicles.  I've, sadly enough, never seen one of his films, but have
come to admire the guy from interviews, articles, and most brilliantly, a
guest appearance on "The Simpsons" that was nothing short of absolute
hilarity.
But with "Pecker," he must have calmed down.  A lot.  Sure, he shocks us
with a couple jokes.  There's a shot of what has to be the closest image of
a woman's pubic hair in an R rated film.  There's the image of two rats
fucking.  There's the hilarious introduction to a gay-bar fetish known as
"tea bagging" (guess what it entails).  And I almost don't need to mention
that the title is the best of the year (after seeing it, you can tell your
friends "Yeah, I just saw John Waters' 'Pecker'").  Of course, when a
film's title is the film's best joke, you're really in trouble, and after
these few jokes, varying in hilarity, that's really about it as far as
jokes that are actually humorous.  Waters has become infamous for making
people laugh with disgusting images and scenes, those which cross over into
what is commonly referred to as "bad taste," but which can easily become
comedy to anyone who doesn't always need subtlety with their humor.
But that's not what's really wrong with this film.  We do expect something
extremely shocking from John Waters, but it would still be fine if he did
calm down and made a film that was hilarious without resorting to NC-17
tactics.  The problem is it's just not very funny.  Nor is it subtle. 
Waters has created a film here that really could be very hilarious.  Take
the joke about the Virgin Mary statue - there are countless jokes that
could be really funny about this.  Waters uses about two of them.  And
they're not really the really funny ones.
Instead of really funny humor, with scenes that are so vile and gross that
we just can't help but kick the chairs in front of us with fitful laughing,
we get scenes that are so blatant in their message and so jaw-droppingly
unfunny that we can't help but just sit there, staring at it, and wondering
what Waters thought was exactly humorous about them.  In one scene, Shelly
discovers Pecker kissing Rorey in his basement, and a chase ensues between
Pecker and Shelly which ends up in a voting booth (I guess when you have to
vote, you have to vote), where they have loud, physical, and clothed sex. 
Just not funny.
It's sad, too, that Waters can't do satire without subtlety.  His
characters say exactly what the problem is whenever the problem arises,
like "My pictures are turning my life inside out."  And while the culture
shock between the odd balls of Baltimore and the art world of New York is
occasionally funny (when coming home from New York, some Baltimorians kiss
the street), it's shots at the art world are stale.  As if they actually
needed skewering.  It would be funnier if a new angle was taken or if the
Baltimorians were more humorous.
"Pecker" may be pretty much bad and unfunny, but it's not totally
unworthwhile.  Some of the performances, particularly the ones by Christina
Ricci and Mary Kay Place, are right on.  There are some moments that are
oddly funny, like a bizarre scene where a social worker makes a house call
to put the younger sister on Ridlin.  These are what redeem it slightly. 
But when there's a dinner scene where Pecker makes a lengthy, corny speech
where he thanks everyone from his hometown for inspiring him while there
are numerous annoying side comments, and this scene is not the worst scene
in the film, well, that just doesn't leave a whole lot to recommend.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Scarlet Letter, The (1995)
Director: Roland Joffé
Writer: Douglas Day Stewart (based "freely" on the novel by Nathaniel
Hawthorne)
Starring: Demi Moore, Gary Oldman, Robert Duvall, Lisa Jolliff-andoh,
Edward Hardwicke, Robert Prosky, Roy Dotrice, Joan Plowright, Malcolm
Storry, Dana Ivey
My theory when watching a film adaptation of a novel, whatever it may be,
is that the film can do anything it wants with it; it just has to work as a
film itself.  After all, if a film is EXACTLY like the book, why are we
wasting our time watching it?  Can't we just pick up the book and get a
better picture of everything?  When discussing this, I always bring up
Stanley Kubrick's adaptation  of Stephen King's "The Shining," a film that
is like the book for about the first 50 or so pages, and then takes off in
a completely different direction, yet is much more fun and all-around
better than the book, which soon pulls all of its punches and ends in a
manner that goes beyond cheap.
The main thing that this version of "The Scarlet Letter" has in common with
the famous novel by Nathaniel Hawthorne is the title and the basic set-up. 
It still tells the story of Hester Prynne, a puritan woman who has an
affair with the local priest which results in a baby, and is forced to wear
a scarlet-colored "A" on her chest to show everyone that she has sinned. 
And it features all of the same characters, and ALMOST ends the same way,
but that's about all that these two have in common.
This, in my estimation, would be totally fine if it all worked out as a
film.  If this could become a good film by doing what it does with its
source, then by all means I would personally have no problem with it.  But
I have many problems with this.  Instead of being a symbolism-laden parable
about hypocrisy and set-morals, it decides to become a condemnation of
Puritan lifestyles, not because they're a bunch of hypocrites, but because,
hey, they won't have sex!
That's barely the least of the problems.  I wish there was just one main
thing wrong with this film, but there are so many problems, ranging in
size, that this film just completely topples over, and instead of being the
"passionate" and "erotic" story it tries to be, it becomes "dull" and
"laughable."  Are we supposed to be moved in any way by that scene where
Hester is bathing and her young female servant girl decides to take a peak
at her through a hole in the door?  Introducing interracial homosexual
undertones would be fine if it fit at all with the rest of the film.  Here,
it just induces laughing.
I'm actually somewhat shocked that this film is so terrible, because apart
from the laughably horrible casting of Demi Moore as Hester (!!!), you have
what is a really competent cast...or at least is supposed to be competent. 
You have Gary Oldman, a totally amazing actor, in a very strong role,
perhaps the toughest role in the entire story: Reverend Arthur Dimmesdale,
the priest who boinks Hester, whose identity is not revealed, and who is
forced to live what with he thinks is guilt for "lowering" himself to
having an affair.  You also have Robert Duvall, one of the best living
actors, as Hester's husband, Roger, who is believed to be dead in the
beginning, but who comes back to disguise himself as someone else and to
try and torture not only Hester but Arthur as well.  And in smaller roles
you have the normally very competent Robert Prosky as a head servant of the
society, and the great Joan Plowright as a woman who is believed to be a
witch because she has a dirty mouth.  Look away from Demi Moore's name in
first bill and you see what is a great cast in what could have been a great
movie.
But alas, they have opted to remove some of the parts of the book which
really would have helped this out, primarily because it's a big budget
(somewhere in the range of $60 million) Hollywood fiasco, and since many
Hollywood distributors take their audiences for idiots (look at "Godzilla"
if you don't believe me, but just take my word for it), they have to dumb
it down.  The novel starts off when the "A" is placed on Hester's chest,
long after the affair; the film spends a ghastly hour filling in the
beginning, trying to make this a romance, even though the main reason
Hester loves Dimmesdale is because she saw him swimming naked (!!!), and
the main reason Dimmesdale loves Hester is because she has a big chest
(they had silicon back then?  okay, bad joke).
The good thing about the book was it didn't give a shit about all that;
it's more concerned with the aftermath, and revolves around the inner
problems the characters face.  Sure, the book spends hundreds of pages
dealing with inner toil, but the thing is it worked.  Spending an hour on
the romance, especially as silly as it is presented here, is a big fat
waste of time, and the second hour, instead of dealing with the
aforementioned inner toils, reduces itself to melodramatic and ridiculous
action.
And then there's the ending.  The book ends in a way that is literally
proposterous, but is simultaneously sad enough to become tragic and
satirical.  This film opts for a "happy" ending, with a big action showdown
between Indians (!!! - how many time do I have to do this?) and the
Puritans, featuring fire, carnage, and lots of people running around
screaming.  It also aims for its totally ridiculous and ignorant message,
that the Puritans were evil because they tried to stop sex and illicit
affairs when the Puritans were really evil because they were a bunch of big
fat hypocrites.
Not that the film is totally without merit.  Gary Oldman, despite having to
do some really ridiculous stuff, does give what would be a good
performance.  You can almost see him trying to bring out some of the
emotional and satirical depth of the novel in certain scenes, as if he
actually took the time to read the book and understand what it's about
(because we all can tell that no one else did, unless you count
screenwriter Douglas Day Stewart reading a couple pages of the Cliffs Notes
for this).  Duvall, try as he must, actually comes off as laughable, giving
what easily ranks as his worst performance, though in all reality it wasn't
entirely his part.  However, as we are speaking about acting, I suppose I
should mention Joan Plowright, who should be embarrassed for her
performance in this: she comes off as if she took muscle relaxers before
every shoot.  And there's Demi...I won't even waste the time.
The really weird thing about this is that anytime anyone mentions this book
to anyone who went to high school, including me, you get a nasty look. 
This really is one of the most painful and excruciating novels to read, and
it's all the more worse because you're forced to read it and disect it. 
Hawthorne may have been able to weave a complex and satirical story which
has great ideas, but for any entertaining value, this comes up snake eyes. 
Yet when you watch this film, you automatically yearn for the novel and how
it didn't treat you like a moron, and didn't come off as being completely
dull.  At the least you could get into a debate over morals or hypocrisy
with this, which is a lot better than talking about how you didn't like
what is basically a really dull, overly-melodramatic, and completely
incompetent love story.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Play It Again, Sam (1972)
Director: Herbert Ross
Writer: Woody Allen (based on his play)
Starring: Woody Allen, Diane Keaton, Tony Roberts, Jerry Lacy
Okay, I admit it.  I've tried to flirt with girls using movie cliches.  
There I said it.  Does it work?  Kinda, sometimes.  But I'm an insecure 
neurotic, and I think they really aren't gonna dig me if I be myself.  
Now that my self-analyzation is done, I will say that Woody Allen's play 
"Play it Again, Sam" features a protgonist who's probably more insecure 
than I am (or anyone else really) or loves movies and thinks that his 
role model for being a "swinger" should be Humphrey Bogart.  And much of 
the film has the protagonist chatting with a figmented Bogart, with the 
latter giving the former advice like, "I never knew a woman who didn't 
understand a slap in the face or a slug form a .45," or "Somewheres in 
life you got turned around; Its her job to smell good for you."  
Woody didn't direct this wonderfully engaging romantic comedy, as many 
believe.  Verstatile director, Herbert Ross, who can direct neurotic 
comedies like this and "The Goodbye Girl" and still do fluff like 
"Footloose" and "Steel Magnolias" did, and he somehow manages to get the 
right feel for it, even if it takes place in Woody's vision of the 10th 
ring of Dante's Hell - California (San Francisco to be exact).  And this 
is the first time we ever see Diane and Woody together as a comic duo on 
celluloid (although I think they did it on Broadway together).  And Tony 
Roberts is also on for the first time with Woody as (GASP!) his best 
friend.
The plot centers around Allan (the Woodster), who has just broken up 
with his wife, Nancy (Susan Anspatch).  He's incredily depressed and 
he's a major hypochondriac ("I'm turning into an aspirin junkie.  Soon 
I'll be burning the cotton at the top to get the extra").  He's also a 
film geek (making us look good) who writes for a film magazine.  In the 
beginning, the film shows the final scene of "Casablanca," then pulls 
back to show Allan watching in literal awe with his mouth wide open at 
the greatness of the film.  Once the film's over, he leaves and his 
voice-over narration tells us the exposition (which I have already done 
for you, thank you very much).
His best friend, Dick (Tony), and his wife, Linda (Diane), come over to 
help him but he just can't get over his wife leaving him.  They somehow 
manage to get him to try to move on by setting him up on dates.  The 
first one is a comical disaster, with him overdoing everything and being 
so nervous that he ends up breaking records, lamps and knocking down 
chairs and what-not in his messy apartment.  His second one, with a 
famed nymphomaniac, ends tragically (and ironically) when he tries to 
take advantage of her.  
Meanwhile, he becomes closer to Linda as Dick is a workaholic and is 
always leaving his number at his office wherever he goes (in a running 
gag).  And before we know it, Dick has gone off on a business trip and 
Allan and Linda realize they are in love...or at least temporary/sorta 
love.  They sleep together and plan to live together and all, but he 
realizes he would be hurting a friend...and that he is in "Casablanca." 
 In one of the funniest scenes of the whole 70s as a decade, Allan gives 
Linda the "Maybe not today, maybe not tomorrow..." speech from the 
finale of "Casablanca" (Linda even dons the Ingrid Bergman hat as she 
leaves her apartment to chase after Dick).  In the end, Allan has moved 
on and realized to be himself.
It would be fluff, but it is handled so hysterially that it has been 
given the title of "classic."  This film came right in the middle of his 
slapstick period, so that may be the reason why Woody didn't direct it. 
 But his writing is perfectly on and his knack for creating comical 
situations and realistically funny characters is also as good as his 
later material.  This is one of his most perfectly realized films, even 
if he didn't direct it, and also one of my favorites.

Title
Review for Kids (1995)
I think I like the ideals behind Larry Clark's "Kids" more than the
actual movie.  Being amongst the generation that Clark is compaining
about (actually more like bitching), I can first hand say that my
generation is rude, self-absorbed, uncautionary, and that we mostly feel
invincible most of the time.  We do drugs, drink a lot, and have tons of
sex, sometimes unprotected (condoms being a global franchise instead of
a means of real protection these days).  What Larry Clark does is
totally overexaggerate the problem, hinting it as apocalyptic, offering
no solution and no hope.  It's a boring, uncomfortable, one-dimensional
film.
"Kids" has no real plot, which is okay, except one small one: Jennie
(Chloe Sevigny, who apparently goes to the same college as I do) finds
out she is HIV-positive, despite having had relations with only one guy:
Telly (Leo Fitzpatrick), a slack-jawed schmuck of a kid who talks like
he's mentally retarded...yet is still the resident Cassanova.  So she
goes around the Big Apple, going to people's houses, attending parties,
etc, in hopes of finding him and telling him before he beds someone
else.
The film is filled with scenes of young teenagers having sex, fooling
around, drinking, doing lot of drugs, stealing, beating innocent men to
near-death with skateboards, swimming in underwear, talking casually
about sex (and how condoms make your penis shrink), and all that.  It's
filled completely with this stuff, and there is no one out there who's
the voice of reason, hope, or even common sense.  Even the girl who
seems intelligent, and who's parents' strictness with her might have
paid off, is easily seduced by the moronic Telly, and gives up her
virginity way too easily for someone she's structured to be.  And Jennie
is stupid enough to "accidentally" take something which prohibits her
from moving quickly enough to stop Telly from sleeping with more
chicks.  The things the kids do in this movie are as plot devices, not
really because they're that way.
Sure, some parts are very good.  I liked Chloe Sevigny as a whole. 
She's really the only very good part of it, acting wonderfully, and
showing a lot of stored-up emotion.  I liked some of the other
actresses, and even the script sounds kind of real now and then.  A lot
of the time, though, it sounds so fake and fabricated that any
"grittiness" it tries to present is lost.  I also liked how the scene
where Telly is screwing his last girl for the evening (there are two in
the same day), it felt scarier than the first one since you knew that he
was HIV-positive, and this innocent little virgin was contracting it as
well.
But that's about all that's good about this film.  It's view on the
subject is completely naive and never backed-up.  Larry Clark, who has
done photographs of kids in the city, claims to know exactly what kids
these days are like.  He thinks that they're all overly-precocious,
naive, and just plain stupid.  He needs to go back and do some more
research.  He has taken a problem with the world, tried to sell it by
overexaggerating it, and slaps on a weak story.  Larry wants this to be
a satire.
But what Larry forgets is that a weak story can take away from the
message.  A strong story, on the other hand, can be constructed in such
a way that it backs up the story well, as in such cases as Kubrick's
masterpieces "Dr. Strangelove" and "A Clockwork Orange," which are two
of the best examples on how to make a satire.
Not only is the film un-focused, naive, and weak, but it also never
really identifies or explores the problem.  Is it that the kids are
having too much sex?  That they think they're invincible?  And if so,
why is that?  Are they're parents uncaring?  Were they raised by bad
role models on television?  We do see a scene dealing with a parent
who's main problem is she's breat-feeding in front of two horny teenage
boys.  But it never really explores anything into the problem(s) dealing
with kids.  It remains totally one-sided on the topic, and all of the
characters are crap since Larry Clark has nothing but sophomoric
pretention towards them.
The ending is pretty good, albeit very contrived.  There is a part which
is tossed in JUST so this can happen, kind of weakening the effect.
"Kids" has been critically acclaimed by some, and pissed on by others
(including myself).  It's been called "a masterpiece," " a wake-up call
to the world," and even received two thumbs up from Siskel and Ebert. 
But unlike most of the haters of this film, I was not offended by the
fact that teenagers were shown having sex, doing drugs, drinking, etc. 
I would never give a film a bad rating for such superficial reasons as
that.  To me, as a part of the generation Larry is blasting, I think
it's a very flawed film.  If I were to construct a "gritty satire on the
decadence of the youth in America," I'd probably do it a lot
differently.  
Larry Clark, however, has constructed it in an un-focused, and
completely ignorant fashion.  It's uncomfortable to watch in the worst
way, and unentertaining in the most annoying way.  The film has good
intentions, but good intentions does not a good film make.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Barry Lyndon (1975)
Director: Stanley Kubrick
Writer: Stanley Kubrick (based on the novel by William Makepeace
Thackeray)
Starring: Ryan O'Neal, Marisa Berenson, Patrick Magee, Leon Vitali,
Hardy Krüger, Mary Kean, Frank Middlemass, Leonard Rossiter, Gay
Hamilton, Diana Körner, Murray Melvin, Arhtur Sullivan, Philip Stone,
David Morley, Michael Hordern
Many people consider Stanley Kubrick's "Barry Lyndon" to be overrated,
as it was his most successful at the Oscars (garnering seven
nominations), yet seems to be his least involved.  Sometimes dubbed as
just "Kubrick's Costume Drama," it has been ridiculed for being too
long, and too bland, the latter in comparison with Kubrick's other
films.  However, beneath the period piece, Merchant Ivory, Ryan
O'Neal-miscast surface of the film lies a poetic little allegory, as
complex and involving as his other work.
"Barry Lyndon" takes place around the time of King George III, and
centers around a slick opportunitist: Redmond Barry (Ryan O'Neal) - a
poor Irish boy.  The film seems to chronicle his rise and fall from
grace and power (with a couple trips along the way), showing him trying
to become a gentleman throughout the film.  We already know what will
happen to him by the end of the film, the narration (by Michael Hordern)
more than subtlely hints at it.  But that's precisely what this film is
about.
Through the 185 minutes of the film, Redmond has quite a huge reportoire
of things occur to him.  He starts out in his hometown, forced to leave
because he won in a duel (there's a lot of them in this film), and soon
ends up in the army during the "Seven Year's War."  He also ends up
gambling with a fellow Irishman, simply named "The Chevalier" ("A
Clockwork Orange"'s Patrick Magee, who played the insane writer), and
even marries into a wealthy family: the Lyndons (hence the name).  But
by the end, Redmond has lost everything, and dies penniless.
"Barry Lyndon" will easily be loved by fans of period pieces turned into
film, as it is a tour de force of authentic 18th centruy decor.  All of
the costumes were made the exact way as the ones from the time period,
and the cinematography is absolutely gorgeous.  The people in this film
look, act, and appear just like they would if they lived at the time of
the characters...even Ryan O'Neal.  The story is wonderful, filled with
irony, sadness, and tragedy (and some nice un-forced comical bits here
and there).  It feels like an epic.
And this film is also noted for creating a special camera for shooting
in rooms lit only by candle.  While this is now obselete, this was the
prototype for this kind of camera (and apparently it was a big pain in
the ass: if a character moved back or forth, they'd go out of focus) and
is, of course, in the history books.  Also noted is the fact that one of
the greatest duel scenes in film history takes place at the end of this
film (there's a bunch of them).
But this is not just a period piece for the sake of being a period
piece.  Kubrick has never been so simple to make a film which is ONLY a
period piece, or ONLY a horror film, or ONLY a sci-fi film.  Like all of
his films, "Barry Lyndon" has a lot of depth, and a hidden meaning which
is never easily spelled out.  Kubrick is always fascinating because his
films are never really easy to comprehend the first time around.  Even
"Dr. Strangelove" has a deeper subtext to the text (that it's a film
about sex in the mechanical age).
"Barry Lyndon" seems to be about man trying to become the ruler of his
own world, but ultimately failing.  The characters are always striving
for greatness, but can never escape fate.  Redmond, in particular, is an
opportunitist, and feels that taking his chances will ultimately set him
farther in the human race.  He has no real dignity, honor, or even
scruples (he shamefully marries a woman chiefly because she's rich), but
at the end, when he has suffered so much that he tries to be a good man,
he fails miserably (not really his fault though).
The characters in "Barry Lyndon" are all bound by fate, crushed by the
frames of the film.  If you look closely at the film, you see that they
are usually confined to the film's frames (probably better with a
widescreen treatment, though), suffocating them.  No matter how any of
the characters try, not just including Redmond, they can never escape
and become...dare I say it...the master of their own domain (hee hee). 
Even the narration basically tells what's going to happen (which pissed
off Pauline Kael, but as pointed it out blatantly by Sam Peckinpah, THAT
WAS THE POINT, PAULINE!!!!!!!).
The acting is generally good, although nothing spectacular - the film's
only real drawback.  Ryan O'Neal, who seems like a joke for the lead in
a costume drama, actually does a pretty good job.  Although having one
look for most of the film, it works, and he's surprisingly moving
towards the end of the film (also, his irish accent is far better than
that of Brad Pitt and Richard Gere).  Other standout performances come
from Madchen Amick-looking Marisa Berenson as the Lady Lyndon, who's
excellent at looking hurt and melancholy without looking like Matt Le
Blanc; Patrick Magee as the heavily-painted Chevalier; Hardy Krüger as
General Podzdoff; Philip Stone, as the kind of always nervous Graham;
and Leon Vitali, as Lord Bullingdon, son of Lady Lyndon, and enemy of
Redmond, who's really amazing in his role.
As always, the direction and writing is the best thing about the film. 
Kubrick squeezes so much into the three-hour film that you'd think that
it'd be either too much or too little, too fast or too slow.  But
Kubrick finds a nice leisurely pace, and allows the story to unwind
nicely.  "Barry Lyndon" is an odd choice for Kubrick, especially as his
follow-up to the X-rated, disturbing-as-hell "A Clockwork Orange."  But
Kubrick pulls it off, amazingly, and presents to us his most underrated
about being overrated film.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
Director: John McNaughton
Writer: Stephen Peters
Starring: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Denise Richards, Daphne
Rubin-Vega, Teresa Russell, Robert Wagner, Bill Murray, Jeff Perry, Carrie
Snodgress, Jennifer Bini
When Guidance Counselor Ray Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) gives a lecture on
sex crimes, asking exactly what is a sex crime, one of the students replies
"Not gettin' any!"  What better way would there be to set the tone for this
film, which is campy, ridiculous, trashy?  "Wild Things" is one of the most
proposterous thrillers, and I'm confident in saying that save for the
direction, the presence of major stars, and high production values, this
film has no difference than something you'd see on UHF at 2:30 in the
morning on any given weeknight, and just a hair bit less sex and nudity
than some erotic thriller you'd see on Cinemax starring Shannon Tweed.  But
as I said, there's still the direction.
"Wild Things" is trash.  I'm blunt about this.  It's a film that features
awful dialogue, some really bad acting, too many twists, no one protagonist
to follow and admire, and some truly ridiculous moments.  It also features,
simultaneously, delightfully bad dialogue, wonderfully campy performances,
so many twists that it's fun, no moral characters, and some moments which
have the same kind of comic appeal as a Marx Brother movie.  Yes, "Wild
Things" is trash; it's your decision whether or not that's a bad thing.
"Wild Things" is the second Florida noir of the year, taking place in a
giant town near the Everglades.  The opening shot is a maginficent montage
surrounding the area, showing not only the alligators and swamp areas, but
also the large homes, suggesting a possible parallel between the two (and
how right it is).  And the music by George S. Clinton is a wonderful mix of
B-grade jazz noir music and Bernard Herrman Hitchcock music (I swear, he
took riffs from "Psycho"). Here, we enter into a high school, and are
introduced to two character students: Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards,
previously a star of "Starship Troopers"), as a popular high school
cheerleader; and Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell, dirtied up considerably), a
white trash...or swamp trash outsider who smokes pot and dresses wildly.
Apparently Kelly has a big school girl crush on Sam, and after she enters
his house after washing his jeep one Sunday morning, she exits with her
clothes torn up, and swearing that Sam raped her.  Her wealthy slut mom
(Teresa Russell, who I haven't seen since the 80s...and no, I didn't see
"Whore") hears about it, and into the scene come two Law Enforcement
Officers - Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega,
from the original cast of "Rent"), who investigate Sam while he gets
himself a shyster lawyer, Ken Bowden (Bill Murray), who we meet as he's
wearing a false neck brace because "some insurance men were hanging
around."  To make things interesting, Suzie enters back into the scene,
claiming that she was also raped by Sam earlier on.
To explain anything from this point on would be a really nasty thing to do;
it gets really really wacky, events blow up that you don't think would
occur, and, well, things get really fun.  Earlier this year, "Palmetto"
came out and while that film didn't possess the campy wit it really needed
to make it fun (apparently: I didn't see it), this one does.  Director John
McNaughton ("Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer," "Mad Dog and Glory")
directs this with tongue placed firmly in cheek, making the film an almost
comedy, if viewed in the right way.  He gets great help from friend Murray
who is the funniest he's been in a real long time.  Just to see him adds a
lot of comic air into the film.  He also gets mileage out of Robert Wagner,
who, sadly, hasn't been able to be taken seriously as an actor for a long
time, but who, gladly, puts a campy spin on himself (just to see him makes
me giggle; to hear him say sternly "You're finished in this town!" is
downright hilarious).
Meanwhile, Kevin Bacon plays his role delightfully Joe Friday for most of
the film, Matt Dillon is wonderfully B-grade serious, Neve Campbell
abandons her usual good girl schtick and comes across hilariously, Teresa
Russell is wonderfully bitchy and post-seductive, and Denise Richards goes
completely south of the border with a performance so campy and wacky it's
admirable.  Sure, it may seem like bad acting, but it's supposed to.
The film has no center, and is constantly switching protagonists.  I
actually liked this approach.  It was manipulative, so that the viewer
never knows exactly what is going on, but instead of playing this straight,
which would have killed the film, it plays this for laughs.  After about
the fifth or sixth twist, I just started laughing at every one afterwards. 
This also creates for a very fun film to keep track of, as anything can
happen at several points, such as two distinctive moments where we see
characters go into houses, never see inside, but see the outcome, not sure
how it reached there.  Even in the end credits, the film is showing us the
past, trying to explain itself because of this approach.  Thankfully, it
works.
And...as an added bonus for some, there IS some sexual content, such as a
threesome (between three actors I won't mention here), and some good old
lesbian action (between two actresses I won't mention here).  I also should
just warn those guys who watch "Party of Five" religiously that no, Neve
Campbell does not get naked.  But Kevin Bacon does.  Be warned though.
The result of "Wild Things" is a film that is campy, trashy, but just plain
fun.  It's a guilty pleasure, an aquired taste.  Many people may be
completely turned off by all the sex, ridiculous plot twists, and all the
other crap in this film.  Then again, others like me may have a great time
watching it.  It's something you watch so that you can guess all the
twists, but not to take them seriously because, after all, how could you
take some of these twists seriiously.  "Wild Things" is a film you enjoy or
you don't.  There's no middle ground.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Raising Arizona (1987)
Director: Joel Coen
Writers: Joel and Ethan Coen
Starring: Nicolas Cage, Holly Hunter, Trey Wilson, John Goodman, William
Forsythe, Randall "Tex" Cobb, Sam MacMurray, Frances McDormand
While we watch "Fargo" for the fun masterpice of it all, we watch
"Raising Arizona" for the pure fun and off-beatness of it all.  "Raising
Arizona" is one of the most original and clever little comedies I've
really ever seen, and it's all due to the greatness that is the Coen
Brothers.
"Raising Arizona" deals with a group of hick arizonians (duh): H.I.
(Nicolas Cage), pronounced "Hi;" and Edwina (Holly Hunter), who goes by
"Ed."  Both are pretty much either side of a pole - he a small-time and
incompetent crook, she an officer of the law twice decorated - but after
a couple run-ins during the mug shot photograph, they seem to have some
kind of bizarre chemistry.  After a couple years, and about three jail
terms, H.I. and Ed are married, and decide to settle down into suburban
Arizona, which means trailer homes.
After a while of what they refer to as "the Salad Days," they decide
that the only thing missing is "a little critter," but it turns out Ed
is barren ("a rocky place where my sea could find no purchase," H.I.,
the narrator of the film, says).  But it turns out that the wife of the
owner of a wide chain on unpainted home furnishings in the southwestern
area, Nathan Arizona (Trey Wilson), has come into quintuplets, and the
hapless couple decide to steal one, since it's not fair for some to have
so less while others to have so much.  This is only the opening 15
minutes, before the opening credits.
The Coens run aboslutely wild with this wacky premise, introducing
bizarre characters who seem to conflict with the lives of H.I. and Ed,
as well as their newly-stolen gipper.  For one, two of H.I.'s prison
buddies (John Goodman and William Forsythe) break out of prison, trying
to steal H.I. back into his old life, while growing a little attached to
the baby.  And an incident with the stupid, moronic owner of H.I.'s
blue-collar job (Sam MacMurray) comes to his house with his wife
(Frances McDormand, very pre-"Fargo") as well as his wide variety of
mal-raised children, creating a lot of doubt in their minds, as well as
creating a bigger problem.
Of course, the biggest and most surreal problem in their lives becomes
that of a biker straight from Hell (Randal "Tex" Cobb), who seems to
show up once they steal the child.  He's never fully explained, but
gives the film a mythical and surreal quality, not usually shown in
child-kidnapping comedies (it's like a sub-sub-genre).
The film's big set-piece is a classic chase sequence, promted by the
waning of H.I.'s assimilation into family life, meaning he tries to rob
a convenience store again.  With Ed driving off with the baby, leaving
her husband for the cops, a trigger-happy and obsessive cop following on
the window of a car, a brace-faced clerk with a Dirty Harry-brand gun, a
hick with a car, and a bunch of ferocious dogs, the scene is one of the
greatest suspended laughs I've had, including that one episode of "The
Simpsons" where Homer falls down the Springfield Gorge twice.
The acting is hilarious too.  Nicolas Cage, in his first good
performance, is hilarious, especially in his silent comic scenes.  This
was back in the days when people hated his acting style, but looking
back on it, he really hasn't changed that much.  That says a lot for
critical analysis.  And Holly Hunter shows that she can really do
comedy, and do it spectacularly.  She's a riot in this film, especially
when she begins crying hysterically "I LOVE HIM SO MUCH!!!"  In smaller
roles, Goodman and Forsythe are a hilarious pair of stupid, absentminded
crooks; and Trey Wilson steals every scene he's in as the irate father. 
And, of course, Frances McDormand and Sam MacMurray are awesome as the
stupid hick "decent folks."
This was the Coen brothers second film, the first being "Blood Simple,"
which was a great film, but didn't have that great style the Coens are
known for.  They combine depth with off-beat and wacky humor, and are
always interesting.  This is most evident in "Fargo," but "Raising
Arizona" is probably one of their best accomplishments.  Their writing
is excellent, featuring some truly classic one-liners (a giant,
deep-voiced black prison inmate saying he feels "trapped" in a woman's
body because "sometimes I get the menstrual cramps real hard"), and some
classic scenes of wild comedy (the chasing the baby scene towards the
beginning).
The film is a screwball comedy of errors, combining a little bit of
satire with the Coen-brand humor, which is often copied, but never as
well as the original.  They combine funny dialogue, interesting
characters, and outrageous situations into this film, creating one of
the funniest films I've really ever seen.  It's strangely touching,
somewhat deep, but always hysterical.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
Writer/Director: Mark Christopher
Starring: Ryan Phllippe, Salma Hayek, Breckin Meyer, Mike Myers, Neve
Campbell, Sela Ward, Heather Matarazzo, Sherry Stringfield, Ellen Albertini
Dow, Lauren Hutton, Michael York, Jared Haris, Art Garfunkel, Peter
Bogdonovich
Studio 54 attracted so many weird and bizarre people to its gates that it's
a wonder why the film about the life and death of the Studio centers itself
on one very boring, cliched individual, not to mention an ensemble of
people who wouldn't be at all fascinating unless they worked at the Studio,
which they did according to this film.  Are we supposed to believe that out
of all the strange folk who populated the Studio nightly, that a character
who is a bland ripoff of Tony Manero would really make a good protagonist
for the film about it?
"54" belongs in the elite group of films known as "The Big
Disappointments": the films that attain so much hype and/or so much
potential in its creation that they come off worse than they are when they
are finally finished.  I was heavily awaiting "54," not the least because
I've become fascinated with the infamous club, which has been the subject
of an engrossing documentary that's been running all summer on VH1, which
is, weirdly enough, much more intriguing and engrossing than this "edgy"
film.
Perhaps more importantly, "54" is part of the blossoming subgenre, "The 70s
Nostalgia Film," which has been picking up mighty steam, what with "Boogie
Nights" and "The Last Days of Disco" coming out within the year, and both
being such damn good movies that not only captured the feel of a certain
time period (the late 70s party and the early 80s wakeup period), but
brought us interesting and real characters, like Scotty, the tragically gay
boom mike operator from "Boogie Nights," and Charlotte, the ironically
clueless and bitchy co-protagonist from "The Last Days of Disco," not to
mention several others.
"54" deals not so much with the timeline of the Studio (how it began, how
it was run, how it ended) - that's all dealt with in the narrated opening
and finale - but more interested in the characters who populated it.  This
is a definite plus.  Here's a film that could have been a fascinating 2
hour plus film about the tragic people who went there to party, and had to
wakeup in the 80s when things like diseases, economy problems, and perhaps
worst of all, Reagan, all hit and forced everyone into a rude awakening. 
The story of the studio is tragedy in itself: let's look at how it all
affected the people.
But this film doesn't let that happen.  It gives us a half-assed
protagonist named Shane O'Shea (Ryan Phillippe, from "I Know What You Did
Last Summer"), who's chief character trait is the fact that he's from New
Jersey, which also happens to be his chief character flaw (I guess).  He's
dim-witted, into being part of "the scene," and soon finds he's become a
bit of a rave amongst the Studio regulars...a bit like "Saturday Night
Fever," 'cept no Travolta and no real interest put into him.  Poor, poor
Phillippe struggles to make him interesting, but all he is a half-assed
character and not at all our ticket to the glimpse of the decadence going
on inside the club that he could have been.
Shane begins to hang out with some other denizens of the club, like Anita
(Salma Hayek), a wannabe Donna Sommers, and her young hubby, Greg Randanzo
(Breckin Meyer, from "Clueless"), who helps Shane become a bartender and
rise to a bit of fame.  Although he begins to get somewhere when he sleeps
with the foxy Billie Auster (Sela Ward), an exec of sorts, he falls in lust
with a soap star named Julie Black (Neve Campbell), and thus the boring
romance subplot that's all too not necessarily important to anything else
in the film and never really becomes interesting at any point in the film.
The film's sole point of interest and one major strongpoint is the all-too
necesary personage of Steve Rubell, played by Mike Myers (you heard me). 
Rubell, the famous head of the Studio acted as if he never stopped partying
ever, and is an easy metaphor for the life and times of his creation, but
the film, thanks to a surprisingly strong performance by Myers, makes him
out to be more than that.  Notice the scenes sole shocking scene, where he
tries to get felatio from one of his male employees in turn for a
promotion: Myers brings the humanity to Rubell in this scene, and a couple
others, that some of us who've only seen him on TV never saw, and proves to
be perhaps the one aspect of Studio 54 that this film actually nails.
First time feature director Mark Christopher proves that he's a better
director than a writer, though not too terribly much.  His story is trite
and shallow, as are his characters, and his direction is shockingly flat,
especially for a film about this subject.  It's as if he had a great story
to tell, but instead opted for the easier route.  The Studio's recreation
is amazingly accurate, though, and very impressive, but his direction is
never captivating enough.  Some people say that a film does its job if it
makes you want to visit the locale it takes place in (despite the film's
tone, I still want to go to Rome and its many nightclubs after I saw
Fellini's "La Dolce Vita"), and when I watched "54," I didn't particularly
want to stay.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Draughtsman's Contract, The (1982)
Writer/Director: Peter Greenaway
Starring: Anthony Higgins, Janet Suzman, Anne-Louise Lambert, Hugh Fraser,
Neil Cunningham, Dave Hill, David Grant, David Meyer, Tony Meyer, Michael
Feast
I'll give the same defense for "The Draughtsman's Contract" as I did for
another Peter Greenaway film, "Drowning by Numbers": I haven't the foggiest
what it was about, but I sure had a good time trying to figure it out.  The
reason "Draughtsman" is better than "Numbers," though, is because it's less
obvious than that one; it doesn't seem like a puzzle at all.  The puzzle
sneaks up on you, takes you off guard, and before you know it, you have to
remember everything you've seen before in effort to understand exactly
Greenaway is going at with his film.
The entire film plays like a very straighforward period piece, taking place
in 1690 with lots of beautiful cinematography, exquisite sets, authentic
baroque music (composed by once-Greenaway-regular, Michael Nyman, a
brilliant composer in any time period), and dialogue that is always to the
point and mannered.  The plot is simple: a somewhat famous and very pompous
draughtsman (Anthony Higgins) is hired by the wife (Janet Suzman) of a
wealthy businessman (Dave Hill) to draw several drawings of their immense
estate, under law of a strict contract which becomes less strict as the
film goes on.
The draugtsman is extremely anal about every drawing, demanding absolute
perfection with every one.  He sketches each place for two hours each day,
then moves onto another section, and continues like this each day.  Nothing
is to change during these time periods, so that each drawing can retain its
individual integrity.  And there is one small catch: every day, the
draugtsman and the wife, who's husband is away on business, must tend to
the bed to, well, consumate their relationship.
The film gets into a nice little bit of tradition after awhile, with each
day switching between the outside drawings and the bedroom.  But every day,
something weird happens.  Windows are opened, sheep interfere, the wife's
son-in-law (Hugh Fraser) begins annoying the draughtsman with petty
problems, and suddenly even weirder things start happening, such as a
statue that turns out not to be what it seems.  By the hour mark, a murder
has occurred, and like the characters that inhibit this film, you have no
clue who to accuse.
The ending is another great one, which happens to be one of Greenaway's
fortes.  It's strange, unnerrving, and brings the film to a close even if
the audience hasn't figured out exactly what it's closing.  One small
gripe: like the ending to "The Cook, the Thief, His Wife, and Her Lover,"
my the best Greenaway film, it's too complete.  It goes too far, and would
be even better if it ended just one step too short.  Not a major complaint,
but something that would have been even more disturbing.
I can't say I figured this film out, even after two very conscious
viewings, but the point is not figuring out who the murderer is, or even
what the point is.  A puzzle is not really about its ending, but about the
process of getting there by unearthing clues and logically thinking.  Like
Atom Egoyan, Peter Greenaway feels the same way about cinematic puzzles,
and he creates a film that is like a giant sensual connundrum, with no
piece to the puzzle ever explained and the entire film is done so that it
is more of an experience than a puzzle.
My theory, though, is that it's something to do with the way we perceive
reality, as things are constantly changing, not the least being the
contract of the title.  But with many of Greenaway's films, that's just a
shot in the dark.  He always has some point he's trying to make, let it be
mockery of conformity or criticism of the Thatcher years.  He just hides it
under the most seductive kind of filmmaking this side of Martin Scorsese.
There's really not much you can say about this film without giving away
many of the pleasures of watching it.  I will say, though, that it's a film
that  moves farily slowly but at a good pace so that it never gets ahead of
itself and totally looses us.  As such, this is a film that almost requires
multiple viewings, just so you can go back and piece everything together. 
Otherwise, though, you have a simply magnificent film that acts as part
social satire, part murder mystery, and part sensual pleasure.  This is a
film that, for some, may be a puzzle that's fun to do because it's so
engrossing that you almost forget that you're doing a puzzle in the first
place.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for BASEketball (1998)
Director: David Zucker
Writers: David Zucker, Robert LoCash, Lewis Friedman, and Jeff Wright
Starring: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Yasmeen Bleeth, Dian Bachar, Robert
Vaughn, Jenny McCarthy, Ernest Borgnine, Al Michaels, Bob Costas, Robert
Stack, Kareem Abdul-Jabbar
Last week, many reviewers made the mistake of comparing "Mafia!," the spoof
on "The Godfather" movies from Jim Abrahams, to the recent Farelly
Brothers' comedy, "There's Something About Mary," possibly the funniest
movie in a couple years.  If you're going to compare any recent comedy to
"Mary," it should be "Baseketball" because when looking at them, you can
see where the former is wildly sucessful while the latter is moderately so.
 These are both films that at least try and take toilet humor to a level of
sheer high comedy, but only one actually gets there.
"Baseketball" actually begins more promisingly than "Mary," a film that,
admittingly, took a couple minutes to really get going.  Here, we start
very high: a sorta-documentary on why modern-day sports are dying: because
of too much media control.  This is where I laughed the hardest - how can't
you laugh when you see a mock arena titled "Preperation-H Stadium?"  And
from this, "Baseketball" promised to be the best of both worlds: high
satire and lots of giddy toilet humor, since the film comes from two groups
of popular giants: David Zucker, one of the three guys who created a whole
new brand of movie comedy with "Airplane!"; and Trey Parker and Matt Stone,
the creators, writers, and voices of the hit show "South Park."
In a lot of ways, "Baseketball" is like "South Park" (strange, because it
was written by other people): it uses lots of shockingly crude humor, a
touch of wild satire, and an attitude that seems to say "hey, we're getting
away with this, aren't we?"  They mock minorities and majorities (they seem
to love making fun of dying children, short people, and Texans).  They
ridicule the way sports has become such a sell-out.  They make sex jokes,
bodily function jokes, and all sorts of jokes many comedies are afraid to
make fun of.  And it all comes across more like a live-action, really long
episode of "South Park" than another film in the spirit of "Airplane!" and
"The Naked Gun."
"Baseketball," as you would have guessed, is about a fusion of Baseball and
Basketball made by two complete losers: Joseph "Coop" Cooper and Doug Remer
(Parker and Stone, respectively).  Over the course of a couple years, the
sport becomes increasingly popular, thanks to help from a selfless
billionaire (an oxymoron?), Theodore Denslow (Ernest Borgnine - remember
when we used to talk this guy seriously?  Neither do I.), who dies as a
result of choking on a hot dog, which catapults the film into its big plot:
Denslow leaves the team to Cooper, instigating another billionaire, Baxter
Cain (Robert Vaughn - see the footnote beside Borgnine), who wants to try
and cash in on it like they used to do for baseball and all.  Will they
sell out? Will Cain get the team anyway?  Will Cooper and Remer break up?
It's all handled in a joking fashion, of course, and there's a joke every
couple seconds of varying degrees, everything from the laugh-inducing sight
of the afro-d Stone making out with a Playboy bunnyin a jacuzzi to calling
the short friend/teamate of Cooper and Remer's a "little bitch" constantly.
 And so Parker and Stone can really goof off, there's a rule in the game
where the defending team can prevent the shooting team by psyching them out
anyway which way they can, so there's lots of hilarious taunts and
disgusitng jokes (my favorite was Parker drinking fat from a liposuction of
Marlon Brando's ass, which, incidentally, doesn't prevent the shooter from
shooting).
The big discovery is that Parker and Stone are, for the most part, talented
and likable comic actors, a shock because many actors who do voices for a
living aren't ever very comfortable on screen.  Parker, with his bleached
blond hair, gets the least wacky of the jobs, settling with a lame romance
subplot involving him and a sexy runner of a sick children's clinic
(Yasmeen Bleeth), but nevertheless milks all the comedy out of it.  Stone,
the ugly guy of the bunch, gets to be more wacky, and actually does it
well.  Ironically, the one time a joke really falls flat is when Parker
does the voice of Eric Cartman from "South Park" as a psyche out - it just
looses so much in the transfer from cartoon to reel life.
The film's cameos and supporitng roles are rather funny as well, especially
real-life sports announcers Al Michaels and Bob Coastas playing, well,
sports announcers, who, like all the news anchors in this film, have to say
wildly profane lines with a straight face.  Robert Stack even shows up
towards the end on a pseudo-episode of "Unsolved Mystery."  I know it's
immature to laugh at something like this, but hearing Stack swearing
dead-pan is just too funny to not laugh at, no matter what the principle
is.
However funny as this film is, the whole falls just short of its many
parts.  There's a lot of funny stuff here, but it never works as smoothly
as it should.  Many many jokes fall dead, as well as subplots (Jenny
McCarthy literally laying carpet...over and over again), and the film's
satirical edge just gradually dies as the film becomes more and more
obsessed with topping itself.  The reason it's not as satisfying as it
should be may be because everyone puts more in the attitude they tell the
jokes than they do the actual quality of the jokes.  Take, for example, the
dozens of psyche-outs we see in this film.  Some are funny, but so many of
them are just mediocre or not funny at all.  Saying at the last second "I
fucked your sister" is hilarious, as is the breast milk squirint bit (at
least the first time).  But putting on a mask and speaking like a hick? 
Puh-lease.
The chief problem is this film is too much in love with itself, too much in
awe at what they can get away with.  Sure, hearing a sports announcer use
the word "cocksucker" like it was just part of his daily job is funny at
first, but a whole bunch of these kinds of jokes, each handled as they're
the greatest, most obscene jokes in the history of comedy...well, that
makes the film a little bland.  It's funny, but if you're want to see
toilet humor done right, without all the glitz and glamor that this film
has, do yourself a big favor and go see "There's Something About Mary."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Aliens (1986)
Director: James Cameron
Writer: James Cameron (story by James Cameron, David Giler, and Walter
Hill)
Starring: Sigourney Weaver, Carrie Henn, Paul Reiser, Michael Biehn,
Lance Henriksen, Bill Paxton, William Hope, Jenette Goldstein, Al
Matthews, Mark Rolston, Ricco Ross, Colette Hiller
After re-watching "Aliens" after a couple years, I silently sat there on
my bed throughout the end credits without making any sudden moves.  This
is what this film does to you: it leaves you completely drained, just
like the characters in this movie.  Some say that the fact that this is
exhausting is a major flaw; I say it's ingenius filmmaking, not a shock
from James Cameron.
"Aliens" is the sequel to the 1979 classic, "Alien" (duh), where a group
of seven were stalked by an acid-burning, shaft-crawling, belligerent
alien, and where only one survived: Ellen Ripley (Sigourney Weaver). 
The film takes place 57 years after the first one, but Ripley has been
in the same hibernation she entered into at the end of the previous
film, but is luckily woken up by some deep space workers or something.
After a nice little introduction, where Ripley is introduced to the
deceptfully slimy Burke (Paul Reiser), a government worker who seems to
be Ripley's friend, but asks her to go back to the planet where they
found the alien in the first film, since the stupid government has sent
about 70 families over there to live, and have lost contact.  After some
soul-searching (spanning a whole day, and a bad dream), she agrees to go
as an "advisor" in what is a military operation.
So off to the freaky planet where the obvious has occured: the face
huggers from the eggs they found in the first film have killed off the
inhabiants, spawning a ton of giant aliens.  Most of the cocky soldiers
are quickly and ironically killed off, leaving about eight people left
to fend off the aliens by themself.  After the only way back to the
mother ship is destroyed, and with the threat of alien invasion at any
moment, the film from this point becomes a non-stop gradual ascent of
pure adrenalized tension.
First off, "Alien" and "Aliens" seem completely different.  Some may
bitch, but I ask you: do you like seeing the same thing over and over
and over and over again (i.e. the "Home Alone" series, which just
released a third installment - yeasnorebitchwail).  The first one, as
directed by Ridley Scott, is a wonderful film, filled with great
tension, and directed with great creepy control.  James Cameron, not one
for slow films with Kubrickian minutes (or hours) of human silence and
inhuman noises, has taken a compeltely different approach.
He, instead, takes us right into the field of combat, making us feel
like we're right there beside Ripley and the surviving soldiers, waiting
until the aliens invade the confines of their space, and probably kill
them mercilessly.  From the hour point on, "Aliens" holds us in its
grasp, and doesn't let us go until the remaining characters (or
character...) are finally sleeping after a long period of
cringe-inducing, coffee-spilling, nail-biting, finger-tapping tension.
Cameron, who has directed such big films as the two Terminator films,
"The Abyss," "True Lies," and the upcoming "Titanic" (to which I'm
counting down the days), is a genius director with a big budget. 
Instead of giving us drivel, like "Independence Day" and "Stargate"
(wow!  both directed by Roland Emmeurich!  who woulda guessed?), Cameron
wows us with special effects, bowls us over with an interesting story,
and amazes us with interesting characters.  Ripley continues to grow as
interesting character, having lost her daughter due to the fact that she
was hibernation for 57 years and she had died before she got back (a
great scene which is deleted in the video copy), she finds solace in the
young Newt (Carrie Henn), a little girl who's family was killed by the
aliens, but has, herself, survived for a long time by staying away from
them.  They share a touching, though never melodramatic and/or corny,
relationship which gives the film additional depth.
The marines in the film are really not as well drawn as these two, but
still carry some great satirical wit along with them.  For one thing,
they're mostly cocky, and bitch constantly about the conditions.  When
Ripley briefs them before they go down about the aliens, one of them -
the butch chick Vasquz (Jenette Goldstein) - says "I just need to know
one thing: where they are."  They're cockiness pays a sorry price, as
they are confronted with acid-burning,
more-belliegerent-than-Saddam-Hussein-on-percodan aliens who wipe most
of them out in a harrowingly creepy scene, to which we only see brief
shots.
Another satirical part of the film deals with the usual "Alien"
government, which is, of course, trying to bring the aliens back for
scientific research and all.  The government is wonderfully represented
in the form of Burke (the brilliantly cast Paul Reiser), a charmingly
witty and innocent-feeling member of government, who turns out wants to
have the aliens planted in the soldiers' bodies.  Reiser gives the film
a comic air (even if he doesn't have a lot of zingy one-liners, a good
thing in my book), and also does a great job with manipulating us into
thinking that he's not such a bad guy.
The film appears to have some minor flaws, like not much
characterization, a lack of respect for the other alien (what is the
alien feeling), and a seemingly cheap ending tacked on for some more
shocks.  But.  This all adds to the overall fun of the film.  If it was
too philosophical, and overly cerebral, the film would probably lose its
touch.  Let "2001" do the cerebral, which is why that is brilliant. 
"Aliens" is brilliant because of the way its directed.  And who says
that big budget action pics can't be brilliant?
Other additional notes should be made to whoever did the efx, which are
absolutely brilliant, to some of the actors (most notably Weaver,
Reiser, Biehn, Paxton - who's annoying but good - Goldstein, and,
strangely enough, Henriksen, who gives his most lively performance -
save that bizarro episode of "Millenium" where he had blond hair...not
that I watch that show - as an android), and to James Horner, who has
scored an absolutely brilliant score from start to finish.  However, a
note should be made that the opening and closing music is a piece from
"2001."
But writer/director James Cameron gets the best note.  In what is
probably his best film so far (along with "T2"), "Aliens" is a
filmmaking tour de force.  He holds a state of tension throughout, so
much that people can come out of it emotionally ravaged.  As I said, I
was shaking afterwards, and in his review, Roger Ebert said it left him
depressed.  But even if it may leave a negative reaction, that was what
Cameron was going for, and it is nothing less than a brilliant example
of sheer film craftsmanship.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Buono, il brutto, il cattivo, Il (1966)
Director: Sergio Leone
Writers: Argenore Incrocci and Furio Scarpelli (from a story by Sergio
Leone and Luciano Vincenzoni)
Starring: Clint Eastwood, Eli Wallach, Lee Van Cleef
The classic American western, we have John Wayne, the totally,
all-around good guy, being tough, beating up the outlaws, and then
perhaps having a wholesome fling with some chick at the end.  But in the
world of the spaghetti western (a name given to the Italian-made
westerns), pretty much everybody's an asswhole.  Kind of life life.  Of
course, a lot of them suck, but the ones by one particular director
stand-out for their amazing style, interesting stories, wild characters,
and, of course, the music.  That would be Sergio Leone, and the music
was by Ennio Morricone, second greatest film composer to ever live.
"The Good" is, of course, Clint Eastwood, returning to his role he has
played, The Man With No Name, who was in the previous two Leone flicks,
"A Fistful of Dollars," and "For a Few Dollars More."  The Man With No
Name is dubbed "Blondie" by another character in this one, so they could
actually call him something.  Of course, he is in no way a good man. 
He's more of the anti-hero of the story.  He's good in a sense, but he's
also an amoral crook who sometimes double-crosses partners, but with
good reason.  With his three-day beard, his squint (that Seagal would
rip-off, but not to the cool effect of Eastwood), his hushed speech, the
eternal cigarette in his mouth, and the occasional mexican rug around
him, the presents one of the most interesting looks and characters I've
ever seen.
"The Bad" is Lee Van Cleef, also called "Angel Eyes," due to his bizarre
stare.  He's a totally amoral bounty hunter who screws over two
different employers of his in the beginning, and goes on to screw some
more people over as the film goes on.  He's actually not in a lot of the
film, turning up here and there, and there for the breathtaking finale.
"The Ugly" is classic actor Eli Wallach, also called "Tuco."  Tuco's a
ranting, raving, somewhat neurotic in a way, and kind of incompetent
bandit who is working with Blondie in the beginning but keeps on going
between partner and enemy throughout the film.  He's one of the more
interesting characters, and is even one who gets some real depth when he
runs into his priest brother.  He's also the loudest, in what is pretty
much an almost silent film, with sometimes mechanical dialogue and
one-liners.  He gets to shout out obscenities to other characters, and
is all around loud.  He's also the funniest, of course.
The whole motivation in the storylines of all three Man With No Name
films is money.  Leone sees the west as a place where everybody's amoral
and they're all greedy as hell.  The film's plot (which takes about an
hour or so to really get started) deals with a chest of gold buried in a
grave at a faraway graveyard.  Angel Eyes knows of it.  Blondie knows
which grave it's buried in.  Tuco knows which graveyard.  What results
is a plot-twisting, satirical, and stylishly entertaining film.
The film takes place during the Civil War, so it takes a kind of
satirical stance towards it.  The politics really don't matter when
viewed this way (one time the characters can't tell which color the
soldiers' coats are), they're all just fighting a stupid cause.  Blondie
and Tuco run into an army fighting over a bridge, suffering many
casualties.  And there's even a bit in a prison camp, due to a stupid
mistake by Tuco.
What's cool about this film is the style.  Leone makes a film that is
rich in substance, and rewards us with some bitching stylistic scenes. 
The editing and the music combines to create tense scenes, filled with
humor, irony, and some deaths.  The film is almost all full of his
style, prohibiting some characters to speak in certain scenes, so the
film creates tension.
And, by God, the closeups!  Leone is famous (and sometimes infamous,
which does NOT mean more than famous) for nearly ODing on the close-up. 
There are scenes where, to build tension, he shows us literally hundreds
of close-ups on the characters' faces.  I mean, the finale, where the
three leads are all standing there with their fingers on their holsters,
waiting for the first person to go for their gun(s), Leone gives us what
felt like 10 minutes of close-ups on each of their faces.  But the thing
is that they start out slowly, and speed up as the tension increases. 
Filmmakers ever since have been ripping off of Leone, for this is just
one cool-ass effect, and his finale is one of the all-time greatest
scenes.
The music is also brilliant.  Ennio Morricone (who also did such
mainstream films as "Wolf" and "Bugsy," as well as all of Leone's films)
has created a soundtrack that is gorgeous and barbaric.  He has one
underline theme going throughout which is instantly memorable: starting
off with what sounds like a screaming hyena, we get then get a
high-pitched phrase, repeated, and launching into a barage of
high-pitched trumets, which sounds like Dick Dale's "Miserlou."  Leone
uses this throughout the film, especially in some of the more perfectly
ironic parts in the story.  His theme, like the squealing knife sounds
in "Psycho," is something that is hummable (it was a big hit on Top 40
radio), and has been recycled over and over and over and over and then
even over and over and over again.  It's just one hell of a great
soundtrack.
The film runs about two hours and forty-five minutes, but is absolutely
absorbing, and goes by quickly and smoothly.  Leone's scenes are
drawn-out with sometimes no dialogue until a burst of it nearly
three-quarters of the way through the scene, creating a film that is
fascinating to watch as it unfolds in front of you.  His gunfights are
classic scenes, even if they're not always bloodbaths.  Sometimes you
don't even see the action (i.e. the first scene).  But his scenes are
well-directed, and are filled completely with a kind of hypnotic draw.
I don't even LIKE westerns.  I mean, I liked "Rio Bravo," but I usually
don't dig those kinds of films.  But Leone's films are so well-directed,
with such an odd quality to them, that you just have to adore them. 
Even if you hate westerns, you'll agree that this is one bitching film,
and what I think to be the greatest Western ever made.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for On Deadly Ground (1994)
Director: Steven Seagal
Writers: Ed Horowitz and Robin O. Russin
Starring: Steven Seagal, Joan Chen, Michael Caine, John C. McGinley, R.
Lee Ermey, Billy Bob Thornton
Martial arts master Steven Seagal (not to mention director!) has built a
career out of playing an allegedly fictitious martial arts superman who
never gets hurt in fights, talks in a hushed tone, and squints at any
sign of danger.  He's also the most consistent individual in Hollywood
today, since all his movies suck.  They basically represent his
egotisitical tendencies about his art (that is, martial art).  I'm sure
the guy's good, and he seems like a nice guy on talk shows, although a
tad haughty, but these movies he makes are all the same: a guy who is
basically indestructable, is maybe wounded supposedly mortally, then
comes back with a vengeance and goes buddha on all the baddies asses
(although I kinda liked "Under Siege").  Of course, this one, as a
change, has a "message" that is drilled into our mind...of course, after
he blows up a lot of stuff and kills a bunch of people.
So why do I watch his crap?  I usually don't.  I will never, and you can
hold me to this, I will NEVER pay to see this man's movies, unless, and
only unless, he's in a supporting role (i.e. "Executive Decision") and
I'd definitely pay if he dies (i.e. "Executive Decision").  But this one
has a special place in my heart.  This doesn't mean it's good or that I
even liked it.  This was the last movie I watched with my deceased
uncle, and we had one hell of a time ripping it apart a la "Mystery
Science Theatre 3000," and this was a couple years before I had heard of
"Mystery Science Theatre 3000."
In this one, Seagal plays a worker for a mining factory set in Alaska
and run by the greased-up typical shallow villain, this time played by
an Oscar-winner to give the movie some more clout - Michael Caine.  It
seems that Caine wants to do something with his oil factory that
includes him dumping oil all over Inuit land.  Around the 20-30 minute
point, Seagal speaks up to him in what seems to be the typical speech to
all the vain entrepeneurs (what with his new "Fire Down Below," another
"message film"), and Caine has him bumped off...or does he?
Seagal is rescued by some Inuits, and falls in love with one of them,
played by Joan Chen, who CAN act, hypothetically, but, for some reason,
not here.  One of Caine's cliched henchmen (played here with a lot of
overacting by John C. McGinley) shoots the cheif of the Inuit clan, and
Chen and Seagal go on a voyage to take down the oil factory...literally,
of course.  At one point, Seagal gives a wonderfully hysterical speech
about how he doesn't have any options but blow stuff up.  He even goes
as far as to say, "I don't want to kill someone," and in the same
breath, he asks some guy where the arsenal is.
I have no problem with violence.  I'm a huge John Woo fan, but he paints
his films with suspense, skill, style, depth, characterization, and just
plain cool violence.  In the films of Seagal, the suspense mainly
consists of the baddie attacking him stupidly, and him either wounding
or killing them.  At some points, they use the cliche of the talking
villain, where the villain has the advantage, can shoot Seagal, but
begins talking by either telling him his big secret plan, or saying a
corny line, to which Seagal says something hokey back, and has had
enough time to devise of a way to do away with them, and does.  This
would be okay if there were any suspense or if it didn't take itself
seriously at all, like in the case of this summer's "Con Air."  But
Seagal is serious about his skill, and of course, his message.
I wouldn't mind if this was a message film in the way that they present
it to you with evidence.  But Seagal has no idea how to present a film
where the message is subtle, not pounded into the viewer's mind.  The
villain is totally shallow and cartoonish, thus we can't take him and
his motives seriously, and while Seagal talks about being kind to the
environment, he also goes ahead and blows up a square mile of rig, and
kills some workers who were just doing his job.  Then at the end, he
spends a good 10 minutes giving a speech, just in case you didn't get
the message from the trailers.  What Seagal doesn't realize is that no
one takes his films seriously (although maybe a couple do) and any
message he has is no only redundant, but doesn't comfortably fit in his
film, which is filled to the brim with hokey violence, crap suspense,
stupid melodrama, and characters who have about as much emotional depth
as a petri dish.
As far as Seagal and his acting, he's rather boring.  He squints, he
kills.  Period.  Nothing else.  Oh, yeah, there's corny one-liners ("I'm
gonna reach out and touch someone!").  Of course, he's the star, and
we're supposed to root for him and all, so he makes all the villains
unbelievably stupid and a bunch of jerks.  Michael Caine, who's a great
actor, is just supposed to yell and look cold.  He does it well, I
guess, but this is no "Alfie."  Of coure, no one was expecting that
caliber of performance from him.  His big henchman, John C. McGinley is
kinda boring as well, but is not horrible.  And we even get a small
performance from that god of drill sergeants on celluloid, R. Lee Ermey
(from "Full Metal Jacket") as a hired assasin squad leader who gets to
say the obligatory speech about how dangerous Seagal is, just for the
movie trailers and for Seagal's ego.  And also, look for Billy Bob
Thornton as one of Ermey's assasins.
Anyway, to conclude this all, to judge one of Seagal's movies is to
judge all of them (except for "Under Siege" and "Executive Decision,"
though the latter is not really a "Seagal movie").  They all have this
same formula, they all have the same action, same villain, same plot,
but this one has that message, which makes it more excrucitating to
watch.  I mean, if you do rent it, and I don't reccomend you do, make
sure you just skip the last 10 minutes.  But I have to put it to Seagal
for creating a film so bad, that the last film I viewed with my uncle
was a pleasurable one.
MY RATING (out of 4): * (extra star for the fun it is to watch and mock)
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Shining, The (1980)
Director: Stanley Kubrick
Writers: Diane Johnson and Stanley Kubrick (from the book by Stephen
King)
Starring: Jack Nicholson, Shelley Duvall, Danny Lloyd, Scatman Crothers
"The Shining" is a tough film to review.  On the surface, it's a
faithless adaptation of the novel, but still tells a really creepy story
that makes almost no sense.  Cinematically, the film is deep with
meaning(s), and creates total atmosphere, creating a sense of dread in
the viewers.  Despite the very, very, very low body count in the film,
this film is one of the scariest films I've ever seen.  And I'm not
easily scared.
You probably know the story about writer Jack Torrence (Jack Nicholson)
who accepts a job of looking over a mountain top hotel called the
Overlook in its four-month down-period as the snow storms block the only
road to the hotel.  While there with his wife and son (Shelley Duvall
and Danny Lloyd, respectively and obviously), he gradually loses any
sanity he once had, and even begins talking with ghosts.  At the end, he
chases his family around the giant hotel, wielding an axe (a mallet in
the book), and screaming out one-liners.
In the both the book and the movie, the son, Danny, is a bit psychic,
possessing a little affliction called "Shining," which allows him to
perceive some of the past, and talk through brain waves with other
people who have the shining.  He meets the cook (Scatman Crothers) of
the hotel who also has it, and who warns him of some kind of old psychic
power the hotel has.  But Danny is too young to totally comprehend it,
and he watches as his father's sanity decreases.
In the book, the hotel's ghosts had power over Jack and were trying to
silence Danny throughout the story.  In the end, Jack was under the
power of the hotel, instead of really being totally insane.  Stanley
Kubrick, who is, in my humble opinion, more interesting than Stephen
King, didn't like that idea, and decided to make another film with his
theory of violence being a part of every human being.  He uses some of
the stories in the book about Jack, particularly the one where he
accidentally broke his son's arm.  And when he gets to the hotel, he
suddenly goes insane, but not totally until near the ending.  The
reason?  Well, the final frame explains that, although it really doesn't
make a whole lot of sense.
Kubrick is never a director to easily comprehend, and "The Shining" is
one confusing flick.  One viewing is not enough to make sense of all the
bizarre sequences, and one explanation cannot cover all the things that
occur.  Is Jack merely hallucinating these people (each time he's
talking to a ghost, he's facing a mirror), or are they really there?
Did Danny really bring it out of Jack, since he brought it out in him
when he accidentally broke his arm?  Is this a satire of violence, and
even TV (there are quotes from TV throughout - i.e. "Heeeeere's
JOHNNY!")?  Or is it even a film about the murders of the native
americans slain on the very site of the hotel?
I have no clue what this film means, but someday I hope to figure it
out.  But even if the film makes no real sense, there's the sense of
depth to everything that goes on.  And, of course, there's the
direction.
Stanley Kubrick has made one of the truly horrific films ever made.  I
mean, this film is actually frightening.  There are moments where I was
scared to breathe, as scared as some of the people in this film.
Kubrick paints dread over everything that goes on, even the childish bit
of Danny riding his little mini-three-wheeler around the hotel.  And
there aren't any scenes where someone just jumps out of nowhere like in
a slasher film.  When Jack is chopping down the bathroom door where
Duvall is hiding, Kubrick shoots it head on.  When Jack jumps out of
nowhere to attack someone, we see him way before it happens.
Last year's mini-series with Steven Weber and Rebecca DeMournay (!!!)
went by the book, but lacked any of the depth and creepiness this film
mastered.  It also lacked any of the fun acting that this film
posesses.  Jack Nicholson's twisted performance is, yes, more campy than
Guy Pearce in "Priscilla."  But it's one of the more darkly comic and
creepy ones in horror history.  He starts off as kind of reserved and
maybe a little twisted, but by the end is drooling and howling like a
dog.
Duvall, who I think was nominated for a highly coveted Razzie award for
her performance, is pretty annoying.  But I think it works with this
film.  I mean, he's supposed to want to kill her, right?  Okay, so I'm
kidding.  She's annoying.  Danny Lloyd, who never did another film I
think (what a shock, I mean, he was a child actor!), is pretty good as
the quiet son (much better than that annoying buck toothed kid in the
mini-series).  And Scatman Crothers...well, he's the man, and we all
know it.
The major complaint of this film, other than it just doesn't make any
sense, is that it's not faithful to the book.  Now, I've read the book,
seen this movie, and even watched all 6 hours of that horrible
mini-series (that kid was annoying as hell, wasn't he?), and this was
the best of all of them.  The book is good and all, but the ending just
didn't live up to the rest of the story.  And the mini-series didn't
help.  Playing like a basic outline of the book, it created zero
suspense, hokey scenes, and even tried to revert to cheap thrills along
the way.  I like how the movie never pulls its punches.  Jack has gone
insane, and there's no way he's going to go back just because his son
starts crying.  It's popular knowledge that the book is ALWAYS better
than the movie adaptation (not the other way around though), but this
film disproves that.  While Stephen King is a very good writer, Stanley
Kubrick's just a better director in this little analogy of mine.
Kubrick's adaption and direction might diss the book, but I think it
works better the way he did it.  It's one of the few times the film was
better than the book.  Yes, the book fills in a lot of the gaps in the
film (well, in the first half).  But it's creepier to watch it this
way.  Don't tell me you weren't shaking when he walked into the
off-limits room and that chick was in the bath tub.  Don't tell me you
weren't breathing shallow when Jack talks to the ghost of the father who
killed his family before.  This is a film that may make no sense the
first 100 viewings, but it's so well done and so absolutely scary that
it works.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Vertigo (1958)
Director: Alfred Hitchcock
Writers: Samuel A. Taylor and Alec Coppel (from the book "Entre Les
Morts" by Pierre Boileu and Thomas Narcejac)
Starring: James Stewart, Kim Novak, Babara Del Geddes
On the surface, "Vertigo" looks like a manipulative jokester of a movie,
constantly giving you ideas, then turning the exact opposite direction
with them, frustrating you.  Then, of course, half way through, the film
pulls a 180, chaning the underlying mood from a detective mystery film
to a sick obsession flick.  But the second half is merely fueled by the
first half, which presents the idea of sexual obsession then goes full
blast with it in the second half.
When "Vertigo" initially came out in the 50s, it was criticized for many
of the same things I said in the first paragraph.  Manipulative. 
Stupid.  Not enough suspense.  But a couple years later, people finally
GOT the film, and now it's a classic.  This film is not to be watched
literally, but to be watched introspectively.  Everything this film is
about is beyond the surface, inbedded in symbolism and theme, creating a
film that is not just one of Hitchcock's best, but probably his most
personal film.
The story centers around a detective named Scottie (James Stewart), who
suffers a massive tragedy when he and another cop are chasing a crook on
rooftops in San Francisco, and he nearly tumbles to his death, only to
watch as the cop who tries to save him falls to his own demise.  From
this, he receives a nasty dose of achrophobia, fear of heights, which
gives him vertigo, which is dizziness, which is exactly what Hitchcock
takes us through.
Stewart is hired by an old college chum a bit later to follow his wife
(Kim Novak), who seems to have developed a bit of insanity, and wanders
off aimlessly, and turns out to believe she is her great-grandmother, a
woman who went insane and killed herself.  As Scottie spies on her, he
becomes more and more obsessed with her, and after he saves her when she
tries to drown herself, he falls deeper in love with her.  Until one day
when fate steps in with her bit of insanity, and at a monestary in
California, she runs to the top of a bell tower, and throws herself to
the ground, all while Scottie is crippled on the stairs by his fear of
heights.
Scottie enters a deep ravine of depression, but one day sees a woman who
looks just like her (also Kim Novak), just a brunette.  He approaches
her, and they begin dating.  Of course, it turns out she was really the
other woman, and was posing as the original so the husband could kill
her and get away with it.  Now, this is pretty hard to swallow, I know,
but do yourself a favor, and don't get hung up on it.  The really great
part is yet to come.
What happens is Scottie and her are really in love, but Scottie's really
in love with what she was pretending to be, since she was the one he had
to follow.  So, he begins to transform her into her, buying her the
exact same dresses, dying her hair, and making her look exactly like
her.  His obsession reaches its fullest when she emerges from the
bathroom in a room lit by neon lights from outside, looking exactly like
the original.  It's one of the most frightening and brilliant scenes in
movie history.
This is, of course, a metaphor for the way Hitchcock had to mold women
into these women they really aren't, to satisfy himself.  He had, I
suppose, felt horrible about the ways he screwed with these women's
personalities, and dumped them for another one.  In most of Hitchcock's
films, the events were a metaphor for something else, but this is one of
the most disturbing ones.  The film is not really a great suspense film,
but really a fantastic introspective drama into the mind of a person
much like the master of suspense himself.
P.S. Make sure you get the widescreen remastered/reissued version that
came out this year.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Damien: Omen II (1978)
Director: Don Taylor
Writers: Stanley Mann and Michael Hodges (story by Harvey Bernhard)
Starring: Jonathan Scott-Taylor, William Holden, Lee Grant, Lucas Donat,
Robert Foxworth, Nicholas Pryor, Lew Ayres, Sylvia Sidney, Lance Henriksen,
Elizabeth Shepherd, Allan Arbus, Mesach Taylor, Leo McKern
There are many scenes in "Damien: Omen II" that would easily make this film
pass as a totally worthy successor to the first film, which was an
entertaining bit of extreme Christian paranoia.  In fact, I'd say that
there are certain scenes in this film which are better than anything that
was in "The Omen."  But like all films, a level of consistency is needed to
make a film work as a whole.  A film needs to have us believe in what it
introduces to us, and then to follow them up and not give us any confusing
contradictions.  And thus, the second in the "Omen" films is frankly a mess
of a film.
For those of you who missed the first one, the "Omen" films are about the
rise and fall of Damien, the antichrist (played this time by Jonathan
Scott-Taylor).  This one takes place seven years after the first one where
he is now 12 and has lived with his uncle, Richard Thorn (William Holden, a
couple years before his death), and his most recent wife, Ann (Lee Grant),
since the death of his parents when he was five (see: "The Omen"). 
Richard, a billionaire, has taken good care of him, and has even allowed
his own son, Mark (Lucas Donat), to become like a brother to Damien.
While the first one had to do with his birth and the discovery by others
that he was the antichrist, this one has a tougher job: it has to continue
the discovery by others of his identity AND has to introduce Damien
discovering who he is, and seeing if he can live up to what he was born to
be.  As the film proceeds, we meet several people who either totally
discover who Damien really is or only begin to discover but don't fully
know.  Either way, they are offed by coincidence or a nasty black crow,
both done by Satan himself.
This was something that was done in the first film as well - someone
discovers that Damien exists in the form of Gregory Peck's five-year-old
son, and they're killed off in a bizarre way - but here is done to such
extremes that they become high camp (not that the ones in the others
weren't campy - need I remind anyone of how the one priest is killed?  I'm
still laughing over that one).  It seems that every ten or fifteen minutes,
someone comes along that is crazed with the knowledge that Damien Thorn is
the antichrist, and a scene later stumble onto a weird death.  The thing
was in the first one, they were: a) part of small and eerie prophecies, and
b) there were only five of them total.  I think that there are about 10 of
them here, all done with a gradual descent of originality.  There are so
many at so many varying levels of camp that the film eventually turns
Satan, who does all the killing, into the world's perfect slasher.
All the while, there's William Holden's Richard, standing there amidst a
high level of corpses, with numerous people telling him about his son, and
not being able to recognize that any of this is in the slightest way a
problem with Damien.  This is a film where everything could probably be
resolved quickly if Richard wasn't so blind to everything.  Luckily Holden
is such a good actor that he actually makes everything seem realistic.  He
brings his character enough depth that some faults in the script are fixed,
while others just stand there unaided.
The film balances Satan's doings of not letting anyone find out too much
with Damien's discovery of who he is, but this is done with varying amounts
of contradictions.  In one scene, he's yelling at his father "WHY ME?!" and
in the other, he's joyously watching someone who knows to much get killed. 
It even tries to introduce those who have discovered who he is, and intend
on trying to help him become the antichrist, like his one sergeant at
military school (Lance Henriksen, before his voice was plagued with the
effects of tobacco), who tells him to read the Book of Revelations to find
out who he is.
But as I said, the film is filled with some very great scenes, including
some very inventive murder scenes (and some not-so-inventive), especially
some of the first ones (though I kinda liked a later one where Messach
Taylor of "Designing Women" was killed in an elevator scene...not that I
ever watched "Designing Women").  The film starts out well, and begins to
show some great promise, especially how it may actually follow up on the
idea that Damien may just be a human with a great burden.  Eventually, it
becomes just a very dramatic slasher pic, complete with proposterous
twists, and a couple instances of good direction.
I've made this out to be a pretty awful little film, and yes, it is a mess,
but it's actually very engrossing.  There's not a minute of the film that
isn't watchable, and Jonathan Scott-Taylor shows himself to be a very
effective Damien (though his constantly switching accent is a bit
perterbing at times).  The thing is if you haven't seen the first one, you
may be blown away by some of the prophecies it unearths.  But if you have
seen the first one, you've already been through all that before, so why
would you need a cheap copy of it?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Love and Death on Long Island (1997)
Director: Richard Kwietniowski
Writer: Richard Kwietniowski (based on the novel by Gilbert Adair)
Starring: John Hurt, Jason Priestly, Fiona Loewi, Sheila Hancock, Maury
Chaykin, Gawn Grainer, Elizabeth Quinn, Bruce Filmore, Tom Hurst
One day, reclusive British Writer Giles De'Ath (John Hurt) locks himself
out of his flat, and stumbles upon a poster advertising a screening of a
film adaptation of an E.M. Forster novel.  Arriving there, he's shocked to
see that it's not really E.M. Forster, but instead a teen schlock film
called "Hotpants College II," and that the Forster film was the prior week.
 But as he's getting up to leave, he stops, and the camera pulls in on his
shocked face, which is frozen on the screen.
What he's seen is an actor on the screen who mesmerizes him for some untold
reason.  He sits down and watches the rest of the film, and when the
credits come up, the film highlights the actor's name: Robbie Bostock
(Jason Priestly - yes, THAT Jason Priestly), and Giles becomes completely
obsessed with this man, awkwardly buying teen magazines, renting his films
(with titles like "Tex Mex" and "Skin Marks"...but alas, no "Hotpants
College I").  He even tells his maid that she is no longer allowed to clean
in his study so that he can secretly watch his films, and make an album of
cut-outs and what-not just like some pre-pubescent Leo DiCaprio-freak.
It's the alienated Giles messy attempt to re-enter society that this film
is about, and, in fact, most of the film plays like a giant
Fish-Out-of-Water film with substance.  The film is a semi-comedy,
semi-philosophical drama which gets most of its laughs from bits like Giles
ordering a VCR but not understanding that you need a television to watch
the tapes on, but also has the guts and brains to make something out of all
this.
The first half of the film deals with his obsession with Robbie, but the
second half has him taking a "vacation," if you will, in Chesterton, Long
Island where Robbie apparently lives.  There, he sets out on a quest to
track down Robbie, and get to know him or something.  Eventually, he does
meet him, and he desperately tries to make it sound like it's really his
fictitious niece who is in love with him, but can't help but tell him
repeatedly how great he is.  Things get generally uncomfortable from here.
"Love and Death on Long Island" has been said to have been based on certain
themes in the novel "Death in Venice" (which I have yet to read, but yeah,
it's next on my long list of books I have to read now), and I can only
guess that some of those themes are the negative parts of seclusion,
worshipping false idols, and alienation in general.  But the film deals
with all of these in mostly comical ways, making the film easier to digest
and also more fun to discuss later on.  As I watched the film, I was
laughing a lot of the time at everything, but afterwards, I was thinking
what the film was trying to say about everything.
Giles, who's brilliantly played by John Hurt (relatively unknown, unless
you bring up the fact that he was the guy in "Alien" who had the alien pop
out of his chest, and that he was the Elephant Man once, but you couldn't
recognize him in the latter anyway), is portrayed not as a mere stupid man,
but as one who is completely out of touch with reality.  He has built an
emotional and philosophical shield around himself, so much that when
someone asks him in an interview if he owns a word processor, he just
stares at her and says "Am I in the business of just processing words?"
That's why his obsession with Robbie is so great.  We don't fully
comprehend his obsession, although I doubt it's the homosexual obsession
many people may find (he was married to a woman once, but she died, and we
don't know his past or anything), but whatever it is, it's so huge that it
grows out of control.  By the time he's in Long Island and searching for
his house by foot, we are near cringing everytime he gets closer to his
target.  And when he literally runs into Robbie's gorgeous model wife
(Fiona Loewi) at the supermarket and gives her a false story, we can't
believe he's gone this far.
But all of this is handled lightly, so as not to talk down to people.  The
film is just hilarious to watch, filled with lots of great quick comic
moments, like a scene in a taxi where he rudely disses a cabbie's attempts
to get him to put out a cigarette, or just weridly subtle characters, like
a diner owner named Irv (Maury Chaykin, who's really making his rounds
these days) who describes absolutely everything as "very attractive."
The performances are quite amazing as well.  John Hurt gives what may be
his best performance, which is a tough thing to beat, in my opinion.  And
Jason Priestly nails his performance.  I really liked how his character
wasn't a self-mockery or anything - it almost seems that this is exactly
how Priestly is in real life, or at least used to be.  I'm almost afraid to
say this: he's great.  Also giving great performances are Loewi as
Priestly's wife, and Chaykin, who's humerous in every way, not just in his
choice of hair cuts.
All this makes "Love and Death" a really fun film to watch, although some
of it is uncomfortable in the same way "King of Comedy" is (although not
that much, to tell the truth).  It's a film that could be passed off as
mere FOOW (Fish Out Of Water) material, but afterwards it can be looked at
philosophically.  Like the way Giles can look at something that seems
kiddie and find something redeeming in it, you can look to this film with
its false facade and find something even more redeeming.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
Director: Steven Spielberg
Writer: David H. Frinzoni (based on the book "Black Mutiny" by William
Owens)
Starring: Djimon Hounsou, Matthew McConaughey, Morgan Freeman, Anthony
Hopkins, Stellan Skarsgĺrd, Nigel Hawthorne, David Paymer, Pete
Postlethwaite, Jeremy Northam, Xander Berkeley, Paul Guilfoyle, Geno Silva,
John Ortiz, Peter Firth, Arliss Howard, Razaaq Adoti, Abu Bakaar Fofanah,
Anna Paquin, Tomás Milián, Kevin J. O'Connor, Austin Pendleton
In 1839, the slaves on the Spanish Ship "La Amistad" revolted, killed all
but two captors (two because none of them knew how to steer the ship), who
proceeded to sail them to America instead of Africa like they said they
would.  Once there, a series of long, controversial hearings were heard,
debating over their origin, which would decide if the slaves were legal
(which means they are technically murders) or not (which means they were
merely defending themselves, and hey, that's okay).  It's a true story, and
I didn't even know about it.
Upon learning about this and how undertold it is, Steven Spielberg thought
it was high time someone made a big budget Dreamworks movie out of it,
directed by him as his next "Schindler's List" (since he directed "The Lost
World" this summer, he thought he'd try to do what he did in '93, otherwise
known as "The Year of Spielberg").  The result?  "Amistad."  With a big
vast cast of everyone from Anthony Hopkins to Anna Paquin to Austin
freaking Pendleton, very impressive production designs, and lots of debate
over freedom to stir everyone up into a pissed-off and emotionally moved
frenzy.
In fact "Amistad" is so big that it's almost disappointing.  "Amistad" not
only wants to be Spilberg's next "Schindler's List," but it wants to be: a)
as emotionally moving as that film; b) as monetarily successful as it; and
c) the big winner in the Oscar race.  It's hand-crafted so that everything
about it is supposed to stir someone up, and filled with scenes of horror,
beauty, and various other stuff that melts Oscar's heart.  But why isn't it
all this?
Well, there's a couple problems with the film.  First off, the film limits
the debate over slavery in a couple ways: first, making the film's outcome
only affect a small group of slaves - no big grand debate here; and because
it's only a trial.  The film plays like this: a great 15 minute
introduction where we see the bloody, gory, and charging in oh so many ways
revolt; then 2 hours and 15 minutes of various courtrooms and talking,
broken up sporadically with scenes like one where the unofficial slave
leader and on-again-off-again protagonist, Cinqué (Djimon Hounsou), stands
up in court to scream repeatedly "Give us free!" while John Williams' score
pounds the emotion into our brains so that we don't have any other thoughts
than "Guess the film wants me to cry now."
Another problem is lack of focus in some areas.  Is it a film about slavery
and its affects on man, or is it just a big debate by people who only know
from second hand experience?  For maximum effect, the film should have been
about Cinqué and his experience as the leader of the alleged slaves.  It is
sometimes.  But the film also decides to focus on other people, placing
them in the foreground for awhile.  The other main character is a real
estate lawyer named Baldwin, played by Matthew McConaughey, which brings
out deja vu since his character in this is only slightly different from the
one he played in "A Time to Kill" (though admittingly he does it so well). 
He takes over the story sometimes, presenting a man who gets into the job
thinking as the slaves as objects to debate over, and eventually thinking
of them as people.  It's too weakly shown, and perhaps it could have been
tossed all together and had him get into the job to make sure they become
free.  But the film just shows it, and almost dumps him later on in the
film, then picks him back up.
This goes with many of the characters, most of whom are underwritten (I
suspect there's a big-ass director's cut somewhere, where everyone gets a
chance to grow - but I'm sure there's not many people who want to see it). 
Take for instance Morgan Freeman's character, an ex-slave who's now a
civilian/abolitionist (working with another abolitionist, played by the
great Stellan Skarsgĺrd, now of "Good Will Hunting" fame): he never grows
throughout and the main reason he seems to be there, other than for
historical accuracy perhaps, is so that there can be a few scenes where he
remembers the pain of being a slave.  That's it.
In fact, many characters can be summed up in either very short sentences or
mere words.  Nigel Hawthorne's current President Van Buren is sheepish,
since he has to try and not create a Civil War and also hold a good
contract with Spain (headed by young Queen Isabella, played by Anna Paquin
who has a small monologue); Jeremy Northam's judge in the second trial is
nervous but trying to appear confident; David Paymer's Secretary John
Forsyth is ignorant; and Pete Postlethwaite's prosecuting attorney is
stubborn.  And for "comic relief," look to Austin Pendleton as a Professor
who's forte is African languages, who stutters just as much as he usually
does, and to the same effect (I love that guy).
As for Djumon Hounsou, he's very intense as Cinqué, showing him as
sometimes pissed off, sometimes saddened, sometimes bewildered.  Some say
he should have received an Oscar nomination for his performance, but just
remember that this year had so many strong performances that you can't
acknowledge them all.  Regardless, Hounsou has a strong film presence, one
that attracts sympathy for his character.
But the one actor who REALLY walks away with his role is Anthony Hopkins,
who DID get an Oscar nomination for his performance as the crotchety,
somewhat bitter, and incredibly intelligent ex-President John Quincy Adams,
who has the most characterization in the film, sometimes shown in scenes
that he's not even in (one of my favorites was one where a bunch of
Presidential advisors discussed how the only great thing about him was that
his father was a great president).  Hopkins not only emerges as a scene
stealer in all of his scenes, but also gives one of the best courtroom
speeches in any film.  Sure, it goes on for 11 minutes, but it's so well
done, so underempahsized by the music (the score is one of Williams' most
overbearing), and so fascinating that I almost wanted to applaud
afterwards.  And I almost did.
What I really didn't feel like applauding after, or even really cheering
over (though I did smile) was the final verdict.  Sure, the music stirs up,
people get pissed off, and many others dance in happiness (McConaughey
jumps up and down like he was moshing), but for some odd reason I could not
really feel that emotionally moved.  Maybe it was because it was the third
time this verdict had been read in the film.  Maybe it was because the
vedict wasn't monumental.  It only affected a small group of people.  In
the beginning of the film, Van Buren replies to a message about the trial
with a quick "There are over 100,000 slaves (or something) living in the
U.S; why should I care about 40 (or so)?"  Sure, he sounded cruel when he
said it, but at least he was being honest.
Yet during the ending when they were showing close-ups of characters in the
film and summing up their lives afterwards in short paragraphs, I couldn't
help but feel moved for Cinqué when the title said that he returned to his
land in Africa to find it destroyed and his family gone, maybe being
captured into slavery.  Why did it move me?  Probably because it was
personal.  It affected one person.  The film has a way of not getting to
grand and not getting to personal with its message throughout.  Maybe if it
had picked one of these instead of lingering in moderation, it may have
been great.  Maybe it could have been almost as good as "Schindler's List."
Still, "Amistad" is educational, powerful, and intriguing throughout.  The
film's 2 1/2 hours are leisurely but never tedious, and there are so many
great moments in the film...let me ammend that a bit: so many great real
moments in the film, like clips of slaves been drowned on the slave ships
by being tied to a bunch of rocks and pulled to the ocean floor, or a bunch
of slaves in captivity and a newborn baby being held above them...things
like this that make "Amistad" worth seeing.  It suceeds on many levels, but
doesn't suceed on being magnificent.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
Director: Martin Campbell
Writers: Terry Rossio, Ted Elliott, and John Eskow
Starring: Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta Jones, Stuart
Wilson, Matthew Letscher, Tony Amendola, Pedro Armendáriz Jr., L.Q. Jones,
Maury Chaykin, Julieta Rosen
"The Mask of Zorro" is like all of the old classic swashbucklers of the 20s
and 30s: action-packed, filled with lots of melodrama, seeming with
characters we either love or hate, marvelously entertaining, and instantly
forgettable.  I can't remember a lot of my reactions to this film as I
watched, and perhaps thinking about it a bit, I could probably point out
several things that I didn't like about it.  But all I remember is that for
2 hours plus, I was glued to the screen, swept up in the melodrama, and had
a big smile on my face the entire time.  Afterwards, it was more of a
grimace, but what are you gonna do?
Zorro is the latest of the classics of either TV or movies to be rehashed
by Hollywood and spit at the American Moviegoing Public, and luckily enough
Zorro's one that even I'd want to remake.  Basically, Zorro's a big
showman.  He doesn't just punish the wicked and return faith to the
downtrodden like a modern-day Mexican Robin Hood; he's got to do some
mugging, which is why he's such an interesting legend.  But this film
actually gives us not one but two Zorros, not to chose from, but to see the
torch being passed from one to another.
The film begins with the first Zorro, really a reclusive land owner named
Don Diego de la Vega (Anthony Hopkins, sans Mexican accent), who rides to
town every now and then to help the poor and battle his tryannical
politician enemy, Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson, the baddie from
"Lethal Weapon 3," if you can at all remember him), then returns to his
villa on the edge of a cliff to be with his wife, Esperanza (Julieta
Rosen), and his newborn baby girl.  We are introduced to him when his fame
has already presided him, and after one big, very satisfying action
sequence towards the begining (glad to see Mr. Hopkins' stunt man is
finally getting some work), he is discovered by Rafael, his wife is
accidentally shot, his baby is stolen by Rafael, and he is sent to prison
for the rest of his life.
Jump about 20 years and Rafael is now returning to power again, this time
to end the long running war with Santa Anna over the property of
California.  Now enter con man Alejandro Murrieta (Anthony Hopkins), who
seeks revenge on an evil general of Montero's, Captain Harison Love
(Matthew Letscher), who kills his brother towards the beginning (sorta). 
Luckily, Diego has escaped from prison, and upon stumbling into Alejandro
at a bar, he decides that his fiery intensity, if properly trained, will
result in a redux of Zorro-dom, since he's way too old, but he still wants
to get revenge on Rafael and maybe introduce himself to his daughter, Elena
(a lusty and wonderfully-acting Catherine Zeta Jones), who's now much older
not to mention much more, well, buxom.
So goes the backstory to "The Mask of Zorro," and you can easily see how
melodramatic this all is, and how things will get even more melodramatic as
Alejandro learns how to fight and become suave (the film stages a massive
"Pygmalion"-esque sequence of him learning to fight, yet skips everything
about him learning to pass as a member of the Mexican aristocracy).  Things
become a tad more complicated as Alejandro starts posing as a politician of
sorts, and learns of some major political corruptedness.  Anyways, it's all
there just to involve the audience with a simple story of passionate
revenge, learning how to obtain dignity, and standing up against the
unjust.  And it's all just fun stuff because, unlike many films, the
characters we're supposed to like are very likable, and the characters
we're not supposed to like are very unlikable.  Just like the old movies.
The film's one major flaw may just be that it's trying to be everything,
and in the pursuit of telling a story, it denies the one thing that the
film really honestly needs: Zorro.  The character only pops up every now
and then, more and more towards the end, and the first times that Banderas
dons the costume and persona of the famous rebel are wonderfully awkward,
but eventually Banderas becomes Zorro.  When he finally gets it right, it's
just amazing stuff.  Banderas has proved himself to a few moviegoers,
mostly those who actually saw "Desperado" (one of the, like, billion films
he made in the fall of '95), that he's a suave, lovable, and wonderful
comic actor, capable of perhaps becoming one of the most likable graceful
action stars since Douglas Fairbanks (Sr.).  He has the kind of radiance
that lets the audience know that he's having lots of fun and the
gracefulness to be awe-inspiring and just plain lovable.  When he finally
discovers Zorro in himself, it just proves what the trailers suggested:
Antonio Banderas was born to play this role.  And he should do it agian,
for God's sake.
But the part of this film that really won me over was not Banderas's Zorro,
but Anthony Hopkins' Diego, a man who could have just been a simple
character, bent on revenge, but is instead portrayed as an emotionally
complex individual, thanks to Hopkins, who plays him with a mix of mystery
and sadness.  We never know what really made his character become Zorro in
the first place, but Hopkins hints at in his acting and makes everything
just seem real.  If Zorro is the reason you're seeing it in the first
place, Diego should be the reason you feel something emotionally.
However bold Hopkins' performance is, he never lets this film become heavy
handed, and his brooding never overblows the fact that this film is simply
just good old American entertainment.  There's no message, no dark
undertones, and the depth is kept to a minimum.  I could probably easily
complain that these are faults in the production and that I want to see big
budget Hollywood event pics, such as this, become "smarter"...but I won't,
because in all reality, I don't want all of them to be like that.  "The
Mask of Zorro" is not a dumb film, but it's not a terribly brilliant film
and that's all right.  It's escapism at its purist because it recognizes
that sometimes the most entertaining films are those that simply tell a
good story and tell it with interesting characters and lots of passion.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
Director: Jay Roach
Writer: Mike Myers
Starring: Mike Myers, Elizabeth Hurley, Michael York, Mimi Rogers, 
Robert Wagner, Seth Green, Charles Napier, Will Ferell, Tom Arnold, 
Carrie Fisher and...Burt Bacharach
When SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE was...you know, good, it starred a guy named 
Mike Myers who, along with such greats as Dana Carvey and Phil Hartman, 
made me bust a gut every Sunday morning (since I was always too tired at 
11:30 on Saturday so I would tape them and watch them before church...I 
was young).  Mike was my fave, though I always said Dana was because I 
was quite the little trendy lad back in the day.  But whenever Mike 
would do an Englishman (especially Mick Jagger), that was when the show 
was the absolute funniest, since his part was so well-rehearsed, so 
authentic and so educated.  
Of course, he was doing material written by someone else, but now, with 
his second big film on his own (the other being the 
nice-idea-but-not-too-good SO I MARRIED AND AXE MURDERER), he's the sole 
writer and main attraction (unless you consider Burt Bacharach a big 
financial attraction...).  With AUSTIN POWERS, he has created an 
original, non-SNL character: a mix between any 60s spy guy...complete 
with bad teeth, an awful wig, firghtening chest hair, big dork glasses, 
a male necklace and...a sweedish-made penis enlarger ("It's not my bag, 
baby!")
Myers not only does a kind of Fish-Out-Of-Water thing here (thank GOD he 
didn't play it up too much!), his full-length parody is one of the most 
intelligent comedies to come around since the days of early Mel Brooks. 
 The plot (somewhat irrelevant, but still good for good laughs for those 
of us who've seen too many Bond films): Austin has frozen himself for 30 
years since his nemesis, Dr. Evil (also Myers), has done the same thing 
to make sure taking over the world would not coincide with the 
sexual/hippie revolution.  He's thawed out and, along with his very 
attractive Emma Peel-esque agent, Vanessa Kensington (the wonderful 
Elizabeth Hurley), he tries to stop Dr. Evil from launching a nuclear 
bomb into the earth's core.  
Austin is a wonderful creation: a swinging ladies man who's a 
photographer by day, and a spy whenever his boss, Mr. Exposition (the I 
think thawed out as well, Michael York) calls him up.  He gets a major 
culture shock when he's thawed out ("As long as people are having 
premiscuous sex with multiple partners while at the same time 
experimenting with mind-expanding drugs, I'll be fine!" - don't quote 
me, I only saw it twice) but Myers choses not to dwell on it too much.  
His explorations with the culture shock on Dr. Evil are much better, 
since his initial plan is to make a false contreversy in the Royal 
Family about Charles having an affair forcing him to divorce and a plan 
to put a whole with "what we call 'a laser' into what we call 'the ozone 
layer' for...ONE MILLION DOLLARS!"  Hilarity ensues.
The film also has a plethora of 60s references, including: any Bond 
film, 60s Connery preferably; MAN FROM U.N.C.L.E.; BLOW UP, THE 
AVENGERS, GET SMART, A HARD DAY'S NIGHT and even a line from BEYOND THE 
VALLEY OF THE DOLLS (written by Roger Ebert - the line being, "This is 
my happening and it freaks me out!" - a great line I will use in 
everyday life henceforth).  Dr. Evil looks exactly like Donald 
Pleasance's Blofeld, equipped with his cat - Mr. Bigglesworth - who 
suffers a hilarious mishap in the beginning.  And to top that off, his 
henchmen consist of a woman who looks almost exactly like Lotta Lenya in 
FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE and a man named Random Task who is a dead ringer 
for Odd Job.  
Another plot dealing with Dr. Evil's son, Scott (Seth Green), who was 
made from his sperm which was frozen before he left, is not essential to 
the plot but gives it a cornicopia of jokes, especially where it winds 
the two in therapy since he hates him for not being there his entire 
life.
Also, look for multiple cameos by the likes of Tom Arnold, Carrie Fisher 
and even...(you knew it, it's anticlimactic) Burt Bacharach himself, 
singing his tunes.  I hear Christian Slater and Rob Lowe were in it too, 
but I have no clue who they were.  Guess I should see it again.
AUSTIN POWERS is a great film, good for multiple viewings and especially 
fun if you know what it's spoofing.  Comedy is hard but Mike Myers is 
now a Titan of modern comedy, thanks to the greatness of this film.  
Rush out to see it and stay groovy, baby!

Title
Review for Gingerbread Man, The (1998)
Director: Robert Altman
Writer: Al Hayes (based on a story by John Grisham)
Starring: Kenneth Branagh, Embeth Davidtz, Roberty Downey Jr, Daryl Hannah,
Robert Duvall, Famke Janssen, Tom Berenger, Jesse James, Mae Whitman
"The Gingerbread Man" is a film that almost cries out to be made into a
piece of Hollywood fluff, and it would have been if it hadn't been directed
by someone like Robert Altman.  It's not surprising that this film is based
on a story by John Grisham, one of the current kings (or at least he's a
duke) of bestsellers, since it has to deal with his favorite topic -
lawyers being forced to go above and beyond their duties - and because it
soon descends into a kafkaesque nightmare where the protagonist's life is
turned inside out.
Yet it's effortlessly not like the other Grisham films, like "The Firm" and
"The Client."  There's more atmosphere, more plausible twists, less
contrivance (in comparison, that is), and one other quality the other
lacked: surprise.  As a hurricane (nicely titled "Geraldo") sweeps through
the film's location of Savannah, Georgia, the film tells a nice piece of
pulp where the twists are geniuine, and so is the atmosphere and the
characters.  And yet the pulp is another of the Grisham lawyer stories,
following a formula that has been perfected yet doesn't feel like it's
being followed all the time.
The story deals with, well, a southern lawyer named Rick Magruder (Kenneth
Branagh, with a flawless and not-at-all annoying Southern accent), who
arrives home from a case one night and finds his staff and friends have
thrown a party for him.  After chatting it up with his assistant (Daryl
Hannah, who's not at all bad in this) and a couple of his other staffers,
he leaves and runs into a waitress who was there, Mallory (Embeth Davidtz),
who's car is stolen and who ends up with a ride home from Rick.  Rick
discovers that Mallory suspects her father (Robert Duvall), a crazy old man
who has been stalking her of late, stole it, and when back at her house,
the two become close as she tells him of her problems and he tries
unsuccessfully to help.  The two end the conversation by sleeping together.
>From here on, Rick begins to feel a certain need to help her, and he
manages to get her father to court, where they win effortlessly, and he is
sent to a mental institution.  But he is broken out by a cult he belongs
to, and soon Rick's life is being turned upside down.  He gets threats in
the mail, finds out cars are following him, and soon begins to take the law
into his own hand.  For once in a real long time, Altman manages to make
everything very suspenseful, with some real geniune nail biters here, even
though the final chapter of the film is basically one big predictable
contrivance, bringing it to a cliched albeit less glossy ending that it
could have avoided.
It's not the plot I really liked about this film.  Most Grisham plots are
in all reality just throwaways.  His novels are entertaining, but let's
face it: they're forgettable.  You read it while on vacation or on breaks
from work, and when you're done, you read his next book and the cycle just
continues.  What Altman has done differently, something which the other
directors didn't do, is give it a personal touch.  Altman's a very original
director.  He goes for a less glossy approach to all his films, using lots
of sloppy and improvised close-ups, following many voice tracks at one
time, and just allowing the film to lay still as he allows characters to
just hang out.  Look at how he designs Rick's office staff and you'll see
how loose and free this film really is, even if its confined by a plot.
As for the element of surprise it introduces - what I mean is that it
allows us to feel a lot like the characters, and it never really lets us
onto thinking of possible conspiracies.  We go along with everything. 
We're there with Rick in his rage towards the second half of the film, when
his kids are kidnapped by someone and we all know who did it.  It doesn't
hurt that Kenneth Branagh is such a likable actor that he manages to make
Rick, who could be just a lawyer who may just be on the receiving end of
instant karma, into a sympathetic and lovable guy.
I can't say I totally liked this film.  It's still a contrived film, with
an ending that Altman fought with the studio over and you wonder why he
didn't just look for a better one.  And Altman's free direction, which
allows mood and characters to be more prominent than plot doesn't exactly
work perfectly well with a film where the plot is so important.  And this
film is disappointing in one major way: just the fact that this was
directed by someone as amazing as Altman.  This certainly can't be a step
forward for the same man who less than a decade ago made a brilliant little
film called "The Player."
But I'm still one of the few people who try to look at every film by a
director as a singular piece of art, and not judge him from his others. 
This man has made "M*A*S*H" and "Nashville."  So what?  Directors sometimes
need to take breaks but still direct, and making films like this, that are
never meant to be masterpieces is sometimes refreshing.  I remember when
Martin Scorsese made "Cape Fear" and some critics criticized it for not
being as great as, say, "Raging Bull."  I suppose the difference between
this film and that one is that "Cape Fear" WAS a great film, and "The
Gingerbread Man" is merely just good.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Unbearable Lightness of Being, The (1988)
Director: Philip Kauffman
Writers: Jean-Claude Carričreand Philip Kauffman (based on the novel by
Milan Kundera)
Starring: Daniel Day-Lewis, Juliette Binoche, Lena Olin, Derek de Lint,
Erland Josephson, Pavel Landowsky, Donald Moffat, Stellan Skarsgĺrd, Tomek
Bork, Daniel Olbrychski
"The Unbearable Lightness of Being" is one of the great stories about sex
primarily because it knows exactly how to tell it.  Here's a film that
takes eroticism completely seriously, existing on some kind of other plane
of being...a light plane if you will.  The entire film feels like one
sustained thought about eroticism, but it also contains thoughts on sex,
promiscuity, and the way that life constantly interrupts this kind of
being, and that sex is something that is truly a many splendored thing, but
it's also something that cannot be sustained.
The film is a 3 hour thought on all of this, told in a light-weighted,
almost ethereal tone which has prompted certain groups to refer to it as
"The Unbearable Lightness of Boring."  In some ways, these people are
right: few things occur in this film, and scenes are extended beyond what
they usually would last in a standard film.  But this film isn't interested
in details, or really telling a story as it is with establishing the
correct mood, and saying some very deep things in the process.
The story itself could be interpreted as melodrama: a promiscuous doctor,
Tomas (Daniel Day-Lewis, with big Ben Stiller hair), marries a somewhat
eccentric country girl, Tereza (Juliette Binoche, very pre-"English
Patient"), but also conducts affairs with numerous women while still
staying emotionally faithful to Tereza.  Tomas has always been a womanizer,
and in the first scene of the film, tells a nurse at his hospital whom he
has had some relations with to take her clothes off because he "missed
something last night."  And she does.  When he marries Tereza, it's a tough
thing for him to do because, unlike him, Tereza is not a person who can
have meaningless affairs, and Tomas's cheating on her worries her.
There's another main character: Sabina (sweedish actress Lena Olin), who is
introduced with a title card that says she's the only person who
understands Tomas and his "lightness of being."  She too is promiscuous,
and she is shown at one time conducting an affair with a man named Franz
(Derek de Lint) who sleeps with her, then shows up one night at her
apartment to announce that he's left his wife and wishes to live with her. 
This frightens Sabina chiefly because she too is falling in love with him
and still wants to keep on living the way she does.
There are few other characters, most who come and go in the film, much like
Franz does.  But we are introduced to a few people who pop up every now and
then, including a chief surgeon at Tomas's hospital in Prague played by
Donald Moffat (who played the president in "Clear and Present Danger"); and
other characters who show up for only a brief period of time and then
disappear, like an Engineer played by Stellan Skarsgĺrd (who recently
played Proffessor Lambeau in the overrated "Good Will Hunting) who has an
all-too brief affair wit Tereza at one point in the film.  The triumverate
of characters are all the film is really interested in, and this creates a
closed vaccuum that the film lives in, protecting it from outside forces,
like these supporting characters who show up now and then.
The film also introduces politics and a war, as it takes place in Prague
during the "Prague Spring" of 1969.  It really could be any war, but this
war is special because it deals with communism and the freedom of
expression.  As the film goes on, Tomas becomes more and more outraged by
this war, and his entire livelihood is threatened, as well as Sabina's and
Tereza's.  The war of course is symbolic of reality's way of crushing the
finer parts of life, like sex and other forms of emotional liberation.  Sex
for Tomas and Sabina is a form of escapism, but this kind of living becomes
endangered because it has no center in reality.
The war scenes are handled nicely: without any real detail and with horror.
 The film never truly establishes what war it is, but later tells us that
it has to deal with communism.  The film is not concerned with such petty
details as the cause of the war, or even the outcome.  Such things are not
necessary to the film.  It wants to show the effects it has on the people
in the film, the way it causes them to have to break from their state of
being, and enter into reality.
But the film sustains a kind of hypnotic pull to it.  It's scenes are often
lengthy, filled with humor and a certain kind of eroticism.  Philip
Kauffman (who directed the first NC-17 film, "Henry and June," a couple
years later) directs the film with a light touch, making everything seem
effortless, and nothing but the war sequences coming off as jolting.  The
scenes themselves have lots of risque things going on which never seem to
attract attention themselves like they would in, say, a porn film.  We
delight in seeing them because they come off so nicely and with such a
gentle yet firm touch.
One scene imparticular stands out in the mind.  That's a scene where
Tereza, who's a photographer and just has gotten a job in Geneva (after
they've retreated there), discovers that to get more jobs, she has to
photograph naked women.  She visits Sabina, who's also in Geneva, and asks
her to pose nude for her.  Sabina agrees, and what occurs is so perfecly
orchestrated that it comes off as a 10 minute sustained breath.  Everything
they do is so sensual that I would be shocked if anyone was able to move
during this scene.  It's an example of how minimalism works perfectly in
creating eroticism: the two women never have sex, but they come so close
that it still comes off as satisfying.
The ending of this scene is perfect, with an intrusion into this form of
escapism that brings reality back to the foreground.  The entire film is
like this, dealing with sex on an intelligent level.  It views sex as a
form of escapism in life, and because sex can never last forever, there are
constant intrusions, spoiling the moment.  This is one of the only films
that view sex and promiscuity in a positive light.  It views it so kindly
because of the more philosophical ideas of it: it is a way to forget about
the terrors of the world, and while it's going on, we are almost not aware
of any outside influences and problems, like war or even STDs.
It also views this kind of living as something that some people have and
some don't.  While Tomas and Sabina have it, Tereza doesn't, and her few
attempts to gain it for herself come out as horrible and tragic.  But Tomas
and Sabina easily live with this kind of living, save for the constant
interruptions they have that break the moment.
You also have to respect how this film is so ungraphic about sex.  Despite
the fact that the subject of this film is sex, it doesn't have tons of
graphic sex or all sorts of nudity.  Yes, there is a little bit of both,
but the film does not become excessive at all.  It views sex as a kind of
hypnotic mystique, making it all the more erotic and sensual.  We never get
nasty close-ups, or linger over sex for long periods of time for the reason
that some person may find it fun to jack off to.  It has a deep respect for
sex, and Kauffman directs this with ease, but also the right amount of
restraint.
The title of the film is perfect: it's cynical, witty, and pretty much sums
up what this film is dealing with.  "The Unbearable Lightness of Being" is
about the way that having sex without the emotional entanglements is
something that will only last a short time.  Judging by this idea, as well
as the tragic ending, one might come to the conclusion that this kind of
living is bad, and that it will only lead to more horrible parts of life. 
But this story takes another angle, showing that while this kind of being
is not eternal, it must be enjoyed while it is happening.  Same goes for
this film, which, while it lasts, is a spellbinding film that transports us
to a whole other dimension of being, is interupted with a couple intrusions
of war and other horrors, then gets right back to where it was before. 
What other film treats sex so profoundly and with such love?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Mean Streets (1973)
Director: Martin Scorsese
Writers: Martin Scorsese and Mardik Martin
Starring: Harvey Keitel, Robert DeNiro, David Proval, Amy Robinson,
Richard Romanus, Cesare Danova, David Carradine, Robert Carradine,
Martin Scorsese, Catherine Scorsese
In 1973, a year after "The Godfather" made organized crime kind of
glorious, director Martin Scorsese exploded onto the big screen with his
highly ambitious, and incredibly personal "Mean Streets," which
chronicled what seemed to be his early adulthood in Little Italy, a
place where there's organized crime which can look glamorous to anyone
on the cusp of maturity.  To me, this film is about this cusp, and how
life lessons like what happens in this film can help us to grow as
people, and someday mature fully.
"Mean Streets" deals with Charlie (Harvey Keitel), who is supposed to be
the young Scorsese.  He is basically defined as an angel stuck between
heaven and hell.  Highly religious, though easily seduced by crime,
sleazy women, and other assorted things prohibited by catholicism, he is
an immature, though a little more mature than most of his clique.
Charlie is a frequent church-goer, but also resides at his one friend's
(David Proval) bar.  We see him at his most reverent at church, then cut
to him at the bar where he's doing what he always does: hanging around,
drinking, etc.  He seems to be more in his element there, and also seems
more hypnotizing there.  We are lured into his world, and show the same
fascination he does when he gazes up at the topless dancers.
Charlie also has another big weakness: his friendship to the incredibly
immature Johnny Boy (Robert DeNiro).  Johnny owes money to everyone in
the world, it seems, and Charlie acts as his parole officer, checking in
on him, and always making sure he's making money to pay off his debts. 
One of his more outstanding debts belongs to one of Charlie's friends
and associates, Michael (Richard Romanus), who is constantly bugging
Charlie for the money.
He's obsessed with Johnny in more ways than one.  The two share a kind
of homoerotic relationship, at one time crashing in the same bed as
eachother.  Then, in the same shot, we see that it's deeper than that. 
Charlie is kind of dating or pseudo-dating Johnny's cousin, Theresa (Amy
Robinson), who's also on Charlie's case to de-friend Johnny and move
away with her.
With all these tense things going on, as well as his job for one of the
local mafia heads (Cesare Danova), we see Charlie caught in a self-made
cage.  The finale, which is often criticized but brilliant when
understood, brings about the maturity of Charlie, and also the awakening
of a couple other characters.
"Mean Streets" is told in a breezy, epiodic fashion, allowing us to get
to know the characters in a friendly fashion.  Johnny Boy's a seductive
character, being child-like and fancy free and all that good stuff.  He
has no responsibilites, is a good ladies man, and seems to always be in
a state of happiness.  Charlie is more like the majority of us: passive
with a bit of fatherhood over Johnny Boy, who he idolizes in a
non-sexual way (yes, there's homoeroticism between the two, but nothing
serious, although one could say that his relationship with Theresa is a
growth from the one with Johnny).
"Mean Streets," the first big film from Scorsese, is a ferociously
original film.  Its directing style is gritty, often resembling a crude
documentary from the era, only with DeNiro and Keitel as the main
subjects.  Its violence is sudden, often impulsive, catching us off
guard.  One time, a drunken man at the bar (David Carridine, around the
time "Kung Fu" took off) is suddenly shot by an unknown assailant
(Robert Carridine, his cousin, I think).  And there are some great brawl
scene taking place in a local pool hall, ending with some bit of gritty
police corruption.
Scorsese has called this one of his most personal films (I think his
most personal as well as favorite might be "Italianamerica," a short
documentary on his parents), and its bursting with the personal touches
of a man who lived all this.  While it's not up there with my favorites
of Scorsese (i.e. "After Hours" and "Taxi Driver"), it's definitely one
of his best films, and a prime example of how to mould your personal
experiences into a powerful film.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Nothing to Lose (1997)
Writer/Director: Steve Oedekerk
Starring: Tim Robbins, Martin Lawrence, John C. McGinley, Giancarlo
Esposito, Kelly Preston, Michael McKean, Rebecca Gayheart, Steve
Oedekerk
For four days at the crap college theatre, where you can see mainstream
films with bad quality for a mere buck 25 (with college id, of course),
they were playing a "surprise movie."  Could it be perhaps a new movie,
or maybe an upcoming film?  Or maybe a popular classic, like "Star
Wars?"  Welp, I got there and it turns out to be none other
than..."Nothing To Lose."  Since I had hiked across campus to find out
what it was and perhaps see it, those were my exact sentiments on
whether I was going to see it or not.
"Nothing To Lose," as the previews stated, is a comedy about racial
unity, robbery, vengeance, and suicidal tendencies.  It has a nice
little gimmick that at least got a little smirk across my face:
sucessful white boy named Nick (Tim Robbins) finds his wife (Kelly
Preston) is cheating on him with his boss (Michael McKean), so he goes
out in his big car, is carjacked by "T" for Terence (Martin Lawrence),
and he figures he has nothing to lose, so he hits the accelerator, and
the two end up being partners in crime.
The premise might be really shallow and all, but it's at least a nice
idea for a good old comedy.  And with serious actor Tim Robbins playing
off of hyperkinetic comic actor Martin Lawrence, you could tell that
this little odd couple would make up for any poorness the script could
possibly posess.  But while I was right on both counts, there's
something missing from the big picture.  Sure, I was laughing, but I
still left feeling like this was just an "ok" movie.
Where's the problem in this?  Well, for starters, the whole suplot of
the two other robbers (John C. McGinley and Giancarlo Esposito) is so
unfunny and weak.  I mean, it has its moments (I actually laughed when
all of them were cursing at eachother for a full minute), but it's just
a poor excuse to get them in more trouble (and extend the length of the
film).  Most of the jokes in this section of the film are cheap, and
unfunny...and it doesn't help that McGinley and Espostio are horrible in
their roles (both CAN act, but not here, strangely).
And the whole adultery gimmick has a really horrible pay-off at the end,
which just exhumes cheapness.  It's just another example of a film
pulling its punches at the last moment, too afraid to go for an original
ending which might not be satisfying to a programmed mass audience.  You
have to see it to believe how dumb it is.  And a little fling Nick has
with a person at his work (Rebecca Gayheart, who was on "90210" for a
while as Luke Perry's girlfriend - I bet you're all wondering how I know
this - oh, and she was the "Noxzema Girl" for a while) is nothing short
of cheap and moronic.
But perhaps the chief problem is with the writing and direction of Steve
Oedekerk (who did the second "Ace Ventura" film, which I still refuse to
see unless I can see it for free).  The film has a totally outrageous
premise, and the film isn't outrageous enough.  As I said, it pulls many
punches, but that's only part of it.  The writing isn't funny enough,
the scenes aren't as wildly shot as they should be, and the storyline
doesn't go as beserk as it should.  Of course, it could be me.
The two leads, on the other hand, are very funny.  Robbins and Lawrence
would probably never be caught in the same movie other than this one,
and they actually posess some good chemistry.  Robbins has done comedy
before (although no one saw it: "The Hudsucker Proxy"), and here he's
hysterical.  He has a way of being extremely likable witout
overshadowing his partner, which is kinda hard since it's Martin
Lawrence, of the now-defunct "Martin."  I've never really been a huge
fan of Lawrence, but I have to say he was hilarious in this one. 
They're the best thing of this film.
Kelly Preston and Michael McKean show up in the beginning and end in
very under-written parts, though Preston and Robbins have some scenes
where they have some great chemistry.  Poor Michael McKean, though. 
He's a funny guy (need I remind anyone of "This is Spinal Tap?"), but
the 90s have been very cruel to him (save "The Brady Bunch Movie"). 
He's always getting very unfunny parts where he tries his best, and
here's another example.
"Nothing to Lose" is funny and all, but it's not really worth going out
of your way to see.  If you can see it for cheap and with very little
physical movement, go for it.  But you're not going to come out enriched
or anything.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
"The Full Monty" is another one of those comedies from England that put
American comedies to shame.  Yes, we make funny movies over here, but
there's almost no debate that British cinema is funnier than American. 
And "The Full Monty" is a prime example of that.  It's not only a funny
film, but it's surprisingly engaging, touching, and, well, revealing. 
It's not the greatest film in the world, but it proves that even the
most cringe-inducing idea can be funny as hell.
"The Full Monty" deals with a group of urban Englishmen who were all
laid off from a once-prominent steel factory and are all seeking jobs. 
Their group "job club" meetings are pretty much wasted, with the old
foreman seeming to be the only one with any aptitude to get a job.  In
fact, the other guys waste time by trying to steel from the closed
factory, and even one of them is up for a bit of suicide.
The protagonist of the film (Robert Carlyle) comes up with a plan to
exploit his town's apparently popular Chippendales entertainment by
seeing if this group of normal-looking men (one of them actually being
quite fat) can raise money by stripping in an elaborate club, much like
Chippendales, all to hokey music and nice spotlights.  In an American
comedy, this would probably star Chris Farley and have him running into
a wall repeatedly and screaming at the top of his lungs for no reason
whatsoever.
But since Brits made this, and since Brits do have a better sense of
humor (it's a fact, okay?), this film is funnier more often, and also
has a bit of a brain.  Yes, this is a lovely concept for a comedy, but
it takes some intelligence to bring it to the screen in a good fashion,
and make the concept work out fully.  Luckily this film does.
There are six men who end up being in the dance/strip group, and they
are all explored interestingly.  They're not all explored in fullness,
but nevertheless interestingly.  The protagonist is a divorced father
who's wife has remarried some jerk, and who has a kind of buddie-buddie
relationship with his son, who hangs with him like they were chaps.  He
is, however, in danger of losing him due to a bit of a custody battle,
and needs some money to pay for it.  Hence, his motivation for getting
into this, other than paying for his smokes.
There's also a fat guy (Mark Addy), who is characterized as being rather
self-concious about his weight (and with good reason), and being a bit
suspicious of his much-thinner wife, who flirts with other men and likes
them Chippendales.  Then there's the ex-foreman (Tom Wilkinson) who
hasn't even told his wife he was fired six months ago, and who can
actually dance.  And there's also a rather quiet and lonely suicidal guy
who still lives with his mother (Tom Huison); an old black man
mysteriously nicknamed "Horse," (Paul Barber) who used to be quite the
break dancer; and a kind of studly guy (Hugo Speer) who can't dance,
can't sing, but who's favorite movie is "Singin' in the Rain" and also
has another formidable quality which is helpful in their "mission."
The ending of this film would be anti-climactic in a lesser film, but
here it's the high point, and it reaches it nicely.  It builds up to the
ending, and when it happens it not only delivers but adds some element
of surprise (will the men actually go "the full monty," if you know what
I mean, nudge, nudge).  And there are scenes that are absolutely
hysterically funny.
The acting is very good too.  The best performances come from Mark Addy
as the insecure fat man, and Tom Wilkinson as the former foreman who
starts off as tough and distanced (he was the foreman, man), but
eventually assimilates into their little microcosm.  But the film is
stolen by Robert Carlyle, who has the lead and does it so well.  He is a
bit immature, but has a kid who is more of a buddie to him than a son,
and who he kind of looks at as a peer (at one point when his son is kind
of ashamed of him, he comes across not only as being hurt since he's the
kid's father, but also as a friend).  Carlyle, you might remember, was
also brilliant as Begbie in last year's "Trainspotting," a role exactly
180 degrees away from this one.  To play a drunken asswhole then turn
around to play a somewhat immature divorced father/stripper just shows
that Carlyle is a great actor.
"The Full Monty" is funny as hell, but it's not totally funny.  There
are touches of melodrama (will the fat guy strip?), and the occasional
dramatic scene (a funny scene results in a bit of crying from one of the
strippers).  But overall, this film is hilarious, well-written, and
just-plain great.  And, the Brits are still funnier than us.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Cité des enfants perdus, La (1995)
Directors: Marc Caro and Jean-Pierre Jeunet
Writers: Gilles Adrien, Marc Caro, and Jean-Pierre Jeunet
Starring: Ron Perlman, Judith Vittet, Daniel Emilfork, Dominique Pinon,
Jean-Claude Dreyfus, Genevičve Brunet, Odile Mallet, Mirille Mossé, Serge
Merlin, Rufus, Ticky Holgado, Joseph Lucien, Mapi Galan, Marc Caro,
Jean-Louis Trintignant
"The City of Lost Children" automatically gets major pointers for being a
stunning film to look at, and it gets a couple extra pointers for having
the respect to not insult our intelligence and waste our time with a really
crap story.  When watching this film, you should be in the same state of
mind that you are when watching last year's french Bruce Willis fantasy,
"The Fifth Element," because save for a little better quality and style in
this one, the two films share a similar idylism: that they're both
children's stories for adults, and eye candy for the intelligent who don't
want to really feel like having a whole lot of depth with their watching
but still want to be entertained in the most original way possible.
That's what one of the strengths of this film is: it's able to be
completely original and entertaining and incredible to just look at, and
this is nothing of shock since it's been directed by one of the most visual
pair of directors working today (although not really paired up anymore),
Marc Caro and Jean-Pierre Jeunet, who, back in 1991, made the incredibly
entertaining "Delicatessen" about a butcher who hires men to work in his
apartment building then cuts them up for food for the normal residents.  In
that film, they showed that they were amazing visualists, that they had a
wicked sense of humor, and that they could tell a story with characters who
were both as freaky as anything Fellini or Kafka ever dreamed up and also
sympathetic.  Who can watch that film and not feel some kind of connection
for Dominique Pinon's desperate clown, or for the butcher's mousy
daughter...or even the butcher?
"The City of Lost Children" is at once similar to that, in that it tells a
weird story in a wonderfully stylistic fashion, but different in that that
one was almost a satire on the results of war (the people were cannibals
because of a lack of food because of a war), while this one's a flat-out
children's story, similar to all those weird tales we heard when we were
kids about monsters harming children and the simple folk who had to save
them.  "The City of Lost Children" has all this.  It has a frighteningly
evil man, denizens of monsters, an almost backwards world where anything is
possible, and a hero in the form of a dim-witted, child-like circus
strongman who's chief brains are in the form of his partner, a young girl
who can't be over 10 years old.
But all of this is told as if it were a story that the writers came up with
when they were kids and only now are being able to make into a lavish,
special effects-laden film, much the same way Luc Besson made "The Fifth
Element," a story he imagined as a teenager, but told from the point of
view of an adult trying to be a kid again.  Both films had adult humor
laced with the right amount of kiddie humor that we all still enjoy, wacky
characters, and some truly amazing vistas to look at (I would rank both of
these as two of the best-looking films of all time).  What makes this one
better is a pinch of depth, weirder more memorable characters, and, well, a
better story told in a more original way.
The story deals with a monster of a man named Krank, played by Daniel
Emilfork, who has got to be the scariest-looking human being I have ever
seen.  Bald, and featuring a long face with a portruding mouth that makes
him look like Nosferatu's lost brother, Emilfork is a freaky creation, and
his character is a tragic one because his main flaw is that he cannot
dream.  Therefore, he kidnaps children, forces them to go to sleep where he
peers into their dreams...but has only found nightmares.  Yes, I know it
sounds weird, but stay with me on this one.
Krank basically rules the city or whatever it is the film takes place on
(like a floating city or something), but lives in a tower in the river next
to it with dozens of clones of one man (all played by Dominique Pinon, who
has one of the most flexible faces in history, allowing him for many
comical happenings), and with a freaky midgit woman played by Mirille Mossé
(picture a shorter, more anorexic version of that short lady from
"Poltergeist" and you have what this woman looks like).  He also controls a
group of men called the Cyclops, who have robotic sensors so they can see
out of a computer and hear extra-well.  Keep on staying with me on this.
Into the story comes the aforementioned circus strongman named One (played
by the ape-like Ron Perlman, who was the Beast on the TV show "Beauty and
the Beast"), who's very little brother (Joseph Lucien) is kidnapped by the
Cyclops, sending One on an odyssey to rescue him.  He eventually gets the
aide of a little girl named Miette (Juliet Vittet), an already-cynical
little girl who works for a pair of siamese twin school teachers (Genevičve
Brunet and Odile Mallet), who ask the kids to rob for them.  With so many
obstacles, it's a tough search, and it all leads up to a bizarre climax,
even more bizarre than you'd think.
Just by reciting this to you, I can tell that I don't totally understand
what goes on in this film, and it's really tough to find out.  The film is
so obsessed with being weird and introducing originally proposterous
characters as well as just looking great that it really doesn't tell a
plausible tale.  However, this is, in all reality, part of its overall
charm.  The film's style of storytelling takes several major risks,
featuring scenes that make little or no sense even after it has been
explained by another scene, and not even managing to really kick in till
around the fifty minute point, when the film's focus has finally taken
control.
The film isn't so much about storytelling as it is about creating a world
that is completely fresh and amazing to look at.  The world in the film is
like something out of a Melies film, only more dark and disturbing, and
there isn't one frame in this film that couldn't be frozen and hung on a
wall in an art museum.  I shouldn't even need to mention to you that
Jean-Paul Gaulthier did the costuming because you can immeadiately spot
when he has designed the costumes for a film.  The man just keeps on
topping himself - look at his ingenius costuming for "The Fifth Element," a
job that was so unrewarded that it's almost a travesty.  Everything that
makes up mise-en-scene really makes this one of the freakiest films to
watch, as well as the most fun because the story is always intriguing, and
a bit of a struggle to make through, I suppose.  And it only helps that the
actors in this film give their characters a bit of heart, like Ron
Perlman's lovable performance as the oafish One, and especially Daniel
Emilfork's creepy and sympathetic performance as Krank.
The factor that really takes this film over the top, though, is its wacky
sense of humor, as well as its sense of style.  Caro and Jeunet really know
how to make a film extremely wacky, and there isn't one character who's
boring in this film, including the several Pinon clones that run around in
Krank's fortress.  Of course, don't ask me what the film's truly about in
depth.  Is it a satire on the amount of humanity, judged by the way Krank
cannot dream?  Perhaps.  Is it about the struggle for normality?  I dunno,
and frankly, I don't give a damn why anything is here, if there's a purpose
for what's on screen.  Don't ask me why there are a bunch of clones who
can't figure out who the original is.  I don't know and I don't care.  I
could care less about what the film is truly about, and really all I know
is that it's certainly an experience I'd highly recommend to anyone with a
sense of humor.  What can I say about a film where the only voice of reason
and sanity is a brain inside a fish tank with the voice of Jean-Louis
Trintignant (from "The Conformist")?  I suppose all I can say "Groovy,
baby."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Superfly (1972)
Director: Gordon Parks Jr.
Writer: Philip Fenty
Starring: Ron O'Neal, Carl Lee, Sheila Frazier, Julius Harris, Charles
McGregor, Polly Niles, K.C., the Curtis Mayfield Experience
If anything, the blaxploitation sub-genre is good for a lot of laughs. 
Though sometimes excellent (need I even say "Shaft?"), it's a
hysterically dated collection of films by and for African Americans (I'm
aiming for some PC here), and usually laden with memorable characters,
the most of which is usually the protagonist.  "Superfly," which I saw
for a buck twenty-five at the crap theratre at my lovely college, is a
fantastically hokey film, yet is still one of the best examples of a
typical blaxploitation film.  Yes, that makes it cool.
"Superfly" deals with a big-time coke-pusher named Priest (Ron O'Neal),
who dresses in leather, has long hair that Michael Jackson would only
dream of, and wears a lovely giant white pimp hat.  He also wears a
crucifix around his neck, which he uses in the first scene to scoop coke
into his nose.  This is a great scene, and wonderfully satirical and
all, but he uses it every ten minutes and it starts to get annoying.
The hook of the story is that Priest wants to get out of the biz while
he's still young.  Tired of being scared of being arrested or killed in
the line of "duty," he decides to make one last score, which involves
him and his assistant (Carl Lee) buying and selling 3 G's worth of coke,
settling the score to half-a-million for each.  Of course, his assistant
loves the life they lead (he says this classic line that goes something
like "You have eight-tracks, a color TV in every room, and enough coke
to snort every day.  You living the American Dream!"), and reluctantly
goes along.
But, Priest finds it's a tad hard to get out, because his boss keeps
pulling him back in.  He makes the money easily, but finds himself on
with a bit of a problem, since they tell him they'll kill him if he
runs.  But he and his loyal girlfriend (Sheila Frazier) - who he cheats
on - try to make a twisted break off, without giving any money up.
Now, the film is pretty nicely paced, although it does slow up a bit in
the middle section.  And the little deal with Priest is handled very
nicely, with a huge lack of violence, until the end, which is only very
brief, and not too bloody (zero deaths in this scene).  Instead, he uses
his brains to get out of his situation, which is respectable.
But.  The film is hilariously dated.  Yes, the seventies fashion (big
pimp hats, tight leather, tight pants, tight everything) is able to be
forgiven, and so is the 8-track.  Well, maybe.  But there is some
hilariously bad little problems with the production.  A chase in the
beginning is done with a very, very, very shaky use of steadicam - so
much that all you see is blurs.  And there's the use of close-ups at
inconvenient times, as well as some bad lighting, which is sometimes
just some street lights, or one single lamp.  There's also a very
horribly done scene where some people are inside a car and you can't see
a thing of what's going on.  I wasn't going to mention the final fight
scene, done in hilarious slow-motion, and culminating in a classic use
of the word "Fuh-reeeeeeeeeze!"
But (ha ha).  This is a quintessential blaxploitation film.  And it's
fun as hell to watch.  I'm a fan of the sub-genre, somewhat for the
mockery factor, but mostly because they're just so damn cool.  Well,
maybe half of each.  But anyway, this film is something I would
reccomend as not being great cinema (although, as I said, it is somewhat
respectable at points), but just one great example of the blaxploitation
wave.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for House of Yes, The (1997)
Director: Mark Waters
Writer: Mark Waters (based on the play by Wendy MacLeod)
Starring: Parker Posey, Josh Hamilton, Tori Spelling, Freddie Prinze Jr,
Genevičve Bujold, Rachel Leigh Cook, David Love
The boyfriend brings his fiance home to meet his disfunctional family...how
many times have we seen this set-up?  In "The House of Yes," this is what
happens, only the film throws us a couple weird pitches, keeping us off
guard and generally freaking us out like no film bearing this cliche has in
recent memory.  For one, they're all much weirder, and for another one, one
of his family members...well, thinks she's Jackie Onassis.  Instead of
being just a cheap comedy, it has become a cheap, elongated "Tales From the
Crypt" episode.
The film opens by introducing the whole "Jackie Onassis" obsession, which
inhibits the one daughter (Parker Posey, making her 97 rounds in indie/art
house films) in the family, who goes by "Jackie-O," but whether her name
really is Jackie, we never discover.  In the opening credits, we see her as
a young child in the early 70s being filmed doing an impersonation of
Jackie Onassis, complete with the pink dress and pill box hat.  We later
discover that the obsession with Jackie Onassis is a result of the
disappearance of their father on the day Kennedy was assasinated.  Okay...
The real plot of the film deals with, as I said, the one brother, Marty
(Josh Hamilton), bringing home his perky fiance, Lesly (Tori Spelling -
yes, you read correctly), to meet his family, who live in a giant mansion
in D.C.  There, she meets his family members: his freaky mother (Genevičve
Bujold, who I thought was dead), a reclusive bizarre nut; his dorky and
clueless brother, Anthony (Freddie Prinze Jr., who played the boring
boyfriend in "I Know What You Did Last Summer"); and...Jackie-O, who is
infactuated with him so much that when she hears of the engagement, she
screams and runs off to comb her hair.
Taking place on Thanksgiving night, we are introduced to one weird evening
where the disfunctions of the family take off, and some extremely weird
things and facts are introduced.  Anthony finds he lusts after Lesly, and
begins to comfort her as the evening goes on...in his own blunt way (which
means trying to get her to talk to him in what he thinks is "Girl Talk"). 
And we discover that Jackie-O is: a) totally insane (duh!), b) just got
back from the hospital, and c) had sex with Marty when they were kids and
still holds a torch for him.
This is pretty much all the film is, and that becomes a big problem because
we discover that the only thing this film has to offer is some really weird
things, like incest and obsessions with Jackie Onassis.  "The House of Yes"
has nothing much to offer in terms of characterization, depth, even some
kind of message (although I guess the message of this film is...families
are weird).  So what it does is pull out as many controversial jokes as it
can, intending to shock the audience into appreaciating the film.
This is what's wrong with the film.  Because it doesn't have the guts to go
any deeper with the themes and ideas it introduces, it becomes shallow and
pretty much redundant.  By the ending, you're just hoping that the film
will suddenly perk up, dive deep into what we saw before, and expand on
them.  It doesn't.  Everything introduced is pretty much just a contrivance
to freak us out; I mean, why exactly did the writer chose Jackie Onassis to
be the obsession if the film is never going to do anything with it but
stage an addmittingly humorous enactment of the assasination?
But granted, the film has many strong points that kinda save it.  For one,
there are some really great one-liners and exchanges, even if the script
isn't all that great.  The acting is also pretty good, with all the actors
doing good jobs (Freddie Prinze Jr is a terrible actor, but his bad acting
works with the character for some reason, and Tori Spelling finds all the
right notes for her part).  One of the biggest shocks for me was to see
Genevičve Bujold, who has pretty much been floundering since the late 70s. 
She gives a pretty incredible and comical performance.
But the real star of the show is Parker Posey, who does what has to be the
best acting of her short yet lengthy career thus far.  She goes completely
over the top with her performance, and watching her do her schtick is one
of the real pleasures of watching this film.  If any performance would
define Posey as an actress and make her a star, it's this.
It's too bad she wasn't in a better film, as "The House of Yes" is a really
disappointing little film.  It has some great ideas and all, but the fact
that it never does a thing with them (probably because the writer wanted it
to be really short) is what becomes wrong with this film.  I will say this
though: the film is pretty comical, and yes, I laughed several times
throughout it.  And the film held my attention the whole time, which is
something to be commended.  Of course, the flip-side of that is I was
waiting for something to really happen.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
Writer/Director: Woody Allen
Starring: Woody Allen, Caroline Aaron, Kirstie Alley, Bob Balaban,
Richard Benjamin, Eric Bogosian, Billy Crystal, Judy Davis, Hazelle
Goodman, Julie Kavner, Mariel Hemingway, Amy Irving, Eric Lloyd, Julia
Louis-Dreyfus, Tobey Maguire, Demi Moore, Elisabeth Shue, Stanley Tucci,
Robin Williams, Philip Bosco, Paul Giamatti, Annette Arnold, Gene Saks
Woody Allen's latest film, "Deconstructing Harry," is his angriest, most
vulgar, and most highly sexual film to date.  It's also one of his
funniest, and his freshest film in a while.  Since his divorce from Mia
Farrow, he's been in a bit of a slump (starting with "Manhattan Murder
Mystery"), making films which are great on their own, but don't posess
the lasting power of films like "Annie Hall" and "Hannah and Her
Sisters."  By taking a big chance with this, telling a story of an awful
human being who may really be him or merely the public's perception of
him, he creates a film which is a cineamtic breath of fresh air from one
of the country's primary and one of its best filmmakers.
The Harry of the title is Harry Block (played by Woody), a whiny,
overly-neurotic, amoral, extremely seflish and narcississtic,
unfaithful, sniveling sonuvabitch bastard - who's also extremely
lovable.  Through this complex narrative, one of his most labyrinthine,
we get to know this guy through his real life, flashbacks, and through
the fictitious world of his novels, where different actors play the
literary people who are thinly disguised characters from his real life. 
Harry, a famed novelist, is also famed at telling exteremely
autobiographical stories, exposing secrets in his life for
therapy...much like Woody Allen himself has allegedly done (though he
always denies it).
When we first meet Harry, he's at a low point in his life.  His
extremely young girlfriend, Fay (Elisabeth Shue), has just left him and
has hitched up with one of his best buds, Larry (Billy Crystal), leaving
him more depressed than he usually is.  Not to mention the fact that his
latest novel, which exposes his affair with one of his ex-wives (Amy
Iriving - unrecognizable with her new blond do) sisters, Lucy (Judy
Davis), who is less than happy.  In the first minutes of the film, we
see one of the more comical episodes of the affair in literary form,
with his fictitious self (Richard Benjamin) porking the fictitious
sister (Julia Louis-Dreyfus) on vacation with their respective families,
and almost being caught by a blind grandmother.
Also, Harry has discovered that the next day, he is to awarded an award
from his old school (who kicked him out) for his writing, but has no one
to go with him.  He ends up taking along a sick friend (Bob Balaban), a
hooker he solicited the night before named Cookie (Hazelle Goodman,
marking the first black person in a lead role in a Woody film - 'cause
you know how hard it is to find black people in New York), and his son
(Eric Lloyd), whom he abducted from school much to the dismay of his
mother and one of his many ex-wives, Joan (Kirstie Alley).
Along the road, he has flashbacks to parts of his life, parts of his
stories, and even has hallucinations of characters from his novels
popping up to lecture him on his life.  The stories play like little
vignettes, with lots of cameos from celebrities, but reflect on Harry's
life at the time he thinks of them.  They also provide lots of comedy,
with several little stories standing out, like: a story about a young
writer (Tobey Maguire, from "The Ice Storm") who has an affair with a
hooker in his critically wounded friend's apartment, only to have Death
knock on the door to collect his friend's soul; an anti-semetic story
about an old Jewish woman who discovers her husband of 30 years had a
previous marriage where he killed four family members and devoured them;
a story about an actor (Robin Williams) who becomes blurry in real life
(you have to see it to fully understand it); and a story he's working on
about him journeying down to hell where Larry is the Devil so he can
retreive Fay from him (a sequence which features lots of topless women -
a new thing for Woody).
This kind of narcississtic storytelling is immeadiately reminiscent of
Woody's worst film (in my opinion), "Stardust Memories," a messy paen to
how much he can't stand his fame and his apparent necessity to do
comedy.  Woody neatly balances the relationship between reality and art,
showing that Harry tries to get therapy by exposing his real life to his
fans, but also alienates himself from everyone around him.  Pretty soon,
it seems like there's almost no way of differentiating his real life
from his fictitious one (one scene has he and Lucy continually mixing up
the names of the people in reality and the ones in his novels.
Is this true of Woody Allen in real life?  If one maps out his real and
reel lives, one can see a definite connection between the two.  For
instance, when his marriage was crumbling, he did the bitter "Husbands
and Wives."  The general public has come to think of the Woody Allen
character in all his movies as Woody Allen the person.  Hell, even I
think of him as some whiny, one-line-shooting, self-hating Jew, and I'm
like the resident Woody Allen FAQ.  But with this film, Woody seems to
be showing that he may put a lot of his personal life in his movies, but
to what extent I'm not sure.  Is Harry just the general perception of
him put on screen, or is this the real Woody Allen, bluntly portrayed
(if so, that makes Elisabeth Shue's character the film's Soon-Yi).
The depth of the film is also wonderfully accentuated with Allen's
brilliant diretion.  The entire film has an edgy feel to it, sometimes
disjointed as scenes are cut quickly, sometimes in mid-speech.  While
this is, yes, a tad annoying, it gives the film the right kind of
atmosphere, showing the disjointed nature of his being.  In fact, the
opening credits (with the cool jazz tune, "Twisted," playing in the
background) are juxtaposed with repeated shots of Lucy frantically
getting out of a taxi cab, followed by the raunchy sex scene between
Richard Benjamin and Julia Louis-Dreyfus, which sets up the film for its
almost non-stop raunchiness.
In fact, this film is probably Woody's most randy; even more sexual than
his '72 classic "Everything You Always Wanted to Know About Sex (But
Were Afraid to Ask)."  There's some sex scenes,  and more sexual jokes
than you can shake a stick at.  Even Kevin Smith didn't tell this many
felatio jokes (my personal favorite, behind when Demi Moore said a
Hassidic prayer before going down on Stanley Tucci in one of Harry's
stories, was Julia Louis-Dreyfus saying to Richard Benjamin "I grind my
teeth.").  And Woody finally says "fuck" about fifty times, and even
uses "cunt" when angered at a couple points in the movie.  It seems that
Woody is opening his films up to a wider audience now, since Kevin Smith
has paved the way for sex jokes in modern-day cinema.
The film's comic moments (which turn this film into a non-stop
laugh-fest) are perfectly interwoven with the film's darker tones, which
it has a lot of.  This doesn't have the bitter feel of "Husbands and
Wives," but it is one of his blackest comedies, showing a man who is
corrupt almost to the core, but still can have salvation.  Woody's
portrayal of this man shows a person who is just awful, yet has some
redeeming qualities.  Why else would so many people interact with him if
he was as bad as Hitler?  And how good would this film be if it was only
showing how awful he is?
The script is brilliant, and should get at least an Oscar nomination,
but many people, I fear, will be turned off by some of his more
off-color jokes, like many of his sexual ones, and some ethnic and
sexist jokes (he calls a woman "a world-class meshuggener cunt), but
this is done to show the character of Harry better.  Woody handles the
film majestically, presenting it as it were through the eyes of Harry
reflecting, but with a deep edge to it.  Even Woody's courtship of Fay
is done to show how horrible it is, as she is a deep admirer of his
work, and he's not respecting her for her own self.
All the actors, who mostly have brief cameos in stories, are wonderful
(though Judy Davis does go a bit overboard), with stand-out performances
going to Elisabeth Shue, Billy Crystal (who's brilliant as the devil),
Julia Louis-Dreyfus, Richard Benjamin, Kirstie Alley, Demi Moore
(there's a shock), and, of course, Woody, who gives one of his best
performances in years.  Though I doubt anyone will get an Oscar
nomination (Woody's famous for his supporting actors getting Oscars),
they all do wonderfully, even if most are very brief.
"Deconstructing Harry" is one of the freshest, funniest, and all-around
fascinating films I've seen this year.  Many of his films are paced very
slowly, but Woody keeps the film moving at a quick pace, and when it's
over, I was sad that it was (by the way, this was my first Woody Allen
film seen in a theatre).  The point of the film seems to be that one
needs to get over themselves and get on with their lives, and this point
is never driven into the ground, but realized at the end, as they are in
most Woody films.  This may be Woody's angriest and narcississtic film
in years, which may turn off a lot of people, but it's still brilliant
work from an ingenius film craftsman.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
Directors: Eric Darnell, Lawrence Gutterman, and Tim Johnson
Writers: Chris Weitz and Paul Weitz
Starring: Woody Allen, Sharon Stone, Gene Hackman, Sylvester Stallone,
Christopher Walken, Meryl Streep, Jennifer Lopez, Grant Shaud, Dan Aykroyd,
Jane Curtin, John Mahoney, Anne Bancroft, Danny Glover, Paul Mazursky
"Antz" is the second feature film that utlizes the technique of
coputer-generated animation, following the wildly sucessful "Toy Story." 
The technique works wonders, as things look more high tech and more is
allowed to be done, but that really wasn't the reason why "Toy Story" was
excellent.  It was excellent because the characters were nicely-realized,
and the story that they went through was surprisingly intelligent.  It was
as if "Toy Story" was a big breath of fresh air in the world of animation,
not only technically but also content-wise.
"Antz" is obviously not going to be as much of a success as "Toy Story"
because it follows in the trend rather than begin it, but it does take one
thing in particular further: the characters in "Toy Story" were slightly
neurotic, with their own nice quirks and idiosyncrasies, which made them
likable and gave the film a nice edge that few cartoons posess.  The lead
character in "Antz" is an ant named Z, who is voiced appropriately and
perhaps brilliantly by none other than Woody Allen, the chairman of the
neurotic union of actors.
Even though it is the presence of Allen that really takes this over the top
into a very entertaining movie, "Antz" is a very enjoyable film to begin
with, probably because it's not the typical animated fare.  In fact, "Antz"
hardly qualifies as the kind of film that is directly aimed at children -
it's designed to marvel children with a simple story and cartoon
characters, but it's real audience is the adolescents and adult crowds,
perhaps the "Simpsons" crowd, or at least anyone who's ever read Orwell or
Huxley before.
"Antz" deals with an ant colony where the inhabitants are chosen at birth
to be either soldiers, workers, or royalty.  The protagonist of the film is
Z, a nebbish worker ant who's introduction takes place in none other than
the room of his local analyst.  Z toils all day in the mines, like most of
the ants, but yearns for something better, like a chance for personal
growth.  There is a rumor of a place called "Insectopia," where insects of
all nations and creeds are free to hang out and do insect-things, but this
rumor comes from the mouth of a delusional drunk ant, so there's very
little chance that Z will ever find his salvation...or something like that.
The plot of this film deals with Z's meeting with the Princess of the ants,
Bala (Sharon Stone), who escapes one night from her housing to hang out at
the ant club, where she hits on Z and ends up dancing with him, leaving him
just as he was really starting to like her.  So Z manages to get himself
into the army, thanks to his soldier ant friend, Weaver (Sylvester
Stallone), and after a deadly battle with termites, finds he is the hero of
the ants, and soon starts and adventure outside the ant colony with Bala to
find Insectopia, thanks to a little bit of convenient clutziness.
The whole idea sounds a bit like and bit not like typical American animated
fare.  The story is simple, with a required love story, and even some
conflict dealing with a conspiracy brought on by the evil General Mandible
(Gene Hackman) to destroy the Queen (Meryl Streep) and all of the wimpy
worker ants pops up.  And some of the film's humor is definitely very
universal, like Z's constant whining and status as the film's anchor and
comic relief in the midst of melodramatic characters and storylines. 
However, the film finds its true humor in subjects that few children will
really understand, like communism and totalitarianism.
The film's true audience is therefore the teenage/adult crowd, who will
find much more humor in it than the children who will find many of the
jokes shooting right over their heads.  Like this summer's lessser "Small
Soldiers," "Antz" doesn't aspire to be as much a hit with kids as it does
with those who know their history lessons and who have read their novels
for college classes.  This is good and bad for this film, as it was for
"Small Soldiers."  While the jokes are clever, they never really expand
into real rational thinking.  This is more of a parody of socialism and its
good and bad points than it is a real thought-out satire, as if the film
were really afraid to go full blown and become as intelligent and
philosophical as an episode of "The Simpsons," the best show currently on
TV, and with good reason.
Nevertheless, "Antz" is extremely entertaining, mostly because the script,
although a little too short (bringing the film to about an hour and 20
minutes, more or less), is sharp and witty, and the story really works. 
Strangely enough, the casting of Woody Allen, one of the most despised men
working in film these days, works wonderfully, and Z is a highly likable
character.  Perhaps it's because Z doesn't resemble the aging filmmaker at
all.  He's short, doesn't wear glasses, and appears totally fragile.  And
his lines are so hysterical and so nicely delivered that it's almost
impossible to imagine this film without a character like him.
Is this a Woody Allen animated film, though?  Not really, though it's
pretty close.  His dialogue sounds so Woody-esque that it'd be a shock if I
learned he didn't write most of his lines.  This is familiar territory for
him, what with his political rebellion in comedies like "Bananas" and
"Sleeper."  Not to mention the entire cast wreaks of old school Woody
actors, as if this was a giant in-joke reunion.  Sharon Stone, you may
remember, blew Woody the kiss from a train in "Stardust Memories."  Gene
Hackman starred in his "Another Woman."  Sylvester Stallone played one of
the subway thugs in "Bananas."  Christopher Walken (who plays one of
Hackman's goons, and to hilarity) gave a hilarious monologue in his
Oscar-Winning "Annie Hall."  And Meryl Streep played his second ex-wife in
"Manhattan," for which she reportedly vowed she'd never work with him
again.  Glad she kept that promise.
What's nice is this film would probably have worked with someone else in
the lead.  It has a really nice, joking tone to it that never takes itself
too seriously, and the rest of the cast is nicely killer, with some real
hilarity due to a great performance by Sylvester Stallone, who's not afraid
to mock his earlier career.  Nice to see that some people in Hollywood
don't take themselves seriously.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
Director: Clint Eastwood
Writer: John Lee Hancock (based on the novel by John Berendt)
Starring: John Cusack, Kevin Spacey, Lady Chablis, Jack Thompson, Jude
Law, Alison Eastwood, Paul Hipp, Irma P. Hall, Bob Gunton, Geoffrey
Lewis, Anne Haney
I'm not even going to pretend that I read the book, but something tells
me that this film pays too much attention to detail and not the style
and mood.  I have a feeling that the book is a hypnotic non-fiction
account which pulls the reader into its pure off-beatness of a pretty
bizarre culture.  Even though I really did enjoy this film, and was
throughly interested the whole time, it still has some flaws in it which
ultimately pull the film down from being a possible awesome film to a
near-miss.
"Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil," for those of you who don't
know, is based on an incredibly popular non-fiction best-seller by John
Berendt, who went to cover a Christmas party in Savannah, Georgia, and
eventually bought an apartment down there after being sucked into the
culture.  In the film, he is played by the awesome John Cusack, and
re-named John Kelso.  He's never truly defined or anything, but he's
very likable as played by Mr. Cusack.
The film follows him around as he meets all sorts of weird Savannah-ites
throughout the course of the film, such as a man who walks a leash since
the dog he's supposed to walk has died long ago; a man who has flies and
bugs tied to leashes (Geoffrey Lewis); a voodoo lady named Minerva (Irma
P. Hall - who else?); a cool, suave piano player named Joe (Paul Hipp);
and an interesting love interest named Mandy (played by Clint's
daughter, Alison).
But the main person he meets is Jim Williams (Kevin Spacey), a noveau
riche aristocrat who's throwing the party John is to cover.  As played
by The Amazing Kevin, Jim is a lovable man who's suave, always looking
cool (with a lovely moustache), and an air of southern tobacco around
him whenever we see him, even when he's not smoking anything.  Even if
he's not wacky like the guy with the dog leash or the flies, he's still
the most interesting character in the film.
The novel, apparently lacks any real form until about 140 pages or so
into it when the whole John Grisham part occurs: Jim shoots his male
lover (Jude Law), and there's a court case over whether he did it in
cold blood or in defense.  The film dives into this about a half hour or
so into itself, seemingly so a wider audience can appreciate it.  Of
course, there are many subplots that still go on, but none which are as
focused as this one, making some of them seem almost unnecessary.
The most interesting other subplot deals with the relationship between
John and the Lady Chablis (played by Nathan Lane...no, sorry, it's
played by the real Lady Chablis), a transexual or transvestite (forget
which) who is more feminine than Ellen Ripley (a cheap plug: go see
"Alien: Resurrection").  She's one of the more interesting characters in
a movie, and it's awesome that she/he really exists.  I'm sure she'll
never get a moment's peace after this, though.
However, the most uninteresting part is the love affair between John and
Mandy.  As played by Alison Eastwood, she's a fantastically cool
character who's always interesting for the sole fact that Alison plays
her so well.  She is not written as a very interesting character, but
Alison just becomes the role (a nice plug for nepotism - take note Mr.
Coppola).  Unfortunately the writing for their romance is under-written,
and seems way too forced.  I mean, she's dating or pseudo-dating Joe in
the beginning, but whatever happens to them quickly disappears when John
shows up on the scene.  Oh well.
The main problem with this film is the writing.  I think that making
John the central figure doesn't really work with the film.  Apparently,
John is hardly a big factor, but here everything works around him. 
Therefore, the film isn't as fascinating, since everything we see is
through his eyes.  I would just like to see a scene where the characters
inter-act without the presence of that "yank," which they call him
repeatedly.
Clint Eastwood is a good director, but has always been more of a subtle
director.  He was the perfect director for "Unforgiven," but I'm not
sure if he's the right choice for this.  He's never really been an
overly cerebral director ("Unforgiven" obviously excluded), and the film
never really makes any grand themes.  The film is really like a bunch of
disjointed tales taking place in the same town, and sometimes dealing
with another (usually the big plot).  There's depth to the film, but no
greater depth.  For instance, a bit at the end about perception is
wonderful, but has nothing to do with any other part of the film.
"Midnight in the Garden of Good an Evil" has so much potential to be an
absolutely awesome film, and yes, it's a pretty enjoyable film (if not a
tad long - 2 1/2 hours, by the way).  I liked it, but I can't really say
it succeeded in what it was supposed to succeed in.  So, like several
films of good intentions, it falls into the class of a "near miss."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Clockwork Orange, A (1971)
Writer/Director: Stanley Kubrick (based on the novel by Anthony Burgess)
Starring: Malcolm McDowell, Patrick Magee, Aubrey Morris, Michael Bates, 
Philip Stone, David Prowse, Adrienne Corri
"A Clockwork Orange" finds Kubrick at his personal peak.  His past two 
films, "2001" and "Dr. Strangelove" are two of the greatest films ever 
made; one an epic space opera/satire, the other a black comedy/satire.  
"A Clockwork Orange" completes Kubrick's trilogy of his utter 
masterpieces (although his other films are also brilliant, but not as 
much as these are).  His subject, as it is in such films as "2001" and 
"Full Metal Jacket" is dehuminization.  And like the other two, he takes 
his film from a literary source and puts his own spin on it.
Many people believe this to be just another of those "anti-violence" 
films.  Uh huh.  And "Trainspotting" was just another "anti-drug" film. 
 "A Clockwork Orange" is a film about the dehuminization of people - if 
you take away the choice of violence, you can't really be a person, can 
you?  No.  Sad but true fact.  Kubrick paints a near future where the 
"good" people hide at night as ruffians and gangs come out and do their 
own schtick - raping, looting, singing Gene Kelly tunes, playing "Kings 
of the Road," you know, the usual.  The center of this intense, 
poignant, darkly comic satire is Alex DeLarge (the perfect, and I mean 
perfect, Malcolm MacDowell, also at his peak).  Alex is 15 in the novel 
by Anthony Burgess (which, in a newer publication of it with the final 
chapter Kubrick deleted from the film, has a forward published by him 
before his death where he basically he says he wrote it under pressure 
and basically regrets writing it 'cause he gets WAYYYY too many papers 
from students on it), but Malcom is a brisk 26.  No matter.  
Alex lives with his parents somewhere in England, rarely attends school 
and goes out at night to, what he tells his parents is his "night job," 
and proceeds to loot, rape, sing Gene Kelly tunes, play "Kings of the 
Road," and all that other stuff I talked about.  The first half-hour 
deals with a typical night for them: they go to a drugged-up-milk bar 
where they get drugged up and ready for some "old ultraviolence;" taunt 
then beat an old homeless man senseless; have a braul with another gang; 
play the aforementioned "Kings of the Road; loot an author's (Patrick 
Magee) house then rape his wife (Adrienne Corri); then go off to their 
respective homes where Alex finishes it off with some old Ludwig Van 
[Beethoven] (just in case you didn't know).  In the morning, he claims 
to have a huge headache to his ignorant parents and goes out (after a 
meeting with his Parole Officer, played with hamminess by Aubrey 
Morris), meets some young girls, has an orgy with them (set to the Lone 
Ranger section of the "William Tell Overture") then gets ready for 
another night on the town with his mates. All this in the first 30 
minutes.
This particular night, though, his mates set him up as he kills a woman 
with a giant phallic sculpture (heh heh) during a looting and is scooted 
off to jail finally at the ripe age of 15 (we assume).  Here is where 
the satire takes shape as he spends time in prison, reading the bible 
(but only liking the sex and violence parts) and chatting up with the 
wise chaplain.  He learns of a government experiment to rehabilitate its 
convicts quickly and efficiently...but it is still in the works.  He 
does everything to get it and he eventually gets chosen as the guinea 
pig.  The whole thing is to be strapped down with his eyes clamped open 
(he actually did have his eyes clamped open and reportedly almost lost 
his sight...but it's for a Kubrick film so it's worth it) and watch 
hours upon hours of sex and violence.  With drugs mixing into his system 
at the same time, he soon finds he is repelled to sex and violence and, 
unfortunately, Beethoven, for his Ninth Symphony is used in a film 
showing Nazis.  After a showcase where he is bullied by an actor and 
throws up when a topless woman walks right up to him, he is set 
free...only as a zombie...a clockwork orange, if you will.
Once out, everyone he had beaten turns right around and beats him 
(literally or figuratively): his parents have rented his room to a jerk 
who's doing a job and tell him to go elsewhere (in an emmotional scene 
perfectly heightened by the first, somber movement of the "William Tell 
Overture"); the old homeless guy he beat up, attacks him with all his 
homeless buddies; his mates ("droogs," really - I never mentioned they 
speak a weird lingo called "Nadsat" which is a combination of Russian 
Slang and something else, I don't remember) are now cops and they beat 
him and try to drown him; and to top it off, the old author he looted 
tries his way at vengeance since his wife had died from her rape wounds 
and he has gone a tad off-kilter.  At the end of it all, Alex throws 
himself from the author's top story in an attempt to kill himself since 
he is no longer able to defend himself...but he only hurt himself and he 
goes into a coma where he is rehabilitated to make a choice once he 
comes out.  With his last line, "I was cured all right," the film ends 
on a note of happiness and dread, knowing that he is back to his old 
self so he can make a choice and it will probably be for violence.
Kubrick reportedly feels that violence is eternal and you can never take 
it away.  This could not be better illustrated with this film.  Violence 
is a part of life no matter what, and taking it away means the end of a 
person.  The film not only satirizes this, but also the government's 
lack of being able to control society naturally.  The government in this 
film is working towards a nice cause - it would be nice to live in a 
world without violence and jerks - but it is impossible and amoral.  
Even though I think this world blows anyway, I certainly don't want a 
world with zombies like in "Brave New World."  Violence is actually 
something we need to make life worth living.  
"A Clockwork Orange" is one of the most thought-provoking films ever to 
be made.  It has so many levels to it that a full report on all of them 
would mean boring the hell out of people by the utterly huge length of 
it.  Also, I have to go to work soon, so I can't just rant on the 
meanings of this film.  It is very open to inerpretation and can mean 
different things to different people.  It also has stood the test of 
time: it is one of the most talked about, most contreversial, and most 
idolized films ever made.  I know that I have been majorly influenced by 
it.  The scenes are perfectly crafted by Kubrick to appear beautiful, 
horrifying, funny and intriguing all at the same time.  The violence is 
quite voyeristic and tempting.  With his hand-held direction, Kubrick 
invites us to join in the droogs fun because violence is something we 
need.  He illustrates this the best at the end when all the people he 
hurt attack him hypocritically and he has no way of defending himself.  
He actually makes the viewer sympathize with/for a totally amoral 
character as Alex, who is wonderfully portrayed by Malcolm MacDowell.
 It has also been spoofed in such films as Woody Allen's "Sleeper" and 
been inspiration for such films as "Trainspotting" and even a bit of 
"Fargo."  And besides, it spoofs "Singing in the Rain."  
Besides, this film is so fun to watch.  With its funny lines, comical 
violence scenes and outrageous sets and costumes, this was bound to 
become a cult hit.  Even if it has been viewed as a way to provoke 
violence (and reportedly influenced gangs to dress up like them and/or 
beat people to Gene Kelly tunes), you can't deny its intensity as an 
intense satire.  Its scenes live in your mind for the rest of your life: 
the first shot, which opens on Alex's face and slowly pulls back to the 
back of the milk bar; the infamous (and hilarious) "Singin' in the Rain" 
loot/rape scene; the accidental murder scene where Alex breaks a woman 
in the face with a giant sculpture of a penis; the shot of him strapped 
into the chair in pain; the shot of the crazed author taking ultimate 
pleasure in hearing Alex suffer; Alex being fed by the head of 
government as he lies in bed in a huge cast; etc, etc, etc.
"A Clockwork Orange" deserves to be esteemed from everyone, even if you 
really didn't care for the violence.
*Note: This film was originally rated X for intense and graphic 
violence, rape, sex, lots o' nudity as well as a bit of language.  I 
reccomend it to everyone, but it is hard to watch if you have a bad 
stomach and/or can't handle watching violence or rape.  
*Another Note: For us "Star Wars" geeks, look for David Prowse who 
played the guy underneath the Darth Vadar costume as the crazed author's 
physical therapist.  You can't miss him.  He's, like, 100 feet tall.

Title
Review for Blade Runner (1982)
Director: Ridley Scott
Writers: Hampton Fancher and David Peoples (based on the book "Do
Androids Dream of Electric Sheep" by Philip K. Dick)
Starring: Harrison Ford, Sean Young, Rutger Hauer, Daryl Hannah, Joanna
Cassidy, Brion James, William Sanderson, M. Emmet Walsh, Edward James
Olmos, James Hong, Morgan Paull
It's pretty much the requisite that a film taking place in the future
has a lot of action, maybe a little romance, and grade-A special
effects.  "Blade Runner" has the latter two, and has a plot that sounds
like it would contain a lot of big action sequences: a police officer
called a blade runner has to silence four illegal androids called
replicants.  It sounds like a B-movie action sci-fi pic, but "Blade
Runner" takes this idea a whole different and original way, which
disapoints some (the flick bombed at the box office), but pleases
others.
The "Blade Runner" of the title is Rick Deckard (Harrison Ford, around
the time he had just gotten big with "Star Wars" and "Raiders of the
Lost Ark"), a retired Blade Runner in L.A. 2019.  He is basically your
typical Phillip Marloe/Sam Spade/John Shaft loner detective, dressing in
trench-coats, and always brooding over something (although getting
significantly less booty than Shaft).  Harrison Ford has been criticized
for his portrayal, but I thought he gave a nicely alienated performance,
with touches of humor in it, without never loosing the core of the
character.
Deckard is called in to "retire" four "skin jobs," as his ex-boss (M.
Emmet Walsh) puts it.  He says the job is "bad, the worst," chiefly
because these illegal androids, which were deemed illegal when they
started going beserk and killing people, have come back to earth, in the
city where the plant that created them is: Tyrell Corp., headed by the
epnonmysly named genius (Joe Turkel, the bartender in Kubrick's "The
Shining").  He reluctantly agrees to do it, and is sent out with his
quiet assistant (Edward James Olmos) to investigate...slowly.
The four replicants in the film - leader Batty (Rutger Hauer), acrobatic
Pris (Daryl Hannah), kinda dumb Leon (Brion James), and seductive Zhora
(Joanna Cassidy) - are shown in intercuts between the action of
Deckard.  They aren't shown as truly evil creatures, but are given a bit
of respect.  They are, after all, beings who are given a short lifespan
and don't to die after experiencing life for only four years, after
which they die.  Their actions are only influenced by their necessity to
survive, like any other kind of living organism.
Also in the film is the replicant Rachael (Sean Young), who has no clue
she's a replicant.  She has been given a past, inplanted by Tyrell, and
when she finds out, she begins to become obsessed with the man who found
her out - Deckard.  They share a bizarre relationship, seeming to fall
in love, which is the cruel ironic twist in the movie.  When she finds
out, she begins to run, and Deckard finds out he has to retire her as
well as the other four.
The film moves at a very slow, leisurely pace.  While this pisses a lot
of people off, it's no slower than a detective film noir from the 40s,
like "Malteese Falcon."  The twist on the detective noir story is that
it's in the future, and it works nicely.  It not only builds up a
wonderful paralellism between humans and androids, but creates a
memorable world (which was nominated for an Oscar, but lost to "E.T" -
okay, let's see: creating an entirely new world, or creating one goddam
little alien?  the choice shouldn't be that hard, folks).
The world that is depicted is one that is totally amazing to view, but
shown in a lovely bit of satirical insight into our world.  What has
happened is we have apparently destroyed earth, and the rich and elite
have moved to the "off-shore colonies," which is shown in ad campaigns
flying around the streets of L.A., which are filled with trash, and
mostly aisians (hmm...).  The rich and elite who haven't off earth live
in the tops of tall buildings, which seems to be the only source of
light in the world.
The direction, script, and acting are very good, although they are all
both dark and brooding, sometimes too much so.  The lighting in the film
is somewhat like that of Ridley's brother Tony's - blue foggy lights -
but used to a poignant and cooler effect (the blue foggy lights in Tony
Scott flicks are there for...um...well, there is no reason why they're
there).  The writing sometimes features some really dumb and corny lines
that aren't always well-said by the actors ("Wake up!  Time to die!"),
but it's plotting is nice, leaving a lot of themes and symbolism to pop
out nicely and smoothly, and for a message to be conveyed, instead of
lost in a stupid action sci-fi pic. 
And the acting is generally good, with notable performances by Rutger
Hauer (who does overdo it a bit towards the end), Sean Young (who gives
what is probably the only good performance of her career), and William
Sanderson (the leader of the "Daryl"s from "Newhart," who gives a
senstive performance as a diseased engineer who helps some of the
replicants out, and actually got a lot of pathos from me).
There are two versions of this flick: the original and the director's
cut.  There seems to be some contreversy over which one is the better
one.  The director's cut doesn't change A LOT, but what it changes are
excellent.  For one thing, the annoying-as-hell, unnecessary, montone
voice-over narration by Harrison Ford is thankfully omitted (some say it
helps; I think it is annoying, and spoon-feeds all the themes to us, not
letting us figure it out).  Another thing is the love between Rachael
and Deckard is actually backed up a little more, making it a tad more
realistic than just some cruel irony tossed in by the writers.
And then there's the ending.  The studios basically fucking freaked when
they saw this original film because it wasn't "Star Wars," and they
realized the general public would hate it.  So they tried their best to
sabotage it, apparently for the better.  So they made him toss in a
stupid final scene where a nice, sun-shiny twist was revealed.  The
director's cut cuts this out, and leaves off with the darker ending,
which suits the film a little better.
But even if you don't see the director's cut, it's an excellent film,
although a tad flawed.  And even if you can't get into the story, or
like any of the characters, at least your mouth can drop at the gorgous
sets, special effects, etc, etc, etc.  And besides, you get to see Daryl
Hannah do the "Onnatop" spiel from "Goldeneye on a lucky Harrison Ford!
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for U Turn (1997)
Director: Oliver Stone
Writer: John Ridley (based on his novel "Stray Dogs")
Starring: Sean Penn, Jennifer Lopez, Nick Nolte, Powers Boothe, Claire
Danes, Joaquin Phoenix, Billy Bob Thornton, Jon Voigt, Julie Haggerty,
Abraham Benrudi, Laurie Metcalf, Liv Tyler
If "U-Turn" is what Oliver Stone does to take a "vacation" from being all
politically cynical, then I wonder what he must do for real vacations. 
Stone has done so much awesome work lately in the arena of political
criticism, as well as media, some of it being barely-well received by
critics and audiences (remember "Nixon?"), and so it's about time he tried
to not be such a political cynic and open his doors to being just a regular
cynic like the rest of us.  The result is this.
"U-Turn" is basically a black comedy a la "After Hours," except that it's
basically a redo of all those old crap film cliches, like a town where
everyone's crooked, there's no industry but a couple convenience stores and
diners, and, well, everyone's just plain weird.  It's also one of those
nightmarish kafkaesque films where everything where Murphy's Law takes into
effect, and everything that could go wrong goes wrong.
But unlike "After Hours," which featured an innocent man plagued by some
kind of weird Job-like bad luck, we are given a detestable creature, a
person who's on the lowest possible rung of the criminal ladder: the slimy
rat who owes money but is constantly running from those who want to collect
it.  He's Bobby Cooper (Sean Penn, making the 97 rounds nicely), and we
meet him as he's driving down the road in the middle of a desert when his
convertible gets a blown radiator hose, and he is forced to stop at the
nearest Arizona town in an effort to get his car fixed.
There, he runs into all kinds of trouble as he meets odd people he probably
shouldn't, and ends up in situations in which he does not belong.  For
instance, he loses all his money when he goes to a convenience store and
some robbers come in and a little gun fight ensues, blowing all his cash
up.  And a bit later, he meets a teenage girl named Jenny (Claire Danes),
who's remarks to him that he wants him to father their "love child" get him
in trouble with her hot-headed and dim-witted boyfriend, Tobey N. Tucker
(Joaquin Phoenix), who says people call him "T.N.T" because when he goes
off, people get hurt.
A couple other people we meet: the inbred hick garage mechanic, Darrell
(Billy Bob Thornton, unrecognizable under about an inch of grease), who's
probably the most evil person in the film; a blind man (Jon Voigt) who says
a couple of meaningful and not-so-meaningful afforisms; the sheriff (Powers
Boothe), who has his paranoid eye on Bobby; and even a diner waitress named
Flo (Julie Haggerty).
But the most notable people he meets are a married couple named Grace and
Jake McKenna (Jennifer Lopez and Nick Nolte, respectively), who hate
eachother so much that each ends up hiring Bobby to kill the other without
the other knowing (a blatant rip-off of "Red Rock West"), causing Bobby to
do some character weighing to see which one he should off if either of
them.
The plot pretty much goes in circles, as we see Bobby being beaten up like
crazy in every other scene, get up, and get beaten up again.  The guy is
already missing two fingers from a scene before the movie (which we are
shown in flashbacks throughout the flick), and we see that this is
basically God's revenge on Bobby for being such a bastard.  The story
becomes a nightmarish revenge story, all the more nightmarish because Penn
makes Bobby such a likable person and we soon sympathize with his plight
and just want him to get the hell out of Dodge.
This is all done with the kind of overdirecting that Oliver Stone is
famous/infamous for.  We get all kinds of wacky camera movements and
angles, cataclysmic editing, some screwing around with the sound track, and
gorgeous cinematography which make this technically amazing, but still a
lot like the headache that "Natural Born Killers" was.  I almost wonder if
Stone can make a technically simple movie anymore, like some of his earlier
work.
Nevertheless, Stone has a personal staple he puts on the film, and all his
technical stuff works this time in creating sheer paranoia, and giving the
film a nightmarish edge that it needs.  Too bad he doesn't really take it
over the edge and give the film a deeper tone, which is what Scorsese did
with "After Hours," turning what could have simply been a "shit happens"
film into an almost brilliant black comedy.  The film needs more of a plot,
which it runs out of about forty-five minutes along, leaving some subplots
(Jenny/Tobey, the guys who he owes the money to, as well as a couple
others) dangling with very little closure.
Oh, and then there's the "attempt" to add a message about, oh I dunno,
manifest destiny and the way we hurt the Native Americans (Lopez's
character is a Native American corrupted by an American).  Just to make
sure we didn't miss his "message," he adds photos of Indian chiefs over the
end credits.  This approach is so underdeveloped that the photos at the end
are a big laugh, and the entire need to add a political subtext to the film
just should have been dropped all together if he couldn't have fit it in in
the film nicely.
But Stone still exhibits a great sarcastic cynical take on life, turning it
into a bit of a pessimistic allegory for life: we're beaten around a lot,
have to deal with people as if not more selfish than we are, and then we're
eventually given the big screw-over by someone we didn't even suspect was
scewing with us in the first place.  He's expanded his pessimism a little
further, but hardly promises the same relief that his political or media
satires promise: that learning from our mistakes can prevent similar things
from happening.  This is more like: life sucks and there's nothing we can
do about it.
Still, for fans of Stone's wild stylistic approach to filmmaking, and
anyone who is into wacky surrealism, as well as a film where every actor
goes deliciously over the top with their performances (yes, even Claire
Danes), this will be pretty pleasing.  It's not a great film, but the
result is a rather fun film which steals from many films (the ending is a
sorta rip-off of "Duel in the Sun"), but still comes off as being at least
marginally entertaining.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Prospero's Books (1991)
Director: Peter Greenaway
Writer: Peter Greenaway (with dialogue from "The Tempest" by William
Shakespeare)
Starring: John Gielgud, Isabelle Pasco, Michael Clark, Michael Blanc,
Erland Josephson
It becomes apparent about 7 minutes into Peter Greenaway's "Prospero's
Books" when John Gielgud says the opening line repeatedly that this will
not be a typical straight translation of Shakespeare's "The Tempest."  In
fact, if the credits did not say that this film was an adaptation of the
classic play, it would probably be very difficult to tell that this is that
play in the first place, even though much of the original dialogue is used.
To call "Prospero's Books" bizarre is an understatement; more like it
should be called "freaky as hell."  It's not a film that is concerned with:
a) telling a story, or b) reciting Shakespeare, but it is concerned with
creating mood, a certain feeling, and addressing some of the more
understated parts of the play, most notably the 24 books that Prospero owns
that he prizes more than his dukedom.  What was in all those books?  Why
are they considered so great?  In fact, the story of "The Tempest" is given
a back seat to these books and various other things.
I never read "The Tempest" (although I did happen to check out a two
paragraph summary of the play prior to seeing it - it helped only
slightly), and anyone who's coming into this film trying to see an
adaptation of the play should go elsewhere.  The story of "The Tempest"
deals with a duke of Milan named Prospero who is driven out of his land by
some of his enemies, and put in a boat with his daughter to die at sea. 
But his friend placed several of his favorite books in the boat with him,
and upon landing at an island, he mastered sorcery, and eventually began to
control the sprites and various fairies that lived there.  However, he
finds that his enemies from before are sailing nearby, and he creates a
tempest to sink their ship, and cause them to come to the island, where he
will exact his revenge on them.  But before he knows it, his daughter,
Miranda, has fallen in love with one of them, and by the finale, Prospero
has forgiven his enemies.
That's "The Tempest."  "Prospero's Books" tells this story, but only
barely.  The film is more interested in setting a mood, and creating a
beautiful and hypnotic look to the film.  For the many sprites, fairies,
and various other people inhabiting the island, there are probably hundreds
of naked extras, all walking around in the buff, and doing various things. 
Even one character, Caliban (dancer Michael Clark), dances everything
wildly, never saying a word.  And the enemies are given wacky period garb,
with giant white collars, and are forced to be tortured by sprits on the
island.
Above everything is John Gielgud, one of the greatest actors of the 20th
century, playing the bitter, angered Prospero, who plans everything that
goes on in the film, and allows Gielgud to give one of the best
performances of his career.  In the film, Prospero is seen writing the play
himself, planning out his revenge carefully, and playing on everything like
a god.  Like a playwright, he holds his enemies in his hands, and anything
he wants to happen to them will happen.  Greenaway uses this approach to
its fullest extent, even going as far as to have Gielgud say all of the
lines for the characters, who often stand mute as Gielgud's voice is filled
in for them.  Not only do you get to hear Gielgud's powerful voice when he
speaks, but you get to hear it distorted a bit when he speaks for others.
And there are the books, which we are shown one-by-one throughout the
course of the film in detail with individual summations done by another
narrator, not speaking Shakespeare like Gielgud is.  The books are often
huge, with magical powers.  For instance, a book on human anatomy pulses
and bleeds when one opens it.  Greenaway was obviously intrigued with the
fact that Prospero took so much pride in owning them that he'd take them
over his dukedom, and by seeing them, it's no wonder why.
Greenaway takes all of these elements (the story, Gielgud's god-like
presence, and the books) and creates one hell of a sensual experience out
of them.  The film is a lavish production, with lots of staginess to them,
and some very beautiful mise-en-scene, some of the best I have ever seen in
my entire life.  The cinematography by Sacha Vierny is absolutely
incredible, and Michael Nyman does yet another brilliant score, even
writing some songs that are presented in certain sections of the film.  The
costumes (and sometimes lack thereof) are ingenius looking, especially
Prospero's long, blue robe that he occasionally wears.  Greenaway
definitely has a way of making a film look just amazing, and I know that
I'm going out on a limb here, but I'd say that Peter Greenaway is probably
the best visual director to ever live...or at least up there.
It becomes obvious that Greenaway's main focus is not really the play, or
the god approach he takes, or even really the books, but that he's really
trying to take film to a whole other plateau.  I wouldn't call this film
"experimental" because it does actually tell the story.  "Prospero's Books"
is actually a whole other kind of film, perhaps "experimental narrative,"
where the story is told, but done in a completely freaky way that has never
been done before.  I've seen this film being judged as strictly an
adaptation of Shakespeare, when it's actually just a meditation on creating
what it must have been like for Prospero.
But Greenaway takes it even further, and makes this film into one of the
very few "abstract" films I've ever seen.  It's not concerned with anything
but being hypnotic and using film's plastic elements to its extremes, or at
least as far as Greenaway can take it.  Books can create a world inside a
person's head, paintings can create a visual experience, music can create
an audio experience.  Film is pretty much all of these.  We get the
visuals, the audio, and anything else that is not shown is left to the
imagination.  Greenaway crafts the film so that the visuals are striking
(not only in mise-en-scene, but the way the screen is done, we see layers
upon layers of different screens, waiting to be peeled away), the audio is
messed with (multiple tracks and whatnot), and in the end, we're still
wondering about the books.  Luckily, it left something to the imagination.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Chienne, La (1931)
Director: Jean Renoir
Writer: Jean Renoir (based on the novel by Georges de la Fouchardiere)
Starring: Michel Simon, Janie Mareze, Georges Flamant, Gaillard,
Magdeleine Berubet
When watching Jean Renoir's early masterpiece, "La Chienne" (literal
translation: "The Female Dog;" less literal translation: "The Bitch"),
one would probably not be shocked at all...until you realize exactly
when this was made.  Then the fact that it was incredibly controversial
is rather clear.
"La Chienne" is a black tragi-comedy, featuring a tragic story told with
a darkly comic edge (just so you get what I was going for).  It tells
the story of Maurice Legrand (Michel Simon), an ugly, spineless,
blue-collar worker, married to Adele (Magdeliene Berubet), a pure bitch
(but not the "bitch" of the title), who is so heartless that she gives
him a feeble allowance on the money he earns at his job, all while she
does nothing.  This whole introduction is built a bit like that one
"Twilight Zone" episode starring Burgess Meredith as the man who likes
to read too much, causing his wife to hate him, as well as everyone else
(he eventually survives nuclear holocaust and finds he has all the time
in the world to read his books - but you know about those TW endings).
Maurice's life changes when he runs into Lucienne "Lulu" Pelletier
(Janie Mareze), a woman who seems to be beaten up by a pimp named Dede
(Georges Flamant).  They begin a lovely little affair, chiefly because
he's utterly unhappy at home, and with good reason.  In Maurice's
pastime, he paints, which soon start to give him a profit when he begins
selling them, which Lulu starts to use.  Soon, Maurice is flat-out in
love with her, and is ready to do anything for her.
The film presents a wonderful character study, all filled with people
who are selfish and sometimes evil.  Maurice is a sympathetic character,
but he's also an adulteror, and still a tad selfish, even if not by
comparison to the other characters.  At one point, a character enters
the story who needs his help, and he only thinks of how he can use him
for his benefit.
The ending is sweetly tragic, with each character getting what's due to
them, yet is filled with a kind of deceptively upbeatness to it all. 
The whole film has a wonderful black comedy undertone, with a lot of the
dialogue being hysterically risque for the early 30s.  The film sets the
tone for the film with a wonderfully original puppet show, presenting
the film as being highly satirical and comical, even if it is tragic.
"Le Chienne" was so risque for its time that it was actually banned in
some countries.  It was never even shown in England and America until
1975 (!!!) because it was so controversial.  I mean the cover shows a
never-seen shot of a violent part of the film (it's a great poster),
showing the extent of how shocking it was for the time.  But anyay, we
also see a lot of great camera-workings, some fantastic early
surrealism, experiments with the narrative, clever writing, and what
seems to be early signs of film noir.  
"La Chienne" is one of those great over-looked films, although it's not
as fantastic and/or memorable as, say, Renoir's later "Grand Illusion." 
But in its own respects, "La Chienne" is an incredible, engrossing
little piece of cinema, and a pure french movie classic.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Out for Justice (1991)
Director: John Flynn
Writer: David Lee Henry
Starring: Steven Seagal, William Forsythe, Jo Champa, Jerry Orbach, Gina
Gershon, Julliana Marguilles, Shannon Whirry, John Leguiziamo, Athena
Massey
It was with a huge lack of something to do that I decided to watch this
on good old UPN on sunday afternoon, when the only good things on TV are
the second-rate movies they show (some are good: they showed "Total
Recall" before this one).  If you know me, I think Seagal is probably
the most boring action star to ever live.  And this includes Keanu
Reeves.
What do I hate about Seagal?  I hate how he uses one facial expression
for every single threatening and non-threatening situation (the
squint).  I hate those scenes in every movie where he goes around,
bullying people up, saying stupid lines with a brooklyn accent more fake
than Burt Reynold's hairpiece in "Boogie Nights."  I despise how he
never gets a bruise in any of his fights.  I hate how every single plot
twist leads to just a melodramatic fight between he and the chief
villain.  I hate his non-satirical messages (in the beginning of this
one, he slaps on a quote from Arthur Miller, which has nothing to do
with the film, except it's about Brooklyn where this film takes place). 
And I hate how he's so narcissistic that he thinks that he can actually
fucking sing (during the end credits, he has a good old hill billy rock
tune sung and penned by him).  Sure, the guy's probably a nice guy in
person (I actually found him very non-threatening when he was on
Letterman not too long ago).  But the guy makes worse films than Reagan
did.
So what's the plot of this shit-terpiece?  Well...something about him
trying to catch a stupid-ass crook (William Forsythe) who shot and
killed his partner in broad daylight.  I couldn't believe how bad this
scene was - the guy was conveniently with his family so we get the
maximum emotional effect (ahem!).  And Forsythe even said some stupid
lines to him before he took off.  I'm sorry, did anyone ever hear of
concealing one's self?
So in comes ex-Brooklynite Seagal, who dedicates his life to catching
this guy.  And I just wished he had caught him in the beginning, then
ended the film.  But NOOOO, this drags on, as he bullies Forsythe's
family members (including a stupid bar-owner, and none other than Gina
Gershon as his other bar-owner sister).  And Forsythe more than once
threatens his family.  At one point, he actually comes to their house
and stalks them like a non-threatening Nicholson in "The Shining"
(complete with them all hiding in the bathroom, but with an added bonus
of one girl conveniently loosing her cool and screaming to give them
away).
Seagal paints himself as a lovable person, with a son, and a fiancee. 
He even shows him hanging with his son, checking up on his homework, and
then about to take him out for a bit of "catch," when he's conveniently
called away on assignment.  I dunno about you, but playing "catch" with
Seagal was one of my childhood nightmares.  He also shows him as that
bad-ass he wants to be, with scenes of him bullying crooks around, and
taking out people who are stupid enough to attack him even after he's
unarmed a chinese guy swinging bats with a pool cue.  Serves them right.
This film, as some of his do, has an interesting supporting cast of
actors who are actually talented, but don't appear to be in this film. 
I already mentioned Gina Gershon (who's pretty horrible in this one), as
well as William Forsythe, who over-acts terribly.  I know this guy can
act: he was awesome in "Raising Arizona" as Goodman's partner in crime. 
But he's just awful here.  Jerry Orbach gives the only credible
performance in the film as the police chief who checks up on Segal after
things have gone down.  Why is he the only one who gives a good
performance?  Well, because his role is small enough and sporadic enough
to not tarnish his credibility.  He seems to be in here just to give it
a cool "Law and Order" feeling (even if it's not a "cool" feeling).  And
in cameos are B-rated erotic-thriller-Cinemax-style stars, Shannon
Whirry (as "Terry Malloy," which is more of a bad joke than a clever
one) and Athena Massey.  Oh!  And "ER"'s Julliana Margiulles has two
scenes.
"Out for Justice" just proves once again that American action films just
suck.  I know that there's such a good thing as good action - he's
called John Woo.  But if you're in the mood for some good old
no-brainer, fun-yet-dumb action, don't bother watching this.  It's so
stupid that it's boring.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/
